<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20020524152844.txt.gz
TIME:20020524152844
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 May 23, 2002 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) Commission File Number: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 4711 Golf Road Skokie, Illinois 60076 (847) 677-2600 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices)
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS. On May 23, 2002, Anixter International Inc., (the "Company"), executed a definitive agreement to acquire the operations and assets of Pentacon, Inc. The Company has agreed to pay $121 million, subject to certain potential purchase price adjustments, for the operations and assets and to assume the trade obligations, active employees and active facility leases of Pentacon, Inc. The Company intends to pay for the acquisition through a combination of current cash balances and added working capital borrowings. The acquisition is expected to be accretive to earnings immediately upon completion of the transaction. Pentacon, Inc. will sell the operations to Anixter as part of a plan of reorganization filed in the United States Bankruptcy court for the Southern District of Texas. The purchase of the Pentacon, Inc. operations and assets are conditioned upon a number of factors, including approval by the Bankruptcy Court and anti-trust clearance. A copy of the press release issued by the Company announcing the agreement with Pentacon, Inc. is filed as Exhibit 99 to this Report and is incorporated herein by reference. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. 99 Press release issued by Anixter International Inc. on May 23, 2002.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: May 23, 2002 By: /s/ Robert W. Grubbs __________________________________ Robert W. Grubbs President and Chief Executive Officer Date: May 23, 2002 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham __________________________________ Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description of Exhibits -- ----------------------- 99 Press Release issued by Anixter International Inc. on May 23, 2002.
EXHIBIT 99 FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: Dennis Letham Chris Kettmann H. Patel Chief Financial Officer Investor Inquiries Media Inquiries (847) 715-2601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE THURSDAY, May 23, 2002 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL ANNOUNCES PROPOSED ACQUISITION OF THE OPERATIONS AND ASSETS OF PENTACON, INC. SKOKIE, IL, May 23, 2002 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE), the largest global distributor and logistics services provider of wire, cable and connectors, said today that its has executed a definitive agreement to acquire the operations and assets of Pentacon, Inc. (OTC BB: PTAC.OB). Anixter has agreed to pay $121 million, subject to certain potential purchase price adjustments, for the operations and assets and to assume the trade obligations, active employees and active facility leases of Pentacon. Pentacon will sell the operations to Anixter as part of a plan of reorganization filed in the United States Bankruptcy court for the Southern District of Texas. The purchase of the Pentacon operations and assets are conditioned upon a number of factors, including approval by the Bankruptcy Court and anti-trust clearance. Pentacon is an industry leader in the provision of advanced inventory management services for fasteners and small parts including procurement, just-in-time delivery, quality assurance testing, kitting, and e-commerce and electronic data interchange to a broad spectrum of industrial and aerospace customers. For the full-year 2001, Pentacon had revenues of $259.4 million and some of its top customers include Boeing, Bombardier, Cummins, and Harley Davidson. Commenting on the proposed acquisition, Robert W. Grubbs, President and CEO of Anixter International, said, "Pentacon's business model, position as a value-added distributor and brand name, Fortune 500 customer base are perfect complements to our current integrated supply and specialty wire and cable OEM businesses. This acquisition allows us to broaden our product offering and presents the opportunity for enhanced organic growth of both Anixter and Pentacon, all while maintaining our focus on bringing increased value to our suppliers and customers. We also believe there are long-term cross selling opportunities as a result of this acquisition." "The various operations that comprise Pentacon have each had long and successful operating track records. The operating performance, however, has been overshadowed by the high amount of leverage and high cost of capital that was incurred in building Pentacon. We believe that by removing the costs and uncertainty associated with the capital structure, the Pentacon operations will be able to grow and be a full participant in the emerging economic recovery," continued Grubbs. Grubbs concluded, "The proposed transaction is an excellent way for Anixter to use its distribution know-how to effectively deploy the significant amounts of free cash flow that has been generated over the past few quarters. We intend to pay for the acquisition through a combination of current cash balances and added working capital borrowings. The acquisition is expected to be accretive to earnings immediately upon completion of the transaction." About Anixter - ------------- Anixter International is the largest global distributor and logistics services provider of wire, cable and connectors for use in data, voice, electrical and electronic applications.. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) the largest technical sales force in the industry, 2) more than 92,000 products and over $450 million in inventory, 3) 103 warehouses with more than 4 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 175 cities in 40 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, exchange rate fluctuations, and new or changed competitors. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. Additional information about Pentacon is available on the Internet at www.pentacon.com ---------------- Additional information about Anixter is available on the Internet at www.anixter.com ---------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20021002102830.txt.gz
TIME:20021002102830
EVENTS:	Acquisition or disposition of assets
TEXT:
ITEM: Acquisition or disposition of assets
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 September 20, 2002 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) Commission File Number: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 4711 Golf Road Skokie, Illinois 60076 (847) 677-2600 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices)
ITEM 2. ACQUISITION OR DISPOSITION OF ASSETS. On September 20, 2002, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"), completed the purchase of the operations and assets of Pentacon, Inc., a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts to Original Equipment Manufacturers and provider of inventory management services, pursuant to Pentacon's plan of reorganization filed under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code. Pentacon has 30 distribution and sales facilities in the United States, along with sales offices and agents in Europe, Canada, Mexico and Australia. The Company paid a total of $108.2 million for assets with a net book value of approximately $87.3 million. The net assets primarily consist of accounts receivable, inventory, office and warehouse equipment and furnishings, accounts payable and select operating liabilities. The Company agreed to hire the existing Pentacon employees and assume the lease obligations for current operating facilities. The acquired assets will be used in substantially the same manner in which they were utilized by Pentacon. In addition, the Company will incur approximately $3.0 million of transaction related costs that will be capitalized as part of the acquisition. The terms of the acquisition were determined through arms-length negotiations between the Company and Pentacon and were confirmed by the Bankruptcy Court on September 9, 2002. The acquisition is expected to be accretive to earnings for the three months ending January 3, 2003. The purchase was funded using a combination of invested cash balances and borrowings under existing working capital and accounts receivable securitization facilities. Borrowings under existing working capital facilities were with a number of banks and institutional lenders led by Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent, Bank One, N.A., as syndication agent, The Bank of Nova Scotia, as documentation agent and Credit Lyonnais Chicago Branch and Suntrust Bank, as managing agents. The Company's accounts receivable securitization facility is led by Bank One, N.A., as agent. As of the closing date, the Company's total outstanding debt balance, including amounts outstanding under its accounts receivable securitization facility, was $353.2 million. As of the same date, the Company's debt to total capital ratio is now 36.6 percent as compared to 40.6 percent at the end of December 2001. Samuel Zell, chairman of the Company, is an indirect beneficial owner of 24.5 percent of Pentacon's Senior Subordinated Notes. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired. The financial statements required to be filed by this Item are not included in this report, but will be filed by amendment not later than 60 days after the date that this Current Report on Form 8-K is required to be filed. (b) Pro Forma Financial Information. The pro forma financial information required to be filed by this Item is not included in this report, but will be filed by amendment not later than 60 days after the date that this Current Report on Form 8-K is required to be filed. (c) Exhibits. Asset Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 23, 2002, by and between Anixter International Inc. and Pentacon, Inc., Pentacon Deleware, Inc., JIT Holdings, Inc., Pentacon Properties, L.P., Pentacon International Sales, Inc., Pentacon Aerospace Group, Inc., Pentacon USA, L.P., Pentacon Industrial, Inc., Pentacon Europe Limited, Pentacon Mexico S.A. de C.V. and Pentacon Canada Corporation.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: October 1, 2002 By: /s/ Robert W. Grubbs ---------------------- Robert W. Grubbs President and Chief Executive Officer Date: October 1, 2002 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ----------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description of Exhibits - ----------- ----------------------- 2.1 Asset Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 23, 2002, by and between Anixter International Inc. and Pentacon, Inc., Pentacon Deleware, Inc., JIT Holdings, Inc., Pentacon Properties, L.P., Pentacon International Sales, Inc., Pentacon Aerospace Group, Inc., Pentacon USA, L.P., Pentacon Industrial, Inc., Pentacon Europe Limited, Pentacon Mexico S.A. de C.V. and Pentacon Canada Corporation.

ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT by and between Anixter International Inc. and Pentacon, Inc. Pentacon Delaware, Inc. JIT Holdings, Inc. Pentacon Properties, L.P. Pentacon International Sales, Inc. Pentacon Aerospace Group, Inc. Pentacon USA, L.P. Pentacon Industrial, Inc Pentacon Europe Limited Pentacon Mexico S.A. de C.V. Pentacon Canada Corporation May 23, 2002
ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT This Asset Purchase Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of May ____, 2002, by and between Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Buyer") and Pentacon, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Pentacon"), and the following subsidiaries of Pentacon: Pentacon Delaware, Inc., a Delaware corporation, JIT Holdings, Inc., a Texas corporation, Pentacon Properties, L.P., a Texas limited partnership, Pentacon International Sales, Inc., a United States Virgin Islands corporation, Pentacon Aerospace Group, Inc., a Nevada corporation, Pentacon USA, L.P., a Texas limited partnership, Pentacon Industrial Group, Inc, a Nevada corporation, Pentacon Europe Limited, a company incorporated under the laws of the United Kingdom, Pentacon Mexico S.A. de C.V., a company incorporated under the laws of Mexico, Pentacon Canada Corporation, a company incorporated under the laws of Canada (each a "Seller," and together the "Sellers"). PRELIMINARY STATEMENT A. Sellers are filing a voluntary petition (the "Bankruptcy Petition") for relief under Chapter 11 of Title 11 of the United States Code, 11 U.S.C. Sections 101, et seq. (the "Bankruptcy Code"), in the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of Texas (the "Bankruptcy Court") and are filing, contemporaneously therewith, a pre-negotiated plan of reorganization ("Plan") and disclosure statement ("Disclosure Statement"); and B. Subject to the approval of the Bankruptcy Court, Sellers desire to sell to Buyer, and Buyer desires to purchase from Sellers, substantially all of Sellers' assets, through the Plan and Disclosure Statement in accordance with the Bankruptcy Code, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement. AGREEMENT The parties, intending to be legally bound, agree as follows: Article 1 CONSTRUCTION AND DEFINITIONS 1.1 CONSTRUCTION Any reference in this Agreement to an "Article," "Section" or "Schedule" refers to the corresponding Article, Section or Schedule of or to this Agreement, unless the context indicates otherwise. The headings of Articles and Sections are provided for convenience only and should not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement. All words used in this Agreement should be construed to be of such gender or number as the circumstances require. The terms "include" and "including" indicate examples of a foregoing general statement and not a limitation on that general statement. Any reference to a statute refers to the statute, any amendments or successor legislation, and all regulations promulgated under or implementing the statute, as in effect at the relevant time. Any reference to a Contract or other document as of a given date means the Contract or other document as amended, supplemented and modified from time to time through such date. 1.2 DEFINITIONS For the purposes of this Agreement, the following terms and variations on them have the meanings specified in this Section: "Accountants" is defined in Section 2.6. "Accounts Receivable" means (a) all trade accounts receivable and other rights to payment from customers of Sellers and the full benefit of all security for such accounts or rights to payment, including all trade accounts receivable representing amounts receivable in respect of goods shipped, products sold or services rendered to customers of Sellers, (b) all other accounts or notes receivable of Sellers and the full benefit of all security for such accounts or notes, and (c) any claim, remedy or other right related to any of the foregoing. "Accrued Liabilities" is defined in Section 2.3. "Active Employee" means an employee of a Seller immediately prior to the Closing Date, including an employee on temporary leave of absence, family medical leave, military leave, temporary disability leave or sick leave, but excluding an employee on long-term disability leave or any employee employed at a Facility which is an Excluded Asset. "Actual Cumulative EBITDA Ratio" is defined in Section 9.1(g). "Actual Monthly EBITDA Ratio" is defined in Section 9.1(g). "Adverse Consequence" means any Liability, loss, damage (including incidental and consequential damages), claim, cost, deficiency, diminution of value, or expense (including costs of investigation and defense, penalties and reasonable legal fees and costs), whether or not involving a third-party claim. "Ancillary Agreements" is defined in Section 2.9. "Assets" is defined in Section 2.1. "Assignment and Assumption Agreement" is defined in Section 2.9(a)(ii). "Assignment and Assumption of Lease Agreements" is defined in Section 2.9(a)(iii). "Assumed Liabilities" is defined in Section 2.3. "Balance Sheet" is defined in Section 3.3. "Bankruptcy Case" meansthe bankruptcy case filed by Sellers in the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of Texas. "Benefit Plan" means each "employee pension benefit plan" as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA, each "employee welfare benefit plan" as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA, and each agreement, plan, program, fund, policy, contract or arrangement (whether written or unwritten) providing compensation, benefits, pension, retirement, profit sharing, stock bonus, stock option, stock purchase, phantom or stock equivalent, bonus, incentive, deferred compensation, hospitalization, medical, dental, vision, vacation, life insurance, death benefit, sick pay, disability, severance, termination indemnity, redundancy pay, educational assistance, holiday pay, housing assistance, moving expense reimbursement, fringe benefit or similar employee benefits covering any employee, former employee, or the beneficiaries and dependents of any employee or former employee. "Best Efforts" means the efforts that a prudent Person desirous of achieving a result would use in similar circumstances to achieve that result as expeditiously as possible. "Bid Procedures Order" is defined in Section 10.2. "Bill of Sale" is defined in Section 2.9(a)(i). "Break-Up Fee" is defined in Section 10.2(f). "Business Plan" means Sellers' 2002 business plan, approved by Pentacon's board of directors, as provided to Buyer by Robert L. Ruck during his visit to Buyer the week of March 18, 2002. "Buyer" is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Buyer DIP" is defined in Section 2.11. "Buyer's Disclosure Schedule" means the disclosure schedule delivered pursuant to Article 4 by Buyer to Sellers concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, together with any updates to it permitted by this Agreement. "Buyer Indemnitees" is defined in Section 11.2. "Cash" means all cash, including cash held in lock-boxes, and cash equivalents, marketable securities and short-term investments of a Seller. "Cash Portion of the Purchase Price" means, subject to the adjustment contemplated by Section 2.6 and Section 5.10, $121,000,000, minus (i) the amount of the Scheduled Liabilities, (ii) the outstanding principal balance under the Buyer DIP and accrued but unpaid interest thereon, (iii) any payment made by Sellers between the date of the Closing Balance Sheet and the Closing Date to satisfy any Liability other than the Assumed Liabilities. "Cleanup" means any investigative, monitoring, cleanup, removal, containment or other remedial or response action required by any Environmental Law. The terms "removal," "remedial" and "response action" include the types of activities covered by the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act. "Closing" means the consummation and completion of the purchase and sale of the Assets. "Closing Balance Sheet" is defined in Section 2.6. "Closing Date" means the date on which the Closing actually takes place. "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. "Competing Agreement" is defined in Section 10.2(a). "Competing Transaction" is defined in Section 10.1. "Confidential Information" means all non-public information of Sellers in any form, including: (i) all information relating to Sellers' trade secrets (including all information that applicable law defines as "trade secrets"); (ii) all information concerning products, product specifications, data, know-how, formulae, compositions, processes, designs, sketches, photographs, graphs, drawings, samples, inventions, ideas, know-how, past, current, and planned research and development, current and planned methods and processes, customer lists, current and anticipated customer requirements, price lists, market studies, business plans, business opportunities, computer hardware, computer software (including object and source codes), and computer software and database technologies, systems, structures and architectures; (iii) all information concerning Sellers' business and affairs, historical and current financial statements, financial projections and budgets, historical, current and projected sales, capital spending budgets, strategic plans, marketing and advertising plans, publications, agreements, client and customer lists and files, the names and backgrounds of key personnel, and personnel training techniques and materials; and (iv) all third-party confidential information lawfully in the possession of Seller. "Confirmation Order" means an order or orders of the Bankruptcy Court, in form and substance reasonably acceptable to Sellers and Buyer, which contain(s), without limitation, the following: (1) confirmation of the Plan; (2) approval of this Agreement and all terms and conditions hereof; (3) transfer of the Assets to Buyer free and clear of all interests (as such term is used in the Bankruptcy Code) other than Assumed Liabilities; and (4) a finding that the Buyer has acted in good faith within the meaning of 11 U.S.C. 363(m). "Consent" means any approval, consent, ratification, waiver or other authorization. "Contemplated Transactions" means all of the transactions to be carried out in accordance with this Agreement, including the purchase and sale of the Assets, the assumption of the Assumed Liabilities, the performance by the parties of their other obligations under this Agreement, the filing of the Bankruptcy Petition and the correspondent Plan and Disclosure Statement, and the execution, delivery and performance of the Ancillary Agreements. "Continued Employees" is defined in Section 13.2. "Contract" means any contract, agreement, commitment, understanding, lease, license, franchise, warranty, guaranty, mortgage, note, bond or other instrument or consensual obligation (whether written or oral and whether express or implied) that is legally binding. "Contravene" -- an act or omission would "Contravene" something if, as the context requires: (a) the act or omission would conflict with it, violate it, result in a breach or violation of or failure to comply with it, or constitute a default under it; (b) the act or omission would give any Governmental Body or other Person the right to challenge, revoke, withdraw, suspend, cancel, terminate or modify it, to exercise any remedy or obtain any relief under it, or to declare a default or accelerate the maturity of any obligation under it; or (c) the act or omission would result in the creation of an Encumbrance on the stock or assets of any Seller. "Cure" means the amount of cash required for the cure necessary to assume, or assume and assign, a Contract which is a Contract that is part of the Assets, pursuant to the requirements of Section 365(b) of the Bankruptcy Code. "Encumbrance" means any charge, claim, mortgage, servitude, easement, right of way, community or other marital property interest, covenant, equitable interest, license, lease or other possessory interest, lien, option, pledge, security interest, preference, priority, right of first refusal or similar restriction; provided, however, that the term "Encumbrance" does not include (a) mechanic's, materialman's or similar liens with respect to amounts not yet due and payable, (b) liens for Taxes not yet due and payable and (c) liens securing rental payments under capital lease arrangements. "Environment" means soil, land surface or subsurface strata, surface waters (including navigable water and ocean waters), groundwaters, drinking water supply, stream sediments, ambient air, plant life, animal life, and any other similar medium or natural resource. "Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities" means any Adverse Consequence arising from or under Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law, including those consisting of or relating to (a) any environmental, health or safety matter or condition (including on-site or off-site contamination, occupational safety and health and regulation of any chemical substance or product) or (b) any other compliance, corrective or remedial measures required under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law. "Environmental Law" means any applicable Law that relates to the protection of the Environment, including those related to the storage, use treatment, transport, disposal and remediation of Hazardous Materials. "ERISA" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. "ERISA Affiliate" means any other Person that, together with a Seller, would be treated as a single employer under Code Section 414. "Escrow Agent" is defined in Section 2.9(a)(vii). "Escrow Agreement" is defined in Section 2.9(a)(vii). "Excluded Assets" is defined in Section 2.2. "Excluded Contracts" is defined in Section 2.2. "Facility" means any Real Property or any equipment (including motor vehicles, tank cars and rolling stock) owned or operated by any Seller, including the Real Property and equipment used or operated by a Seller at the respective locations of the Real Property listed in Section 3.7(a) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule, excluding those constituting Excluded Assets. "GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles for financial reporting in the United States. "Governing Document" means any charter, articles, bylaws, certificate, statement, statutes or similar document adopted, filed or registered in connection with the creation, formation or organization of an entity, and any Contract among all equityholders, partners or members of an entity. "Governmental Authorization" means any Consent, license, permit or registration issued, granted, given or otherwise made available by or under the authority of any Governmental Body or pursuant to any Law. "Governmental Body" means any (a) nation, region, state, county, city, town, village, district or other jurisdiction, (b) federal, state, local, municipal, foreign or other government, (c) governmental or quasi-governmental authority of any nature (including any governmental agency, branch, department or other entity and any court or other tribunal), (d) multinational organization, or body exercising, or entitled to exercise, any administrative, executive, judicial, legislative, policy, regulatory or taxing authority or power of any nature, or (e) official of any of the foregoing. "Hazardous Activity" means the distribution, generation, handling, importing, management, manufacturing, processing, production, refinement, Release, storage, transfer, transportation, treatment or use (including any withdrawal or other use of groundwater) of Hazardous Materials in, on, under, about or from any of the Facilities or any part thereof into the Environment. "Hazardous Material" means any waste or other substance that is listed, defined, designated or classified as, or otherwise determined to be, hazardous waste, radioactive or a pollutant or contaminant under any Environmental Law, and specifically including petroleum and asbestos or asbestos-containing materials. "HSR Act" means the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976. "Improvements" means all buildings, structures, fixtures and other improvements located on the Real Property. "include" and "including" as used in this Agreement indicate examples of a foregoing general statement and not a limitation on that general statement. "Indemnified Person" is defined in Section 11.7(a). "Indemnifying Person" is defined in Section 11.7(a). "Insurance Policy" means any written contract whereby one party undertakes to defend, indemnify or guaranty another party against loss by certain specified risks, contingencies or perils, including payment bonds, performance bonds, fidelity bonds, financial guaranty bonds and similar instruments and arrangements. "Intellectual Property" means any intellectual property owned, used or licensed (as licensor or licensee) by a Seller, including (a) such Seller's name, assumed business names and corporate names, (b) patents, patent disclosures, trademarks, service marks, trade dress, trade names, logos, copyrights and mask works, and all registrations, applications and goodwill associated with the foregoing, (c) all computer software (including source and object codes), databases, data models or structures, algorithms, system architectures and related documentation, data and manuals, (d) trade secrets, know-how and confidential business information (including information concerning products, product specifications, data, formulae, compositions, designs, sketches, photographs, graphs, drawings, samples, inventions, discoveries, ideas, past, current, and planned research and development, current and planned methods and processes, client and customer lists and files, current and anticipated client and customer requirements, vendor and supplier lists and files, price lists, market studies, business plans, business opportunities and financial data), (e) rights in Internet web sites and domain names used by such Seller and (f) rights in electronic mail addresses and in telephone, facsimile, cable or similar numbers used by such Seller. "Interim Balance Sheet" is defined in Section 3.3. "Inventories" means all inventories of a Seller, wherever located, including all finished goods, work in process, raw materials, spare parts and all other materials and supplies to be used or consumed by a Seller in the production of finished goods. "IRS" means the Internal Revenue Service or any successor agency and, to the extent relevant, the Department of Treasury. "Knowledge" means, with respect to Sellers, the actual knowledge after reasonable investigation of Robert L. Ruck, James C. --------- Jackson, Jay D. McFadyen, Cary M. Grossman, Kent D. Rosenthal or Joseph Homa. "Law" means any constitution, law, statute, treaty, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, relevant case law or principle of common law of any Governmental Body. "Liabilities" includes liabilities or obligations of any nature, whether known or unknown, whether absolute, accrued, contingent, choate, inchoate or otherwise, whether due or to become due, and whether or not required to be reflected on a balance sheet prepared in accordance with GAAP. "Material Adverse Effect" means any effect that is reasonably likely to be materially adverse to the business, condition (financial or otherwise), operations or results of operations of business represented by the Assets and Assumed Liabilities. "Multiemployer Plan" has the meaning specified in ERISA Section 3(37)(A). "Net Assets" is defined on Schedule 2.5. "Occupational Safety and Health Law" means any Law designed to provide safe and healthful working conditions and to reduce occupational safety and health hazards. "Order" means any order, injunction, judgment, decree, ruling, assessment or arbitration award of any Governmental Body or arbitrator and any Contract with any Governmental Body pertaining to compliance with Law. "Ordinary Course of Business" refers to actions taken in Sellers' normal operation, consistent with past practice and financial condition and having no Material Adverse Effect. "Other Benefit Obligation" means any material obligation, arrangement or customary practice owed, adopted or followed by any Seller or any ERISA Affiliate, whether or not legally enforceable, to provide benefits, other than salary, as compensation for services rendered, to present or former directors, officers, employees or agents, other than obligations, arrangements and practices that are Benefit Plans. Other Benefit Obligations include material consulting agreements under which the compensation paid does not depend upon the amount of service rendered, sabbatical policies and severance payment policies. "Person" refers to an individual or an entity, including a corporation, share company, limited liability company, partnership, trust, association, Governmental Body or any other body with legal personality separate from its equityholders or members. "Petition Date" means the date on which Sellers file the Bankruptcy Petition. "Plan" is defined in the Preliminary Statement. "Plan Sponsor" has the meaning specified in ERISA Section 3(16)(B). "Proceeding" means any action, arbitration, audit, examination, investigation, hearing, litigation or suit (whether civil, criminal, administrative, judicial or investigative, whether formal or informal, and whether public or private) commenced, brought, conducted or heard by or before, or otherwise involving, any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "Purchase Price" is defined in Section 2.5. "Qualified Plan" means any Benefit Plan that meets or purports to meet the requirements of Code Section 401(a). "Real Property" is defined in Section 3.8(b). "Real Property Leases" is defined in Section 3.8(b). "Real Estate Permitted Encumbrances" shall mean: (i) All building codes and zoning ordinances and other laws, ordinances, regulations, rules, orders or determinations of any federal, state, county, municipal or other governmental authority heretofore, now or hereafter enacted, made or issued by any such governmental authority affecting the Real Property; (ii) All easements, rights-of-way, covenants, conditions, restrictions, reservations, licenses, agreements and other similar matters of record incurred or suffered that would not have a Material Adverse Effect; (iii) All encroachments, overlaps, boundary line disputes, shortages in area, drainage and other similar easements, rights of persons in possession and other matters not of record which would be disclosed by an accurate survey or inspection of the Real Property and that would not have a Material Adverse Effect; (iv) All electric power, telephone, gas, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, water, steam, compressed air and other utility lines, pipelines, service lines and similar facilities now located on, over or under the Real Property, and all licenses, easements, flowage rights, rights of way and other similar agreements relating thereto that would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and (v) All existing public and private roads and streets (whether dedicated or undedicated), and all railroad lines and rights-of-way affecting the Real Property. "Records" means information relating to the operations of a Seller that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form, including all client and customer lists, price lists, competitive analyses, referral sources, research and development reports and records, production reports and records, service and warranty records, equipment logs, operating guides and manuals, plans, specifications, confidential information, financial and accounting records, creative materials, advertising materials, promotional materials, studies, reports, correspondence and similar documents, and personnel and employee benefits records. "Refundable Income Tax Amount" means the refundable income tax amount of $3,789,000 identified in Pentacon's 2002 1st Quarter filing on Form 10-Q. "Related Person" means, with respect to a particular Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by or under common control with, such Person and, with respect to an individual, any other individual that is a member of the individual's immediate family (by blood, marriage or adoption), a member of the individual's household, an entity in which the individual participates in management or an employee or employer of the individual. For purposes of this definition, "control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of an entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities or otherwise, and will be construed in accordance with the rules promulgated under the Securities Act. "Release" means any release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, pouring, dumping, emptying, injection, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration on or into the Environment or into or out of any property. "Release Agreement" is defined in Section 2.9(a)(viii). "Representative" means, with respect to a particular Person, any director, officer, employee, agent, consultant, advisor, investment banker, legal counsel, accountant or other representative of that Person. "Retained Liabilities" is defined in Section 2.4. "Scheduled Liabilities" is defined in Section 2.3. "Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933. "Seller" and "Sellers" are defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Seller Benefit Plan" means any Benefit Plan covering any Active Employee or any dependent or beneficiary thereof, of which a Seller or an ERISA Affiliate is a Plan Sponsor, to which any Seller or an ERISA Affiliate contributes, has contributed, or with respect to which has any liability, or in which any Seller or an ERISA Affiliate otherwise participates or has participated. "Seller Contract" means any Contract under or by which (a) a Seller has or may acquire rights, (b) a Seller is or may become subject to any Liability or (c) a Seller or any of the Assets is or may become bound. "Seller Indemnitees" is defined in Section 11.3. "Sellers' Disclosure Schedule" means the disclosure schedule delivered pursuant to Article 3 by Sellers to Buyer concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, together with any updates to it permitted by this Agreement. Each section or subsection of Article 3, as applicable, will be accompanied by a corresponding section of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. If no qualification to a representation or warranty made in such section or subsection of Article 3 is warranted, Sellers will indicate "none" on the corresponding section of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. "Senior Subordinated Debt" is defined in Section 5.3. "Stockholders" means the stockholders of Pentacon. "Tangible Personal Property" means all machinery, equipment, tools, furniture, office equipment, computer hardware, supplies, materials, vehicles and other items of tangible personal property (other than Inventories) of every kind owned or leased by a Seller, together with any express or implied warranty by the manufacturers or sellers or lessors of any item or component part thereof, and all maintenance records and other documents relating thereto. "Tax" or "Taxes" means all federal, state, local, foreign and other taxes, charges, fees, duties (including customs duties), levies or assessments, including income, gross receipts, net proceeds, alternative or add-on minimum, ad valorem, turnover, real and personal property (tangible and intangible), sales, use, franchise, excise, value added, stamp, leasing, lease, user, transfer, fuel, excess profits, occupational, interest equalization, windfall profits, severance, license, payroll, environmental, capital stock, disability, employee's income withholding, other withholding, unemployment and social security taxes, that are imposed by any Governmental Body, including obligations under abandoned property laws, and including any interest, penalties or additions to tax attributable thereto. "Tax Return" means any report, return or other information required to be supplied to a Governmental Body in connection with any Taxes. "365 Order" means a final, non-appealable order, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Buyer which provides that the Sellers have assumed and assigned to Buyer all Contracts which are Assets pursuant to 11 U.S.C. s. 365(b), (c) & (f). "Transition Employees" means Robert L. Ruck, James C. Jackson, Kent D. Rosenthal and Jay D. McFadyen. "Transition Services Agreement" means the agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(a)(vi), providing for the transition payments described in Schedule 2.9. "Vendor Liabilities" is defined in Section 2.3. "WARN Act" means the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act." Article 2 SALE AND TRANSFER OF ASSETS; CLOSING 2.1 ASSETS TO BE SOLD Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, at the Closing, each Seller will sell, convey, assign, transfer and deliver to Buyer, and Buyer will purchase and acquire from each Seller, all of such Seller's right, title and interest in and to substantially all of such Seller's assets on the Closing Date, including the following (the "Assets"): (a) all Cash and related bank accounts; (b) all customer Contracts and relationships; (c) all Accounts Receivable; (d) all Inventories; (e) all prepaid and other assets, including lease, utility and similar deposits, service or maintenance contracts, dues and subscriptions, guarantees, bonds or other rights; (f) all Real Property and Tangible Personal Property; (g) all books and Records insofar as the same relate to Assets otherwise described in this Section 2.1 or to Assumed Liabilities; (h) all Intellectual Property; (i) all operating leases, capital leases and Contracts to which such Seller is a party as of the Closing Date or the full benefits of all operating leases, capital leases and Contracts used in the business of Sellers to which such Seller is a third-party beneficiary; (j) all vendor Contracts; (k) all rights and interests under each Insurance Policy, including claims and rights to insurance proceeds, refunds or awards, to the extent they relate to the Assets or Assumed Liabilities; (l) all Tax refunds of Sellers, including the Refundable Income Tax Amount, other than property Tax refunds and other Tax refund amounts specifically related to Excluded Assets or Retained Liabilities; (m) all claims, rights and defenses of a Seller against third parties relating to any of the Assets or Assumed Liabilities, whether choate or inchoate, known or unknown, contingent or non-contingent, including all attorney work-product protections, attorney-client privileges and other legal protections and privileges to which such Seller may be entitled in connection with any of the Assets or Assumed Liabilities; and (n) all Seller Benefit Plans and any related assets, trusts and Insurance Policies. 2.2 EXCLUDED ASSETS Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 2.1 or elsewhere in this Agreement, the following assets of each Seller (collectively, the "Excluded Assets") are not part of the sale and purchase contemplated by this Agreement, are excluded from the Assets, and will remain the property of such Seller after the Closing: (a) subject to Section 5.10, all Contracts identified on Schedule 2.2(a) (the "Excluded Contracts"); (b) all minute books, stock records and corporate seals; (c) all shares of the capital stock of a Seller held in treasury and capital stock, limited partnership interests and other equity interests of direct and indirect subsidiaries of Pentacon; (d) assets designated as being excluded on Schedule 2.2(d); (e) all personnel records and other Records that a Seller is required by law to retain in its possession; (f) all insurance proceeds, refunds or awards with respect thereto and returns of premium with respect thereto, to the extent they relate to the Excluded Assets or the Excluded Liabilities; (g) all inter-company accounts receivable; (h) all rights of a Seller under this Agreement or any of the Ancillary Agreements to which a Seller is a party; (i) any claims, actions, causes of action or rights which Sellers may now or hereafter possess that are not related to the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities; and (j) all preference actions and fraudulent transfer or conveyance claims arising out of or related to any case under the Bankruptcy Code except to the extent such claims relate to Assumed Liabilities or the Assets. 2.3 ASSUMED LIABILITIES Effective as of the Closing, Buyer will pay or assume and agree to discharge only the following Liabilities of Sellers (collectively, the "Assumed Liabilities"): (a) the accounts payable of Sellers on the Closing Date relating to the Assets (i) which were outstanding on the Petition Date, or (ii) which were incurred after the Petition Date in accordance with this Agreement, provided that Buyer shall not assume the accounts payable of Sellers set forth on Schedule 2.3(a) ("Excluded Payables") (the accounts payable assumed by Buyer in clause (i) and (ii) are referred to as the "Pre-Petition Payables" and "Post Petition Payables," respectively, and collectively as the "Vendor Liabilities"), (b) such other contract liabilities in the amounts set forth on Schedule 2.3(b) ("Scheduled Liabilities"), (c) such accrued expenses as are set forth on Schedule 2.3(c) ("Accrued Liabilities"), (d) all obligations and liabilities under the written terms of any Contracts, operating leases, capital leases or other agreements included within the Assets, including the Cure which has been finally determined in the Bankruptcy Case on or prior to the Closing and included on the Closing Balance Sheet, and (e) all principal and interest outstanding under the Buyer DIP. 2.4 RETAINED LIABILITIES The Retained Liabilities will remain the sole responsibility of and will be retained, paid, performed and discharged solely by Sellers. "Retained Liabilities" will mean every Liability of each Seller, whether known or unknown, fixed or contingent, other than the Assumed Liabilities. 2.5 PURCHASE PRICE Subject to the adjustment contemplated by Section 2.6 and Section 5.10, the purchase price for the Assets will be $121,000,000, plus the assumption of the Assumed Liabilities, plus interest on the amount of the Pre-Petition Payables from the Petition Date to the Closing Date at the per annum rate of 5%, minus (i) the amount of the Scheduled Liabilities, (ii) the outstanding principal balance and accrued but unpaid interest of the Buyer DIP and (iii) any payment made by Sellers between the date of the Closing Balance Sheet and the Closing Date to satisfy any Liability other than the Assumed Liabilities (the "Purchase Price"). The Purchase Price will be paid at the Closing in the following manner: (a) Buyer will pay to Pentacon in cash for distribution pursuant to the Plan the Cash Portion of the Purchase Price less $1,000,000; (b) Buyer will deposit with the Escrow Agent the sum of $1,000,000, which will be held in escrow for a period of 6 months following the Closing to secure the performance of each Seller's obligations under this Agreement; and (c) Buyer will pay the Pre-Petition Payables, plus interest thereon from the Petition Date to the Closing Date at the rate of 5% per annum, (d) Buyer will pay any other Assumed Liabilities, due and payable at the Closing and will discharge all other Assumed Liabilities, as and when they become due and payable. If Sellers' Net Assets (as defined in Schedule 2.5) as of the date of the Closing Balance Sheet are higher or lower than the Net Assets set forth on the Interim Balance Sheet, the Purchase Price will be adjusted upward or downward, respectively, on a dollar-for-dollar basis by such amount in accordance with Section 2.6 below. 2.6 ADJUSTMENT Pentacon will prepare and deliver to Buyer, within ten business days after the last day of the month immediately prior to Closing, Pentacon's pro forma consolidated balance sheet for such month, which shall contain such pro forma adjustments to reflect the elimination from such balance sheet of any assets which are not Assets and any liabilities which are not Assumed Liabilities (the "Closing Balance Sheet") and all supporting schedules. The Closing Balance Sheet (i) will include as a liability the amount of the Cure constituting an Assumed Liability, and (ii) will be prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a basis consistent with the preparation of the Interim Balance Sheet without giving effect to any purchase accounting adjustments arising from the Contemplated Transactions. If Sellers' Net Assets as of the date of the Closing Balance Sheet are higher or lower than the Net Assets as of the date of the Interim Balance Sheet, the Purchase Price will be adjusted upward or downward, on a dollar-for-dollar basis by such amount. Sellers and Buyer will act in good faith to resolve between themselves any disputes regarding the Closing Balance Sheet. If they are unable to do so within five business days after Buyer's receipt of the Closing Balance Sheet, then the issues in dispute will be submitted to Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, certified public accountants (the "Accountants"), for resolution. Each party will furnish to the Accountants such work papers and other documents and information relating to the disputed issues as the Accountants may request and are available to that party (or its independent public accountants), and will be afforded the opportunity to present to the Accountants any material relating to the disputed issues and to discuss the issues with the Accountants. The resolution of the issues in dispute by the Accountants, as set forth in a notice delivered to Buyer and Sellers by the Accountants, will be binding and conclusive on the parties. Buyer and Sellers will each bear 50% of the Accountants' fees and expenses for such resolution. Sellers will revise the Closing Balance Sheet to reflect the resolution of the issues in dispute, and the Purchase Price will be adjusted accordingly. 2.7 ALLOCATION OF PURCHASE PRICE AND ASSUMED LIABILITIES The Purchase Price will be allocated in accordance with Exhibit 2.7. After the Closing, the parties will make consistent use of the allocation, fair market values and useful lives specified in Exhibit 2.7 for all Tax purposes and in all filings, declarations and reports with the IRS in respect thereof, including the reports required to be filed under Section 1060 of the Code. The Plan shall provide that (a) within 45 days after the date the Purchase Price is determined, Buyer will prepare and deliver IRS Form 8594 to Seller to be filed with the IRS and (b) in any Proceeding related to the determination of any Tax, neither Buyer nor Seller will contend or represent that such allocation is not a correct allocation. The foregoing allocation will not be determinative of the appropriate allocation of the Purchase Price among any creditors of Sellers asserting the right to receive a portion of the Purchase Price as a distribution under the Bankruptcy Code. 2.8 CLOSING The Closing will take place at the offices of Haynes and Boone, L.L.P., 1000 Louisiana, Suite 4300, Houston, Texas 77002 at 10:00 a.m. (local time) on the later of (a) the 11th day after the date of entry of the Confirmation Order so long as such Confirmation Order is not subject to a stay, (b) the date that is two business days following the satisfaction or waiver of each of the conditions set forth in Articles 7 and 8, unless Buyer and Sellers agree otherwise, and (c) after the Net Asset adjustment described in Section 2.6 has been finally determined. Subject to Article 9, failure to consummate the purchase and sale provided for in this Agreement at the place and on the date determined by the previous sentence will not result in the termination of this Agreement and will not relieve any party of any obligation under this Agreement. 2.9 CLOSING DELIVERIES At the Closing: (a) Pentacon will deliver to Buyer: (i) a bill of sale substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(a)(i) ("Bill of Sale") executed by Seller; (ii) an assignment and assumption agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(a)(ii) providing in part for the assignment of Sellers' rights under each Seller Contract to be included in the Assets ("Assignment and Assumption Agreement") executed by Sellers which Assignment and Assumption Agreement will also contain Buyer's undertaking to assume and discharge those obligations under the applicable Seller Contract that are Assumed Liabilities; (iii) for each leasehold or sub-leasehold interest in Real Property included in the Assets, an assignment of Sellers' rights under each Seller Contract evidencing such interest substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(a)(iii) (collectively, "Assignment and Assumption of Lease Agreements") executed by Sellers, which Assignment and Assumption of Lease Agreement will also contain Buyer's undertaking to assume and discharge those obligations under the applicable Seller Contract that are Assumed Liabilities; (iv) separate assignments of certain Intellectual Property included in the Assets substantially in the forms of Exhibit 2.9(a)(iv) executed by Seller; (v) such other deeds, bills of sale, assignments, certificates of title and other instruments of transfer and conveyance as may reasonably be requested by Buyer, each in form and substance satisfactory to Buyer, Seller and their legal counsel and executed by Seller; (vi) a Transition Services Agreement with each Transition Employee; (vii) an escrow agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(a)(vii) (the "Escrow Agreement"), executed by Pentacon and Southwest Bank of Texas (the "Escrow Agent"); (viii) a release substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(a)(viii) executed by Sellers (the "Release Agreement"); ----------------- (ix) a certificate executed by the president of Pentacon Aerospace Group and the president of Pentacon's Industrial Group as to the accuracy of Sellers' representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing and as to their compliance with and performance of its covenants and obligations to be performed or complied with on or before the Closing Date in accordance with Article 7; (x) a certificate of the Secretary of Pentacon certifying, as accurate and complete as of the Closing, attached copies of the Governing Documents of each Seller, certifying and attaching all requisite resolutions or actions of each Seller's board of directors approving the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions, and certifying the incumbency and signatures of the officers of each Seller executing this Agreement and any other document relating to the Contemplated Transactions; and (xi) a certificate from the chief accounting officer of Pentacon that identifies all the payments made by Sellers to satisfy all Liabilities other than Assumed Liabilities from the Closing Balance Sheet date through the day prior to the Closing Date. (b) Buyer will deliver to Sellers: (i) the Cash Portion of the Purchase Price, adjusted as described in Section 2.6 (less $1,000,000 to be delivered to the Escrow Agent) by wire transfer to an account specified by Sellers in a writing delivered to Buyer at least two business days before the Closing Date; (ii) the Escrow Agreement executed by Buyer, together with the delivery of $1,000,000 to the Escrow Agent by wire transfer to an account specified by the Escrow Agent; (iii) the Assignment and Assumption Agreement executed by Buyer; (iv) the Assignment and Assumption of Lease Agreements executed by Buyer; (v) the Transition Services Agreements executed by Buyer; (vi) a certificate executed by the chief financial officer of Buyer as to the accuracy of Buyer's representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing in accordance with Article 8; and (vii) a release substantially in the form of Exhibit 2.9(b)(vii) executed by Buyer. In addition, on the Closing Date, Buyer will pay the Pre-Petition Payables, together with interest thereon at the rate of 5% per annum from the Petition Date to the date of payment. The Assignment and Assumption Agreement, Assignment and Assumption of Lease Agreements, Release Agreements and Escrow Agreement are collectively referred to as the "Ancillary Agreements." 2.10 PLAN (a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Sellers agree to propose and file with the Bankruptcy Court, and use their best efforts to obtain confirmation of, the Plan pursuant to which the Assets shall be sold and conveyed to Buyer in accordance with Section 363 of the Bankruptcy Code in exchange for the Purchase Price and subject to the assumption of the Assumed Liabilities. Copies of the Plan and Disclosure Statement are attached hereto as Exhibits 2.10(a)(1) and 2.10(a)(2), respectively. Sellers will provide to Buyer the Plan and the Disclosure Statement and any amendments thereto before the filing thereof and a copy of the proposed Confirmation Order before the submission thereof to the Bankruptcy Court. (b) Sellers will be the sole proponent of the Plan, and as such may make such additions to and amendments of the Plan and Disclosure Statement as they may determine in their discretion. The Plan will not be amended to change the following terms of the Plan in a manner that is adverse to Buyer, without Buyer's consent, which will not be unreasonably withheld. (i) The Assets will be transferred to the Buyer pursuant to the Confirmation Order, free and clear of all liens, claims and encumbrances of any kind, nature and description, other than the Assumed Liabilities; (ii) Subject to the entry of the 365 Order, Sellers will assume, pursuant to Section 365 of the Bankruptcy Code those executory Contracts to be assigned and conveyed to Buyer as part of the Assets and Buyer will pay the Cure which constitutes an Assumed Liability and assume those Contracts and provide adequate assurance of future performance pursuant to Section 365 of the Bankruptcy Code. (c) Sellers shall promptly file a motion in the Bankruptcy Case, in a form acceptable to Buyer, to establish a bar date for filing claims for Cure for Contracts constituting part of the Assets. 2.11 BUYER DIP Buyer will make available to Sellers up to $20 million in debtor-in-possession financing ("Buyer DIP"). All principal and interest outstanding under the Buyer DIP will be deducted dollar-for-dollar from the cash portion of the Purchase Price as described in Section 2.5. The Buyer DIP will be used to fund prepayments, deposits, COD payments, and similar payments to trade creditors for goods and services provided to Sellers prior to Closing. The Buyer DIP will be subordinate only to the debtor-in-possession financing being made available to Sellers from their existing bank group, will be on terms and conditions substantially equivalent thereto, and will otherwise be accorded the highest available priority available to them under Section 364 of the Bankruptcy Code. The Buyer DIP will have to be approved by the Bankruptcy Court after notice to Seller's creditors and a hearing before the Bankruptcy Court. Article 3 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF SELLERS Sellers represent and warrant to Buyer, jointly and severally, that, except as set forth in Sellers' Disclosure Schedule: 3.1 ORGANIZATION AND GOOD STANDING Each Seller is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, with requisite power and authority to conduct its business as presently conducted, to own or use the properties and assets that it purports to own or use, and to perform its obligations hereunder and under the Ancillary Agreements. Each Seller is duly qualified to do business as a foreign entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which either the ownership or use of the properties owned or used by it, or the nature of the activities conducted by it, requires such qualification, except where the failure to be so qualified will not affect Sellers' ability to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 3.2 ENFORCEABILITY; NO CONFLICT; SUBSIDIARIES (a) Subject to receipt of the Confirmation Order and the 365 Order, each Seller has the requisite power, authority and capacity to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements to which it is a party and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and such Ancillary Agreements. Assuming due authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement by Buyer, following the approval of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by the Bankruptcy Court pursuant to the Confirmation Order and the 365 Order, this Agreement will constitute the legal, valid and binding obligation of each Seller, enforceable against each Seller in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, moratorium, and other laws affecting creditors' rights generally from time to time in effect and to general equitable principles. Assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the other parties thereto, following the approval of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by the Bankruptcy Court pursuant to the Confirmation Order and the 365 Order, each Ancillary Agreement to which a Seller becomes a party will, upon execution and delivery, constitute the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Seller, enforceable against such Seller in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, moratorium, and other laws affecting creditors' rights generally from time to time in effect and to general equitable principles. (b) Section 3.2(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule lists all Consents and Governmental Authorizations other than as required by the Bankruptcy Court that Sellers are required to obtain from, and all notices that Sellers are required to give to any Person in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions except those Consents, Governmental Authorizations or notices for which the failure to obtain would not have a Material Adverse Effect. (c) Except with respect to another Seller, no Seller owns, or has any Contract to acquire, any equity securities or other securities of any Person or any direct or indirect equity or ownership interest in any other business. 3.3 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Sellers have delivered to Buyer (a) an audited consolidated balance sheet of Sellers as at December 31, 2001 (including the notes thereto, the "Balance Sheet"), and the related consolidated statements of income, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flow for the fiscal year then ended, together with the report thereon of Ernst & Young LLP, independent certified public accountants, and (b) an unaudited consolidated balance sheet of Sellers as at March 31, 2002 (the "Interim Balance Sheet") and the related unaudited consolidated statements of income, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flow for the three months then ended. Such financial statements and notes fairly present the financial condition and the results of operations, changes in stockholders' equity, and cash flow of Sellers as at the respective dates of and for the periods referred to in such financial statements, all in accordance with GAAP, subject in the case of interim financial statements to normal recurring year-end adjustments (the effect of which will not, individually or in the aggregate, be materially adverse) and the absence of notes (that, if presented, would not differ materially from those included in the Balance Sheet). The financial statements referred to in this Section reflect the consistent application of accounting principles throughout the periods involved other than as disclosed therein. 3.4 ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE All Accounts Receivable that are reflected on the Balance Sheet, the Interim Balance Sheet or the accounting records of Seller as of the Closing Date represent or will represent valid obligations arising from sales actually made or services actually performed in the Ordinary Course of Business. There is no contest, claim, defense or right of setoff, other than in the Ordinary Course of Business, under any Contract with any obligor of an Account Receivable relating to the amount or validity of such Account Receivable. 3.5 BOOKS AND RECORDS The books of account, minute books, equity record books and other financial records of each of the Sellers, all of which have been made available to Buyer, are accurate and complete in all material respects and have been maintained in accordance with sound business practices and the requirements of Section 13(b)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, including the maintenance of an adequate system of internal controls. Each transaction of Sellers is properly and accurately recorded in all material respects on the books and records of Sellers, and each document (including any Contract, invoice or receipt) on which entries in Sellers' books and records are based is accurate and complete in all material respects. 3.6 INVENTORIES All items included in the Inventories are of a quality and quantity usable and, with respect to finished goods, salable in the Ordinary Course of Business, except for obsolete items and items of below-standard quality, all of which have been or will be reserved against, written off or written down to net realizable value on the Balance Sheet, the Interim Balance Sheet, the Closing Balance Sheet or the accounting records of Seller as of the Closing Date, as the case may be. Except for customer items that have been consigned or bailed, Seller is not in possession of any inventory not owned by Seller, including goods already sold. All of the Inventories now on hand that were purchased after the date of the Balance Sheet were purchased in the Ordinary Course of Business at a cost not materially exceeding market prices prevailing at the time of purchase. All Inventories are maintained at one of the locations of Real Property listed in Section 3.8(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. 3.7 ABSENCE OF CERTAIN CHANGES AND EVENTS Except as set forth on Section 3.7 of the Sellers' Disclosure Schedule, since the date of the Balance Sheet, Sellers have conducted their business only in the Ordinary Course of Business and there has not been any: (a) change in payment or increase by Seller of any bonuses, salaries or other compensation to any Stockholder, director, officer or employee, except in each case for annual salary increases and otherwise in the Ordinary Course of Business; (b) adoption of, amendment to or increase in the payments to or benefits under, any Seller Benefit Plan or material Other Benefit Obligation, except in each case in the Ordinary Course of Business; (c) damage to or destruction or loss of any Asset, whether or not covered by insurance, with an aggregate value to Seller in excess of $100,000; (d) (i) modification, cancellation or termination of, or receipt of, notice of, termination of, any license, distributorship, dealer, sales representative, joint venture, credit, guaranty or similar Contract, which is material either individually or in the aggregate, except in each case in the Ordinary Course of Business or (ii) entry into any Contract or transaction involving a total remaining commitment by any Seller of at least $100,000; (e) sale, lease or other disposition of any Asset (other than in the Ordinary Course of Business) having a value in excess of $25,000; (f) cancellation or waiver of any claims or rights with a value to any Seller in excess of $50,000; (g) material acceleration or delay in the payment of accounts payable or in the collection of Accounts Receivable; (h) material change in the accounting methods used by Seller; (i) closure, cessation, consolidation or relocation of operations at any Facility, except for the Facilities identified in Section 3.7(i) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule; or (j) Contract by Seller to do any of the foregoing. 3.8 PROPERTIES (a) Sellers own no fee simple interest in Real Property, and have no obligation to purchase or acquire, now or in the future, any fee simple interest in Real Property. (b) Section 3.8(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true, correct and complete list of all leases and other agreements, including all amendments thereto (collectively, the "Real Property Leases"), under which Sellers have the right to use or occupy, now or in the future, any real property, including the land, buildings and other improvements (the "Real Property"). Except in connection with the Bankruptcy Petition, each Real Property Lease is valid, binding and in full force and effect, all rent and other sums and charges payable by Sellers or their affiliates as tenants thereunder are current, no notice of default or termination under any Real Property Lease is outstanding, no termination event or condition or charged default on the part of Sellers or their affiliates as tenants or landlords exists under any Real Property Lease. Sellers have not received notice, and have no Knowledge, of any event that has occurred or condition that exists which, with the giving of notice or the lapse of time or both, would constitute such a default or termination event or condition. (c) Sellers have not received notice, and have no Knowledge, of any pending, threatened or contemplated condemnation proceeding affecting the Real Property or any part thereof, or of any sale or other position of the Real Property or any part thereof, in lieu of condemnation. (d) Sellers have valid leasehold interests in the Real Property, free and clear of any Encumbrances, except for Real Estate Permitted Encumbrances or as otherwise set forth in Section 3.8(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. (e) Use of the Real Property for the various purposes for which it is presently being used is permitted under applicable zoning Laws and is not subject to "permitted non-conforming" use or structure classifications. All Improvements are in material compliance with applicable Laws, including those pertaining to zoning, building and the disabled. No part of any Improvement encroaches on any real property not included in the Real Property, and there are no buildings, structures, fixtures or other improvements primarily situated on adjoining property which encroach on any part of the Real Property, in a manner that would cause a Material Adverse Effect. 3.9 SUFFICIENCY OF ASSETS Except with respect to the Excluded Assets, the Assets constitute all such assets necessary for the continued operation of Sellers' current business after the Closing in substantially the same manner as before the Closing. Sellers have accurately accounted for substantially all of the consolidated assets and liabilities of Pentacon as reflected on, and as of, the date of the Interim Balance Sheet, and, since such date Sellers have not shifted any material assets or material liabilities between Sellers and any of their Related Persons. 3.10 INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY (a) Sellers own or have the right to use pursuant to a valid Contract all material items of Intellectual Property necessary for the operation of the business of Sellers as presently conducted. Each material item of Intellectual Property owned or used by Sellers as of the date of this Agreement will be owned or available for use by Buyer on substantially identical terms immediately subsequent to the Closing, other than Intellectual Property that may not be assigned under Section 365 of the Bankruptcy Code. Sellers have taken all necessary and desirable actions within their control to maintain and protect each item of Intellectual Property that they own or use except for such actions that would not have a Material Adverse Effect. (b) Sellers have not, in any material respect, interfered with, infringed upon, misappropriated or otherwise Contravened any intellectual property rights of third parties, and Sellers have not received any written notice and have no Knowledge of any other communication regarding any actual, alleged or potential such interference, infringement, misappropriation or Contravention. No event has occurred or circumstance exists that may (with or without notice or lapse of time) constitute or result, nor will the continued operation by Buyer of Sellers' business after the Closing as presently conducted constitute or result, directly or indirectly, in any such material interference, infringement, misappropriation or Contravention. To Sellers' Knowledge, no third party has interfered with, infringed upon, misappropriated or otherwise Contravened any Intellectual Property rights of Sellers. (c) Section 3.10(c) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule identifies each issued patent and each registered trademark, service mark and copyright owned by any Seller and identifies each pending patent application or application for registration that has been made with respect to any Intellectual Property owned by any Seller. Sellers have made available to Buyer true and complete copies of all such patents, registrations and applications, each as amended to date, and all other written documentation evidencing ownership and prosecution of each such item. 3.11 CONTRACTS (a) Section 3.11(a) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule contains an accurate and complete list of each of the following Seller Contracts to be included in the Assets (other than the Seller Contracts listed on Section 3.11(a)(x) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule which may be identified as Excluded Contracts subject to Section 5.10): (i) each Seller Contract that was not entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business; (ii) each Seller Contract that is a letter of credit, bond or other indemnity (including letters of credit, bonds or other indemnities as to which Seller is the beneficiary but excluding endorsements of instruments for collection in the Ordinary Course of Business) or guarantee of a third party's obligation; (iii) each Seller Contract with respect to Intellectual Property (including Contracts with current or former employees, consultants or contractors regarding the appropriation or the non-disclosure of any of the Intellectual Property) except for any license implied by the sale of a product and perpetual, paid-up licenses for commonly available software programs with a value of less than $25,000 under which a Seller is the licensee; (iv) each Seller Contract with any labor union or other employee representative of a group of employees; (v) each Seller Contract other than Seller Benefit Plans involving a sharing of profits, losses, costs or Liabilities by a Seller with any other Person; (vi) each Seller Contract containing covenants that in any way purport to restrict the business activity of any Seller or limit the freedom of any Seller to engage in any line of business or to compete with any Person; (vii) each Seller Contract providing for payments over $10,000 to or by any Person based on or determined by reference to sales, purchases or profits, other than direct payments for goods or standard form employee bonus plans; (viii) each power of attorney that is currently effective and outstanding, other than limited powers of attorneys issued in the Ordinary Course of Business, such as to custom brokers; (ix) each Seller Contract for capital expenditures in excess of $100,000; and (x) each Seller Contract that is not a vendor contract, a customer contract or a Real Property Lease, which Seller Contract provides for payments in excess of $100,000 in the aggregate. (b) Sellers have made available to Buyer a true and complete copy of each of the Seller Contracts listed in Section 3.11(a) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. (c) Except as may result from the Contemplated Transactions, each Seller Contract listed in Section 3.11(a) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule is in full force and effect and is valid and enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, moratorium, and other laws affecting creditors' rights generally from time to time in effect and to general equitable principles. Sellers have not given or received notice and have no Knowledge of any other communication (written or oral) regarding any actual, alleged or potential Contravention of any Seller Contract listed in Section 3.11(a) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. 3.12 CUSTOMERS AND SUPPLIERS Sellers have made available to Buyer the names and addresses of the 10 largest customers and the 10 largest suppliers (measured in each case by dollar volume of purchases or sales during the year ended December 31, 2001) of Sellers taken as a whole and the dollar amount of purchases or sales which each such customer or supplier represented during the year ended December 31, 2001. Sellers have communicated to Buyer any actual or threatened termination, cancellation or material limitation of, or any material change in, the business relationship of Sellers with any such customer or supplier. 3.13 INSURANCE Sellers maintain in full force and effect Insurance Policies covering its insurable business risks and Liabilities in adequate amounts to provide reasonable protection for the business of and the properties owned and used by Sellers, including the Assets. Sellers have complied with each such Insurance Policy and program, and since December 31, 2001, Sellers have not, and will not have as of the Closing, made any material changes to any such Insurance Policies. 3.14 TAXES (a) All material Taxes that Sellers are required by law to withhold or collect, including sales and use Taxes and amounts required to be withheld for Taxes of employees, have been duly withheld or collected and, to the extent required, have been paid over to the proper taxing authority or are held in separate bank accounts for such purpose. (b) There are no Encumbrances upon any of the Assets arising from any failure or alleged failure to pay any Tax (other than Encumbrances relating to Taxes not yet due and payable). (c) Sellers have not made or become obligated to make, and neither Sellers nor Buyer will as a result of any Contemplated Transaction become obligated to make, any payments that could be nondeductible by reason of Section 280G (without regard to subsection (b)(4) thereof) or 162(m) of the Code, nor will Sellers or Buyer be required to "gross up" or otherwise compensate any individual because of the imposition of any excise tax on such a payment to the individual. 3.15 EMPLOYEE BENEFITS (a) Section 3.15 of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule contains an accurate and complete list of each Seller Benefit Plan and, subject to Section 5.10, identifies exceptions to the representations and warranties regarding the Seller Benefit Plans set forth herein. Sellers have made available to Buyer (i) all documents that set forth the terms of each Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation, and of any related trust, including all summary plan descriptions, summaries and descriptions furnished to participants and beneficiaries, (ii) all personnel, payroll, and employment manuals and policies, (iii) a written description of any Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation that is not otherwise in writing, (iv) all registration statements filed with respect to any Seller Benefit Plan, (v) all Insurance Policies purchased by or to provide benefits under any Seller Benefit Plan, (vi) all reports submitted to Sellers since December 31, 1999, by third-party administrators, actuaries, investment managers, trustees, consultants, or other independent contractors with respect to any Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation, (vii) the Form 5500 filed in each of the most recent three plan years with respect to each Seller Benefit Plan and Other Benefit Obligation, including all schedules thereto and the opinions of independent accountants, (viii) all notices that were given by any Seller, any ERISA Affiliate or any Seller Benefit Plan to the IRS or any participant or beneficiary, pursuant to statute, since December 31, 1999, (ix) all notices that were given by any Governmental Body to any Seller, any ERISA Affiliate or any Seller Benefit Plan since December 31, 1999, and (x) with respect to each Seller Benefit Plan that is a Qualified Plan, the most recent determination letter for each such Seller Benefit Plan. (b) Sellers have performed all of their obligations under each Seller Benefit Plan and with respect to each Other Benefit Obligation. Each Seller Benefit Plan has been administered in accordance with its terms. Sellers have made appropriate entries in their financial records and statements for all obligations and liabilities under the Seller Benefit Plans and Other Benefit Obligations that have accrued but are not due. Sellers, with respect to all Seller Benefit Plans and Other Benefit Obligations, is and each Seller Benefit Plan and Other Benefit Obligation are in compliance in all material respects with ERISA, the Code and other applicable Laws, including the provisions of such Laws expressly mentioned in this Section 3.18, and with any applicable collective bargaining agreement. No non-exempt transaction prohibited by ERISA Section 406 and no non-exempt "prohibited transaction" under Code Section 4975(c) has occurred with respect to any Seller Benefit Plan. Sellers have no Liability to any Governmental Body with respect to any Seller Benefit Plan, including any Liability imposed by Chapter 43 of the Code. All employer and employee contributions which are due and owing as of the Closing Date with respect to the Seller Benefit Plans have been or will be made in accordance with local law and past practice. All contributions and payments made or accrued with respect to all Seller Benefit Plans and Other Benefit Obligations are deductible under Code Section 162 or 404. No event has occurred or circumstance exists that may result in a material increase in premium costs of Seller Benefit Plans and Other Benefit Obligations that are insured or a material increase in benefit costs of Seller Benefit Plans and Other Benefit Obligations that are self-insured. There is no materially unfunded liability under any Seller Benefit Plan. Other than routine claims for benefits submitted by participants or beneficiaries, no claim against, or Proceeding involving, any Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation is pending or, to Seller's Knowledge, is threatened. (c) Each Qualified Plan of Sellers has received a favorable determination letter from the IRS that it is qualified under Code Section 401(a) and that its related trust is exempt from federal income tax under Code Section 501(a), and each such Benefit Plan materially complies in form and in operation with the requirements of the Code and materially meets the requirements of a "qualified plan" under Section 401(a) of the Code. No event has occurred or circumstance exists that may give rise to disqualification or loss of tax-exempt status of any such Benefit Plan or trust. (d) Neither any Seller nor any ERISA Affiliate has ever established, maintained or contributed to, or had an obligation to maintain or contribute to, any Benefit Plan that is subject to Section 412 of the Code, Section 302 of ERISA, or Title IV of ERISA. Neither Seller nor any ERISA Affiliate has terminated any Benefit Plan subject to Title IV of ERISA. No Seller has ever established, maintained or contributed to, or had an obligation to maintain or contribute to, any voluntary employees' beneficiary association under Code Section 501(c)(9), any organization or trust described in Code Section 501(c)(17) or 501(c)(20), or any welfare benefit fund as defined in Code Section 419(e). Neither any Seller nor any ERISA Affiliate has ever established, maintained, contributed to or otherwise participated in, or had an obligation to maintain, contribute to or otherwise participate in, or has any liability with respect to, any Multiemployer Plan. Except to the extent required under ERISA Section 601 et seq. and Code Section 4980B, no Seller provides health or welfare benefits for any retired or former employee nor is it obligated to provide health or welfare benefits to any active employee following such employee's retirement or other termination of service. (e) Sellers have the right to modify and terminate benefits to retirees (other than pensions) with respect to both retired and active employees. Sellers have complied with the provisions of ERISA Section 601 et seq. and Code Section 4980B and with the provisions of ERISA Section 701 et seq. and Subtitle K of the Code. (f) No individual classified as a non-employee for purposes of receiving employee benefits (such as an independent contractor, leased employee, consultant or special consultant), regardless of treatment for other purposes, is eligible to participate in or receive benefits under any Seller Benefit Plan. (g) Neither any Seller nor any ERISA Affiliate is a party to any agreement, whether written or oral, with change-in-control or similar provisions. Except as set forth in Section 3.15(g) of Seller's Disclosure Schedule, neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will: (1) entitle any employee to severance pay, (2) accelerate the time of payment or vesting or trigger any payment or funding (through a grantor trust or otherwise) of compensation or benefits under, increase the amount payable or trigger any other obligation pursuant to, any Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation in respect of any employee or (3) result in any breach or violation of, or a default under, any Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation. 3.16 EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS Neither Robert L. Ruck nor any employee of Sellers who reports directly to him, all of whom are listed on Section 3.16 of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule, is a party to, or is otherwise bound by, any Contract, including any confidentiality, noncompetition or proprietary rights agreement with any Person other than a Seller that adversely affects or could adversely affect (a) the performance of his or her duties for Sellers or Buyer, (b) his or her ability to assign to Sellers or Buyer rights to any invention, improvement, discovery or information relating to the business of Sellers or Buyer, or (c) the ability of Sellers or Buyer to conduct its business. 3.17 LABOR RELATIONS; EMPLOYMENT LAW COMPLIANCE; EMPLOYEES (a) Except as set forth on Section 3.17 of the Sellers Disclosure Schedule, no Seller has been, nor is any Seller currently a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor contract. To Sellers' Knowledge, no application or petition is pending for an election of or for certification of a collective bargaining agent representing Sellers' employees. (b) Sellers have provided to Buyer a complete list of the following information for each director, officer, Active Employee, employee on layoff status or long-term disability leave, independent contractor, consultant and agent of Sellers: name, job title, date of hiring or engagement, date of commencement, current compensation paid or payable and any change in compensation since April 1, 2002, sick and vacation leave that is accrued but unused, and service credited for purposes of vesting and eligibility to participate under any Seller Benefit Plan. (c) There is not pending or, to Sellers' Knowledge, threatened any formal Proceeding against or affecting Sellers relating to the alleged violation of any applicable Law pertaining to labor relations or employment matters. No formal grievance or arbitration Proceeding exists that might have an adverse effect on Sellers or the conduct of their business. There has been no charge of discrimination filed against or, to Sellers' Knowledge, threatened against Sellers with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or similar Governmental Body. 3.18 ENVIRONMENTAL, HEALTH AND SAFETY MATTERS Except as set forth in Section 3.18 of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule: (a) Sellers are in material compliance with all Environmental Laws or Occupational Safety and Health Laws, in each case applicable to such Sellers. Sellers have not received any actual or threatened Order, notice or other communication from (i) any Governmental Body or other Person acting in the public interest, or (ii) the current or prior owner or operator of any Facility, of any actual or potential violation or failure to comply with any Environmental Law, or of any actual or threatened obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which any Seller has an interest, or with respect to any property or Facility at or to which Hazardous Materials were used, processed or disposed of by such Seller. (b) There are no pending or, to Sellers' Knowledge, threatened, claims, Encumbrances or other restrictions of any nature, resulting from any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities or arising under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law, with respect to or affecting any Facilities or any other properties and assets (whether real, personal or mixed) in which any Seller has an interest. (c) Sellers have no basis to expect, nor have they received, any citation, directive, inquiry, notice, Order, summons, warning or other communication of any actual, alleged or potential obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which any Seller has an interest. (d) There are no Hazardous Materials resulting from Sellers' operations present on or in the Environment at any Facility in violation of Environmental Laws. (e) There has been no Release of any Hazardous Materials from Sellers' operations at or from any Facility. (f) Sellers have delivered to Buyer true and complete copies of any reports, studies, analyses, tests or monitoring results possessed by Sellers pertaining to Hazardous Materials or Hazardous Activities in, on or under any Facilities. 3.19 LEGAL PROCEEDINGS; ORDERS (a) Section 3.19(a) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule lists any pending Proceedings (i) by or against any Seller that relate to or may affect the business of Sellers or any of the Assets, or (ii) that challenge, or that may have the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal or otherwise interfering with, any of the Contemplated Transactions (other than the Bankruptcy Case). To Sellers' Knowledge, no other such Proceeding has been threatened, and no event has occurred or circumstance exists that is reasonably likely to give rise to or serve as a basis for the commencement of any such Proceeding (other than the Bankruptcy Case). Except for the Bankruptcy Petition, no such Proceedings will have a Material Adverse Effect. (b) Section 3.19(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule lists each Order to which a Seller, or any of the Assets, is or has been subject. To Sellers' Knowledge, no officer, agent or employee of a Seller is subject to any Order that prohibits such officer, agent or employee from engaging in or continuing any conduct, activity or practice relating to the business of Sellers. (c) Each Seller is, and at all times since December 31, 1999, has been, in full compliance with all of the terms and requirements of each Order to which it or any of the Assets is or has been subject. No event has occurred or circumstance exists that may constitute or result in (with or without notice or lapse of time) a violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Order to which such Seller or any of the Assets is subject. No Seller has received, at any time since December 31, 1999, any written notice or, to Sellers' Knowledge any other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding any actual, alleged or potential violation of, or failure to comply with, any term or requirement of any Order to which such Seller or any of the Assets is or has been subject. 3.20 COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS; GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORIZATIONS Except as set forth in Section 3.20 of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule: (a) Without limiting the scope of any other representation in this Agreement, Sellers are, and at all times since December 31, 1999, have been, in material compliance with each Law that is applicable to it or to the conduct of its business or the ownership or use of any of the Assets except to the extent that noncompliance would not result in a Material Adverse Effect. Sellers have not received at any time since December 31, 1999 any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding any actual, alleged or potential material Contravention of any applicable Law or any actual, alleged or potential obligation on the part of Sellers to undertake, or to bear all or any portion of the cost of, any remedial action of any nature with respect to the Assets. (b) Section 3.20(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule contains an accurate and complete list of each material Governmental Authorization that is held by Sellers or that otherwise relates to the business of Sellers or to any of the Assets, each of which is valid and in full force and effect. Sellers are, and at all times since December 31, 1999, have been, in material compliance with all of the material terms and requirements of each such Governmental Authorization. Sellers have not received at any time since December 31, 1999, any written notice from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding any actual, alleged or potential material Contravention of any material Governmental Authorization. (c) The Governmental Authorizations listed in Section 3.20(b) of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule collectively constitute all of the material Governmental Authorizations not held by Sellers which are necessary to permit Sellers to conduct their business lawfully in the manner in which they currently conduct such business and to permit Sellers to own and use the Assets in the manner in which they currently own and use the Assets. 3.21 DISCLOSURE No statement in Sellers' Disclosure Schedule or notification given pursuant to Section 5.5 will contain any untrue statement or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein or in this Agreement, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading. Article 4 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF BUYER Buyer represents and warrants to Sellers that, except as set forth in Buyer's Disclosure Schedule: 4.1 ORGANIZATION Buyer is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization. 4.2 ENFORCEABILITY; NO CONFLICT (a) Buyer has the absolute and unrestricted right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and its Ancillary Agreements and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and its Ancillary Agreements, which actions have been duly authorized and approved by all necessary corporate action of Buyer. Assuming the execution and delivery of this Agreement by Sellers, this Agreement constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with its terms. Assuming their execution and delivery by the other parties thereto, the Ancillary Agreements to which Buyer becomes a party will, upon execution and delivery, constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with their respective terms. (b) Buyer is not and will not be required to obtain any Consent or Governmental Authorization in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions. (c) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement by Buyer nor the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions by Buyer will give any Person the right to prevent, delay or otherwise interfere with any of the Contemplated Transactions pursuant to (i) any provision of Buyer's Governing Documents, (ii) any resolution adopted by the board of directors or the stockholders of Buyer, (iii) any Law, Order or Governmental Authorization to which Buyer may be subject or (iv) any Contract to which Buyer is a party or by which Buyer may be bound. 4.3 CERTAIN PROCEEDINGS There is no pending Proceeding that has been commenced against Buyer and that challenges, or may have the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal or otherwise interfering with, any of the Contemplated Transactions. To Buyer's knowledge, no such Proceeding has been threatened. 4.4 BROKERS OR FINDERS Neither Buyer nor any of its Representatives have incurred any Liability for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or other similar payment in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. 4.5 DISCLAIMER OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES (a) BUYER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT, EXCEPT AS AND TO THE EXTENT EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THIS AGREEMENT, SELLERS (OR ANYONE ACTING ON THEIR BEHALF) HAVE NOT MADE, DO NOT MAKE AND SPECIFICALLY DISCLAIM ANY REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, PROMISES, COVENANTS, AGREEMENTS OR GUARANTIES OF ANY KIND OR CHARACTER WHATSOEVER, WHETHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ORAL OR WRITTEN, PAST, PRESENT OR FUTURE, OF, AS TO, OR CONCERNING THE ASSETS, THE ASSUMED LIABILITIES OR THE BUSINESS OF SELLERS. (b) BUYER FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT BUYER HAS HAD ADEQUATE OPPORTUNITIES TO INSPECT, EXAMINE AND INVESTIGATE THE ASSETS. BUYER FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED OR TO BE PROVIDED BY SELLERS OR ANYONE ON THEIR BEHALF WITH RESPECT TO THE ASSETS WAS OBTAINED FROM A VARIETY OF SOURCES AND THAT, EXCEPT AS SET FORTH HEREIN, NO SELLER HAS MADE ANY INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATION OR VERIFICATION OF SUCH INFORMATION AND MAKE NO REPRESENTATIONS AS TO THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF SUCH INFORMATION. BUYER FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT, EXCEPT AS SET FORTH HEREIN, THE SALE OF THE ASSETS AS PROVIDED FOR HEREIN IS MADE ON AN "AS IS," "WHERE IS" BASIS. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL AFFECT THE WARRANTY OF TITLE IN THE SPECIAL WARRANTY DEEDS AND OTHER TRANSACTION DOCUMENTS CONVEYING THE ASSETS FROM SELLERS TO BUYER AT THE CLOSING. 4.6 FINANCING Buyer has cash on hand and/or available credit in amounts sufficient to pay the Purchase Price and otherwise consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Article 5 COVENANTS OF SELLERS BEFORE CLOSING 5.1 ACCESS AND INVESTIGATION Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date and upon reasonable advance notice from Buyer, each Seller will (a) afford Buyer and its Representatives during normal business hours full and free access to Sellers' personnel, properties (including subsurface testing), Contracts, books and records, and other documents and data, (b) furnish such Persons with copies of all such Contracts, books and records, and other documents and data as Buyer may reasonably request, and (c) furnish such Persons with such additional financial, operating and other data and information as Buyer may reasonably request. Additionally, Sellers will provide Buyer with all schedules, statements and operating reports filed by Sellers with the Bankruptcy Court. To the extent Buyer conducts an environmental investigation involving testing, Buyer shall take any and all actions necessary or advisable to minimize the inconvenience to Sellers and shall indemnify and hold harmless Sellers from and against any and all claims, lawsuits, liabilities, damages, and expenses (including strict liability claims under the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act and similar state statutes) resulting from Buyer's actions. Buyer shall be responsible for restoring the Facility or other location to its pre-investigation condition, for any damage caused by its testing activities, and for the proper disposal of any wastes generated by its testing. Buyer will, upon Sellers' request, provide to Sellers a copy of any report, sample results or analysis generated by its environmental investigation. 5.2 OPERATION OF THE BUSINESS OF SELLER Except as otherwise contemplated by this Agreement, between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, each Seller will (a) conduct its business only in the Ordinary Course of Business, (b) use its Best Efforts to preserve intact its current business organization (including the maintenance of existing insurance coverage), keep available the services of its current officers, employees and agents, and maintain relations and goodwill with its suppliers, customers, landlords, creditors, employees, agents and others having business relationships, (c) confer with Buyer concerning operational matters of a material nature, and (d) otherwise conduct its business subject to the limitations and restrictions imposed by the Bankruptcy Code and the Bankruptcy Court; provided, however, that Sellers will terminate or consolidate operations at certain Facilities and will close certain Facilities as provided in the Facility Consolidation Plan, dated April 25, 2002 and as communicated to Buyer on May 3, 2002 during due diligence. 5.3 NEGATIVE COVENANT Except as otherwise expressly permitted by this Agreement, between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, Sellers will not without the prior written consent of Buyer, (a) take any affirmative action, or fail to take any reasonable action within its control, as a result of which any of the changes or events in Section 3.7 would be likely to occur, (b) make any modifications to any other material Seller Contract or Governmental Authorization, permit the levels of Inventories, Accounts Receivable and pre-paid assets to vary materially from the levels customarily maintained, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, or (d) enter into any compromise or settlement of any pending or threatened material Proceeding outside the Ordinary Course of Business relating to the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities. Sellers will use their Best Efforts not to pay or satisfy on the Closing Date (i) any principal or interest on debtor-in-possession financing; (ii) any principal or interest on the Second Amended and Restated Loan Agreement dated September 30, 1999 (and as subsequently amended or replaced) between Pentacon and Bank of America NA, as agent; (iii) any principal or interest on the 12.25% Senior Subordinated Notes due 2009 and related Indenture (the "Senior Subordinated Debt"); or (iv) any Liabilities other than Assumed Liabilities; provided that if any such payment is made, the Confirmation Order shall provide that the amount of such payment will be refunded in full to Buyer following the Closing. 5.4 REQUIRED APPROVALS As promptly as practicable after the date of this Agreement, Sellers will make all filings that they are required by applicable Law to make to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, Sellers will (a) cooperate reasonably with Buyer with respect to all filings that Buyer elects to make or that Buyer is required by Law to make in connection with the Contemplated Transactions, and (b) cooperate reasonably with Buyer in obtaining any Governmental Authorizations and Consents required to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. 5.5 NOTIFICATION Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, Seller will promptly notify Buyer in writing if Sellers become aware of (a) any fact or condition that causes or constitutes a breach of any of Sellers' representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement, or (b) the occurrence after the date of this Agreement of any fact or condition that would (except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement) cause or constitute a breach of any such representation or warranty had that representation or warranty been made as of the time of the occurrence or discovery of such fact or condition. Should any such fact or condition require any change in Sellers' Disclosure Schedule, Seller will promptly deliver to Buyer a supplement to Sellers' Disclosure Schedule specifying such change. Such delivery shall be deemed to update the Sellers' Disclosure Schedule as of the date of delivery, and shall be deemed to qualify Sellers' representations and warranties from and after the date of delivery, including any requirement that Sellers' representations and warranties be materially true at Closing. Such delivery, however, will not affect any rights of Buyer under Article 9 and Article 11 for breaches of representations and warranties made or deemed made prior to the date of delivery of such revised Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. During the same period, Sellers will promptly notify Buyer of the occurrence of any breach of any covenant of Sellers in this Article or of the occurrence of any event that may make the satisfaction of the conditions in Article 7 impossible or unlikely. 5.6 NO SOLICITATION Except as required by the Bankruptcy Code or other applicable Law, until such time, if any, as this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Article 9, Sellers will not, and will cause each of their Representatives not to, directly or indirectly, solicit, initiate, or otherwise encourage any inquiries, proposals or offers from, or discussions or negotiations with, any Person (other than Buyer) relating to any business combination transaction involving any Seller, including the sale of any of the shares of any Seller, any merger or consolidation, or the sale of any of the Assets (other than in the Ordinary Course of Business). Notwithstanding the foregoing, Sellers may respond to any such inquiries, proposals or offers that were not solicited, initiated or encouraged by Sellers or any of Sellers' Representatives, as contemplated by Article 10, provided Sellers fully comply with Article 10. 5.7 BEST EFFORTS Sellers will use their Best Efforts to cause the conditions in Article 7 and Section 8.2 to be satisfied. 5.8 INTERIM FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Until the Closing Date, Pentacon will deliver to Buyer within fifteen business days after the end of each month a copy of its consolidated balance sheet, income statement and supporting schedules for such month prepared in a manner and containing information consistent with Sellers' current practices and certified by Sellers' chief accounting officer as to compliance with Section 3.3. Monthly operating reports will be provided to Buyer as soon as they become available. 5.9 BULK TRANSFER; REFUNDABLE INCOME TAX AMOUNT (a) Buyer and Sellers hereby waive compliance with the bulk transfer provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code (or any similar law) in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, any and all claims, losses, damages, liabilities, costs and expenses incurred by Buyer, Sellers or any of their respective affiliates as a result of any failure to comply with any such bulk transfer provisions shall be borne by Sellers. (b) The Confirmation Order shall provide that, if the Refundable Income Tax or any other Tax refund amount included in the Assets has not been received by Sellers prior to Closing, Sellers shall be required to deliver such Refundable Income Tax Amount to Buyer promptly following receipt. 5.10 SPECIFIED SCHEDULE UPDATES Sellers will deliver to Buyer on or before 12:00 p.m. Central Daylight Time on May 29, 2002 an update to Section 3.11(a)(x) and Section 3.15 of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. Within one business day of Buyer's receipt thereof, Buyer will deliver to Sellers an update to Schedule 2.2(a) reflecting any additional Seller Contracts to be identified thereon as Excluded Contracts. If any update made to Section 3.15 of Sellers' Disclosure Schedule results in a cost, expense or other Liability to Buyer identified prior to Closing, Buyer will be entitled to receive a dollar-for-dollar reduction in the Purchase Price, or, if such Liability is identified subsequent to the Closing, a claim for indemnification and a right of setoff under the Escrow Agreement that will not be subject to any limitation set forth in Section 11.5 hereof. Article 6 COVENANTS OF BUYER BEFORE CLOSING 6.1 REQUIRED APPROVALS As promptly as practicable after the date of this Agreement, Buyer will make all filings that it is required by Law to make to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, Buyer will (a) cooperate reasonably with Sellers with respect to all filings that Sellers elect to make or that they may be required by Law to make in connection with the Contemplated Transactions, and (b) cooperate reasonably with Sellers in obtaining any Governmental Authorizations and Consents required to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. 6.2 BEST EFFORTS Buyer will use its Best Efforts to cause the conditions in Article 8 and Section 7.2 to be satisfied. 6.3 CONFIDENTIALITY Buyer shall hold, and shall cause its employees, agents, affiliates, consultants, representatives and advisors to hold, any information which it or they receive in connection with Section 5.1 of this Agreement in strict confidence in accordance with and subject to the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement, dated as of March 8, 2002, between Buyer and Pentacon (the "Confidentiality Agreement"). Article 7 CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO BUYER'S OBLIGATION TO CLOSE Buyer's obligation to purchase the Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Buyer at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, on or before the Closing Date, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Buyer, in whole or in part): 7.1 PERFORMANCE All of the covenants and obligations that Sellers are required to perform or to comply with under this Agreement on or before the Closing Date (considered both collectively and individually) must have been duly performed and complied with in all material respects. 7.2 CONSENTS Each of the Governmental Authorizations and Consents identified in Schedule 7.2 must have been obtained and must be in full force and effect. 7.3 ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTS Sellers will have delivered to Buyer: (a) if requested by Buyer, any consents or other instruments that may be required to permit Buyer's qualification under each Seller's name in each jurisdiction in which a Seller is licensed or qualified to do business as a foreign corporation; (b) all schedules, statements and operating reports filed with the Bankruptcy Court; and (c) such other documents as Buyer may reasonably request for the purpose of evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article. 7.4 CONFIRMATION ORDER; 365 ORDER; THIRD PARTIES (a) The Confirmation Order and the 365 Order must have been entered. (b) The Confirmation Order must include a finding that all third parties entitled to notice of the Contemplated Transactions (including, without limitation, the third parties to the assumed and assigned executory contracts and unexpired leases which are part of the Assets) have been properly served by the Sellers. (c) More than 120 days must not have elapsed from the filing of the Bankruptcy Petition without the entry of the Confirmation Order and the 365 Order, unless the delay in obtaining such order is solely due to the schedule of the Bankruptcy Court or to the breach of this Agreement by Buyer. 7.5 INJUNCTION No order shall be in effect that enjoins, restrains, conditions or prohibits the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions. 7.6 FORCE MAJEURE No acts of God or war or terrorism will have occurred that has a Material Adverse Effect. 7.7 OPPORTUNITY TO CURE In the event that Buyer notifies Sellers of its decision not to consummate the sale and purchase of the Assets due to the failure of any of the conditions contained in this Article 7 to be satisfied, Sellers shall have the opportunity for a period of 10 business days to take such actions as may be necessary to remedy the circumstances which have resulted in the failure of such condition or conditions to be satisfied. Article 8 CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO SELLERS' OBLIGATION TO CLOSE Sellers' obligation to sell the Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Sellers at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, on or before the Closing Date, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Sellers, in whole or in part): 8.1 BUYER'S PERFORMANCE All of the covenants and obligations that Buyer is required to perform or to comply with under this Agreement on or before the Closing Date (considered both collectively and individually) must have been performed and complied with in all material respects. 8.2 CONSENTS Each of the Governmental Authorizations and Consents required to be obtained as a condition to the Closing must have been obtained and must be in full force and effect. 8.3 INJUNCTION No order shall be in effect that enjoins, restrains, conditions or prohibits the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions. 8.4 CONFIRMATION ORDER; 365 ORDER The Confirmation Order and the 365 Order must have been entered. Article 9 TERMINATION 9.1 TERMINATION EVENTS Subject to Section 9.2, this Agreement may, by notice given before or at the Closing, be terminated: (a) by mutual written consent of Buyer and Sellers; (b) by Buyer if a Seller has committed a material breach of any provision of this Agreement and Buyer has not waived such breach, provided, however, that prior to terminating this Agreement pursuant to this Section, Buyer will notify Sellers of such breach and give Sellers 15 days to cure such breach and provide an updated Sellers' Disclosure Schedule. (c) by Sellers if Buyer has committed a material breach of any provision of this Agreement and Sellers have not waived such breach; provided, however, that prior to terminating this Agreement pursuant to this Section, Pentacon will notify Buyer of such breach and give Buyer 15 days to cure such breach and provide an updated Buyer's Disclosure Schedule. (d) by Buyer if it is or becomes impossible to satisfy any condition in Article 7 (other than through the failure of Buyer to comply with its obligations under this Agreement) and Buyer has not waived such condition; (e) by Sellers if it is or becomes impossible to satisfy any condition in Sections 8.1, 8.2 and 8.3 (other than through the failure of Sellers to comply with its obligations under this Agreement) and Sellers have not waived such condition; (f) by Buyer if the Confirmation Order and the 365 Order have not been entered as provided in Section 7.4 above; (g) by Buyer in accordance with the following: (i) The "Actual Cumulative EBITDA Ratio" will equal (i) the EBITDA of Seller for the three months ending on the last day of the month preceding the Closing divided by (ii) the EBITDA of Sellers set forth in Sellers' Business Plan for such period. EBITDA for any period means Pentacon's consolidated earnings for such period, plus, to the extent deducted in calculating such earnings, all net interest expense, including the interest component of capital lease obligations, all income tax expenses, all depreciation and amortization expense, and all costs and expenses of Sellers attributable to severance expenses, the filing of the Bankruptcy Petition, preparation of the Plan and Disclosure Statement, the consummation of the Plan and this Agreement and costs of the Contemplated Transactions and alternative restructuring transactions. If the Actual Cumulative EBITDA Ratio is 0.60 or less, Buyer may terminate the Definitive Agreement. (ii) The "Actual Monthly EBITDA Ratio" will equal (i) the EBITDA of Seller for any single month starting after March 31, 2002 and ending prior to the Closing divided by (ii) the EBITDA of Seller set forth in Business Plan for such period. If the Actual Monthly EBITDA Ratio is 0.50 or less, Buyer may terminate the Definitive Agreement; and (h) by Buyer at its discretion upon notice from Sellers or the Bankruptcy Court that Sellers (i) have entered into a definitive agreement providing for a Competing Transaction or (ii) have filed a pleading with the Bankruptcy Court to enter into any Competing Transaction. 9.2 EFFECT OF TERMINATION (a) Each party's right of termination under Section 9.1 is in addition to any other rights it may have under this Agreement or otherwise, and the exercise of such right of termination will not be an election of remedies. Subject to Section 9.2(b) below, if this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 9.1, all obligations of the parties under this Agreement will terminate, except that the obligations in Sections 6.3, 9.2, 14.1, 14.2, 14.3, 14.15 and 14.16 will survive; provided, however, that if this Agreement is terminated by a party because of the breach of the Agreement by another party or because one or more of the conditions to the terminating party's obligations under this Agreement is not satisfied as a result of any other party's failure to comply with its obligations under this Agreement, the terminating party's right to pursue all legal remedies will survive such termination unimpaired. (b) Subject to Bankruptcy Court approval to be included as part of the Bid Procedures Order, Seller will promptly, but in no event later than five business days after the first to occur of any of the events described in the following clauses, pay to Buyer in cash the amount of Buyer's out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred in connection with pursuing, negotiating and/or consummating the Contemplated Transactions, including all fees and expenses of Buyer's investment bankers, counsel, auditors, consultants and other representatives, which amount will not exceed $1,500,000: (i) Buyer terminates this Agreement due to a material breach by any Seller of any provision hereunder; (ii) Sellers terminate this Agreement for any reason other than Buyer's material breach of any provision hereunder; or (iii) Buyer terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 9.1(f) and at the time of such termination Sellers have entered into a definitive agreement for a Competing Transaction. Article 10 BREAK-UP FEE AND OVERBID PROCEDURES 10.1 COMPETITIVE BIDDING Buyer acknowledges that, from the date hereof and any prior time and until the transaction contemplated by this Agreement is consummated, Sellers may be debtors-in-possession under the Bankruptcy Code, to the extent required by the the Bankruptcy Code or applicable Law, Sellers will cause their Representatives and affiliates to consider the submission of any inquiries, proposals or offers by, any Person (in addition to Buyer) to (i) make a tender or exchange offer for and/or acquire 50% or more of the outstanding shares of any class of capital stock of any Seller, (ii) acquire 50% or more of the outstanding principal amount of the Senior Subordinated Debt or (iii) enter into an agreement to acquire and/or consummate any transaction providing for the acquisition of any Seller by merger, consolidation, recapitalization, reorganization or purchase of 50% or more of its assets, either in or out of bankruptcy (a "Competing Transaction"). In addition, Sellers shall have the responsibility and obligation to respond to any inquiries or offers to purchase the Assets and perform any and all other acts related thereto which are required under the Bankruptcy Code or other applicable law, including, without limitation, supplying information relating to the business of Sellers and the Assets to prospective purchasers. Sellers shall promptly notify Buyer of the existence of any inquiry, proposal or offer received by Sellers with respect to any Competing Transaction, and Sellers shall communicate to Buyer the material terms of any inquiry, proposal or offer which it may receive with respect to any Competing Transaction but not the identity of the party making such inquiry, proposal or offer. Sellers shall promptly provide to Buyer any non-public information regarding the Assets or the business of Sellers provided to any other party which was not previously provided to Buyer. 10.2 BIDDING PROCEDURES This Agreement contemplates that there shall be a sale of Sellers' Assets to Buyer pursuant to the Plan in accordance with Section 363 of the Bankruptcy Code. The sale of Assets to Buyer may become subject to a competitive bidding process. Such bidding process shall include a break-up fee for Buyer which shall be implemented pursuant to an order of the Bankruptcy Court establishing the competitive bidding procedures and related break-up fee (the "Bid Procedures Order"). Within ten (10) business days after the Petition Date, Sellers shall file a motion with the Bankruptcy Court seeking approval of the Bid Procedures Order. The Bid Procedures Order shall approve competitive bidding, overbid, and sales procedures and, among other provisions, provide: (a) that a proposal for a Competing Transaction must be in writing and submitted using this Agreement as a form (the "Competing Agreement"). A Competing Agreement shall be made upon terms and conditions substantially similar to those contained in this Agreement (except as may constitute an improvement on the terms set forth therein), and must be accompanied by a "clean" and "black-lined" version of the Competing Agreement marked to show changes from this Agreement; (b) that, to be a qualified bid, a Competing Transaction shall provide additional cash consideration in an amount not less than $4,000,000, and that any successive overbids (by any Person) shall be made in increments not less than $1,000,000 in excess of the last submitted, highest qualified bid for the Assets; (c) that Sellers retain sole discretion to evaluate successive overbids based on the aggregate net consideration provided in light of any Break-Up Fee to be paid as well as any other factor Sellers determine has bearing on whether a successive overbid is a higher and better offer; (d) that any Person submitting a Competing Transaction shall provide an Earnest Money Deposit in an amount at least equal to the Break-Up Fee; (e) that the deadline for any Person submitting a qualified bid for a Competing Transaction be five business days prior to the hearing to be held to approve the Sellers' Disclosure Statement; and (f) for the payment of a break-up fee of $3,000,000 (the "Break-Up Fee") to Buyer in the event a Competing Transaction is consummated and Sellers do not consummate a transaction with Buyer as contemplated in this Agreement. ARTICLE 11 INDEMNIFICATION; REMEDIES 11.1 SURVIVAL All representations, warranties, covenants and obligations in this Agreement will survive the Closing and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions, subject to the limitations set forth in this Article. 11.2 INDEMNIFICATION BY SELLERS Sellers will indemnify and hold harmless Buyer and its Representatives (collectively, the "Buyer Indemnitees") for, and will pay to the Buyer Indemnitees the monetary value of, any Adverse Consequences arising, directly or indirectly, from or in connection with: (a) any breach of any representation or warranty made by any Seller in this Agreement or in any certificate or document delivered by Sellers pursuant to this Agreement; (b) any breach by any Seller of any covenant or obligation in this Agreement; (c) any Retained Liability; (d) any claim by any Person for brokerage or finder's fees or commissions or similar payments based upon any agreement or understanding alleged to have been made by any such Person with Seller or any Stockholder (or any Person acting on their behalf) in connection with any of the Contemplated Transactions; and (e) any Proceedings, demands or assessments incidental to any of the matters set forth in Sections 11.2(a) through (d). 11.3 INDEMNIFICATION BY BUYER Buyer will indemnify and hold harmless Sellers and their Representatives (collectively, the "Seller Indemnitees"), and will pay to Seller Indemnitees the monetary value of any Adverse Consequences arising, directly or indirectly, from or in connection with: (a) any breach of any representation or warranty made by Buyer in this Agreement or in any certificate or document delivered by Buyer pursuant to this Agreement; (b) any breach by Buyer of any covenant or obligation in this Agreement; (c) any of the Assumed Liabilities; (d) any claim by any Person for brokerage or finder's fees or commissions or similar payments based upon any agreement or understanding alleged to have been made by such Person with Buyer (or any Person acting on its behalf) in connection with any of the Contemplated Transactions; and (e) any Proceedings, demands or assessments incidental to any of the matters set forth in Section 11.3(a) through (d). 11.4 TIME LIMITATIONS (a) If the Closing occurs, Sellers will have no Liability (for indemnification or otherwise) for breach of (i) a covenant or obligation to be performed or complied with before the Closing Date or (ii) a representation or warranty, other than those in Sections 3.1, 3.2, 3.15, 3.16 or 3.18, unless on or before the six month anniversary of the Closing Date, and with respect to a claim under Sections 3.1, 3,2, 3.15, 3.16 or 3.18, unless on or before the one year anniversary of the Closing Date, Buyer notifies Sellers of a claim specifying the factual basis of that claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Buyer. A claim for indemnification or reimbursement based upon fraud or intentional misrepresentation or for a breach of Section 12.3(d) may be made at any time. (b) If the Closing occurs, Buyer will have no Liability (for indemnification or otherwise) for breach of (i) a covenant or obligation to be performed or complied with before the Closing Date or (ii) a representation or warranty, unless on or before the six month anniversary of the Closing Date, Sellers notify Buyer of a claim specifying the factual basis of that claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Sellers. 11.5 LIMITATIONS ON AMOUNT - SELLERS Sellers shall have no liability or obligation to Buyer under this Agreement, except to the extent that the amount thereof exceeds $500,000 as to all events or occurrences in the aggregate. In addition, Sellers will have no liability for the amount by which the total monetary value of all Adverse Consequences or other claims or damages exceeds $1,500,000. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the limitations of this Section 11.5 will not apply to any fraud or any intentional misrepresentation by a Seller or any breach of a covenant herein or as provided under Section 5.10. 11.6 LIMITATIONS ON AMOUNT--BUYER Buyer will have no liability for the amount by which the total monetary value of all Adverse Consequences exceeds $1,000,000. 11.7 PROCEDURE FOR INDEMNIFICATION--DEFENSE OF THIRD-PARTY CLAIMS (a) Promptly after receipt by a Person entitled to indemnity under Section 11.2 or 11.3 (an "Indemnified Person") of notice of the assertion of a third-party claim against it, the Indemnified Person will, if a claim is to be made against a Person obligated to indemnify under such Section (an "Indemnifying Person"), give notice to the Indemnifying Person of the assertion of such claim. An Indemnified Person's failure to notify an Indemnifying Person will not relieve the Indemnifying Person of any Liability that it may have to the Indemnified Person, except to the extent that the Indemnifying Person demonstrates that the resolution of such claim is prejudiced by the Indemnified Person's failure to give such notice. (b) If any claim referred to in Section 11.7(a) is brought against an Indemnified Person by means of a Proceeding and the Indemnified Person gives notice to the Indemnifying Person of the commencement of such Proceeding, the Indemnifying Person will be entitled to participate in such Proceeding and, to the extent that it wishes, to assume the defense of such Proceeding with counsel satisfactory to the Indemnified Person (unless (i) the Indemnifying Person is also a party to such Proceeding and the Indemnified Person determines in good faith that joint representation would be inappropriate or (ii) the Indemnifying Person fails to provide reasonable assurance to the Indemnified Person of its financial capacity to defend such Proceeding and provide indemnification with respect to such Proceeding). After notice from the Indemnifying Person to the Indemnified Person of its election to assume the defense of such Proceeding, the Indemnifying Person will not, as long as it diligently conducts such defense, be liable to the Indemnified Person under this Article for any fees of other counsel or any other expenses with respect to the defense of such Proceeding, in each case subsequently incurred by the Indemnified Person in connection with the defense of such Proceeding, other than reasonable costs of investigation. If the Indemnifying Person assumes the defense of a Proceeding, (i) it will be conclusively established for purposes of this Agreement that the claims made in that Proceeding are within the scope of and subject to indemnification, (ii) no compromise or settlement of such claims may be effected by the Indemnifying Person without the Indemnified Person's consent unless (A) there is no finding or admission of any violation of Laws or any violation of the rights of any Person and no effect on any other claims that may be made against the Indemnified Person, and (B) the sole relief provided is monetary damages that are paid in full by the Indemnifying Person, and (iii) the Indemnified Person will have no Liability with respect to any compromise or settlement of such claims effected without its consent. (c) If notice is given to an Indemnifying Person of the commencement of any Proceeding and the Indemnifying Person does not, within ten days after the Indemnified Person's notice is given, give notice to the Indemnified Person of its election to assume the defense of such Proceeding, the Indemnifying Person will be bound by any determination made in such Proceeding or any compromise or settlement effected by the Indemnified Person. (d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an Indemnified Person determines in good faith that there is a reasonable probability that a Proceeding may adversely affect it or its affiliates other than as a result of monetary damages for which it would be entitled to indemnification under this Agreement, the Indemnified Person may, by notice to the Indemnifying Person, assume the exclusive right to defend, compromise or settle such Proceeding, but the Indemnifying Person will not be bound by any determination of a Proceeding so defended or any compromise or settlement effected without its consent (which may not be unreasonably withheld). (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 11.7(a) through (d), Buyer will be entitled to assume control of any Cleanup and related Proceeding arising from a claim relating to any Environmental, Health and Safety Liability on a Facility or Real Property then owned or used by Buyer in its operations. 11.8 PROCEDURE FOR INDEMNIFICATION--OTHER CLAIMS A claim for indemnification for any matter not involving a third-party claim may be asserted by notice to the party obligated to indemnify and will be paid promptly after such notice. 11.9 TREATMENT OF INDEMNIFICATION PAYMENTS Any indemnification payment made pursuant to this Article will be treated by the parties to the extent permitted under applicable Law as an adjustment to the Purchase Price for Tax, accounting and all other purposes. 11.10 ESCROW; RIGHT OF SETOFF Buyers shall have rights of setoff as provided in the Escrow Agreement. Neither the exercise of nor the failure to exercise such right of setoff or to give a notice of a claim under the Escrow Agreement will constitute an election of remedies or limit Buyer in any manner in the enforcement of any other remedies that may be available to it. ARTICLE 12 ADDITIONAL COVENANTS 12.1 TRANSACTION TAXES Sellers will pay in a timely manner all Taxes resulting from or payable in connection with the sale of the Assets pursuant to this Agreement, including all transfer, documentary, recording, notarial, sales, use, registration, stamp and similar Taxes and fees, regardless of the Person on whom Laws impose such Taxes. 12.2 DISTRIBUTION OF PROCEEDS In addition to payment of Taxes pursuant to Section 12.1, Sellers will provide for the distribution of the Purchase Price proceeds in accordance with the Plan. 12.3 ASSISTANCE IN PROCEEDINGS; PRIVILEGES; ACCESS TO RECORDS (a) Each party will cooperate reasonably with the other party and its counsel in the contest or defense of, and make available its personnel and provide any testimony and access to its books and Records in connection with, any Proceeding involving or relating to (i) any Contemplated Transaction or (ii) any action, activity, circumstance, condition, conduct, event, fact, failure to act, incident, occurrence, plan, practice, situation, status or transaction on or before the Closing Date involving Sellers or their business or any Stockholder. (b) Sellers and Buyer acknowledge that the Assets include all attorney work-product protections, attorney-client privileges and other legal protections and privileges to which Sellers may be entitled in connection with any of the Assets or Assumed Liabilities. Sellers are not waiving, and will not be deemed to have waived or diminished, any of its attorney work-product protections, attorney-client privileges or similar protections or privileges as a result of the disclosure of information to Buyer and its Representatives in connection with this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions. Sellers and Buyer (i) share a common legal and commercial interest in all of the information and communications that may subject to such protections and privileges, (ii) are or may become joint defendants in Proceedings to which such protections and privileges may relate and (iii) intend that such protections and privileges remain intact should either party become subject to any actual or threatened Proceeding to which such information or communications relate. Sellers agree that they will have no right or power after the Closing Date to assert or waive any such protection or privilege included in the Assets. Sellers will take any actions reasonably requested by Buyer, at the sole cost and expense of Buyer unless Buyer is entitled to indemnification therefor under the provisions of Article 10, in order to permit Buyer to preserve and assert any such protection or privilege included in the Assets. (c) After the Closing Date, Buyer will retain for a period consistent with Buyer's record retention policies and practices but for a minimum of 6 years, those Records of Sellers delivered to Buyer. Buyer also will provide Sellers and their Representatives reasonable access thereto, during normal business hours and on at least three days' prior written notice, to enable them to prepare financial statements or Tax Returns or deal with Tax audits or other Proceedings or for any other reasonable business purpose specified in such notice. After the Closing Date, Sellers will provide Buyer and its Representatives reasonable access to Records that are Excluded Assets, during normal business hours and on at least three days' prior written notice, for any reasonable business purpose specified by Buyer in such notice. (d) After the Closing Date, Sellers will take all actions reasonably requested by Buyer, at Buyer's expense, to preserve, collect, and promptly assign and/or endorse over to Buyer any and all Tax refunds included in the Assets, and not collected by Sellers as of the Closing Date. If any Governmental Body takes any action to reduce the amount of any Tax refund claimed by Sellers on a Tax Return filed before the Closing date, or on a Tax Return filed after the Closing Date but relating to a Tax period ending on or before the Closing Date, Sellers will promptly notify Buyer of such action, and take such responsive action, at Buyer's expense, as Buyer may reasonably request. Sellers will keep Buyer informed quarterly of the progress of all such refund claims until the last refund or portion thereof has been collected by Buyer. 12.4 POST-CLOSING ASSISTANCE Buyer agrees to make available to Sellers from and after the Closing the services of such Continued Employees and any other senior managers of Sellers then employed by Buyer as Sellers may reasonably request, having due regard for the employment obligations of such Continued Employees and other senior managers, to Buyer, for the purposes of assisting Sellers with respect to (i) claims reconciliation, (ii) other administrative matters related to the Plan and (iii) the winding-up of the affairs of Sellers. 12.5 FURTHER ASSURANCES Subject to the provisos in Section 6.1, the parties will cooperate reasonably with each other and with their respective Representatives in connection with any steps required to be taken as part of their respective obligations under this Agreement, and the parties agree (a) to furnish upon reasonable request to each other such further information, (b) to execute and deliver to each other such other documents, and (c) to do such other acts and things, all as the other party may reasonably request for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions. If Sellers or Buyer after the Closing Date receives any funds properly belonging to the other party in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, the receiving party will promptly so advise such other party, will segregate and hold such funds in trust for the benefit of such other party and will promptly deliver such funds, together with any interest earned thereon, to an account or accounts designated in writing by such other party. ARTICLE 13 EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS 13.1 PRE-CLOSING EMPLOYMENT LIABILITIES Through the Closing, Sellers will continue to be responsible for (i) the payment of all wages to Active Employees with respect to their services as employees of Sellers, (ii) the payment to Active Employees of any termination or severance payments under Seller Benefit Plans or Other Benefit Obligations and the provision of group health plan continuation coverage in accordance with the requirements of ERISA Section 601 et seq. and Code Section 4980 B, and (iii) all payments to Active Employees required under the WARN Act. 13.2 EMPLOYMENT; SELLER BENEFIT PLANS (a) Buyer agrees to offer employment to all Active Employees employed by Sellers effective as of the Closing Date, other than the Transition Employees. Except as otherwise agreed by Buyer and Sellers' employees, all such offers shall be for employment at will. Employees of Sellers accepting such offers of employment with Buyer, other than those senior managers of Sellers who execute employment contracts with Buyer at the Closing, ("Continued Employees") shall be provided with substantially similar positions as such employees held immediately prior to the Closing Date and at compensation and benefits that are substantially equivalent to or better than the compensation and benefits provided by Sellers to such employees as of the date of this Agreement and which compensation and benefits will extend for a period of at least twenty four months thereafter so long as such employees continue to remain employed by Buyer. Sellers shall terminate all persons who are to become Continued Employees on the Closing Date in compliance with all applicable Laws, rules, regulations and order requirements. (b) Sellers agree to take all action and execute such documents as may be necessary or advisable to show that Buyer has assumed the Seller Benefit Plans and that Buyer has become the Plan Sponsor of such Benefit Plans. Buyer agrees to take all reasonable actions and execute such documents as may be reasonably necessary for the Buyer to assume the Seller Benefit Plans and to become the Plan Sponsor of such Benefit Plans on the Closing Date. (c) Buyer and its Affiliates will take into account all service of the Continued Employees earned while employed by Sellers prior to the Closing Date and will treat such service as service with Buyer for purposes of determining such employees' eligibility for holidays, sick days and vacation benefits. Any group health, disability or other welfare benefit plan made available by Buyer for the benefit of any Continued Employee and his or her dependents and beneficiaries will not contain any exclusion or limitation with respect to any preexisting condition for such Continued Employee or his or her dependents or other beneficiaries and Buyer will credit all such individuals with deductibles and out-of-pocket maximums incurred or paid by on behalf of such individuals for the applicable plan year containing the Closing Date. Buyer will take into account all service of the Continued Employees with Sellers prior to the Closing Date for purposes of participation and vesting under the Benefit Plans of Buyer, but will not take such services into account for the purpose of calculating any benefit under Buyer's pension and excess benefit plans. (d) The parties hereto agree that, as soon as practicable following the execution of this Agreement, they will undertake a joint review of the liabilities under the Seller Benefit Plans. Sellers will use their reasonable best efforts to disclose to Buyer as promptly as possible all such information as Buyer or its advisors may reasonably request pertaining to the amount and funding of such liabilities. (e) As soon as practicable following the Closing Date, Sellers will cause to be transferred to Buyer any trust, Insurance Policy (other than director and officer insurance policies), cash and other assets set aside or designated to fund or finance any Seller Benefit Plan or Other Benefit Obligation or other employee benefit or employment-related liabilities related to the Continued Employees and assumed by the Buyer under this Agreement. (f) Buyer shall, or shall cause a subsidiary of Buyer to, during the period commencing on the Closing Date and ending on the second anniversary of the Closing Date, provide Continued Employees and their dependents and beneficiaries with Benefit Plans and Other Benefit Obligations which in the aggregate are no less favorable than those provided to such employees, dependents and beneficiaries immediately prior to the Closing Date. (g) Except as expressly provided herein, nothing contained herein, expressed or implied, is intended to confer upon any employee of Sellers any right to employment or continued employment with Buyer, or any benefits under any Benefit Plan, including without limitation severance benefits, by reason of this Agreement. In addition, the provisions of this Agreement, in particular Article 13, are for the sole benefit of the parties to this Agreement and their respective affiliates and are not for the benefit of any third parties. 13.3 OTHER ACTIONS Sellers and Buyer will give any notices required by Law and take whatever other actions as may be necessary to carry out the arrangements described in this Article. Sellers and Buyer will provide each other with such plan documents and summary plan descriptions, employee data or other information as may be reasonably required to carry out the arrangements described in this Article. Sellers will provide Buyer with completed I-9 forms and attachments with respect to all Continued Employees, except for such employees as Sellers will certify in writing to Buyer are exempt from such requirement. ARTICLE 14 GENERAL PROVISIONS 14.1 EXPENSES Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, each party to this Agreement will bear its respective expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, execution and performance of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions, including all fees and expenses of its Representatives. Each party will pay all amounts payable to its respective broker and/or investment banker in connection with this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions. If this Agreement is terminated, the obligation of each party to pay its own expenses will be subject to any rights of such party arising from a breach of this Agreement by another party. 14.2 PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS Sellers and Buyer will consult with each other concerning public disclosures of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions and the means by which Sellers' employees, customers, suppliers and others having dealings with Sellers will be informed of the Contemplated Transactions, and Buyer will have the right to be present for any such communication. Except as required by applicable Law, any public announcement or similar publicity with respect to this Agreement or the Contemplated Transactions will be issued, if at all, at such time and in such manner as Buyer and Sellers mutually determine. 14.3 CONFIDENTIALITY (a) For a period of two years after the Closing Date, Sellers will treat and hold as such, and will not use for the benefit of itself or others, any confidential information, in whatever form or medium, concerning the operations or affairs of Sellers in respect of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities of the types that, as of the date of this Agreement, are deemed to be Confidential Information. If Sellers are requested or required (by oral request or written request for information or documents in any Proceeding, interrogatory, subpoena, civil investigative demand or similar process) to disclose any such Confidential Information, then Sellers will notify Buyer promptly in writing of the request or requirement so that Buyer may seek an appropriate protective order or waive compliance with this Section. If, in the absence of a protective order or receipt of a waiver hereunder, Sellers are, on the advice of outside counsel, required to disclose any such Confidential Information to any Governmental Body, then Sellers may disclose such Confidential Information to such Governmental Body; provided, however, that Sellers will use their commercially reasonable efforts to obtain at the request and expense of Buyer an order or other assurance that confidential treatment will be accorded to such Confidential Information. (b) Sellers will be deemed to have assigned and conveyed to Buyer at the Closing all rights and remedies to which it is or may in the future be entitled under any confidentiality agreement between Sellers and any prospective purchaser of Sellers or any of their material assets or properties. If any such agreements prohibit assignment to Buyer, then Sellers will cooperate with Buyer, at Buyer's request and expense, to permit Buyer to assert all rights and remedies to which Sellers may be entitled under such agreements. 14.4 NOTICES All notices, consents, waivers and other communications under this Agreement must be in writing and will be deemed given to a party when (a) delivered to the appropriate address by hand or by nationally recognized overnight courier service (costs prepaid), (b) sent by facsimile or e-mail with confirmation of transmission by the transmitting equipment, or (c) received or rejected by the addressee, if sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, in each case to the following addresses, facsimile numbers or e-mail addresses and marked to the attention of the individual (by name or title) designated below (or to such other address, facsimile number, e-mail address or individual as a party may designate by notice to the other parties): If to Seller: Pentacon, Inc. c/o McFarland, Grossman & Company, Inc. 9821 Katy Freeway, Suite 500 Houston, Texas 77024 Attention: Mr. Cary M. Grossman, Chairman Facsimile No.: 713-464-1827 E-mail Address: cgrossman@mcfarlandgrossman.com with a copy (which will not constitute notice) to: Pentacon, Inc. 21123 Nordhoff Street Chatsworth, California 91311 Attention: Mr. Jay McFadyen, General Counsel Facsimile No.: (818) 576-6032 E-mail Address: jay.mcfadyen@pentacon.com Haynes and Boone, LLP 1000 Louisiana Street, Suite 4300 Houston, Texas 77002-5012 Attention: Facsimile No.: (713) 547-2600 E-mail Address: If to Buyer: Anixter International Inc. 4711 Golf Road Skokie, Illinois 60076 Attention: Mr. Dennis J. Letham, Senior Vice President - Finance Facsimile No.: (847) 715-7518 E-mail Address: dennis.letham@anixter.com with a copy (which will not constitute notice) to: Anixter International Inc. 4711 Golf Road Skokie, Illinois 60076 Attention: Mr. John A. Dul, General Counsel Facsimile No.: (847) 715-7604 E-mail Address: john.dul@anixter.com with a copy (which will not constitute notice) to: Baker & McKenzie 130 East Randolph Drive Chicago, Illinois 60601 Attention: Mr. Philip F. Suse Facsimile No.: (312) 861-2899 E-mail Address: philip.f.suse@bakernet.com 14.5 FURTHER ACTIONS Upon the reasonable request of any party to this Agreement, the other parties will (a) furnish to the requesting party any additional information, (b) execute and deliver, at their own expense, any other documents and (c) take any other actions as the requesting party may reasonably require to more effectively carry out the intent of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions. 14.6 INCORPORATION OF SCHEDULES AND EXHIBITS The Schedules and Exhibits identified in this Agreement, including Sellers' Disclosure Schedule and Buyer's Disclosure Schedule, are incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Agreement. 14.7 ENTIRE AGREEMENT AND MODIFICATION This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements among the parties with respect to its subject matter and constitutes (along with the Confidentiality Agreement and the documents delivered pursuant to this Agreement) a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement between the parties with respect to its subject matter. This Agreement may not be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified except in a written document executed by the party against whose interest the modification will operate. 14.8 DISCLOSURE SCHEDULES Sellers' Disclosure Schedule and Buyer's Disclosure Schedule will be arranged in sections corresponding to the numbered and lettered sections of Articles 3 and 4, as applicable. The statements in such Disclosure Schedules, and those in any supplements to them, relate only to the provisions in the Section of this Agreement which they expressly address and not to any other provision. Nothing in such Disclosure Schedules will be adequate to disclose an exception to any representation or warranty made in Article 3 or Article 4 unless the applicable Disclosure Schedule identifies the exception with reasonable particularity and describes the facts relating to such exception in reasonable detail. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the listing or inclusion of a copy of a document or other item will not be adequate to disclose an exception to any representation or warranty made in this Agreement unless the representation or warranty relates to the existence of the document or item itself. In the event of any inconsistency between the statements in the body of this Agreement and those in such Disclosure Schedules (other than an exception expressly set forth as such in a Disclosure Schedule with respect to a specifically identified representation or warranty), the statements in the body of this Agreement will control. 14.9 TIME OF ESSENCE With regard to all dates and time periods set forth or referred to in this Agreement, time is of the essence. 14.10 DRAFTING AND REPRESENTATION The parties have participated jointly in the negotiation and drafting of this Agreement. No provision of this Agreement will be interpreted for or against any party because that party or its legal representative drafted the provision. 14.11 SEVERABILITY If a court of competent jurisdiction holds any provision of this Agreement invalid or unenforceable, the other provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect. Any provision of this Agreement held invalid or unenforceable only in part or degree will remain in full force and effect to the extent not held invalid or unenforceable. 14.12 ASSIGNMENT; SUCCESSORS; NO THIRD-PARTY RIGHTS No party may assign any of its rights or delegate any of its obligations under this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other parties, except that Buyer may without the consent of Sellers assign any of its rights and delegate any of its obligations under this Agreement to any entity that is a Related Person of Buyer or to any subsequent acquirer of the Assets or of all or substantially all of the business of Buyer or any Related Person of Buyer; provided, however, that Buyer will remain primarily liable for all obligations under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement will apply to, be binding in all respects upon, and inure to the benefit of Buyer's and Sellers' successors and permitted assigns. Nothing expressed or referred to in this Agreement will be construed to give any Person, other than the parties to this Agreement, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or with respect to this Agreement or any provision of this Agreement except such rights as may inure to a successor or permitted assignee under this Section. 14.13 ENFORCEMENT OF AGREEMENT Each party acknowledges and agrees that the other party could be damaged irreparably if any of the provisions of this Agreement are not performed in accordance with the specific terms and that any breach of this Agreement could not be adequately compensated in all cases by monetary damages alone. Accordingly, each party agrees that, in addition to any other right or remedy to which Buyer or a Seller may be entitled, at law or in equity, each party will be entitled to enforce any provision of this Agreement by a decree of specific performance and to temporary, preliminary and permanent injunctive relief to prevent breaches or threatened breaches of any of the provisions of this Agreement, without posting any bond or other undertaking. 14.14 WAIVER The rights and remedies of the parties to this Agreement are cumulative and not alternative. Neither any failure nor any delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege under this Agreement or any of the documents referred to in this Agreement will operate as a waiver of such right, power or privilege, and no single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege will preclude any other or further exercise of such right, power or privilege or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, (a) no claim or right arising out of this Agreement or any of the documents referred to in this Agreement can be discharged by one party, in whole or in part, by a waiver or renunciation of the claim or right unless in a written document signed by the other party, (b) no waiver that may be given by a party will be applicable except in the specific instance for which it is given, and (c) no notice to or demand on one party will be deemed to be a waiver of any obligation of that party or of the right of the party giving such notice or demand to take further action without notice or demand as provided in this Agreement or the documents referred to in this Agreement. 14.15 GOVERNING LAW This Agreement will be governed by and construed under the laws of Illinois without regard to conflicts of laws principles that would require the application of any other law. 14.16 JURISDICTION; SERVICE OF PROCESS Any action, hearing, suit or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any Contemplated Transaction will be subject to the jurisdiction of the Bankruptcy Court. 14.17 COUNTERPARTS This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts. The parties have executed and delivered this Agreement as of the date indicated in the first sentence of this Agreement. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON, INC. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON DELAWARE, INC. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title JIT HOLDINGS, INC. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON PROPERTIES, L.P. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON INTERNATIONAL SALES, INC. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON AEROSPACE GROUP, INC. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON USA, L.P. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON INDUSTRIAL, INC By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON EUROPE LIMITED By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON MEXICO S.A. DE C.V. By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title PENTACON CANADA CORPORATION By: ____________________________________________________ Name Title
TABLE OF CONTENTS (continued) TABLE OF CONTENTS PAGE Article 1 CONSTRUCTION AND DEFINITIONS........................................1 1.1 CONSTRUCTION.................................................1 1.2 DEFINITIONS..................................................2 Article 2 SALE AND TRANSFER OF ASSETS; CLOSING...............................11 2.1 ASSETS TO BE SOLD...........................................11 2.2 EXCLUDED ASSETS.............................................12 2.3 ASSUMED LIABILITIES.........................................12 2.4 RETAINED LIABILITIES........................................13 2.5 PURCHASE PRICE..............................................13 2.6 ADJUSTMENT..................................................13 2.7 ALLOCATION OF PURCHASE PRICE AND ASSUMED LIABILITIES........14 2.8 CLOSING.....................................................14 2.9 CLOSING DELIVERIES..........................................15 2.10 PLAN........................................................16 2.11 BUYER DIP...................................................17 Article 3 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF SELLERS..........................17 3.1 ORGANIZATION AND GOOD STANDING..............................18 3.2 ENFORCEABILITY; NO CONFLICT; SUBSIDIARIES...................18 3.3 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS........................................19 3.4 ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE.........................................19 3.5 BOOKS AND RECORDS...........................................19 3.6 INVENTORIES.................................................19 3.7 ABSENCE OF CERTAIN CHANGES AND EVENTS.......................20 3.8 PROPERTIES..................................................20 3.9 SUFFICIENCY OF ASSETS.......................................21 3.10 INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.......................................21 3.11 CONTRACTS...................................................22 3.12 CUSTOMERS AND SUPPLIERS.....................................23 3.13 INSURANCE...................................................23 3.14 TAXES.......................................................24 3.15 EMPLOYEE BENEFITS...........................................24 3.16 EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS.......................................26 3.17 LABOR RELATIONS; EMPLOYMENT LAW COMPLIANCE; EMPLOYEES.......26 3.18 ENVIRONMENTAL, HEALTH AND SAFETY MATTERS....................27 3.19 LEGAL PROCEEDINGS; ORDERS...................................27 3.20 COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS; GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORIZATIONS...........28 3.21 DISCLOSURE..................................................29 Article 4 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF BUYER............................29 4.1 ORGANIZATION................................................29 4.2 ENFORCEABILITY; NO CONFLICT.................................29 4.3 CERTAIN PROCEEDINGS.........................................29 4.4 BROKERS OR FINDERS..........................................30 4.5 DISCLAIMER OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES................30 4.6 FINANCING...................................................30 Article 5 COVENANTS OF SELLERS BEFORE CLOSING................................30 5.1 ACCESS AND INVESTIGATION....................................30 5.2 OPERATION OF THE BUSINESS OF SELLER.........................31 5.3 NEGATIVE COVENANT...........................................31 5.4 REQUIRED APPROVALS..........................................32 5.5 NOTIFICATION................................................32 5.6 NO SOLICITATION.............................................33 5.7 BEST EFFORTS................................................33 5.8 INTERIM FINANCIAL STATEMENTS................................33 5.9 BULK TRANSFER; REFUNDABLE INCOME TAX AMOUNT.................33 5.10 SPECIFIED SCHEDULE UPDATES..................................33 Article 6 COVENANTS OF BUYER BEFORE CLOSING..................................34 6.1 REQUIRED APPROVALS..........................................34 6.2 BEST EFFORTS................................................34 6.3 CONFIDENTIALITY.............................................34 Article 7 CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO BUYER'S OBLIGATION TO CLOSE................34 7.1 PERFORMANCE.................................................34 7.2 CONSENTS....................................................34 7.3 ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTS........................................35 7.4 CONFIRMATION ORDER; 365 ORDER; THIRD PARTIES................35 7.5 INJUNCTION..................................................35 7.6 FORCE MAJEURE...............................................35 7.7 OPPORTUNITY TO CURE.........................................35 Article 8 CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO SELLERS' OBLIGATION TO CLOSE...............36 8.1 BUYER'S PERFORMANCE.........................................36 8.2 CONSENTS....................................................36 8.3 INJUNCTION..................................................36 8.4 CONFIRMATION ORDER; 365 ORDER...............................36 Article 9 TERMINATION........................................................36 9.1 TERMINATION EVENTS..........................................36 9.2 EFFECT OF TERMINATION.......................................37 Article 10 BREAK-UP FEE AND OVERBID PROCEDURES...............................38 10.1 COMPETITIVE BIDDING.........................................38 10.2 BIDDING PROCEDURES..........................................39 ARTICLE 11 INDEMNIFICATION; REMEDIES.........................................40 11.1 SURVIVAL....................................................40 11.2 INDEMNIFICATION BY SELLERS..................................40 11.3 INDEMNIFICATION BY BUYER....................................40 11.4 TIME LIMITATIONS............................................41 11.5 LIMITATIONS ON AMOUNT - SELLERS.............................41 11.6 LIMITATIONS ON AMOUNT--BUYER................................41 11.7 PROCEDURE FOR INDEMNIFICATION-DEFENSE OF THIRD-PARTY CLAIMS.41 11.8 PROCEDURE FOR INDEMNIFICATION--OTHER CLAIMS.................43 11.9 TREATMENT OF INDEMNIFICATION PAYMENTS.......................43 11.10 ESCROW; RIGHT OF SETOFF.....................................43 ARTICLE 12 ADDITIONAL COVENANTS..............................................43 12.1 TRANSACTION TAXES...........................................43 12.2 DISTRIBUTION OF PROCEEDS....................................43 12.3 ASSISTANCE IN PROCEEDINGS; PRIVILEGES; ACCESS TO RECORDS....43 12.4 POST-CLOSING ASSISTANCE.....................................44 12.5 FURTHER ASSURANCES..........................................44 ARTICLE 13 EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS...................................45 13.1 PRE-CLOSING EMPLOYMENT LIABILITIES..........................45 13.2 EMPLOYMENT; SELLER BENEFIT PLANS............................45 13.3 OTHER ACTIONS...............................................46 ARTICLE 14 GENERAL PROVISIONS................................................47 14.1 EXPENSES....................................................47 14.2 PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS........................................47 14.3 CONFIDENTIALITY.............................................47 14.4 NOTICES.....................................................48 14.5 FURTHER ACTIONS.............................................49 14.6 INCORPORATION OF SCHEDULES AND EXHIBITS.....................49 14.7 ENTIRE AGREEMENT AND MODIFICATION...........................49 14.8 DISCLOSURE SCHEDULES........................................50 14.9 TIME OF ESSENCE.............................................50 14.10 DRAFTING AND REPRESENTATION.................................50 14.11 SEVERABILITY................................................50 14.12 ASSIGNMENT; SUCCESSORS; NO THIRD-PARTY RIGHTS...............50 14.13 ENFORCEMENT OF AGREEMENT....................................51 14.14 WAIVER......................................................51 14.15 GOVERNING LAW...............................................51 14.16 JURISDICTION; SERVICE OF PROCESS............................51 14.17 COUNTERPARTS................................................51
EXHIBITS Exhibit 2.7 ..............Allocation of Purchase Price and Assumed Liabilities Exhibit 2.9(a)(i) ................................................Bill of Sale Exhibit 2.9(a)(ii) ........................Assignment and Assumption Agreement Exhibit 2.9(a)(iii) ..............Assignment and Assumption of Lease Agreement Exhibit 2.9(a)(iv) .......................Assignments of Intellectual Property Exhibit 2.9(a)(vi)...............................Transition Services Agreement Exhibit 2.9(a)(vii)..........................................Escrow Agreement Exhibit 2.9(a)(viii).........................................Release Agreement Exhibit 2.9(b)(vii)..........................................Release Agreement Exhibit 2.10(a)1..........................................................Plan Exhibit 2.10(a)2..........................................Disclosure Statement
SCHEDULES SCHEDULE 2.2(a)...................................EXCLUDED CONTRACTS SCHEDULE 2.2(d)......................................EXCLUDED ASSETS SCHEDULE 2.3(a)...................................VENDOR LIABILITIES SCHEDULE 2.3(b)................................SCHEDULED LIABILITIES SCHEDULE 2.3(c)..................................ACCRUED LIABILITIES SCHEDULE 2.5..............................................NET ASSETS SCHEDULE 7.2................................................CONSENTS SELLERS' DISCLOSURE SCHEDULE SECTION 3.1..............................ORGANIZATION AND GOOD STANDING SECTION 3.2.................................ENFORCEABILITY; NO CONFLICT SECTION 3.3........................................FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SECTION 3.4.........................................ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE SECTION 3.5...........................................BOOKS AND RECORDS SECTION 3.6.................................................INVENTORIES SECTION 3.7.......................ABSENCE OF CERTAIN CHANGES AND EVENTS SECTION 3.8..................................................PROPERTIES SECTION 3.9.......................................SUFFICIENCY OF ASSETS SECTION 3.10......................................INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY SECTION 3.11..................................................CONTRACTS SECTION 3.12....................................CUSTOMERS AND SUPPLIERS SECTION 3.13..................................................INSURANCE SECTION 3.14......................................................TAXES SECTION 3.15..........................................EMPLOYEE BENEFITS SECTION 3.16......................................EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS SECTION 3.17......LABOR RELATIONS; EMPLOYMENT LAW COMPLIANCE; EMPLOYEES SECTION 3.18...................ENVIRONMENTAL, HEALTH AND SAFETY MATTERS SECTION 3.19..................................LEGAL PROCEEDINGS; ORDERS SECTION 3.20..........COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS; GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORIZATIONS SECTION 3.21.................................................DISCLOSURE
BUYER'S DISCLOSURE SCHEDULE SECTION 4.2(b)..............................ENFORCEABILITY; NO CONFLICT SECTION 4.4.........................................BROKERS AND FINDERS
Exhibit 1.2 Business Plan See Attached.
Exhibit 2.7 Allocation of Purchase Price and Assumed Liabilities See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(a)(i) Bill of Sale See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(a)(ii) Assignment and Assumption Agreement See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(a)(iv) Assignments of Intellectual Property See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(a)(vi) Transition Services Agreement See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(a)(vii) Escrow Agreement See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(a)(viii) Release Agreement See Attached.
Exhibit 2.9(b)(vii) Release Agreement See Attached.
Exhibit 2.10(a)1 Plan See Attached.
Exhibit 2.10(a)2 Disclosure Statement See Attached.
Schedule 2.2(a) Excluded Contracts See Attached.
Schedule 2.2(d) Excluded Assets See Attached.
Schedule 2.3(a) Vendor Liabilities See Attached.
Schedule 2.3(b) Scheduled Liabilities See Attached.
Schedule 2.3(c) Accrued Liabilities See Attached.
Schedule 2.5 Net Assets See Attached.
Schedule 7.2 Consents See Attached.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20021112102124.txt.gz
TIME:20021112102124
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 November 11, 2002 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) Commission File Number: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 4711 Golf Road Skokie, Illinois 60076 (847) 677-2600 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices)
ITEM 9. REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE On November 11, 2002, each of the President and Chief Executive Officer, Robert W. Grubbs, and the Senior Vice President-Finance and Chief Financial Officer, Dennis J. Letham, of Anixter International, Inc. submitted to the Commission sworn statements pursuant to the Commission's June 27, 2002 Order Requiring the Filing of Sworn Statements Pursuant to Section 21 (a) (1) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (No. 4-460). A copy of each of these statements is attached hereto as an Exhibit 99.1 and 99.2.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: November 11, 2002 By: /s/ Robert W. Grubbs --------------------- Robert W. Grubbs President and Chief Executive Officer Date: November 11, 2002 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham -------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description of Exhibits ----------- ----------------------- 99.1 Statement Under Oath of President and Chief Executive Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings dated November 7, 2002. 99.2 Statement Under Oath of Senior Vice President-Finance and Chief Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings dated November 7, 2002.

STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRESIDENT AND CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CURCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS I, Robert W. Grubbs, state and attest that: (1) To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of Anixter International Inc., and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: (a) no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and (b) no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2) I have reviewed the contents of this statement with the Company's audit committee. (3) In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": (a) the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2001 of Anixter International Inc.; (b) all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of Anixter International Inc. filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and (c) any amendments to any of the foregoing. /s/ Robert W. Grubbs Subscribed and sworn to before me - ------------------------ this 7th day of November 2002. Robert W. Grubbs November 7, 2002 /s/ Michele R. Nelson ------------------------ Michele R. Nelson Notary Public My Commission Expires: January 31, 2005 ------------------------
STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT - FINANCE AND CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CURCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS I, Dennis J. Letham, state and attest that: (1) To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of Anixter International Inc., and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: (a) no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and (b) no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2) I have reviewed the contents of this statement with the Company's audit committee. (3) In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": (a) the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2001 of Anixter International Inc.; (b) all reports on Form 10-Q, all report on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of Anixter International Inc. filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and (c) any amendments to any of the foregoing. /s/ Dennis J. Letham Subscribed and sworn to before me - ----------------------- Dennis J. Letham this 7th day of November 2002. November 7, 2002 /s/ Michele R. Nelson ----------------------- Michele R. Nelson Notary Public My Commission Expires: January 31, 2005 -----------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20021127153206.txt.gz
TIME:20021127153206
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K/A CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 September 20, 2002 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) Commission File Number: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 4711 Golf Road Skokie, Illinois 60076 (847) 677-2600 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices)
ITEM 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired. Pentacon, Inc. Report of Independent Auditors Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2001 and 2000 Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements Consolidated Balance Sheets as of June 30, 2002 and December 31, 2001 Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Three Months and the Six Months Ended June 30, 2002 and 2001 Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Six Months Ended June 30, 2002 and 2001 Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (b) Pro Forma Financial Information Anixter International Inc. Pro Forma Consolidated Statement of Operations for the Year Ended December 28, 2001 Pro Forma Consolidated Statement of Operations for the 39 weeks Ended September 27, 2002 Notes to Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Statements (c) Exhibit 23 Consent of Ernst and Young LLP 1
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REPORT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS The Board of Directors and Stockholders: We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Pentacon, Inc. as of December 31, 2001 and 2000, and the related consolidated statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2001. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audits. We conducted our audits in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion. In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of Pentacon, Inc. at December 31, 2001 and 2000, and the consolidated results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2001, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The accompanying consolidated financial statements have been prepared assuming that Pentacon, Inc. will continue as a going concern. As more fully described in Note 3, the Company has incurred an operating loss and its revolving credit facility matures on April 30, 2002. These conditions raise substantial doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going concern. Management's plans in regard to these matters are also described in Note 3. The consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments to reflect the possible future effects on the recoverability and classification of assets or the amounts and classification of liabilities that may result from the outcome of this uncertainty. ERNST & YOUNG LLP Houston, Texas February 1, 2002, except for Note 3, as to which the date is March 28, 2002 2
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements. 3
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements. 4
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS 5
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY (IN THOUSANDS, EXCEPT SHARE DATA) 6
PENTACON, INC. NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES BASIS OF PRESENTATION: Pentacon, Inc. ("Pentacon" or the "Company") was incorporated in March 1997. On March 10, 1998, Pentacon and separate wholly-owned subsidiaries acquired in separate transactions, simultaneously with the closing of its initial public offering (the "Offering") of its common stock, five businesses (the "Initial Acquisitions"): Alatec Products, Inc. (Alatec), AXS Solutions, Inc., Capitol Bolt & Supply, Inc., Maumee Industries, Inc., and Sales Systems Limited, collectively referred to as the "Founding Companies." The consideration for the Initial Acquisitions consisted of a combination of cash and common stock. Because (i) the stockholders of the Founding Companies owned a majority of the outstanding shares of common stock following the Offering and the Initial Acquisitions, and (ii) the stockholders of Alatec received the greatest number of shares of Pentacon, Inc. common stock among the stockholders of the Founding Companies, for financial statement presentation purposes, Alatec was identified as the accounting acquiror. The acquisitions of the remaining Founding Companies were accounted for using the purchase method of accounting. Unless the context otherwise requires, all references herein to the Company include Pentacon, the Founding Companies and acquisitions subsequent to the Offering ("Subsequent Acquisitions"). Pentacon distributes fasteners and other small parts and provides related inventory management services primarily to customers in the United States. PRINCIPLES OF CONSOLIDATION: The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Pentacon, Inc. and its majority-owned subsidiaries. All significant intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. CASH EQUIVALENTS: Cash equivalents include highly liquid, temporary cash investments having original maturity dates of three months or less. For reporting purposes, cash equivalents are stated at cost plus accrued interest, which approximates fair value. INVENTORIES: Inventories are stated at the lower of cost or market value, cost being determined on a first-in, first-out basis. REVENUE RECOGNITION: Revenues are recognized upon shipment of products or, in the case of inventory management contracts, when the product is delivered to the customer's production line. Revenues include freight billed to customers and the related freight costs are recorded as cost of sales. CASH EQUIVALENTS: Short-term investments purchased with original maturities of three months or less are considered cash equivalents. INVENTORIES: Inventories consist of products held for resale and are stated at the lower of cost, determined using the first-in, first-out method, or market. INCOME TAXES: The Company recognizes deferred tax assets and liabilities for expected future tax consequences of events that have been recognized in the financial statements or tax returns. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are determined based on the differences between the financial statements carrying amounts and the tax basis of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates and laws in effect in the years in which the differences are expected to reverse. PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT: Property and equipment is stated at cost. Depreciation is provided over the estimated useful lives of the related assets 7
using primarily the straight-line method. The amortization expense on assets acquired under capital leases is included with depreciation expense on owned assets. Repairs and maintenance are charged to earnings as they are incurred. GOODWILL: Goodwill is amortized over a period of 40 years. The carrying value of goodwill is reviewed if there are indications that the goodwill may be impaired. If this review indicates that the goodwill will not be recoverable, as determined based on undiscounted cash flows over the remaining amortization periods, the carrying value of the goodwill will be reduced by the estimated shortfall in discounted cash flow. At the time goodwill is evaluated for impairment, enterprise goodwill is also evaluated utilizing undiscounted cash flows of the enterprise over the remaining life of the asset. USE OF ESTIMATES: The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates. CONCENTRATION OF CREDIT RISK: The Company performs credit evaluations of its customers and generally does not require collateral. The Company maintains an allowance for doubtful accounts based upon the expected collectibility of all accounts receivable. The allowance for doubtful accounts and related activity were not material at and for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999. One customer of the industrial segment accounted for approximately 12%, 16% and 14% of consolidated revenues for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively. Accounts receivable balances related to this customer represented approximately 9% and 10% of total accounts receivable at December 31, 2001 and 2000, respectively. FAIR VALUE OF FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS: The carrying amounts of accounts receivable, prepaid expenses and accounts payable approximate fair values due to the short-term maturities of these instruments. The Company's publicly-traded Senior Subordinated Notes had a fair value of $21.0 million at December 31, 2001. The carrying value of the Company's remaining debt facilities and capital lease obligations approximate fair value since the rates on such facilities are variable, based on current market or are at fixed rates currently available to the Company. COMMON STOCK BASED COMPENSATION: The Company follows the intrinsic value method of accounting for stock options and performance-based stock awards as prescribed by Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25 (APB 25), ACCOUNTING FOR STOCK ISSUED TO EMPLOYEES. RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES: Certain types of specialized fasteners are available from only a limited number of sources. If those sources become unavailable, the Company would not be able to continue to sell such fasteners unless the Company could locate an alternative supplier. The Company's inability to supply certain types of fasteners may adversely affect the Company's sales and its relationship with the customers requiring such fasteners. RECENTLY ISSUED ACCOUNTING STANDARDS: In June 1998, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued Statements of Financial Accounting Standards No. 133, ACCOUNTING FOR DERIVATIVE FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS AND HEDGING ACTIVITIES ("SFAS No. 133"). SFAS No. 133 requires that all derivatives be recognized as assets and liabilities and measured at fair value. The accounting for changes in the fair value of a derivative depends on the intended use of the derivative and the resulting designation. The Company adopted this standard in the quarter ended March 31, 2001. The adoption had no impact on net income because of the Company's minimal use of derivatives. In June 2001, the FASB issues SFAS No. 141, "Business Combinations". SFAS No. 141 establishes new standards for accounting and reporting requirements for business combinations and requires that the purchase method of accounting be used for all business combination initiated after June 30, 2001. SFAS No. 141 also requires that acquired intangible assets be recognized as assets apart from 8
goodwill if they meet one of two specified criteria. Additionally, the statement adds certain disclosure requirements to those required by APB 16, including disclosure of the primary reasons for the business combination and the allocation of the purchase price paid to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed by major balance sheet caption. This statement is required to be applied to all business combinations initiated after June 30, 2001 and to all business combinations accounted for using the purchase method for which the date of acquisition is July 1, 2001 or later. Use of the pooling-of-interests method is prohibited. The adoption of SFAS No. 141 did not have an impact on the Company's financial condition or results of operations. In June 2001, the FASB issued SFAS No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets". SFAS No. 142, which must be applied to fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2001, modifies the accounting and reporting of goodwill and intangible assets. The pronouncement requires entities to discontinue the amortization of goodwill, reallocate all existing goodwill among its reporting segments based on criteria set by SFAS No. 142 and perform initial impairment tests by applying a fair-value-based analysis on the goodwill in each reporting segment. Any impairment at the initial adoption date shall be recognized as the effect of a change in accounting principle. Subsequent to the initial adoption, goodwill shall be tested for impairment annually or more frequently if circumstances indicate a possible impairment. Under SFAS No. 142, entities are required to determine the useful life of other intangible assets and amortize the value over the useful life. If the useful life is determined to be indefinite, no amortization will be recorded. For intangible assets recognized prior to the adoption of SFAS No. 142, the useful life should be reassessed. Other intangible assets are required to be tested for impairment in a manner similar to goodwill. At December 31, 2001, the Company's net goodwill was approximately $125.9 million, and annual amortization of such goodwill was approximately $3.5 million. The Company expects to adopt SFAS No. 142 during its first quarter of 2002. The Company believes the impairment charge upon adoption will be material, and based on current market capitalization could equate to a substantial amount of its recorded goodwill. The Company does not believe this adoption will impact its free cash flows or its operating income. In August 2001, the FASB issued SFAS No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets." SFAS No. 144 supercedes SFAS No. 121, "Accounting for the Impairment of Long-Lived Assets and for Long-Lived Assets to be Disposed of". SFAS No. 144 establishes a single accounting model for long-lived assets to be disposed of by sale and requires that those long-lived assets be measured as the lower of carrying amount or fair value less cost to sell, whether reported in continuing operations or in discontinued operations. SFAS No. 144 is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2001. The Company is in the process of assessing the impact that the adoption of this standard will have on its financial position and results of operations. 2. RESTRUCTURING AND OTHER CHARGES In the fourth quarter of 2001, the Company initiated a plan to restructure its business operations. In addition, the Company conducted an assessment of its business in the aerospace and telecommunication industries in view of the impact of recent events, most notably the September 11th events in New York and Washington, D.C. and the financial difficulties in the telecommunications industry. The Company expects decreases in revenues in the aerospace industry and continued softness in the telecommunications sector. As a result, the Company recorded restructuring and other charges of $47,650,000 in the fourth quarter of 2001. 9
Below is an analysis and discussion of the restructuring and other charges recognized during the fourth quarter and year-ended December 31, 2001 (amounts in thousands): Included in restructuring and other charges are charges totaling $39,053,000 for the write-off of inventory. Of that total, $33,430,000 related to noncash write-offs of excess aerospace and telecommunications inventory in the fourth quarter based upon a review of the anticipated reduced future demand for the inventory resulting from decreased usage levels in the quarter. A $5,623,000 noncash charge was recognized in the second quarter of 2001 as a result of offering $9,762,000 of slower moving inventory at substantially reduced prices in order to take advantage of the cashflows and tax benefits. As announced in November 2001, the Company implemented a restructuring plan to reduce annual operating expenses. The Company is closing five distribution facilities and has reduced its workforce by 86 employees, the majority of which were terminated prior to December 31, 2001. These employees encompass all levels of the organization from executives to warehouse employees. The Company recognized a $2,620,000 charge in the fourth quarter relating to implementation of the plan. In the second quarter of 2001, the Company recorded a $967,000 charge for the relocation of its corporate office from Houston, Texas to Chatsworth, California and a $345,000 charge for cost initiatives in the Industrial Group. The Company has engaged advisors to assist in restructuring efforts and has incurred costs with respect to professionals engaged by potential lenders and investors in connection with due diligence. The Company recognized $966,000 for those fees in the fourth quarter of 2001. In connection with the amendment of the Company's bank credit facility in October 2001, unamortized debt issuance costs of $633,000 relating to the previous facility were written-off. As a result of the charges recorded in the fourth quarter, the realization of recorded deferred tax assets is not assured. The Company recorded a $10,001,000 valuation allowance related to deferred tax assets in the fourth quarter of 2001. During the year ended December 31, 1999, the Company incurred a non-recurring charge of $632,000 related to a workforce reduction in one of the Company's industrial segment distribution centers. 10
3. MANAGEMENT'S PLAN The Company's consolidated financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2001 have been prepared on a going concern basis, which contemplates the realization of assets and the satisfaction of liabilities in the normal course of business. The Company has incurred a net loss of $52,476,000 for the year ended December 31, 2001 and the Company's credit facility (the "Bank Credit Facility") matures on April 30, 2002. These conditions raise substantial doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going concern. The consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that may result from the outcome of this uncertainty. A substantial portion of the Company's business involves sales to the aerospace industry. Primarily as a result of the September 11th events in New York and Washington, D.C., aerospace manufacturers have substantially reduced their business, resulting in decreased business for the Company. The Company is highly leveraged and has outstanding $100 million of Senior Subordinated Notes due 2009 (the "Notes") and approximately $60 million of senior secured indebtedness under the Company's Bank Credit Facility. The downturn in the Company's business since September 11th has made it unlikely that it will be able to repay this indebtedness in accordance with its terms. The Company has taken a number of steps during the year ended December 31, 2001 to reduce costs. On April 25, 2001, the Company hired a new Chief Executive Officer and subsequently replaced four of its executive officers. The Company reduced its workforce by 14% and closed five facilities which are estimated to result in future cost savings of $10 million in 2002. In addition, the Company restructured the manner in which it purchases its inventory in an effort to increase its annual inventory turns. The Company also evaluated its inventory for excess inventory, primarily in the aerospace group, taking into consideration the downturn in business resulting from the events of September 11th and the number of older aircraft that have been taken out of use, resulting in an aerospace inventory write-down of $ 31.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2001. While the steps taken by the Company will improve its 2002 operating results, the Company's level of indebtedness combined with restrictions imposed on the use of the Company's credit facility have resulted in debt service in excess of that which can be serviced by the Company's current operations. The Company has entered into negotiations with its lenders, holders of its Notes and other sources of capital to restructure its indebtedness. Although no binding agreements or commitments have been received, the Company anticipates that a restructuring will involve a reduction in the amount of indebtedness owed to holders of the Notes in exchange for common stock (or a security convertible into common stock). The Company is also negotiating with its senior lenders under its Bank Credit Facility to extend the maturity of its Bank Credit Facility. In addition, the Company is in discussions regarding other alternative transactions, including a sale of the Company's business. It is likely that any restructuring or other alternative will result in substantial dilution to current holders of our common stock and a change in control of the Company. The Company believes that its improved ongoing operating performance will enable it to successfully restructure its indebtedness, without materially impacting its operations, to a level that can be adequately serviced by its current and anticipated future operations. However, these negotiations involve numerous parties with different interests. Additionally, the events of September 11th continue to affect the aerospace industry making it difficult to project future results, and therefore more difficult to attract equity capital. No assurances can be given that one or more of these factors will prevent the Company from successfully restructuring its indebtedness and continuing as a going concern. The Company's lenders under its Bank Credit Facility have notified the Company that the Company is in default under certain covenants under the Bank Credit Facility that would give the lenders the right to accelerate the indebtedness under the Bank Credit Facility and declare it immediately due and payable. The Company and the senior lenders have entered into a forbearance agreement in which the senior lenders agree not to exercise their remedies under the Bank Credit Facility and to continue lending to the Company under the facility until April 26, 2002. In addition, the scheduled interest payment date for the Company's Notes is April 1, 2002. The Company does not expect to make the interest payment on that date. The indenture for the Notes provides a 30-day grace period. If the failure to pay interest continues for 30 days, the Notes will be in default, and the holders of the Notes may, subject to the terms of the indenture, declare all interest and principal immediately due and payable. A default under the Notes will also be a default under the Company's Bank Credit Facility. If the Company is unable to successfully restructure its indebtedness, it may be required to seek protection under the bankruptcy laws. 11
4. PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT AND GOODWILL 5. CREDIT FACILITY, LONG-TERM DEBT AND LEASES In March 1999, the Company sold $100 million of Notes due April 1, 2009. The net proceeds of $94.2 million, after the original issue discount and paying underwriter's commissions, from the offering of the Notes were used to repay indebtedness under the Company's Bank Credit Facility. The Notes accrue interest 12
at 12.25% which is payable on April 1 and October 1 of each year. The Notes are publicly-registered and subordinated to all existing and future senior subordinated obligations and will rank senior to all subordinated indebtedness. The indenture governing the Notes contains covenants that limit the Company's ability to incur additional indebtedness, pay dividends, make investments and sell assets. At December 31, 2001 the Company was in compliance with the covenants. Each of the Company's subsidiaries, which are wholly owned, fully, unconditionally and jointly and severally guarantees the Notes on a senior subordinated basis. Separate financial statements of the guarantors are not presented because management has determined that they would not be material to investors. Effective October 30, 2001, the Company amended its $100 million Bank Credit Facility. The Bank Credit Facility is subject to a borrowing base limitation and secured by Company stock and assets. Advances under the Bank Credit Facility bear interest at the banks' prime rate plus 100 basis points. Commitment fees of 25 to 37.5 basis points per annum are payable on the unused portion of the line of credit. The Bank Credit Facility contains a provision for standby letters of credit up to $20 million. The Bank Credit Facility prohibits the payment of dividends by the Company, restricts the Company's incurring or assuming other indebtedness and requires the Company to comply with certain financial covenants. The financial covenants include: (1) minimum monthly availability requirements, beginning at $6.5 million on October 31, 2001 and increasing periodically thereafter up to $9.5 million on March 1, 2002; (2) monthly EBITDA minimums through February 28, 2002; (3) maximum gross inventory that the Company may have at the end of each calendar month through February 28, 2002; and (4) a tangible net worth requirement. In addition, the Company is required to complete an inventory appraisal by January 15, 2002. At December 31, 2001, the Company had approximately $9.9 million of availability ($6.5 million of availability is required) under the facility. Borrowings under the Bank Credit Facility are classified as current liabilities in accordance with EITF 95-22 BALANCE SHEET CLASSIFICATION OF BORROWINGS OUTSTANDING UNDER REVOLVING CREDIT AGREEMENTS THAT INCLUDE BOTH A SUBJECTIVE ACCELERATION CLAUSE AND A LOCK-BOX ARRANGEMENT. The weighted-average interest rate on short-term borrowings outstanding was 6.59% and 8.10% at December 31, 2001 and 2000, respectively. In March 2002, the Company amended its Bank Credit Facility to reduce the facility to $65 million and change the term to April 30, 2002. In addition, the Company entered into a forbearance agreement with respect to the default on the tangible net worth covenant of the facility caused by the restructuring and other charges described in Note 2. In connection with the amendment of the Company's Bank Credit Facility in October 2001, unamortized debt issuance costs of $633,000 related to the previous facility were written-off. In connection with the amendment of and reduction in the Bank Credit Facility and issuance of the Notes in March 1999, the Company recorded a $2,308,000 noncash charge for the write-off of debt issuance costs. Maturities of long-term debt (excluding capital leases) for the five years subsequent to December 31, 2001 are $60,242,000, $94,000, $51,000, $0 and $0, respectively. The Company leases a portion of its buildings and equipment under non-cancelable capital and operating leases. Future minimum lease payments under the capital and operating leases, together with the present value of the net minimum lease payments, as of December 31, 2001 are as follows: 13
Total rental expense under operating leases for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 was approximately $4,758,000, $4,210,000 and $3,435,000, respectively, including amounts to related parties of $1,024,000, $1,217,000 and $952,000, respectively. Total minimum lease payments include payments due to stockholders of $1,864,000 for capital leases and $6,999,000 for operating leases. 6. INCOME TAXES Deferred tax liabilities and assets at the end of each period are determined based on the future tax consequences attributable to differences between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases, using the tax rate expected to be in effect when the taxes are actually paid or recovered. The measurement of deferred tax assets is reduced, if necessary, by a valuation allowance. For the year ended December 31, 2001, the Company recorded a valuation allowance relating to its net deferred tax assets. Components of income tax expense (benefit) are as follows: 14
The net deferred tax assets (liabilities) consist of the following: Due to the uncertainty surrounding the realization of the deferred tax assets, the Company has recorded a full valuation allowance against these amounts for the year ended December 31, 2001. The Company has approximately $5,696,000 of tax operating loss carryforward at December 31, 2001 that will expire in 2021. The Company's effective tax rate varied from the federal statutory tax rate as follows: 15
7. EARNINGS (LOSS) PER SHARE The computation of net income (loss) per share for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 is based on the weighted average shares of common stock outstanding during the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively. Basic and diluted net income (loss) per share is computed based on the following information: Options and warrants to purchase 1,220,218, 976,228 and 1,192,225 shares of common stock were not included in the diluted net income per share calculation for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively, because the exercise price was greater that the average market price. 8. STOCK OPTION PLAN The Board of Directors has adopted, and the stockholders of the Company have approved, the Pentacon, Inc. 1998 Stock Plan (the "1998 Stock Plan"). The aggregate amount of common stock with respect to which options or other awards may be granted may not exceed 2,550,000 shares. As of December 31, 2001, the Company had granted options and other awards for a total of 1,227,468 shares under the 1998 Stock Plan. The 1998 Stock Plan is administered by the Compensation Committee, which is composed of non-employee directors (the "Committee"). Subject to the terms of the 1998 Stock Plan, the Committee generally determines to whom awards will be granted and the terms and conditions of these awards. Awards granted under the 1998 Stock Plan may be non-qualified stock options, or may qualify as incentive stock options ("ISOs"), restricted stock grants or other awards. In the case of ISOs, the aggregate fair market value (determined at the time the ISO is granted) of the common stock with respect to which ISOs are exercisable for the first time by any employee during any calendar year under all plans of the Company and any parent or subsidiary corporation shall not exceed $100,000. No employee or consultant may receive an option in any year to purchase more than 250,000 shares of common stock. 16
The Committee determines the period over which options become exercisable, provided that all options become immediately exercisable upon death of the grantee or upon a change-in-control of the Company. The 1998 Stock Plan also provides for automatic option grants to directors who are not otherwise employed by the Company or its subsidiaries. Upon commencement of service, a non-employee director will receive a non-qualified option to purchase 15,000 shares of common stock, and continuing non-employee directors annually will receive options to purchase 5,000 shares of common stock. Options granted to non-employee directors are immediately exercisable in full and have a term of ten years. Upon exercise of a non-qualified option, the optionee generally will recognize ordinary income in the amount of the "option spread" (the difference between the market value of the option shares at the time of exercise and the exercise price), and the Company is generally entitled to a corresponding tax deduction (subject to certain withholding requirements). When an optionee sells shares issued upon the exercise of a non-qualified stock option, the optionee realizes a short-term or long-term gain or loss, depending on the length of the holding period, but the Company is not entitled to any tax deduction in connection with such sale. The Company applies APB 25 in accounting for the Plan. Accordingly, no compensation cost has been recognized for its fixed stock option plan. Pro forma information regarding net income and earnings per common share is required by Statements of Financial Accounting Standards No. 123, ACCOUNTING FOR STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION ("SFAS No. 123") as if the Company had accounted for its employee stock options under the fair value method of that statement. The fair value of these options was estimated at the date of grant using a Black-Scholes option pricing ("Black-Scholes") model with the following weighted average assumptions for 2001, 2000 and 1999 respectively: (i) risk-free interest rate of 5.03%, 5.03% and 6.34%, (ii) a dividend yield of 0.00%, (iii) volatility factors of the historical market price of the Company's common stock of 141.4%, 84.6%, and 75.7%, respectively and (iv) a weighted average expected life of 10 years. The Black-Scholes model was developed for use in estimating the fair value of traded options that have no vesting restrictions and are fully transferable. In addition, option valuation models require the input of highly subjective assumptions, including the expected volatility. Because the Company's employee stock options have characteristics significantly different from those of traded options and because changes in the subjective input assumptions can materially affect the fair value estimate, in management's opinion, the existing models do not necessarily provide a reliable single measure of the fair value of its employee stock options. For purposes of pro forma disclosure, the estimated fair value of the options is amortized to expense over the vesting period of the stock options. Had compensation for the Company's stock-based compensation plan been determined based on the fair value at the grant dates for awards under the Plan consistent with the method of SFAS 123, the Company's net income (loss) and earnings (loss) per common share would have been adjusted to the pro forma amounts indicated below: 17
A summary of the status and activity of the Company's fixed stock option plans for officers and employees is presented below: The weighted average fair value of options granted in the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 was $0.98, $1.57 and $4.65, respectively. The following summarizes information related to stock options outstanding at December 31, 2001: 9. SUPPLEMENTAL CASH FLOW INFORMATION Supplemental disclosures of cash flow information are as follows: 18
10. EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS The Company has defined contribution plans which cover substantially all of the Company's full-time employees. Under certain plans, the Company may make discretionary contributions, match various percentages of participants' contributions or both. The Company contributed $524,000, $529,000 and $639,000 in matching contributions to the plans for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively. Additionally, the Company made discretionary contributions to certain plans of $93,000 for the year ended December 31, 1999. 11. UNAUDITED QUARTERLY OPERATING RESULTS 12. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES The Company is involved in various legal proceedings that have arisen in the ordinary course of business. While it is not possible to predict the outcome of such proceedings with certainty, in the opinion of the Company, all such proceedings are either adequately covered by insurance or, if not so covered, should not ultimately result in any liability which would have a material adverse effect on the financial position, liquidity or results of operations of the Company. 13. RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS The Company purchased $2,050,000, $1,415,000 and $1,243,000, of products for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively, from a supplier which is 50% owned by a shareholder The Company had sales of $75,000, $3,841,000 and $5,387,000, of products for the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively, to a company which has a board member who is also a member of the Company's board. The Company has notes or accounts receivable of $1,364,000, $2,463,000 and $1,579,000 relating to such sales at December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively. Other related party transactions are discussed in Note 5. 14. INDUSTRY SEGMENTS AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION INDUSTRY SEGMENTS The Company has two principal operating segments: the Aerospace Group and the Industrial Group. The Aerospace Group serves the aerospace and aeronautics industries and the Industrial Group serves a broad base of industrial manufacturers producing items such as diesel engines, locomotives, power turbines, motorcycles, telecommunications equipment and refrigeration equipment. 19
The performance of businesses is evaluated at the segment level and resources are allocated between the segments. The Pentacon executive responsible for each segment further allocates resources among the various operating units that compose the segment. The accounting policies of the segments are the same as those described in the summary of significant accounting policies in Note 1. Pentacon, Inc. manages cash, debt and income taxes centrally. Accordingly, the Company evaluates performance of its segments and operating units based on the operating earnings exclusive of financing activities and income taxes. The segments are managed separately since each segment distributes to industries requiring different asset allocation characteristics. Intersegment sales and related receivables for each of the years presented were insignificant. Financial information by industry segment follows: (1) Aerospace operating income for the year ended December 31, 2001 includes nonrecurring and other charges of $38,686. Industrial operating income for the year ended December 31, 2001 includes restructuring and other charges of $3,270. General corporate expense for the year-ended December 31, 2001 includes restructuring and other charges of $1,995. (2) Aerospace operating income for the year ended December 31, 2000 includes a charge of $2,003 primarily related to exiting certain non-core and under-performing operations. 20
Capital expenditures by segment were as follows: GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION The Company recorded export sales of $45,828,000, $38,216,000 and $39,274,000 in the years ended December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively. The Company has export sales through its foreign sales corporation to Europe, Canada, the Far East, Mexico, Australia and South America, of which no country or region is individually significant. 15. SUBSEQUENT EVENT (UNAUDITED) The Job Creation and Workers Act of 2002 ("the Act") was enacted in March 2002. The Act provided that net operating loss carryback claims for the years ended December 31, 2001 and 2002 are extended from two years to five years. As a result, the Company will be able to carryback its $5,696,000 tax loss and realize approximately $1,659,000 of additional income tax refunds. The related benefit will be recorded in the first quarter of 2002. 21
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements. 22
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (UNAUDITED) The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements. 23
PENTACON, INC. CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (UNAUDITED) The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements. 24
PENTACON, INC. NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS JUNE 30, 2002 (UNAUDITED) 1. BASIS OF PRESENTATION The consolidated financial statements of Pentacon, Inc. (the "Company") included herein have been prepared without audit pursuant to the Rules and Regulations for reporting on Form 10-Q. Accordingly, certain information and footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements are not included herein. The Company believes all adjustments necessary for a fair presentation of these statements have been included and are of a normal and recurring nature. There has been no significant change in the accounting policies of the Company during the periods presented, with the exception of the adoption of the provisions of bankruptcy accounting described below and the new accounting pronouncement on accounting for goodwill described in Note 2. The statements should be read in conjunction with the financial statements and related notes thereto included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001. The balance sheet at December 31, 2001 has been derived from the audited financial statements at that date but does not include all of the information and footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements. On May 23, 2002, the Company and certain of its subsidiaries filed voluntary petitions for relief under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code with the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of Texas. A substantial portion of the Company's business involves sales to the aerospace industry. Primarily as a result of the September 11th events in New York and Washington D.C., aerospace manufacturers substantially reduced their business, resulting in decreased business for the Company. In addition, the Company's senior lenders had imposed restrictions on the Company's credit availability. The downturn in the Company's business since September 11th combined with the decrease in credit availability resulted in the Company being unable to repay its debts in accordance with stated terms. Therefore, the Company sought protection under Chapter 11 of the Bankruptcy Code. Also on May 23, 2002, the Company entered into an agreement to sell substantially all of its assets to Anixter International, Inc. ("Anixter"). Under the agreement, Anixter has agreed to assume all pre and post petition trade accounts payable. The sale to Anixter and the Company's Plan of Reorganization have the support of the holders of a majority of the Company's 12.25% Senior Subordinated Notes (the "Notes") due April 1, 2009 and the committee of its unsecured creditors. In addition, as of May 23, 2002, the Company entered into a $60.5 million debtor-in-possession credit facility (the "Credit Facility") with its existing bank group (see Note 4). Prior to the bankruptcy filing, the Company did not make the $6.1 million interest payment due April 1, 2002 under the terms of the Company's Notes. As of May 23, 2002, the Company discontinued accruing interest on the Notes. Contractual interest on the Notes for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 was $3.1 million, which is $1.4 million in excess of recorded interest expense included in the accompanying financial statements. The Company is in possession of its properties and assets and continues to manage its business as a debtor-in-possession subject to the supervision of the Bankruptcy Court. Pursuant to the provisions of the Bankruptcy Code, all actions to collect upon any of the Company's liabilities as of the petition date or to enforce pre-petition date contractual obligations, including the Notes, were automatically stayed. Absent approval from the Bankruptcy Court, the Company is prohibited from paying pre-petition obligations. However, the Bankruptcy Court has approved payment of certain pre-petition liabilities such as employee wages and benefits and certain other pre-petition obligations. Additionally, the Bankruptcy Court has approved the retention of legal and financial professionals. As a debtor-in-possession, the Company has the right, subject to Bankruptcy Court approval and certain other conditions, to assume or reject any pre-petition executory contracts and unexpired leases. Parties affected by such rejections may file claims with the Bankruptcy Court in accordance with bankruptcy procedures. 25
Although the Chapter 11 Bankruptcy filing raises substantial doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going concern, the accompanying financial statements have been prepared on a going concern basis. This basis contemplates the continuity of operations, realization of assets, and discharge of liabilities in the ordinary course of business. The statements also present the assets of the Company at historical cost and the current intention that they will be realized as a going concern and in the normal course of business. The Plan of Reorganization could materially change the amounts currently disclosed in the financial statements. The accompanying financial statements do not present the amount which may ultimately be paid to settle liabilities and contingencies which may be allowed in the Chapter 11 Bankruptcy cases. Under Chapter 11 Bankruptcy, the right of, and ultimate payment by the Company to pre-petition creditors may be substantially altered. This could result in claims being paid in the Chapter 11 Bankruptcy proceedings at less (and possibly substantially less) than 100 percent of their face value. At this time, because of material uncertainties, pre-petition claims are carried at face value in the accompanying financial statements. Under the Bankruptcy Code, the Company may elect to assume or reject real estate leases, employment contracts, personal property leases, service contracts and other executory pre-petition contracts, subject to Bankruptcy Court review. The Company cannot presently determine or reasonably estimate the ultimate liability that may result from claims filed as a result of rejecting leases and contracts, and no provisions have been made for these items. Moreover, the interests of existing shareholders could, among other things, be very substantially diluted or even eliminated. Further information about the financial impact of the Chapter 11 Bankruptcy filing is set forth in item 2, Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. On September 9, 2002 the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of Texas issued an order confirming the Company's Plan of Reorganization which included the sale of substantially all of its assets to Anixter. On September 20, 2002 substantially all of the Company's assets were sold to Anixter for $108.2 million. Additionally, Anixter assumed pre-bankruptcy liabilities totaling $16.5 million, and Anixter hired the existing employees of the Company and assumed the lease obligations of certain operating facilities. Bankruptcy Accounting: Since the Chapter 11 Bankruptcy filings, the Company has applied the provisions in Statement of Position ("SOP") 90-7 "Financial Reporting by Entities in Reorganization Under the Bankruptcy Code." SOP 97-1 does not change the application of generally accepted accounting principles in the preparation of financial statements. However, it does require that the financial statements for periods including and subsequent to filing the Chapter 11 petition distinguish transactions and events that are directly associated with the reorganization from the ongoing operations of the business. The financial statements include reclassifications made to reflect the liabilities which have been deferred under the Chapter 11 proceedings as "Liabilities Subject to Compromise". Recently Issued Accounting Standards: In August 2001, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets". SFAS No. 144 supercedes SFAS No. 121, "Accounting for the Impairment of Long-Lived Assets and for Long-Lived Assets to be Disposed of". SFAS No. 144 establishes a single accounting model for long-lived assets to be disposed of by sale and requires that those long-lived assets be measured at the lower of carrying amount or fair value less cost to sell. The Company adopted this standard in the quarter ended March 31, 2002. The adoption had no impact on the Company's financial position or results of operations. 26
2. GOODWILL Effective January 1, 2002, the Company adopted SFAS No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," which establishes new accounting and reporting requirements for goodwill and other intangible assets. Under SFAS No. 142, all goodwill amortization ceased effective January 1, 2002. Goodwill amortization for the quarter and six months ended June 30, 2002 would have otherwise been $864,000 and $1,728,000, respectively. Recorded goodwill attributable to each of the Company's reporting units were tested for impairment by comparing the fair value of each reporting unit with its carrying value. Fair value was determined using discounted cash flows, market multiples and market capitalization. These impairment tests are required to be performed upon adoption of SFAS No. 142 and at least annually thereafter. Significant estimates used in the impairment tests include estimates of future cash flows, future short-term and long-term growth rates, weighted average cost of capital and estimates of market multiples for each of the reportable units. On an ongoing basis (absent any impairment indicators), the Company expects to perform its impairment tests during the fourth quarter. Based on its initial impairment tests, the Company recognized a charge of $88,804,000 ($5.24 per share) in the first quarter of 2002 to reduce the carrying value of goodwill of each of its reporting units to the implied fair value. This impairment is a result of adopting a fair value approach, under SFAS No. 142, to testing impairment of goodwill as compared to the previous method utilized in which evaluations of goodwill impairment were made using the estimated future undiscounted cash flows compared to the assets' carrying amount. Under SFAS No. 142, the impairment adjustment recognized at adoption of the new rules was reflected as a cumulative effect of change in accounting principle in the first quarter 2002 statement of operations. Impairment adjustments recognized after adoption, if any, generally are required to be recognized as operating expenses. The carrying amount of goodwill attributable to each reportable operating unit with goodwill balances and changes therein follows: January 1, Impairment June 30, 2002 Adjustment 2002 ----------- ----------- ----------- (in thousands) Aerospace $ 74,675 $ (70,944) $ 3,731 Industrial 51,252 (17,860) 33,392 ------------ ----------- ----------- $ 125,927 $ (88,804) $ 37,123 ============ =========== =========== 3. RESTRUCTURING AND OTHER CHARGES In November 2001, the Company implemented a restructuring plan to reduce annual operating expenses. The Company closed five distribution facilities and implemented workforce reductions. The Company recognized a $2,620,000 restructuring charge in the fourth quarter relating to implementation of the plan. In the second quarter of 2001, the Company recorded a $967,000 restructuring charge for the relocation of its corporate office from Houston, Texas to Chatsworth, California and a $345,000 restructuring charge for cost reduction initiatives in the industrial group. 27
Below is the activity related to the restructuring charges recognized during the six months ended June 30, 2002 (amounts in thousands): (1) The noncash activity relates to the write-off of leasehold improvements. The Company recognized charges totaling $39,053,000 for the write-off of excess inventory during the year ended December 31, 2001. The noncash write-offs of excess aerospace and telecommunications inventory were recorded based upon a review of the anticipated reduced future demand for the inventory resulting from decreased usage levels. In addition, certain aerospace inventory was disposed of during the year ended December 31, 2001 in order to take advantage of cash flows and tax benefits. At December 31, 2001, the remaining allowance for this excess inventory was $36,066,000. During the six months ended June 30, 2002, the Company recognized $300,000 as a result of disposing of the inventory to which the allowance related. 4. DEBT In March 1999, the Company sold $100 million of Notes due April 1, 2009. The net proceeds of $94.2 million, after the original issue discount and paying underwriter's commissions, were used to repay indebtedness under the Company's Credit Facility. The Notes accrue interest at 12.25% per annum which is payable on April 1 and October 1 of each year. The Notes are publicly-registered and subordinated to all existing and future senior subordinated obligations and will rank senior to all subordinated indebtedness. The indenture governing the Notes contains covenants that limit the Company's ability to incur additional indebtedness, pay dividends, make investments and sell assets. Each of the Company's subsidiaries, which are wholly owned, fully, unconditionally and jointly and severally guarantees the Notes on a senior subordinated basis. The Company did not make the interest payment on the Notes due April 1, 2002 and, as a result, was not in compliance with the covenants. On May 23, 2002, the Company amended the Restructuring Agreement with certain holders of a majority of the Notes whereby the noteholders agreed to support the sale of substantially all the Company's assets to Anixter and the Company's Plan of Reorganization in lieu of finalizing the transaction wherein the Company had agreed with the holders to effect a recapitalization of the Company. As of May 23, 2002, the Company entered into a debtor-in-possession Credit Facility. The $60.5 million Credit Facility is subject to a borrowing base limitation and secured by Company stock and assets. Advances under the Bank Credit Facility bear interest at the banks' prime rate plus 175 basis points. The Credit Facility contains a provision for standby letters of credit up to $2.5 million. The Credit Facility prohibits the payment of dividends by the Company, restricts the Company's incurring or assuming other indebtedness and requires the Company to comply with certain financial covenants. At June 30, 2002, the Company was in compliance with the covenants and had approximately $9.9 million of availability under the facility. 28
5. EARNINGS (LOSS) PER SHARE Basic and diluted net income (loss) per share is computed based on the following information: Options to purchase 1,018,396, 1,195,218, and 1,175,218 shares of common stock were not included in the diluted net income per share calculation for the three and six months ended June 30, 2002, three months ended June 30, 2001 and six months ended June 30, 2001, respectively, because the exercise prices were greater than the average market price. 6. INCOME TAXES The Job Creation and Workers Act, which was enacted in March 2002, provides that net operating loss carryback claims for the years ended December 31, 2001 and 2002 are extended from two years to five years. As a result, the Company can carryback its $5,696,000 tax loss carryover as of December 31, 2001 and realize $1,659,000 of additional income tax refunds. The related benefit was recorded in the quarter ended March 31, 2002. The Company recorded a valuation allowance against the tax benefit which results from the loss in the six months ended June 30, 2002 since realization of the benefit is not assured. For the six months ended June 30, 2001, the provision for income taxes included in the Consolidated Statements of Operations assumes the application of statutory federal and state income tax rates and the non-deductibility of goodwill amortization. Interim period income tax provisions are based upon estimates of annual effective tax rates and events may occur which will cause such rates to vary. 7. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES The Company is involved in various legal proceedings that have arisen in the ordinary course of business. While it is not possible to predict the outcome of such proceedings with certainty, in the opinion of the Company, all such proceedings are either adequately covered by insurance or, if not so covered, should not ultimately result in any liability which would have a material adverse effect on the financial position, liquidity or results of operations of the Company. 29
8. SEGMENT INFORMATION The Company has two principal operating segments: the Industrial Group and the Aerospace Group. The Industrial Group serves a broad base of industrial manufacturers producing items such as diesel engines, locomotives, power turbines, motorcycles, telecommunications equipment, and refrigeration equipment. The Aerospace Group serves the aerospace and aeronautics industries. Financial information by industry segment follows: (1) Industrial operating income for the three and six months ended June 30, 2002 includes costs of $26 and $61, respectively, related to the Company's Chapter 11 filing. Industrial operating income for the three and six months ended June 30, 2001 includes $345 of costs related to cost reduction initiatives. (2) Aerospace operating income for the three and six months ended June 30, 2001 includes a $5,623 charge related to the write down of inventory. (3) General corporate expense for the three and six months ended June 30, 2002 includes $2,318 and $3,878, respectively, of costs related to professional fees incurred in connection with the Company's restructuring, Chapter 11 filing and workforce reductions. General corporate expense for the three and six months ended June 30, 2001 includes $967 of costs related to the relocation of the corporate office from Houston, Texas to Chatsworth, California. 30
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Pro Forma Consolidated Statements of Operations Introduction The following unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements have been prepared from the historical consolidated financial statements of Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"). The Pentacon, Inc. ("Pentacon") column in the following unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements reflects the historical financial statements of Pentacon for the year ended December 31, 2001 and for the 38 week period ended September 19, 2002. The unaudited pro forma consolidated statements of operations have been adjusted to reflect the Pentacon acquisition as described under Item 2 in the Company's 8-K dated September 20, 2002. The unaudited pro forma consolidated statements of operations assume that the Pentacon acquisition occurred as of December 30, 2000. The Pentacon acquisition is reflected in the Company's consolidated balance sheet at September 27, 2002, the most recent period for which a consolidated balance sheet was required. Accordingly, a pro forma balance sheet is not required and is not included herein. In the opinion of management, all adjustments to present fairly the unaudited pro forma consolidated statements of operations have been made. The unaudited pro forma statements of operations should be read in conjunction with the Company's historical consolidated financial statements including the notes thereto, set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 28, 2001; the Company's historical consolidated financial statements including the notes thereto, set forth in the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 27, 2002 and Pentacon's historical consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included elsewhere in this report. Anixter acquired the operations and assets of Pentacon as part of a pre negotiated plan of reorganization by Pentacon under Chapter 11 of the U. S. Bankruptcy Code. The historical results of Pentacon used in the preparation of these pro forma statements reflect certain costs and expenses that are not a part of the acquired assets. The unaudited pro forma consolidated statements of operations are not necessarily indicative of the results that would have occurred had the purchase been made at the beginning of the period presented, nor do they purport to indicate the results of the future operations of the Company. 31
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. PRO FORMA CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS For the Year Ended December 28, 2001 (Unaudited) (In millions, except per share amounts) 32
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. PRO FORMA CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS For the 39 Weeks Ended September 27, 2002 (Unaudited) (In millions, except per share amounts) 33
NOTES TO PRO FORMA CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Note 1. Pro Forma Statements of Operations The pro forma adjustments to the accompanying financial information for the year ended December 28, 2001 and for the 39 weeks ended September 27, 2002 are described below: (a) To reduce both rental expense for facilities that were not acquired and legal and professional fees that were directly related to the bankruptcy proceedings of Pentacon. (b) This adjustment reflects the exclusion of the 2001 goodwill amortization expense incurred by Pentacon, partially offset by purchase accounting adjustments for the amortization of $13.9 million of other intangibles with finite lives. (c) To reflect the exclusion of total interest expense incurred by Pentacon, partially offset by the interest expense that would have been incurred by Anixter resulting from $110.4 million of borrowings used to fund the acquisition at an annualized interest rate of 4.75% over the respective period. (d) To record the estimated income tax expense impacts related to the pro forma adjustments (a) through (c) above and the inclusion of Pentacon at the combined federal and state effective income tax rates of 40.0% and 42.2% for 2002 and 2001, respectively. Note 2. Restructuring and Other Charges In 2001, Pentacon initiated a plan to restructure its current business operations and conducted an assessment of its business in the aerospace and telecommunication industries in view of the impact of the September 11, 2001 events in New York and Washington, D.C. and the financial difficulties in the telecommunications industry. As a result, Pentacon recorded restructuring and other charges of $54.6 million. Included in cost of sales are charges totaling $39.1 million for the write-off of inventory. Of that total, $33.5 million related to noncash write-offs of excess aerospace and telecommunications inventory based on a review of the anticipated future demand for the inventory resulting from decreased usage levels. The remaining $5.6 million represented a noncash charge resulting from offering $9.8 million of slower moving inventory at substantially reduced prices in order to take advantage of the cash flows and tax benefits. The remaining $15.5 million of restructuring and other charges resulted from the write-down of deferred tax assets, termination benefit costs, closing of five distribution facilities, professional fees and write-off of debt issuance costs. See Note 2 "Restructuring and Other Charges" in Pentacon's 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 for additional information. 34
Note 3. Allocation of Purchase Price The Company's acquisition of Pentacon was accounted for as a purchase. Assets and liabilities have been recorded at estimated fair value based on the following preliminary allocation of purchase price. During the fourth quarter of 2002, the Company preliminarily identified certain intangible assets. Intangible assets with finite lives totaling $13.9 million will be amortized over their useful lives of 8 to 10 years, while intangible assets with indefinite lives and goodwill of $1.8 million and $8.6 million, respectively, will not be amortized. Estimated purchase price $ 108.2 Other transaction-related costs 3.2 ------- Total investment 111.4 Tangible assets acquired 117.8 Intangible assets acquired 15.7 Liabilities assumed (30.7) ------- Net assets acquired 102.8 ------- Goodwill $ 8.6 ======= 35
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: November 27, 2002 By: /s/ Robert W.Grubbs ----------------------------- Robert W. Grubbs President and Chief Executive Officer Date: November 27, 2002 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ----------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer 36
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description of Exhibits ----------- ----------------------- 23 Consent of Ernst and Young LLP 37

EXHIBIT 23 CONSENT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS We consent to the incorporation by reference in each of the following Registration Statements of Anixter International Inc. and in each related Prospectus of our report dated February 1, 2002 (except for Note 3, as to which the date is March 28, 2002) with respect to the consolidated financial statements of Pentacon, Inc. included in the Form 8-K/A. Registration Statement No. Purpose ------------- ------- No. 2-93173 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 33-13486 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 33-21656 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 33-38364 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 33-60676 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 33-05907 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 333-56815 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 333-56935 Registration Statement on Form S-8 No. 333-42788 Registration Statement on Form S-3 ERNST & YOUNG LLP Houston, Texas November 25, 2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20030430161020.txt.gz
TIME:20030430161020
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 -------------------- FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of report (Date of earliest event reported): April 29, 2003 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in its Charter) Delaware 1-5989 94-1658138 (State or Other (Commission (IRS Employer Jurisdiction File Number) Identification No.) of Incorporation) 2301 Patriot Boulevard Glenview, Illinois 60025 (Address of Principal Executive (Zip Code) Offices) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 224-521-8000 Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits (c) Exhibits. Exhibit Number Description ------- ----------- 99.1 Press Release, dated April 29, 2003, issued by Anixter International Inc. Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Information furnished under Item 12 -- Results of Operations and Financial Condition). The following information, which is intended to be furnished under Item 12 "Results of Operations and Financial Condition," is being furnished under this Item 9 in accordance with SEC Release No. 33- 8216. Consequently, it is not deemed "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or otherwise subject to liability under that section. It may only be incorporated by reference in another filing under the Exchange Act or Securities Act of 1933 if such subsequent filing specifically incorporates this Form 8-K. On April 29, 2003, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended April 4, 2003. The Company's press release, dated April 29, 2003, is attached as Exhibit 99.1 SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: April 30, 2003 By: /s/ Dennis Letham ---------------------------------- Dennis Letham Senior Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press Release, dated April 29, 2003, issued by Anixter International Inc.

EXHIBIT 99.1 ------------ PRESS RELEASE ------------- FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS EARNINGS PER SHARE OF 27 CENTS ON SALES OF $662 MILLION GLENVIEW, IL, APRIL 29, 2003 Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended April 4, 2003. FIRST QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS * Sales of $662.2 million, including $49.6 million of sales from the recent Pentacon acquisition, rose 8 percent versus the prior year quarter. * Operating profits increased by 10 percent year-over-year to $22.6 million. * Diluted earnings per share, which includes after-tax costs of 1 cent per diluted share for the early retirement of debt, were 27 cents or 17 percent more than the year ago quarter. * Cash flow from operations of $32.3 million was used, among other things, to repurchase $17.3 million of the Company's common stock. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (In millions, except per share amounts) Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "Despite continued economic softness and uncertainty, we were able to generate sales and earnings in line with our stated range of expectations for the quarter. Our market data continues to suggest that we are increasing market share in the face of these difficult times. At the same time, we have the earnings and cash flow strength to continue investing in new market opportunities that are expected to contribute to growth and profitability in both the near and long term." FIRST QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended April 4, 2003, sales of $662.2 million produced net income of $10.2 million, or 27 cents per diluted share. The current period sales include $49.6 million from the operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in September of 2002. The Pentacon sales added 2 cents per diluted share of net income in the first quarter of this year. In the prior year period, sales of $614.7 million generated net income of $8.9 million, or 23 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes an after-tax gain of $0.7 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the sale of real estate. The prior year also includes an after-tax loss of $0.6 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. In the current quarter, the company recorded an after-tax loss of $0.2 million or 1 cent per diluted share related to the early retirement of debt. Consistent with revised financial accounting standards, gains and losses associated with the early retirement of debt are now being reported as a component of other income and expense' for all periods. Operating income in the quarter was $22.6 million, or 10 percent greater than in the 2002 first quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 3.4 percent as compared with 3.3 percent in the year ago quarter. Operating cash flow in the quarter was $32.3 million compared to $42.5 million in the year ago quarter when the Company experienced a 7.2 percent drop in consecutive quarter revenues. At the end of the current quarter, the debt-to-total capitalization ratio was 24.0 percent as compared to 23.5 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. If amounts advanced under the accounts receivable securitization facility were included in the calculation as debt, the debt-to-total capitalization ratio would have been 34.1 percent as compared to 33.8 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. The Company believes the adjusted debt-to-total capitalization ratio is of interest to analysts, investors and other interested parties and, accordingly, it has been presented to permit a more complete analysis of the Company's capitalization relative to others. FIRST QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "The continued softness in IT and telecom spending and manufacturing sector economic weakness have been well documented. Despite these broader issues, however, our first quarter sales results were a repeat of the overall sales patterns of the past few quarters. Excluding sales from the recent Pentacon acquisition, our quarterly sales over the last five quarters have been in a very tight range between $612.5 and $619.4 million. During this time period there has been a fairly steady softening of telecom-related integrated supply sales, with the first quarter reflecting nearly a $35 million year-on-year decrease in such sales. At the same time this has been offset by a firming of enterprise network product sales and exchange rate driven growth in our foreign businesses." "Sales in Europe increased 16.0 percent over the year ago quarter, all of which was attributable to the effects of the weaker US dollar. At the same time, our Latin America and Asia/Pacific combined business experienced an 8.0 percent increase in sales versus the first quarter of last year. After excluding the effects of exchange rate differences, this business increased 11.9 percent in sales due primarily to higher telecom-related integrated supply sales in Asia/Pacific," said Grubbs. "Overall, the sales environment remains challenging, as customers in all markets continue to be extremely reluctant to commit to new capital spending. At the same time, our current sales mix, which continues to be driven largely by maintenance spending for moves, adds and changes in existing networks, seems to have found a fairly firm bottom in this difficult market. Our statistics on new customer acquisitions continue to be positive, which is an important offset to this environment of continued soft capital spending," Grubbs commented. PENTACON ACQUISITION "We were pleased with the progress that was made during the first quarter in terms of both revenue growth and integration efforts," said Grubbs. "We saw Pentacon sales grow by 11.6 percent from the fourth quarter to the first quarter. This growth was achieved despite some very soft production schedules at some of our key customers. The growth reflects a combination of renewed customer confidence in the new' Anixter-Pentacon and new contracts added over the past few months. As a result of the improved revenues, the acquired Pentacon operations contributed 2 cents to diluted earnings per share in the first quarter." Commenting further, Grubbs said, "Over the past few months we have added sales staff at Pentacon to capitalize on its renewed financial strength and market position. At the same time we believe we have made good initial progress in combining the Anixter OEM wire & cable sales efforts into Pentacon. We expect the combined Anixter-Pentacon OEM sales team to drive sales growth as the year unfolds." CONTINUED STRONG CASH FLOW "During the quarter we generated $32.3 million in cash flow from operations due to a combination of earnings and additional working capital reductions," noted Dennis Letham, Chief Financial Officer. "We used $12.6 million of this cash flow for capital expenditures, including $11.2 million for the continued construction of our new headquarters building. Through a sale and leaseback transaction, we anticipate recovering the capital invested in this project, in the second half of 2003. In the first quarter we also repurchased 832,200 of our common shares for $18.4 million, of which $17.3 million was paid for by quarter end." Letham added, "At the end of the quarter, our total borrowings, inclusive of $128.5 million advanced under our accounts receivable securitization facility, were $328.7 million, which resulted in a debt-to-total capital ratio of 34.1 percent. This compares to total borrowings of $324.8 million and a debt-to-total capital ratio of 33.8 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. At this level of leverage we continue to have very good financial flexibility to pursue additional growth opportunities." RESTRICTED STOCK GRANTS "After evaluating current public discussions, trends surrounding the use of stock options, the issues of expensing options and shareholder dilution caused by options, the Anixter Board made the decision to grant restricted stock units in lieu of options with the 2003 grant cycle," said Grubbs. "As a result of this decision, 248,000 stock units were granted in the first quarter of 2003. As required by generally accepted accounting principles, the costs associated with this grant will be expensed over the vesting period of the units. This will result in a reduction to anticipated 2003 earnings of approximately 3 cents per diluted share." SECOND QUARTER OUTLOOK Commenting on the outlook for the second quarter of 2003, Grubbs said, "At the outset of the year we had an expectation of a general economic recovery. Through the current date there have been few signs of such a recovery taking hold and continued uncertainty makes it difficult to predict when a more robust recovery will begin. In such an environment it is increasingly clear that in the near term, growth and improved profitability will come only as a result of increased market share and product line expansion." "We continue to believe, based upon our market contacts, that we are taking share in our core product and primary customer markets," said Grubbs. "At the same time, our efforts to 1) expand our security product lines through the addition of new vendors, 2) develop new security sales opportunities through programs like our recently announced, award winning CCTP solution, 3) invest in the expansion of our OEM sales efforts, and 4) remain focused on selling the value of more efficient supply chain management, all should help drive revenue growth. The near-term issue is whether these efforts will be sufficient to offset continued or further economic weakness." Grubbs concluded by saying, "While we are very focused and encouraged by the opportunities to grow our business and improve near-term profitability, the continuing economic uncertainty makes it difficult to predict the exact timing or extent of any rebound in capital spending by our customers. As a result, our near-term outlook is for a continuation of the sales and earnings patterns of the past few quarters." FIRST QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the first quarter on Tuesday, April 29, 2003, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at WWW.ANIXTER.COM. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at WWW.COMPANYBOARDROOM.COM, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (WWW.STREETEVENTS.COM). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) more than 185,000 products and nearly $500 million in inventory, 2) 142 warehouses with more than 4.4 million square feet of space, and 3) locations in 175 cities in 40 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT THE STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE THAT USE SUCH WORDS AS "BELIEVE," "EXPECT," "INTEND," "ANTICIPATE," "CONTEMPLATE," "ESTIMATE," "PLAN," "PROJECT," "SHOULD," "MAY," OR SIMILAR EXPRESSIONS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THEY ARE SUBJECT TO A NUMBER OF FACTORS THAT COULD CAUSE THE COMPANY'S ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM WHAT IS INDICATED HERE. THESE FACTORS INCLUDE GENERAL ECONOMIC CONDITIONS, TECHNOLOGY CHANGES, CHANGES IN SUPPLIER OR CUSTOMER RELATIONSHIPS, EXCHANGE RATE FLUCTUATIONS, AND NEW OR CHANGED COMPETITORS. PLEASE SEE THE COMPANY'S SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION FILINGS FOR MORE INFORMATION. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT WWW.ANIXTER.COM ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL, INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL, INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS Certain amounts for the prior year have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation. The reimbursement from vendors for expenses incurred by the Company to sell the vendors' products have been classified as a reduction to operating expenses rather than as a reduction to cost of sales. This change has the effect of reducing the gross profits and operating expenses by $1.9 million and $2.2 million in 2003 and 2002, respectively. Also, the costs associated with the debt extinguishment are no longer reported as an extraordinary item, but as a non-operating expense entitled "Extinguishment of debt."


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20030708165302.txt.gz
TIME:20030708165302
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 ---------------------------- FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) July 7, 2003 ------------ ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. -------------------------------------------------------- (Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter) Delaware 1-5989 94-1658138 -------- ------ ---------- (State or Other Jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of Incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 2301 Patriot Boulevard, Glenview, Illinois 60025 ------------------------------------------------ (Address of Principal Executive Offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code (224) 521-8000 -------------- ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS. On July 7, 2003, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") received $125.0 million gross proceeds from the placement under Rule 144A of $328.8 million principal amount at maturity of 30-year zero coupon senior notes convertible into shares of the Company's common stock. Copies of the press releases relating to the announcement and final terms of the offering of the notes are filed as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 hereto, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) EXHIBITS. 99.1 Press release, dated June 30, 2003, issued by the Company. 99.2 Press release, dated July 1, 2003, issued by the Company. SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Registrant) Date: July 8, 2003 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ----------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer EXHIBIT INDEX ------------- Exhibit No. Description ------- ----------- 99.1 Press release, dated June 30, 2003, issued by the Company. 99.2 Press release, dated July 1, 2003, issued by the Company.

EXHIBIT 99.1 ------------ FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC TO RAISE $125 MILLION IN SALE OF ZERO COUPON CONVERTIBLE SENIOR NOTES ------------------------------------ GLENVIEW, IL, JUNE 30, 2003 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), today announced that it will seek to raise $125 million through an offering of zero coupon convertible senior notes due 2033. Anixter may raise up to an additional $18.75 million upon exercise of an over- allotment option in connection with the offering. Anixter expects to use the proceeds of the offering to fund possible repurchases of its outstanding debt and equity securities, including the repurchase of up to $17 million of its common stock simultaneous with the offering, and for general corporate purposes. Neither the convertible notes nor the shares issuable upon their conversion have been registered under the Securities Act of 1933 or any state securities laws and, until so registered, may not be offered or sold in the United States or any state absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT THE STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE THAT USE SUCH WORDS AS "BELIEVE," "EXPECT," "INTEND," "ANTICIPATE," "CONTEMPLATE," "ESTIMATE," "PLAN," "SHOULD," "MAY," OR SIMILAR EXPRESSIONS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THEY ARE SUBJECT TO A NUMBER OF FACTORS THAT COULD CAUSE THE COMPANY'S ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM WHAT IS INDICATED HERE. THESE FACTORS INCLUDE GENERAL ECONOMIC CONDITIONS, TECHNOLOGY CHANGES, CHANGES IN SUPPLIER OR CUSTOMER RELATIONSHIPS, EXCHANGE RATE FLUCTUATIONS, AND NEW OR CHANGED COMPETITORS. PLEASE SEE THE COMPANY'S SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION FILINGS FOR MORE INFORMATION.

EXHIBIT 99.2 ------------ FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC ANNOUNCES SALE OF $125 MILLION OF ZERO COUPON CONVERTIBLE SENIOR NOTES ------------------------------------ GLENVIEW, IL, JULY 1, 2003 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), today announced that it has agreed to the sale of 30-year zero coupon senior notes that are convertible into shares of Anixter International common stock. Anixter anticipates gross proceeds of $125 million. The initial purchaser of the notes will also have a 13-day option to purchase additional notes to cover over-allotments, which would give Anixter up to approximately $18.75 million in additional gross proceeds. Terms of the 30-year zero coupon senior notes include an annual yield- to-maturity of 3.25 percent and an initial conversion premium of 26 percent over the $23.43 closing price of Anixter common stock on June 30, 2003. If certain conditions for conversion (relating to the closing stock prices of Anixter exceeding certain thresholds for specified periods) are met, holders may convert each of the 30-year zero coupon senior notes into 12.8773 shares of Anixter common stock in any calendar quarter commencing after September 30, 2003. Holders also may convert their notes into shares of Anixter common stock if the notes are called for redemption or upon the occurrence of certain corporate events. In either event, Anixter may elect to settle the conversion obligation in cash. If the conditions for conversion are met, and Anixter elects not to settle in cash, the 30-year zero coupon senior notes will be convertible in the aggregate into approximately 4,234,000 shares of Anixter common stock or approximately 4,869,000 shares of Anixter common stock if the initial purchaser exercises its entire over-allotment option. Anixter may redeem the 30-year zero coupon senior notes, at any time in whole or in part, after eight years for cash at accreted value. Holders of the 30-year zero coupon senior notes will have the option to require Anixter to purchase their notes at accreted value in years 4, 6, 8, 10, 15, 20 and 25. Anixter may choose to pay the purchase price in cash and/or common shares. The notes and the shares of common stock issuable upon conversion have not been registered under the Securities Act of 1933 or any state securities laws and, until so registered, may not be offered or sold in the United States or any state absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) more than 185,000 products and nearly $500 million in inventory, 2) 142 warehouses with more than 4.4 million square feet of space, and 3) locations in 175 cities in 40 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT THE STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE THAT USE SUCH WORDS AS "BELIEVE," "EXPECT," "INTEND," "ANTICIPATE," "CONTEMPLATE," "ESTIMATE," "PLAN," "SHOULD," "MAY," OR SIMILAR EXPRESSIONS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THEY ARE SUBJECT TO A NUMBER OF FACTORS THAT COULD CAUSE THE COMPANY'S ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM WHAT IS INDICATED HERE. THESE FACTORS INCLUDE GENERAL ECONOMIC CONDITIONS, TECHNOLOGY CHANGES, CHANGES IN SUPPLIER OR CUSTOMER RELATIONSHIPS, EXCHANGE RATE FLUCTUATIONS, AND NEW OR CHANGED COMPETITORS. PLEASE SEE THE COMPANY'S SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION FILINGS FOR MORE INFORMATION. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com ---------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20030730145933.txt.gz
TIME:20030730145933
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 -------------------- FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of report (Date of earliest event reported): July 29, 2003 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in its Charter) Delaware 1-5989 94-1658138 (State or Other (Commission (IRS Employer Jurisdiction File Number) Identification No.) of Incorporation) 2301 Patriot Boulevard Glenview, Illinois 60025 (Address of Principal Executive (Zip Code) Offices) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 224-521-8000 Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits (c) Exhibits. Exhibit Number Description ------- ----------- 99.1 Press Release, dated July 29, 2003, issued by Anixter International Inc. Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On July 29, 2003, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended July 4, 2003. The Company's press release, dated July 29, 2003, is attached as Exhibit 99.1 SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: July 30, 2003 By: /s/ Dennis Letham ------------------------------ Dennis Letham Senior Vice President-Finance and Chief Financial Officer EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press Release, dated July 29, 2003, issued by Anixter International Inc.

EXHIBIT 99.1 ------------ PRESS RELEASE ------------- FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: Dennis Letham Chris Kettmann H. Patel Chief Financial Officer Investor Inquiries Media Inquiries (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS EARNINGS PER SHARE OF 20 CENTS, INCLUDING A LOSS OF 9 CENTS PER SHARE FROM THE EARLY RETIREMENT OF DEBT, ON SALES OF $645 MILLION GLENVIEW, IL, JULY 29, 2003 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended July 4, 2003. SECOND QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS ------------------------- * Sales of $644.8 million, including $45.5 million of sales from the September 2002 Pentacon acquisition, rose 4 percent versus the prior year quarter. * Operating profits decreased by 5 percent year-over-year to $21.3 million. * Diluted earnings per share, which includes after-tax costs of 9 cents per diluted share for the early retirement of debt, were 20 cents or 39 percent less than the year ago quarter. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS -------------------- (In millions, except per share amounts) ********************************************************************** * * * Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "As we have seen in the * * past few quarters, customers are continuing to spend on day-to-day * * maintenance and smaller projects, but are generally unwilling to * * commit to larger projects. In this environment our daily sales * * have remained relatively flat, although the number of actual * * shipping and billing days in a given quarter has affected our * * total quarterly sales. Given our strong balance sheet, as well * * as our ability to leverage our cost structure, we remain well * * positioned to take advantage of increased levels of customer * * capital spending." * * * ********************************************************************** SECOND QUARTER RESULTS ---------------------- For the three-month period ended July 4, 2003, sales of $644.8 million produced net income of $7.3 million, or 20 cents per diluted share, inclusive of after-tax losses of $3.5 million or 9 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. Second quarter sales included $45.5 million from the operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in September of 2002. The Pentacon sales had no effect on net income in the second quarter of this year. The second quarter also benefited from a substantial increase in the cash surrender value of certain company-owned life insurance policies due to gains in the value of the equity securities underlying the policies. These gains resulted in pre-tax income of $1.4 million being recorded as a part of "other, net" during the quarter. In the prior year period, sales of $617.3 million generated net income of $12.4 million, or 33 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes an after-tax gain of $1.2 million or 3 cents per diluted share from the sale of securities. The prior year period also includes an after-tax loss of $0.4 million or 1 cent per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. Consistent with revised financial accounting standards, gains and losses associated with the early retirement of debt are now being reported as a component of "other income and expense" for all periods. Operating income in the quarter was $21.3 million or 5 percent less than in the 2002 second quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 3.3 percent compared to 3.7 percent in the year ago quarter. Operating cash flow in the quarter was a negative $4.7 million compared to a positive $56.0 million in the year ago quarter. The negative cash flow was due to the timing of payments to vendors and an increase in purchases from vendors offering early payment discounts. Following the end of the quarter refinancing, the quarter-end debt-to- total capitalization ratio was 30.2 percent as compared to 23.5 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. If amounts borrowed under the accounts receivable securitization facility were included in the calculation, the debt-to-total capitalization ratio would have been 38.9 percent compared to 33.8 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. Due to the timing of various steps of the refinancing extending over the quarter-end, the leverage ratios at quarter-end were higher by 2 to 3 percentage points than they were in early July when all steps of the refinancing were completed. SIX MONTH RESULTS ----------------- For the six-month period ended July 4, 2003, sales of $1,307.0 million produced net income of $17.5 million, or 47 cents per diluted share, inclusive of after tax losses of $3.7 million or 10 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. The six-month period sales include $95.1 million from the operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in September of 2002. The Pentacon sales added 2 cents per share of net income in the first half of this year. The first half results also include the gains in cash surrender value on company- owned life insurance policies described above. In the prior year period, sales of $1,232.0 million generated net income of $21.3 million, or 56 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes after-tax gains of $1.2 million or 3 cents per diluted share from the sale of securities and $0.7 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the sale of certain real estate. The prior year also includes an after-tax loss of $1.0 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. As discussed above, gains and losses associated with the early retirement of debt are now being reported as a component of "other income and expense" for all periods. SECOND QUARTER SALES TRENDS --------------------------- Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "In the second quarter we saw a continuation of the very steady, but basically flat, daily sales trends of the past couple of quarters. Our average daily sales in the second quarter were $10.40 million compared to $10.19 million in the first quarter of this year and $10.18 in the fourth quarter of the prior year. The sequential drop in total quarterly sales is due entirely to the fewer number of actual shipping and billing days." Grubbs added, "Consistent with our comments of the past couple of quarters, the overall sales environment continues to place a greater emphasis on day-to-day maintenance spending and smaller projects. For the most part, customers remain very cautious about committing to larger capital projects. At the same time, weak levels of industrial production are having a negative impact on the portion of our business that supplies original equipment manufacturers." "In the current environment it is important that we continue to focus on good expense management and opportunities to improve gross margins. In the second quarter we achieved a 20 basis point improvement in gross margins and we were able to reduce operating expenses by just over 1 percent on a consecutive quarter basis. These actions partially offset the negative earnings effects associated with the drop in sales in the second quarter," said Grubbs. REFINANCING ACTIVITIES ---------------------- "At the end of the second quarter we entered into a series of transactions that will lower our future cost of borrowings as well as add to earnings per share because there will be fewer shares outstanding," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "On July 1, 2003 we raised $125.0 million through the issuance of 3.25 percent, zero coupon senior bonds, maturing July of 2033. Later in July, the underwriter of this offering exercised its over-allotment option, thereby raising the total gross proceeds from this offering to $143.8 million." "As of the end of the quarter, we had committed a portion of the proceeds from this offering to retire $63.5 million in accreted value of our 7 percent, zero coupon senior notes, maturing June of 2020. The early retirement of these bonds resulted in an after-tax charge of $3.5 million or 9 cents per share in the quarter," continued Letham. "We also committed $17.2 million of the offering proceeds to retire 735,450 of our outstanding common shares during the second quarter. The remaining proceeds were subsequently used to reduce borrowings under our bank working capital lines of credit and will be available for general corporate purposes." Letham added, "This refinancing has resulted in a modest, short-term increase in leverage. Free cash flow over the coming months is expected to quickly reduce leverage ratios to a level at or below the level that existed prior to this refinancing." BUSINESS OUTLOOK ---------------- "While some recent analyst and media reports have commented on an improving economic environment, we have not yet seen a significant pick up in larger capital spending projects across a broad portion of our customer base. Until these larger projects materialize we will plan for our daily average sales to remain at the same level as the past few quarters," said Grubbs. "We will continue to focus on new customer acquisition, product line expansion and new service offerings, with a short-term goal to maintain our daily sales rates. Longer term, we believe these actions will help to reinforce a rebound in sales and profitability when the economy improves." Concluding, Grubbs said, "In comparison to the recently completed quarter, the third quarter should benefit by the fact that there are two more shipping and billing days, due to a fewer number of holidays. We expect this to result in an improvement in sales and earnings on a consecutive quarter basis." SECOND QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT ------------------------------ Anixter will report results for the second quarter on Tuesday, July 29, 2003, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER ------------- Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) more than 185,000 products and nearly $500 million in inventory, 2) 142 warehouses with more than 4.4 million square feet of space, and 3) locations in 175 cities in 40 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT THE STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE THAT USE SUCH WORDS AS "BELIEVE," "EXPECT," "INTEND," "ANTICIPATE," "CONTEMPLATE," "ESTIMATE," "PLAN," "PROJECT," "SHOULD," "MAY," OR SIMILAR EXPRESSIONS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THEY ARE SUBJECT TO A NUMBER OF FACTORS THAT COULD CAUSE THE COMPANY'S ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM WHAT IS INDICATED HERE. THESE FACTORS INCLUDE GENERAL ECONOMIC CONDITIONS, TECHNOLOGY CHANGES, CHANGES IN SUPPLIER OR CUSTOMER RELATIONSHIPS, EXCHANGE RATE FLUCTUATIONS, AND NEW OR CHANGED COMPETITORS. PLEASE SEE THE COMPANY'S SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION FILINGS FOR MORE INFORMATION. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com --------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS ---------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET -------------------------------------------------------------------------- July 4, January 3, (IN MILLIONS) 2003 2003 ------- ---------- ASSETS Cash $ 27.3 $ 19.1 Accounts receivable, net 227.8 188.2 Bond offering proceeds receivable 121.9 - Note receivable - unconsolidated subsidiary 42.3 69.6 Inventories 483.4 498.8 Deferred taxes 26.6 26.5 Income taxes receivable 3.2 - Other current assets 11.7 10.0 --------- --------- Total current assets 944.2 812.2 Property and equipment, net 69.1 59.1 Goodwill, net 253.1 247.6 Other assets 117.9 107.1 --------- --------- $ 1,384.3 $ 1,226.0 ========= ========= LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY Accounts payable $ 246.1 $ 257.3 Accrued expenses 75.5 83.5 Common stock and bond repurchase payable 85.6 - Accrued restructuring costs 3.4 4.2 Accrued income taxes - 4.7 --------- --------- Total current liabilities 410.6 349.7 3.25% zero-coupon convertible notes 125.0 - 7.0% zero-coupon convertible notes 64.8 124.0 Long-term debt 88.5 71.1 Other liabilities 51.6 46.4 --------- --------- Total liabilities 740.5 591.2 Stockholders' equity 643.8 634.8 --------- --------- $ 1,384.3 $ 1,226.0 ========= =========
Net sales $ 644.8 $ 617.3 $1,307.0 $1,232.0 Cost of goods sold 486.8 471.0 988.2 946.1 ------- ------- -------- -------- Gross profit 158.0 146.3 318.8 285.9 Operating expenses 136.4 123.8 274.2 242.9 Amortization of intangibles 0.3 - 0.7 - ------- ------- -------- -------- Operating income 21.3 22.5 43.9 43.0 Interest expense (3.3) (4.1) (6.7) (8.8) Extinguishment of debt (5.8) (0.6) (6.2) (1.6) Other, net 0.6 2.9 (0.7) 2.9 ------- ------- -------- -------- Income before income taxes 12.8 20.7 30.3 35.5 Income tax expense 5.5 8.3 12.8 14.2 ------- ------- -------- -------- Net income $ 7.3 $ 12.4 $ 17.5 $ 21.3 ======= ======= ======== ======== BASIC INCOME PER SHARE $ 0.20 $ 0.34 $ 0.48 $ 0.58 DILUTED INCOME PER SHARE $ 0.20 $ 0.33 $ 0.47 $ 0.56 AVERAGE SHARES OUTSTANDING: Basic 36.4 36.9 36.7 36.8 Diluted 37.3 38.2 37.5 38.1 GEOGRAPHIC SEGMENTS ------------------- NET SALES: North America $ 511.8 $ 492.8 $1,029.9 $ 980.4 Europe 89.9 84.8 187.8 169.2 Asia Pacific and Latin America 43.1 39.7 89.3 82.4 ------- ------- -------- -------- $ 644.8 $ 617.3 $1,307.0 $1,232.0 ======= ======= ======== ======== OPERATING INCOME (LOSS): North America $ 18.2 $ 21.0 $ 37.3 $ 39.0 Europe 2.9 1.5 5.9 4.9 Asia Pacific and Latin America 0.2 - 0.7 (0.9) ------- ------- -------- -------- $ 21.3 $ 22.5 $ 43.9 $ 43.0 ======= ======= ======== ======== Certain amounts for the prior year have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation. The reimbursement from vendors for expenses incurred by the Company to sell the vendors' products have been classified as a reduction to operating expenses rather than as a reduction to cost of sales. This change has the effect of reducing the gross profits and operating expenses for the 13 weeks and 26 weeks ended July 4, 2003 and June 28, 2002, by $2.0 million and $3.9 million, and $1.4 million and $3.6 million, respectively. In addition, the costs associated with the debt extinguishment are no longer reported as an extraordinary item, but as a non-operating expense entitled "Extinguishment of debt."


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20031031173013.txt.gz
TIME:20031031173013
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): October 31, 2003 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60025 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) ================================================================================
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated October 28, 2003, issued by Anixter International Inc. ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On October 28, 2003, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended October 3, 2003. The Company's press release, dated October 28, 2003, is attached as Exhibit 99.1. i
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. October 31, 2003 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham -------------------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NO. DESCRIPTION 99.1 Press Release, dated October 28, 2003, issued by Anixter International Inc.

EXHIBIT 99.1 FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS EARNINGS PER SHARE OF 31 CENTS ON SALES OF $653 MILLION GLENVIEW, IL, OCTOBER 28, 2003 -- Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended October 3, 2003. THIRD QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS o Sales of $653.4 million rose 4 percent versus the prior year quarter, including a $40.0 million increase in sales resulting from the September 20, 2002 Pentacon acquisition. o Operating profits of $23.3 million increased 1 percent compared to $23.1 million in the year ago quarter. o Diluted earnings per share were 31 cents as compared to 30 cents in the year ago quarter, which included a 2 cent per share gain for the early extinguishment of debt. o As a result of timing differences in payments to vendors, cash flow from operations was $55.8 million as compared to $36.5 million in the prior year. o Walters Hexagon Group Limited, a U.K. based distributor of fasteners and other small components to Original Equipment Manufacturers, was acquired on September 26, 2003 for an initial consideration of $41.6 million. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (In millions, except per share amounts) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "Our third quarter results continue the trend of the past few quarters where steady sales have produced consistent earnings and solid cash flow. Significant improvement in sales trends is still dependent on increased capital spending by our customers, and it is expected that increased capital spending will likely trail overall improvements in the economy. Until then we will continue to generate solid operating results and strong cash flow that will put us in a strong position for an eventual recovery in capital spending." - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
THIRD QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended October 3, 2003, sales of $653.4 million produced net income of $11.3 million, or 31 cents per diluted share. Third quarter sales included $47.0 million from the operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in September of 2002. The acquired Pentacon operations contributed 1 cent to earnings per diluted share in the third quarter of this year. In the prior year period, sales of $626.3 million generated net income of $11.6 million, or 30 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes an after-tax gain of $0.8 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the early extinguishment of debt. Operating income in the quarter was $23.3 million as compared to $23.1 million in the 2002 third quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 3.6 percent compared to 3.7 percent in the year ago quarter. NINE MONTH RESULTS For the nine-month period ended October 3, 2003, sales of $1,960.4 million produced net income of $28.8 million, or 77 cents per diluted share, inclusive of after tax losses of $3.7 million or 10 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. The nine-month period sales include $142.1 million from the operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in September of 2002. The acquired Pentacon operations added 3 cents to earnings per diluted share in the first nine months of this year. The nine-month results also include after-tax gains in cash surrender value on company-owned life insurance policies of $0.9 million or 2 cents per diluted share. In the prior year period, sales of $1,858.3 million generated net income of $32.9 million, or 86 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes after-tax gains of $1.2 million or 3 cents per diluted share from the sale of securities and $0.7 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the sale of real estate. The prior year also includes an after-tax loss of $0.2 million or 1 cent per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. Consistent with revised financial accounting standards, gains and losses associated with the early retirement of debt are now being reported as a component of "other income and expense" for all periods. Operating income for the nine months ended October 3, 2003 was $67.2 million as compared to $66.1 million in the year ago period. Operating margins were 3.4 percent for the nine months ended October 3, 2003 versus 3.6 percent in the year ago period. THIRD QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Similar to the past several quarters, the overall sales environment continues to place a greater emphasis on day-to-day maintenance spending and smaller projects. For the most part, customers remain very cautious about committing to larger capital projects. This is a trend that we expect to continue until the economy shows sustained economic growth." "We believe we have continued to enhance our competitive position in all of the end markets we serve, putting us in a better position for long-term growth," continued Grubbs. "We have done this by improving our service offerings and applications, which are designed to enhance customer profitability by lowering the customer's procurement process costs and total cost of inventory ownership."
STRONG CASH FLOW "Operating cash flow in the quarter was $55.8 million compared to $36.5 million in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "During the quarter, $42 million was used to purchase Walters Hexagon Group Limited. For the nine months ended October 3, 2003, cash flow from operations was $83.4 million, as compared to $135.0 million in the year ago period. At the end of the quarter, the debt-to-total capitalization ratio was 26.7 percent as compared to 23.5 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. If amounts borrowed under the accounts receivable securitization facility were included in the calculation, the debt-to-total capitalization ratio would have been 36.4 percent at the end of the most recent quarter compared to 33.8 percent at the end of fiscal 2002." ACQUISITION OF WALTERS HEXAGON GROUP LIMITED Commenting on the recent acquisition of Walters Hexagon, Grubbs said, "Since our purchase of Pentacon in September of 2002 we have explored ways in which we could expand the geographic reach of our OEM supply business to create a global value proposition for existing and potential multi-national OEM customers. The acquisition of Walters Hexagon gives us not only a reasonable sized base of business in the U.K., but more importantly, it provides us a management team with the experience and industry knowledge to develop a Europe-wide OEM supply business." "With a number of the initial integration steps related to the Pentacon acquisition now successfully behind us, the timing for this acquisition seemed right," said Grubbs. "The combination of our existing wire & cable OEM supply business, together with the acquired operations of Pentacon and Walters Hexagon, gives us an annual revenue base of nearly $375 million in this market. Although we would not entirely eliminate the possibility of further acquisitions in this market at some point in the future, we believe we now have the critical mass necessary to successfully build a global presence in the OEM supply market." BUSINESS OUTLOOK "In recent months, analyst reports, media stories and government statistics have pointed to an improving economic environment. Looking at our business, however, while customers acknowledge the long-term need to upgrade their network infrastructure, we have not seen a significant pick up in larger capital spending projects across a broad portion of our customer base," said Grubbs. "Until we see a few solid quarters of improved revenue and earnings results in our customer base, we are unlikely to see a significant upturn in larger capital projects. Until that time, our business will continue to generate significant cash flow and relatively strong earnings that can be used to better position us to capitalize on an improving economy." Grubbs concluded, "Our fiscal fourth quarter, which ends on Friday, January 2, 2004, will contain three major Thursday holidays, including Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year's. This will reduce the number of available billings days to an estimated 60 days, as compared to 64 days in the recently completed third quarter. Although the holiday effects will be partially offset by the initial quarter of reported sales and earnings from our acquisition of Walters Hexagon, we expect a drop in both sales and earnings in fourth fiscal quarter as compared to the third quarter due to the fewer number of billing days."
THIRD QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the third quarter on Tuesday, October 28, 2003, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 220,000 products and nearly $500 million in inventory, 3) 151 warehouses with more than 4.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 180 cities in 40 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, exchange rate fluctuations, and new or changed competitors. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS Certain amounts for the prior year have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation. The reimbursement from vendors for expenses incurred by the Company to sell the vendors' products have been classified as a reduction to operating expenses rather than as a reduction to cost of sales. This change has the effect of reducing the gross profits and operating expenses for the 13 weeks and 39 weeks ended October 3, 2003 and September 27, 2002, by $2.2 million and $6.1 million, and $1.9 million and $5.5 million, respectively. In addition, the costs associated with the debt extinguishment are no longer reported as an extraordinary item, but as a non-operating expense entitled "Extinguishment of debt."
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20040206111938.txt.gz
TIME:20040206111938
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 3, 2004 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of incorporation (I.R.S. Employer or organization) Identification No.) 2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60025 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) ================================================================================
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated February 3, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc. ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On February 3, 2004, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended January 2, 2004. The Company's press release, dated February 3, 2004, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. February 6, 2004 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ------------------------------ Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NO. DESCRIPTION 99.1 Press Release, dated February 3, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc.

EXHIBIT 99.1 FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS EARNINGS PER SHARE OF 36 CENTS ON SALES OF $665 MILLION GLENVIEW, IL, FEBRUARY 3, 2004 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended January 2, 2004. FOURTH QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS - - Sales of $664.8 million on 60 billing days in the quarter (including a $19.0 million increase in sales resulting from the September 26, 2003 acquisition of Walters Hexagon Group Limited) compared to sales of $661.8 million on 65 billing days in the year ago quarter. - - Operating profits, including a gain of $1.6 million from the termination of pension plans in certain foreign operations, increased 16 percent to $25.1 million as compared to $21.6 million in the year ago quarter. - - Diluted earnings per share, including a gain of 4 cents per diluted share from the termination of pension plans in certain foreign operations rose 33 percent to 36 cents versus 27 cents in the year ago quarter. - - Cash flow from operations was $41.7 million as compared to $30.7 million in the prior year quarter. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS - -------------------- (In millions, except per share amounts) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Robert Grubbs, President and CEO of Anixter, said, "The biggest contributors to the fourth quarter revenue and earnings gains were increased activity by telecom equipment manufacturers and increased business in foreign markets. The termination of defined benefit pension plans in certain of our foreign operations and a replacement of those plans with defined contribution plans contributed to our positive earnings results. However, while the fourth quarter results were encouraging it is still premature to conclude that there is a broader based trend of increased capital spending within our customer base." - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended January 2, 2004, sales of $664.8 million produced net income of $13.1 million, or 36 cents per diluted share. Fourth quarter sales included $19.0 million from Walters Hexagon Group Limited, which was acquired on September 26, 2003. The acquired Walters Hexagon operations contributed 1 cent to earnings per diluted share in the fourth quarter of 2003. The fourth quarter also included a gain of $1.6 million or 4 cents per diluted share from the termination of pension plans in certain foreign operations and an after-tax loss of $0.2 million or 1 cent per diluted share from the early extinguishment of debt. In the prior year period, sales of $661.8 million generated net income of $10.2 million, or 27 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes an after-tax loss of $0.2 million or 1 cent per diluted share from the early extinguishment of debt. Consistent with revised financial accounting standards, gains and losses associated with the early retirement of debt are now being reported as a component of "other income and expense" for all periods. Operating income in the quarter was $25.1 million as compared to $21.6 million in the 2002 fourth quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 3.8 percent compared to 3.3 percent in the year ago quarter. Excluding the gain of $1.6 million from the termination of pension plans in certain foreign countries, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 3.5 percent. The fourth quarter of 2003 had an estimated 60 billing days after taking into account the Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year holidays, each of which was on a Thursday. In the prior year the fiscal calendar resulted in a 14-week period prior to the effect of holidays. After taking into consideration the midweek holidays of Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Years, there were an estimated 65 billing days in the fourth quarter of 2002. FISCAL 2003 RESULTS For the fiscal year ended January 2, 2004, sales of $2.63 billion produced net income of $41.9 million, or $1.13 per diluted share. Current year earnings are inclusive of after tax losses of $3.9 million or 11 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt and a gain of $1.6 million or 4 cents per diluted share for the termination of pension plans in certain foreign countries. The fiscal year sales include $184.8 million from the operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in September 2002 and $19.0 million from the acquisition of Walters Hexagon on September 26, 2003. The two acquired operations added 4 cents to earnings per diluted share in the fiscal year. In the prior year period, sales of $2.52 billion generated net income of $43.1 million, or $1.13 per diluted share. The prior year includes after-tax gains of $1.2 million or 3 cents per diluted share from the sale of securities and $0.7 million or 2 cents per diluted share from the sale of certain real estate. The prior year also includes an after-tax loss of $0.4 million or 1 cent per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. Operating income for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2004 was $92.3 million as compared to $87.7 million in the year ago period. Operating margins were 3.5 percent in both fiscal 2003 and 2002.
Discussing full year 2003 results, Grubbs said, "Although 2003 continued to present both Anixter and the broader market with a number of challenges, we were pleased to report improved operating results and continued strong cash flow. The addition of Walters Hexagon in September, combined with a continued focus on enhancing our product and service offerings for our customers, have improved our competitive position and provide us with a strong foundation going into 2004." FOURTH QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "The quarter started out strong, but the holidays in late November and December make it difficult to ascertain if there is a sustainable growth trend at this time. While the quarter did show an overall improvement in daily sales trends, it remains to be seen when and how quickly larger capital project spending will increase across our customer base." "The sales strength we saw in the fourth quarter was most pronounced in our foreign businesses and sales to telecom equipment manufacturers," continued Grubbs. "In Latin America we saw a traditionally strong fourth quarter, with sales up 19 percent from the third quarter to the fourth quarter. We also saw approximately an 11 percent consecutive quarter growth rate in Europe communications and industrial wire & cable sales, which excludes the sales of the recently acquired Walters Hexagon. This increase in consecutive quarter European sales reflects the seasonal recovery from the third quarter vacation period and the weaker US dollar. Lastly, there was a noticeable pick up in sales to telecom equipment manufacturers which resulted in consecutive quarter sales growth of 19 percent." STRONG CASH FLOW "Operating cash flow in the quarter was $41.7 million compared to $30.7 million in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "In addition to cash flow from operations the Company also received $27.0 million from the completion of the sale and leaseback of the Company's headquarters in Glenview, Illinois during the fourth quarter of 2003. At the end of the fiscal 2003 the debt-to-total capitalization ratio was 25.7 percent as compared to 23.5 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. If amounts borrowed under the accounts receivable securitization facility were included in the calculation, the debt-to-total capitalization ratio would have been 35.8 percent compared to 33.8 percent at the end of fiscal 2002. At the end of fiscal 2003, on hand cash balances were $101.4 million as compared to $19.1 million at the end of fiscal 2002." "For the fiscal year, cash flow from operations was $125.1 million, as compared to $165.7 million in the year ago period. The decrease from the prior year reflects the fact that sales declines in the prior year lead to larger working capital reductions than were experienced in the current year on flat sales," commented Letham. BUSINESS OUTLOOK "We hope the daily sales trends of October and early November are early signs that the end markets we serve may be starting to participate in the overall economic recovery that has been widely reported in the business press and various government statistics," said Grubbs. "However, the weak holiday periods in late November and December, combined with the downward seasonal trends we typically see in some of our operations in the early weeks of a new year, have obscured the degree to which this may be the start of a recovery in our customer base."
Concluding, Grubbs said, "The first half of 2004 should provide a clearer indication of the degree to which our customers are participating in a broader economic recovery. Regardless of overall economic conditions, however, we remain encouraged by the long term opportunities that exist from extending our product and service offerings." FOURTH QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the fourth quarter on Tuesday, February 3, 2004, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 225,000 products and nearly $500 million in inventory, 3) 151 warehouses with more than 4.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 180 cities in 42 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, exchange rate fluctuations, and new or changed competitors. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Certain amounts for the prior year have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation. The reimbursement from vendors for expenses incurred by the Company to sell the vendors' products have been classified as a reduction to operating expenses rather than as a reduction to cost of sales. This change has the effect of reducing the gross profits and operating expenses for the fourth quarter and fiscal year ended January 2, 2004 and January 3, 2003, by $2.3 million and $8.4 million, and $2.8 million and $8.3 million, respectively. In addition, the costs associated with the debt extinguishment are no longer reported as an extraordinary item, but as a non-operating expense entitled "Extinguishment of debt."
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20040428171717.txt.gz
TIME:20040428171717
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 27, 2004 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60025 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) ================================================================================
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated April 27, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc. ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On April 27, 2004, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended April 2, 2004. The Company's press release, dated April 27, 2004, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. April 28, 2004 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham --------------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NO. DESCRIPTION 99.1 Press Release, dated April 27, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc.

FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: EXHIBIT 99.1 AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS EARNINGS PER SHARE BEFORE EXTRAORDINARY GAIN ROSE 37 PERCENT IN THE FIRST QUARTER ON SALES OF $764 MILLION GLENVIEW, IL, APRIL 27, 2004 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended April 2, 2004. FIRST QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS o Sales of $764.2 million in the quarter, including a $23.7 million increase in sales resulting from the September 26, 2003 acquisition of Walters Hexagon Group Limited, rose 15 percent compared to sales of $662.2 million in the year ago quarter. o Operating profits increased 28 percent to $29.0 million as compared to $22.6 million in the year ago quarter. o Current quarter includes after-tax foreign exchange losses of $1.9 million or 5 cents per diluted share. o Diluted earnings per share before extraordinary gain rose 37 percent to 37 cents versus 27 cents in the year ago quarter. o An extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million or 11 cents per diluted share was reported for the current quarter related to a 1983 matter regarding Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company. o Cash flow used for operations was $10.7 million as compared to $32.3 million provided from operations in the prior year due to the increased working capital required to support current quarter sales growth. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS - -------------------- (In millions, except per share amounts) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "The first quarter reflects solid company-wide sales gains resulting from a combination of increased customer demand, improved product pricing, the late 2003 acquisition of Walters Hexagon and a weaker US dollar. These sales gains produced a 28 percent increase in operating profitability. Most importantly, the sales trends of the first quarter seem to point to a gradually improving economy. If those trends continue, that should result in improved earnings for the company throughout the remainder of the year." - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
FIRST QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended April 2, 2004, sales of $764.2 million produced income before an extraordinary gain of $14.0 million, or 37 cents per diluted share. First quarter sales included $23.7 million from Walters Hexagon Group Limited, which was acquired on September 26, 2003. Diluted earnings per share were unfavorably affected by after-tax foreign exchange losses of $1.9 million, or 5 cents per share. A significant portion of these foreign exchange losses, which are reflected as a component of other income and expense, resulted from the February 2004 devaluation of the Venezuelan Bolivar. The first quarter of the current year also includes an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million or 11 cents per diluted share associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company. In the prior year period, sales of $662.2 million generated net income of $10.2 million, or 27 cents per diluted share. The prior year includes an after-tax loss of $0.2 million or 1 cent per diluted share from the early extingushment of debt. Operating income in the quarter was $29.0 million as compared to $22.6 million in the first quarter of 2003. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 3.8 percent compared to 3.4 percent in the year ago quarter. FIRST QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Robert W. Grubbs, President and CEO of Anixter, said, "The first quarter benefited from a number of factors that combined to produce a 15.4 percent year-on-year increase in sales. First, our acquisition of Walters Hexagon added $23.7 million to sales in the first quarter. Secondly, the continued weak US dollar added $25.6 million to our revenues as compared to the year ago quarter. When these two factors are removed, our remaining year-on-year sales increase was approximately 8.0 percent." "While this 8.0 percent increase in year-over-year sales reflects the combined effects of higher copper prices, particularly on industrial wire and cable products and higher data cabling prices, it more importantly gives evidence of the initial pick-up in capital spending and overall improvement of the economic environment," continued Grubbs. "Importantly, given the strength with which we weathered the difficult conditions of the past couple of years we think we have been able to increase market share during the initial stages of this economic rebound. These factors favorably affected both the year-on-year as well as the consecutive quarter sales trends. As compared to the fourth quarter of last year, this quarter produced not only an increase in the absolute level of sales, but also approximately a 6.1 percent increase in average daily sales." "In the first quarter sales increased in each of the geographies in which we operate. In North America, sales were up just over 10 percent. Enterprise cabling sales rose on increased demand and data cabling price increases. Stronger industrial wire & cable sales resulted from a combination of increased demand as well as the effects of higher copper prices. The operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in late 2002, reported a nearly 9 percent increase in sales on improved customer demand. Lastly, we saw sales to North American telecom original equipment manufacturers record their first year-on-year increase in over two years," said Grubbs. "In Europe sales climbed by 43.2 percent. Excluding the effects of the Walters Hexagon operations and adjusting for the weaker US dollar, sales grew by approximately 4.0 percent. This is the first time in several quarters that we have seen an increase in sales on a local currency basis
in Europe," commented Grubbs. "In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific we saw a 14.7 percent increase in sales, 24 percent of which was due to exchange rate differences. The 11.2 percent growth we saw on a local currency basis reflects improved economic conditions and better market penetration." CASH FLOW - SPECIAL DIVIDEND PAYMENT MODESTLY INCREASES LEVERAGE "Cash flow used in operations in the quarter was $10.7 million compared to $32.3 million provided by operations in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "The decline in cash flow from operations from the prior year is due to the working capital requirements associated with the 15 percent consecutive quarter sales growth. This compares to flat sales between the fourth quarter of 2002 and the first quarter of 2003, which did not require an investment in working capital. Cash balances declined from $101.4 at the end of fiscal 2003 to $38.4 million at the end of the most recent quarter. The decrease is largely due to the payment of a special dividend on March 31, 2004 to shareholders of record on March 16, 2004 that totaled $55.1 million as well as a nearly $30 million increase in working capital associated with the increase in sales." "The special dividend not only reduced our cash balances, but as expected it modestly increased our leverage ratio due to the reduction in shareholders equity associated with the dividend. At the end of the first quarter the debt-to-total capitalization ratio was 26.8 percent as compared to 25.7 percent at the end of fiscal 2003. Total borrowings of $385.2 million, including $143.8 million borrowed under an unconsolidated accounts receivable securitization facility at the end of the first quarter, compared to total borrowings of $384.9 million, including $145.7 borrowed under an unconsolidated accounts receivable securitization facility at the end of fiscal 2003," commented Letham. BUSINESS OUTLOOK Concluding, Grubbs said, "The first quarter was an encouraging start to the new fiscal year. Sales trends in the quarter seem to support the increasingly widely held belief that the economy is showing signs of improvement. If the trends of improving end market demand continue and if the factors that underlie the recent manufacturer price increases remain intact, then we should see an improving earnings trend as the year unfolds." FIRST QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the first quarter on Tuesday, April 27, 2004, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class
inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 225,000 products and $500 million in inventory, 3) 151 warehouses with more than 4.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 180 cities in 42 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, exchange rate fluctuations, and new or changed competitors. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20040727172220.txt.gz
TIME:20040727172220
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 27, 2004 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) ================================================================================
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated July 27, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc. ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On July 27, 2004, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended July 2, 2004. The Company's press release, dated July 27, 2004, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. July 27, 2004 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ------------------------------------ Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX

EXHIBIT 99.1 FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS SECOND QUARTER DILUTED EARNINGS PER SHARE OF 44 CENTS ON SALES OF $813 MILLION GLENVIEW, IL, JULY 27, 2004 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended July 2, 2004. SECOND QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS o Sales of $813.1 million in the quarter, including a $26.2 million increase in sales resulting from the September 26, 2003 acquisition of Walters Hexagon Group Limited, rose 26 percent compared to sales of $644.8 million in the year ago quarter. o Operating profits increased 58 percent to $33.7 million as compared to $21.3 million in the year ago quarter. o Diluted earnings per share rose 120 percent to 44 cents versus 20 cents in the year ago quarter. The current quarter includes a charge of 1 cent per diluted share for the early retirement of debt as compared to 9 cents in the year ago quarter. o Cash flow from operations was $15.1 million as compared to $4.7 million of cash used in operations in the prior year as a result of the substantially stronger operating results and lower incremental working capital investments versus those in the year ago period. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (In millions, except per share amounts) Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "The effects of general economic improvement, along with continued success in expanding the breadth of products we offer and the number of markets we serve, produced solid sales and earnings improvements in the quarter. The improvements continue to be broad-based with the exception of Europe, where the second quarter showed a slight deterioration from the first quarter. We believe we are well positioned to continue benefiting from improving economic conditions and growth in the products and markets we serve."
SECOND QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended July 2, 2004, sales of $813.1 million produced net income of $16.8 million, or 44 cents per diluted share. The second quarter results include an after-tax charge of $0.4 million or 1 cent per diluted share for the early retirement of debt. Second quarter sales included $26.2 million from Walters Hexagon Group Limited, which was acquired on September 26, 2003. In the prior year period, sales of $644.8 million generated net income of $7.3 million, or 20 cents per diluted share including an after-tax loss of $3.5 million, or 9 cents per diluted share for the early retirement of debt. Operating income in the second quarter increased 58 percent to $33.7 million as compared to $21.3 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.2 percent compared to 3.3 percent in the second quarter of 2003. The acquisition of substantially all of the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics, Inc. ("DDI"), which was effective as of June 22, did not have a meaningful effect on sales or earnings in the quarter. SIX MONTH RESULTS For the six-month period ended July 2, 2004, sales of $1,577.3 million produced income before extraordinary gain of $30.8 million, or 82 cents per diluted share. Results for the first six months include an after-tax charge of $0.4 million, or 1 cent per diluted share for the early retirement of debt. Sales for the first six months of 2004 include sales of $49.9 million from Walters Hexagon. In the first six months of 2004, the Company also reported an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company. Sales of $1,307.0 million in the first six months of 2003 resulted in net income of $17.5 million, or 47 cents per diluted share, inclusive of after-tax losses of $3.7 million, or 10 cents per diluted share from the early retirement of debt. Operating income in the first six months of 2004 increased 43 percent to $62.7 million as compared to $43.9 million in the year ago period. For the first six-month period of 2004, operating margins were 4.0 percent as compared to 3.4 percent in the first six months of 2003. SECOND QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "At 26 percent year-on-year growth, the second quarter was our strongest sales growth period since 2000. While our acquisition of Walters Hexagon added $26.2 million to sales and the continued weak US dollar added an additional $10.7 million, we still reported 20 percent organic sales growth as compared to the second quarter of 2003." "This organic growth in sales reflects the continuing overall improvement of the economic environment, increased levels of capital spending, new products and market expansion,"
continued Grubbs. "The general economic factors were supplemented by the effects of higher commodity prices on industrial wire and cable and data cabling products. Importantly, with the exception of Europe where there was some consecutive quarter softness, this growth in sales has occurred in all portions of our business, both geographically and in the end markets we serve." "In North America, sales were up 23 percent year-over-year. Enterprise cabling sales rose on increased demand and data cabling price increases. Stronger industrial wire & cable sales resulted from a combination of increased demand from existing customers, the addition of new customers and the effects of higher copper prices. The operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in late 2002, also reported a 23 percent increase in sales on improved customer demand and the addition of new customers. Lastly, we saw sales to North American telecom original equipment manufacturers increase nearly 44 percent year-on-year," said Grubbs. "In Europe, despite second quarter sales that were somewhat weaker than the first quarter we still saw sales climb by 47 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. Excluding the effects of the Walters Hexagon operations and adjusting for the weaker US dollar, sales grew by approximately 9 percent as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, where there was little year-on-year currency exchange rate effect, we saw a 21 percent increase in sales." ACQUISITION OF DISTRIBUTION DYNAMICS INC. ASSETS AND OPERATIONS Commenting on the June 22nd acquisition of substantially all of the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics Inc., Grubbs said, "We were pleased to add these operations to our OEM supply business due to its strong customer base, an excellent team of people and strategic geographic locations. When combined with the recent acquisitions of Pentacon and Walters Hexagon we now have a business with annual sales in excess of $375 million per year supplying fasteners and other small parts to original equipment manufacturers. In this business we now have over 1,000 employees in 44 locations covering all of the US and UK as well as locations in Canada, France and Italy." "It is important to note that with these acquisitions we have compiled an outstanding list of blue chip, multi-national customers, each of whom has multiple facilities within our geographic reach that today are not being serviced by us," continued Grubbs. "We think this provides an excellent opportunity to drive organic growth with existing customers in addition to growth by adding new customers." CASH FLOW "Cash flow from operations in the quarter was $15.1 million compared to $4.7 million of cash used in operations in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "The improved operations cash flow was due to substantially better operating results and lower incremental investments in working capital in the current period. Cash balances declined from $101.4 million at the end of fiscal 2003 to $36.5 million at the end of the most recent quarter. The decrease is largely due to a combination of the payment of a special dividend on March 31, 2004 that totaled $55.1 million as well as a $42.9 million increase in working capital associated with increased sales in the first six months of 2004." "The acquisition of the assets and operations of DDI for $33.3 million led to a slight increase in leverage during the quarter. When the DDI acquisition is combined with a $55.1 million reduction in equity in the first quarter of this year for a special dividend payment, our end of the
second quarter debt-to-total capitalization ratio increased to 27.5 percent as compared to 25.7 percent at the end of fiscal 2003. Total borrowings of $416.4 million, including $157.5 million borrowed under an unconsolidated accounts receivable securitization facility at the end of the current quarter, compared to total borrowings of $384.9 million at the end of fiscal 2003, which included $145.7 million borrowed under the unconsolidated accounts receivable securitization facility," commented Letham. NEW WORKING CAPITAL CREDIT FACILITY Commenting on the new working capital credit facility that the Company entered into during the second quarter, Letham said, "We were pleased that market conditions and our strong financial position allowed us to enter into a new working capital credit facility that provides a lower cost of borrowing and increased flexibility with regard to certain financial covenants. This facility, which is for $275 million, is the same size as the facility that it replaced. Because we did this in advance of the October 2005 expiration date on the previous facility, we recorded an after-tax charge in the second quarter of $0.4 million, or 1 cent per diluted share for the write-off of unamortized deferred financing fees on the previous facility." BUSINESS OUTLOOK Concluding, Grubbs said, "The second quarter was a positive extension of the trends we saw developing at the beginning of the year. While the trends remain positive we would caution about assuming that the same sort of consecutive quarter sales trends that we saw from the first to the second quarter of this year will be extended into the second half of the year. This will be particularly true as we look toward the fourth quarter and the effects of holidays on activity levels. If, however, we continue to implement well on our market and product expansion efforts, we can build on the revenue and market share gains of the past couple of quarters, putting us in a solid position to effectively deal with opportunities or challenges from the economy in general." SECOND QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the second quarter on Tuesday, July 27, 2004, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and over $500 million in inventory, 3) 164 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 42 countries.
Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, exchange rate fluctuations, and new or changed competitors. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20041005172037.txt.gz
TIME:20041005172037
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
On October 4, 2004, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced that it had renewed for an additional 364 days the accounts receivable securitization program it has had in place since October 2000. In announcing the program renewal, Anixter said key terms of the program are largely unchanged with the exception that Anixter Receivables Corporation ("ARC") has been granted a call right with respect to receivables sold. As a result of this call right, ARC, which was previously unconsolidated, will now be consolidated in the financial statements of the Company. Approximately $183.7 million of long-term debt, which was previously recorded, on ARC's financial statements, will now be reflected in the Company's consolidated balance sheet. The applicable Amended and Restated Sale and Purchase Agreements, dated as of September 30, 2004, are attached as Exhibit 4.1 and 4.2, respectively. The Company's press release, dated October 4, 2004, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
4.1 Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, dated September 30,2004. 4.2 Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated September 30,2004. 99.1 Press Release, dated October 4, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 4.1
CH1 3043750v3
EXECUTION COPY
THIS AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES SALE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of September 30, 2004, between ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation, (the "") and ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the "").
Amendment
Originator
Buyer
WHEREAS, the Originator and the Buyer are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1. . Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
SECTION 2. . The Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to the Agreement
(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended to delete the following parenthetical from the sentence immediately following the proviso to :
Section 6.1
Section 6.1
"(including, without limitation, losses in respect of uncollectible receivables, regardless of whether reimbursement therefor would constitute recourse to Originator)"
(b) The defined term "Excluded Receivable" is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
"" means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Originator, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's Latin American export locations; (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pacer" division, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pentacon" division which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer numbers: 139661, 804470, 544876, 520222, 037690, 608556, 514221 or 548357, and (v) all accounts receivable existing at Originator's general corporate division coded WC.
Excluded Receivable
(c) Exhibit II to the Agreement is hereby replaced with Exhibit II attached hereto.
SECTION 3. . This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when the parties shall have received a copy of this Amendment duly executed by each of the parties hereto.
Effective Date
SECTION 4. . In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, the Originator represents and warrants to the Buyer, as to itself, that the execution and delivery by such Originator of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Originator and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Originator, enforceable against such Originator in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
Representations and Warranties of the Originator
SECTION 5. . The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
SECTION 6. . From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
SECTION 7.
CHOICE OF LAW
. THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
SECTION 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Execution of Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered by their duly authorized officers as of the date first written above:
ANIXTER INC., as the Originator
By:     Name: Title:
ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, as the Buyer
By:     Name: Title:
Acknowledged and Agreed this 30 day of September, 2004:
th
FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION CORPORATION
By:     Name: Title: Authorized Signatory
THREE PILLARS FUNDING CORPORATION
By:     Name: Title: Authorized Signatory
BANK ONE, NA, as a Financial Institution, a Managing Agent and as Agent
By:     Name: Title:
SUNTRUST BANK, as a Financial Institution
By :    Name: Title:
SUNTRUST CAPITAL MARKETS INC., as a Managing Agent
By:     Name: Title:

EXHIBIT 4.2
CH1 3042924v5
EXECUTION COPY
THIS AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES PURCHASE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of September 30, 2004, among ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the ""), ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), as the initial Servicer, each financial institution party hereto as a Financial Institution, FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION CORPORATION ("") and THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (f/k/a Three Pillars Funding Corporation) (" "), as conduits, (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and SUNTRUST CAPITAL MARKETS and BANK ONE, NA (""), as managing agents (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and Bank One, as agent for the Purchasers (the "").
Amendment
Seller
Anixter
Falcon
Three
Pillars
Conduits
Conduit
Bank One
Managing Agents
Managing Agent
Agent
WHEREAS, the Seller, Anixter, the Financial Institutions, Falcon, Three Pillars, the Managing Agents and the Agent are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1. . Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
SECTION 2. . The Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to the Agreement
(a) The first sentence of of the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Section 2.7
"In addition to Seller's rights pursuant to Section 1.3, Seller shall have the right (after providing three (3) Business Days' written notice to each Managing Agent), at any time, to repurchase from the Purchasers all, but not less than all, of the then outstanding Purchaser Interests."
(b) of of the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Clause (ii)
Section 5.1(t)
"(ii) Each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance as an Eligible Receivable on any Monthly Report, Mid-Month Report and any other report delivered pursuant to Section 8.5 was an Eligible Receivable as of the date of such Monthly Report, Mid-Month Report or other report."
(c) of the Agreement is hereby amended to add the following immediately after the clause "except as herein specifically provided":
Section 7.1(i)(J)
"or in connection with collections in respect of Excluded Receivables, which Collections the Servicer has indicated are readily identifiable"
(d) of the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Section 7.1(i)(Q)
"(Q) take such other actions as are necessary on its part to ensure that the facts and assumptions set forth in the opinion issued by Schiff Hardin LLP, as counsel for Seller, in connection with the closing or initial Incremental Purchase under this Agreement and relating to substantive consolidation issues, and in the certificates accompanying such opinion, remain true and correct in all material respects at all times, it being acknowledged that the assumption set forth in the ninth paragraph of Section 1 of such opinion to the extent it indicated that the Seller would not be consolidated with Anixter Inc. for financial reporting purposes, is no longer true."
(e) The last sentence of Section 8.1(a) of the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
"The Managing Agents may at any time designate as Servicer any Person to succeed Anixter or any Successor Servicer."
(f) of the Agreement is hereby amended to add the following sentence at the end thereof:
Section 8.5
"In addition to the foregoing, upon the request of the Agent, the Servicer shall provide to the Agent a list of Receivables (including such information regarding such Receivables as the Agent may request) as to which (as of the date specified by the Agent in such request) any payment of part thereof remains unpaid 90 days or more past the original due date therefor but less than 120 days past the original invoice date with respect to such Receivable."
(g) of the Agreement is hereby amended to delete the words "or the Servicer" from the parenthetical in the sentence immediately following the proviso to .
Section 10.1
Section 10.1
(h) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Affiliate
"" means, with respect to any Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under direct or indirect common control with, such Person or any Subsidiary of such Person; provided that so long as Ariel Capital Management, Inc. ("Ariel") does not own more than 30% of any class of voting stock of Anixter International Inc., "Affiliate" shall exclude (with respect to Anixter) any other Person under direct or indirect control of Ariel, unless such other Person directly or indirectly controls or is controlled by Anixter. A Person shall be deemed to control another Person if the controlling Person owns 20% or more of any class of voting securities of the controlled Person or possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the controlled Person, whether through ownership of stock, by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
(i) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Applicable Margin
"" means, as of any date of determination, the percentage set forth in the table below opposite the then applicable Debt Rating:
Applicable Margin
(j) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Assignment Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Assignment Agreement
Section 12.1(b)
(k) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Credit Agreement
"" means that certain Credit Agreement dated as of June 18, 2004 by and among Anixter, the Subsidiaries of Anixter identified as Borrowing Subsidiaries thereunder, Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Wachovia Bank N.A., as Syndication Agent, Bank One, N.A., The Bank of Nova Scotia and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. as Co-Documentation Agents, and the lenders party thereto from time to time, as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Credit Agreement
(l) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Dilution Reserve
"" means, on any date, an amount equal to (x) the greater of (i) 9% and (ii) the Dilution Reserve Ratio then in effect, times (y) the Net Receivables Balance as of the close of business on the immediately preceding Business Day.
Dilution Reserve
(m) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Excluded Receivable
"" means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Originator, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's Latin American export locations; (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pacer" division, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pentacon" division which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer numbers: 139661, 804470, 544876, 520222, 037690, 608556, 514221 or 548357, and (v) all accounts receivable existing at Originator's general corporate division coded WC.
Excluded Receivable
(n) The definition of the term "" set forth in to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Facility Account
Exhibit I
"" means Seller's Account No. 8188016122 at Bank of America.
Facility Account
(o) Clause (iii) of the definition of the term "" set forth in to the Agreement is hereby restated in its entirety as follows:
Facility Termination Date
Exhibit I
"(iii) September 27, 2007"
(p) The definition of the term "" set forth in to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Liquidity Termination Date
Exhibit I
"" means September 29, 2005.
Liquidity Termination Date
(q) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended to delete therefrom the reference to "12%" and to substitute a reference to "9%" therefor.
Loss Reserve
(r) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended to delete therefrom the reference to "4%" and to substitute a reference to "3%" therefor.
Standard Concentration Limit
SECTION 3. . This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when the Agent shall have received the following:
Effective Date
(a) a copy of this Amendment duly executed by each of the parties hereto; and
(b) a bring-down opinion from Schiff Hardin LLP regarding true-sale and non-consolidation matters.
SECTION 4. . In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, each of the Seller Parties represents and warrants to the Agent and the Purchasers, as to itself, that:
Representations and Warranties of the Seller Parties
(a) The representations and warranties of such Seller Party set forth in of the Agreement, as hereby amended, are true, correct and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof and there exists no Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event on the date hereof, provided that in the case of any representation or warranty in that expressly relates to facts in existence on an earlier date, the reaffirmation thereof under this shall be made as of such earlier date.
Section 5.1
Section 5.1
Section 4(a)
(b) The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Seller Party and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Seller Party, enforceable against such Seller Party in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
SECTION 5. . The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
SECTION 6. . From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
SECTION 7. . THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
CHOICE OF LAW
SECTION 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Execution of Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered by their duly authorized officers as of the date first written above:
ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, as the Seller
By:     Name: Title:
ANIXTER INC., as the initial Servicer
By:     Name: Title:
FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION CORPORATION
By:     Name: Title: Authorized Signatory
BANK ONE, NA, as a Financial Institution, a Managing Agent and as Agent
By:     Name: Title:
THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (f/k/a Three Pillars Funding Corporation) By:     Name:
Title: Authorized Signatory
SUNTRUST BANK, as a Financial Institution
By :    Name: Title:
SUNTRUST CAPITAL MARKETS INC., as a Managing Agent
By:     Name: Title:

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today announced that it had renewed for an additional 364 days the accounts receivable securitization program it has had in place since October of 2000.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 4, 2004 
The accounts receivable securitization program is conducted through Anixter Receivables Corporation ("ARC"), a wholly owned subsidiary of Anixter. Under the program Anixter sells to ARC, at a discount of 2.12% on an ongoing basis without recourse, a majority of the accounts receivable originating in the United States. ARC in turn sells an interest in these receivables to financial institutions for proceeds up to $225 million.
In announcing the program renewal, Anixter said key terms of the program are largely unchanged, with the exception that ARC has been granted a call right with respect to receivables sold. As a result of this call right, ARC, which was previously unconsolidated, will now be consolidated in the financial statements of Anixter.
The consolidation of ARC financials with Anixter will result in some key changes to the financial statements of Anixter going forward. Beginning with the balance sheet for the quarter ending on October 1, 2004, accounts receivable and funding related to the program, which were previously off-balance sheet, will be reflected on the balance sheet. Additionally, Anixter's investment in ARC and the inter-company note between Anixter and ARC will now be eliminated in consolidation. Notwithstanding the accounting consolidation, the receivables will continue to be sold by Anixter to ARC, a separate entity. The assets of ARC are not available to creditors of Anixter.
Beginning with the fourth quarter income statement, costs associated with the program (primarily funding costs), which were recorded in "other income and expense," will be recorded as "interest expense." At the inception of this program in 2000 the company recorded a charge of $8.8 million for the initial discounting of receivables sold to ARC. The company expected to substantially recover this amount upon termination of the program. In the intervening years, due to a decline in receivables, $2.4 million of the initial discount costs have been recouped. With the consolidation of ARC, the remaining $6.4 million of discount costs are expected to be recovered during the fourth quarter of 2004.
Commenting on the renewal of the accounts receivable program, Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President and CFO of Anixter, said, "We have always viewed the securitization program as a part of our financing strategy to secure funds at the lowest possible cost, which is consistent with our credit standing. We believe the recent modification to the program, which preserves the advantageous cost of funds and the non-recourse sale feature of the program, but still allows us to consolidate the accounts receivable and funding associated with the program, will provide a clearer picture of our capital structure and financing strategy to investors."
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and over $500 million in inventory, 3) 164 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 42 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20041006125813.txt.gz
TIME:20041006125813
EVENTS:	Material Impairments	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Impairments
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.06. Material Impairments.
On October 1, 2004, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced a new branding name, Anixter Fasteners(SM) to its customers and vendors. The introduction of this brand name will result in Anixter recording an asset impairment charge of $1.8 million in the third quarter of 2004 to write-off the value assigned to the Pentacon name when that business was acquired by the Company. The Company's press release, dated October 6, 2004, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release, dated October 6, 2004, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today announced a new branding strategy for its recently acquired fastener and small parts supply businesses.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 6, 2004 
Following the September 2002 acquisition of the assets and operations of Pentacon, Anixter has acquired Walters Hexagon Group Limited as well as the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics Inc. All three of these businesses are engaged in the supply of "C" class inventory components to Original Equipment Manufacturers and, collectively have annual sales in excess of $375 million, employ over 1,000 people in 44 locations throughout the United States and the United Kingdom along with a location in each of France and Italy.
As a part of bringing these businesses together to form an industry leading supply chain solution that combines the individual strengths and expertise of the acquired companies with the financial strength and global capabilities of Anixter, a new brand name, Anixter Fasteners has been introduced to reflect the combined capabilities.
sm
As a result of this new brand name introduction, Anixter will record an asset impairment charge of $1.8 million in the third quarter of 2004 to write-off the value assigned to the Pentacon name when that business was acquired by Anixter. In addition, in the third quarter Anixter will record approximately $800,000 of acquisition related expenses that were incurred in conjunction with the recent purchase of the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics. In total, Anixter will record a pre-tax charge of $2.6 million in the third quarter as a result of these items; on an after-tax basis the charge will total $1.5 million or approximately 4 cents per diluted share.
Commenting on the new branding strategy, Robert Grubbs, President and CEO said, "An important part of the future organic growth of these operations depends on establishing marketplace recognition for our ability to deliver high quality customized logistics and supply solutions for Original Equipment Manufacturers on a global basis. Marketing our capabilities under a single brand name, wherever we have the opportunity to serve customers, is an important step in achieving this goal."
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and over $500 million in inventory, 3) 164 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 42 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with
integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20041026162359.txt.gz
TIME:20041026162359
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 26, 2004, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended October 1, 2004. The Company's press release, dated October 26, 2004 is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated October 26, 2004 issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended October 1, 2004.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 26, 2004 
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "We were pleased to report significant year-on-year sales and earnings growth, even with the asset impairment charge and acquisition related costs in our OEM supply business. Consistent with the past couple of quarters, the year-on-year sales growth has been fairly broad based, both from an end-market and a geographic perspective. A continued focus on expanding the markets we serve and the products we offer should allow us to further build on the successes of the past couple of quarters."
Third Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended October 1, 2004, sales of $849.6 million produced net income of $17.2 million, or 41 cents per diluted share. In the prior year period, sales of $653.4 million generated net income of $11.3 million, or 31 cents per diluted share.
Comparability of results between the third quarter of 2004 and 2003 is affected by the following significant items:
Operating income in the third quarter, inclusive of the asset impairment and acquisition related charges, increased 46 percent to $33.9 million as compared to $23.3 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.0 percent compared to 3.6 percent in the third quarter of 2003. If the asset impairment and acquisition related charges of $2.6 million were excluded from the current quarter results, operating income would be $36.5 million and operating margins would be 4.3 percent.
Nine Month Results
For the nine-month period ended October 1, 2004, sales of $2,426.9 million produced income before extraordinary gain of $48.0 million, or $1.23 per diluted share. In addition to the asset impairment and acquisition related charges and the dilutive effects of the convertible notes discussed above, results for the first nine months also include an after-tax charge of $0.4 million, or 1 cent per diluted share, for the early retirement of debt. Sales for the first nine months of 2004 include $96.7 million from the recent acquisitions of DDI and Walters Hexagon.
In the first nine months of 2004, the Company also reported an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million, or 10 cents per diluted share, associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company.
Sales of $1,960.4 million in the first nine months of 2003 resulted in net income of $28.8 million, or 77 cents per diluted share, inclusive of after-tax losses of $3.7 million, or 10 cents per diluted share, from the early retirement of debt.
Operating income in the first nine months of 2004, inclusive of the asset impairment and acquisition related charges of $2.6 million discussed above, increased 44 percent to $96.6 million as compared to $67.2 million in the year ago period. For the first nine months of 2004, operating margins were 4.0 percent as compared to 3.4 percent in the first nine months of 2003. If the asset impairment and acquisition related charges of $2.6 million were excluded from results for the first nine months of the current year, operating income would be $99.2 million and operating margins would be 4.1 percent.
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Although slightly lower than the sequential growth we saw from the first to the second quarter, the 4.5 percent consecutive quarter sales growth from the second to the third quarter of this year continued the positive quarterly trend. We also generated 30 percent year-on-year sales growth, making this our strongest year-on-year sales growth period since 2000. While our acquisitions of DDI and Walters Hexagon added $46.8 million to sales and the continued weak US dollar added an additional $13.0 million, we still reported 21 percent organic sales growth as compared to the third quarter of 2003."
"As was the case in the second quarter of this year, organic growth in sales reflects an improved economic environment, increased levels of capital spending, product and market expansion and the effects of higher commodity prices on industrial wire and cable and data cabling products," continued Grubbs. "Consistent with the past couple of quarters, the year-on-year sales growth has been fairly broad based, both from an end-market and a geographic perspective."
"Sales in North America, inclusive of $18.3 million of sales for DDI, were up 27 percent year-over-year. Excluding the sales of the recently acquired DDI operations and adjusting for the weaker U.S. dollar of $4.6 million, organic growth in North America was 22 percent. Enterprise cabling sales again rose on increased demand, continued progress in the security market and data cabling price increases. Stronger industrial wire & cable sales resulted from a combination of increased demand from existing customers, the addition of new customers and the effects of higher copper prices. The operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in late 2002, also reported a 23 percent increase in sales on improved customer demand and the addition of new customers. Offsetting these positive trends was a modest year-on-year decline in sales to North American telecom original equipment manufacturers," said Grubbs.
"In Europe, despite generally weak market conditions, especially on the continent, we still saw sales climb by 55 percent as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "Excluding the effects of the Walters Hexagon operations of $28.5 million and adjusting for the weaker US dollar of $8.5 million, sales grew by approximately 13 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, where there was little year-on-year currency exchange rate effect, we saw a 22 percent increase in sales as a result of an increase in larger project sales."
OEM Supply Branding Strategy
Commenting on the recently introduced branding strategy for the OEM Supply business, Grubbs said, "With the acquisition of DDI in late June of 2004, we now have an OEM supply business with over $375 million in sales and 1,000 employees in 44 locations covering all of the US and UK as well as locations in Canada, France, Italy and Mexico. As we bring these businesses together it is important that we create a branding strategy that reflects our strategy to our customers. As a result, on October 1, 2004 we introduced the name Anixter Fasteners as a common brand name for our OEM business."
sm
"When we acquired the assets and operations of Pentacon in September of 2002, a value was assigned to the Pentacon name. As a result of the new branding strategy, we wrote-off the value assigned to that name. When combined with other acquisition related expenses for DDI, we recorded a total pre-tax charge of $2.6 million during the third quarter," Grubbs commented.
Cash Flow
"Cash flow from operations in the quarter was $9.3 million compared to $55.8 million in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "This reduction reflects higher working capital requirements associated with current year sales growth and timing differences of vendor payments compared to the year ago quarter. Cash balances declined from $101.4 million at the end of fiscal 2003 to $36.9 million at the end of the most recent quarter. The factors leading to the reduction in cash balances include the payment of a special dividend on March 31, 2004 of $55.1 million, a $63.9 million increase in working capital associated with increased sales in the first nine months of 2004 and an outlay of $33.3 million for the operations and assets of DDI."
Renewal of Accounts Receivable Securitization Facility
Commenting on the renewal of the accounts receivable securitization facility that the Company entered into at the end of the quarter, Letham said, "We were pleased that in addition to renewing this very cost effective component of our capital structure, we were able to modify it in a manner that should make the accounting for the facility easier for investors to understand. By adding a call feature related to the sale of an interest in accounts receivable by Anixter Receivable Corporation ("ARC"), we were able to consolidate all receivables and funding related to the securitization program on to the balance sheet of Anixter International Inc. effective as of October 1, 2004."
"Additionally, beginning in the fourth quarter, the funding costs that were previously reported as other income and expense will be reported as interest expense," Letham commented. "Also, as the associated accounts receivable are collected during the fourth quarter, we expect to recapture the remaining $6.4 million of the original discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when this facility was initiated."
"At the end of the third quarter our debt-to-total capitalization ratio was 38.0 percent as compared to 25.7 percent at the end of the prior fiscal year. The increase in leverage is largely attributable to the consolidation of ARC at the end of the third quarter. If ARC's debt of $145.7 million had also been consolidated at the end of the prior fiscal year, our debt-to-total capitalization ratio at that time would have been 35.8 percentLetham concluded.
,"
Business Outlook
Commenting on the business outlook, Grubbs said, "The positive trends of the past couple of quarters clearly extended into the third quarter. The consecutive quarter revenue growth trend that we saw from the second to the third quarter of just over 2 percent, excluding the DDI acquisition, was the result of a continued focus on customer service and product and market expansion. If we continue to successfully implement our strategy, we can build on the revenue, market share and earnings gains of the past couple of quarters and position ourselves well for continued growth over the coming quarters. It is important to keep in mind, however, that the holiday heavy fourth quarter is typically a slower quarter."
"Lastly, as announced in December of 2003, we will be relocating our largest distribution facility, located in Alsip, Illinois to a new built to specification, state-of-the-art distribution facility during the fourth quarter of 2004. The relocation to the new facility will involve a significant effort and expense as this facility contains approximately 8 percent of our nearly $600 million worldwide inventory investment. During the fourth quarter we expect to incur approximately $2 million in cost related to the relocation, including physical moving costs, extra staffing and overtime, and duplicate rental costs in the transition period. While this expense is significant, the new facility will provide us a more efficient layout that is designed to improve customer service levels and lower our ongoing operating costs," Grubbs concluded.
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the third quarter on Tuesday, October 26, 2004, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and nearly $600 million in inventory, 3) 164 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 42 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20041115172853.txt.gz
TIME:20041115172853
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01. Other Events.
Ernst & Young LLP recently informed our Audit Committee that, in connection with certain income tax compliance services, a member firm of Ernst & Young LLP held employment and business and corporate income tax related funds of a de minimis amount and made payment of such funds to the applicable tax authorities in respect of our representative offices in China and employees in those offices. These actions by the member firm of Ernst & Young LLP have been discontinued. Custody of the assets of an audit client is not permitted under the auditor independence rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission. Our Audit Committee and Ernst & Young LLP have considered the impact that the holding and paying of these funds may have had on Ernst & Young LLPs independence with respect to our company and have concluded that there has been no impairment of Ernst & Young LLPs independence. In making this determination, our Audit Committee considered the de minimis amount of funds involved, the ministerial na ture of the actions, and that the offices and related subsidiary involved were immaterial to our consolidated financial statements.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20041228155347.txt.gz
TIME:20041228155347
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): December 28, 2004 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: |_| Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) |_| Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) |_| Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) |X| Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c)) ================================================================================
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS. Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") today sent a notice to holders of its Liquid Yield Option Notes due 2020 (Zero Coupon--Senior)(the "LYONs") with respect to each holder's right to require the Company to purchase its LYONs on purchase dates of June 28, 2005, 2010 and 2015. In the notice, the Company irrevocably elected to pay the purchase price solely in cash. A copy of the notice is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits The following exhibit is filed herewith: 99.1 Company Notice to Holders of Liquid Yield Option Notes due 2020 dated December 28, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. December 28, 2004 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ------------------------------- Dennis J.Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description 99.1 Company Notice to Holders of Liquid Yield Option Notes due 2020 dated December 28, 2004

EXHIBIT 99.1 COMPANY NOTICE TO HOLDERS OF LIQUID YIELD OPTION NOTES DUE 2020 ISSUED BY ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CUSIP NUMBER: 035290AC9 NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Indenture, dated as of June 28, 2000, between Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Anixter"), and Bank of New York, a New York banking corporation, as Trustee (the "Paying Agent"), and the Company's Liquid Yield Option Notes due 2020 (the "Securities"), that at the option of each holder thereof (the "Holder"), the Securities will be purchased by the Company on June 28, 2005 for $356.28 per $1,000 principal amount at maturity of the Securities (the "Purchase Price"), subject to the terms and conditions of the Indenture, the Securities and this Company Notice (the "Option"). The Company irrevocably elects to pay the Purchase Price, and the Purchase Price for future purchases at the option of the Holder on June 28, 2010 and June 28, 2015, solely in cash. Holders may surrender their Securities from May 31, 2005 through 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on June 28, 2005. This Company Notice is being sent pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.08 of the Indenture and paragraph 6 of the Securities. All capitalized terms used but not specifically defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Indenture and the Securities. The Paying Agent is not currently accepting surrender of the Securities, and will not do so until May 31, 2005. Offer materials, including a Purchase Notice, will be provided supplementally on or before that date. On or before that date, the Company will file a Tender Offer Statement (including a Purchase Notice and other offer materials) with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Tender Offer Statement will be made available to all Holders at no expense to them. The Tender Offer Statement will also be available at no charge at the SEC's website at www.sec.gov. The Tender Offer Statement will contain important information that should be read carefully. To exercise your option to have the Company purchase the Securities and receive payment of $356.28 per $1,000 principal amount at maturity of the Securities, you must validly surrender the Securities with a Purchase Notice (to be supplementally provided) to the Paying Agent (and not have withdrawn such surrendered Securities and Purchase Notice), on or after May 31, 2005 and prior to 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on Tuesday, June 28, 2005 (the "Purchase Date"). Securities surrendered for purchase may be withdrawn at any time prior to 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on Tuesday, June 28, 2005 by delivery of a notice of withdrawal to the Paying Agent. The right of Holders to surrender Securities for purchase in the Option expires at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on Tuesday, June 28, 2005. Holders that surrender through the Depository Trust Company ("DTC") need not submit Securities to the Paying Agent if such holders comply with the transmittal procedures of DTC. The Purchase Price for any Security so surrendered and not withdrawn will be paid promptly following the Purchase Date. The Securities are convertible at any time prior to maturity at the offices of the Paying Agent into 7.4603 shares of Company Common Stock per $1,000 principal amount at maturity of Securities. Securities for which a Purchase Notice have been given may be converted only if the Purchase Notice has been withdrawn. The address for the Paying Agent is as follows: The Bank of New York Corporate Trust Operations Reorganization Unit 101 Barclay Street - Floor 7E New York, New York 10286 Copies of this Company Notice may be obtained from the Paying Agent at its address set forth above. The date of this Company Notice is December 28, 2004


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050202160811.txt.gz
TIME:20050202160811
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 1, 2005 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) Not applicable (Former name or former address, if changed since last report.) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instructions A.2. below): / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On February 1, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 31, 2004. The Company's press release, dated February 1, 2005 is attached as Exhibit 99.1. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated February 1, 2005 issued by Anixter International Inc.
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. February 1, 2005 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ----------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NO. DESCRIPTION 99.1 Press Release, dated February 1, 2005 issued by Anixter International Inc.

FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: EXHIBIT 99.1 AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN H. PATEL CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR INQUIRIES MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 (312) 553-6745 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS FISCAL 2004 FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS GLENVIEW, IL, FEBRUARY 1, 2005 -- Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported results for the quarter ended December 31, 2004. FOURTH QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS o Sales of $848.3 million in the quarter, including a $15.9 million increase in sales resulting from the June 22, 2004 acquisition of the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics Inc. ("DDI"), rose 28 percent compared to sales of $664.8 million in the year ago quarter. o Operating profits increased 65 percent to $41.4 million as compared to $25.1 million in the year ago quarter. Included in the current quarter results were net favorable adjustments to cost of sales of $10.2 million ($6.1 million after-tax or 15 cents per diluted share) which principally resulted from a $13.4 million favorable adjustment related to a reduction in risk associated with certain inventories. Also, a number of unfavorable expense items were recorded during the quarter, including the relocation of the Company's largest distribution facility in Alsip, Illinois, and severance in Europe; these two unfavorable expense items collectively totaled $4.4 million ($2.9 million after-tax or 7 cents per diluted share). The prior year quarter benefited from a $1.6 million gain (4 cents per diluted share) associated with the termination of certain foreign pension plans. o Diluted earnings per share rose 78 percent to 64 cents versus 36 cents in the year ago quarter. In addition to those items affecting operating income in the quarter, the fourth quarter also includes a gain of $6.4 million ($3.8 million after-tax or 9 cents per diluted share) resulting from the October 1, 2004 consolidation of the accounts receivable securitization facility. o Cash flow from operations was $43.7 million as compared to $41.7 million in the prior year. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (In millions, except per share amounts) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "We experienced a solid fourth quarter, even after setting aside a number of unusual items. This reflects a continuation of the positive economic and operational trends of the past few quarters. While the number of holidays in the fourth quarter affected sales results, overall sales for the period were stronger than anticipated especially in the days immediately before and after the holidays. At the same time we were again able to generate significant positive cash flow for the quarter and further strengthen our financial position. We entered 2005 with an expectation for another year of positive sales and earnings growth." - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended December 31, 2004, sales of $848.3 million produced net income of $25.6 million, or 64 cents per diluted share. In the prior year period, sales of $664.8 million generated net income of $13.1 million, or 36 cents per diluted share. Comparability of results between the fourth quarter of 2004 and 2003 is affected by the following significant items: o Sales in the current quarter include $15.9 million related to the June 22, 2004 acquisition of Distribution Dynamics Inc. o Operating profits in the current quarter include net favorable adjustments to cost of sales of $10.2 million ($6.1 million after-tax or 15 cents per diluted share) arising primarily from a reduction in the risks associated with the value of certain inventories. Fourth quarter 2004 operating results were also affected by a number of unfavorable expense items including moving costs related to the relocation of the Company's largest distribution center and severance costs associated with a reduction in staffing levels in Europe. These unfavorable expense items reduced fourth quarter operating earnings by $4.4 million ($2.9 million after-tax or 7 cents per diluted share). In the 2003 fourth quarter operating earnings were favorably impacted by a gain of $1.6 million or 4 cents per diluted share from the termination of pension plans in certain foreign countries. o In addition to the items affecting operating results, diluted earnings per share in the fourth quarter of 2004 was favorably affected by a $6.4 million ($3.8 million after-tax or 9 cents per diluted share) gain arising from the recapture of the remaining original discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when the accounts receivable securitization facility was initiated. Operating income in the fourth quarter, inclusive of the net favorable cost of sales adjustments and unfavorable expense items increased 65 percent to $41.4 million as compared to $25.1 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.9 percent compared to 3.8 percent in the fourth quarter of 2003. If the net favorable cost of sales adjustments of $10.2 million and the unfavorable expenses of $4.4 million were excluded from the fourth quarter 2004 results, operating income would be $35.6 million and operating margins would be 4.2 percent. If the pension plan termination gain of $1.6 million was eliminated from the prior year fourth quarter, operating income would be $23.5 million and operating margins would be 3.5 percent. In addition, if the gain arising from the recapture of the remaining original discount expense from the accounts receivable securitization program was excluded from the 2004 results and the losses related to the early extinguishment of debt were excluded from 2003, net income for the fourth quarter of 2004 would be $18.6 million or 47 cents per diluted share as compared to net income of $11.7 million or 32 cents per diluted share in 2003. (NOTE: A RECONCILIATION TABLE FOR THE ABOVE ITEMS FOLLOWS AT THE END OF THIS RELEASE.) FISCAL YEAR RESULTS For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2004, sales of $3,275.2 million produced income before extraordinary gain of $73.6 million, or $1.90 per diluted share. In fiscal 2003, the Company reported net income of $41.9 million or $1.13 per diluted share on sales of $2,625.2 million. Comparability of results between fiscal years 2004 and 2003 is affected by the following significant items:
o Sales in fiscal 2004 include $34.2 million related to the June 22, 2004 acquisition of DDI and $108.6 million from the September 26, 2003 acquisition of Walters Hexagon Group Limited ("Walters Hexagon"). Fiscal 2003 included sales of $19.0 million related to the Walters Hexagon acquisition. o Fiscal 2004 operating profits were affected by the net favorable cost of sales adjustments and the expense items discussed above as well as by a third quarter charge of $2.6 million ($1.5 million after-tax or 4 cents per diluted share) for acquisition related expenses and asset impairment, primarily due to the write-off of the value assigned to the Pentacon name. The write-off was the result of the introduction of a new branding strategy for the Company's OEM Supply business. As discussed above, the prior year operating results were favorably affected by a $1.6 million gain, or 4 cents per diluted share, associated with certain foreign pension plan terminations. o In addition to the items affecting operating results, diluted income per share was affected by the previously discussed gain of $6.4 million ($3.9 million after-tax or 10 cents per share) associated with the accounting for the amended accounts receivable securitization facility and by a charge of $0.7 million (1 cent per diluted share) for the early retirement of debt during the second fiscal quarter of 2004. For fiscal 2003, in addition to the above-discussed gain related to termination of certain foreign pension plans, diluted earnings per share were affected by an after-tax charge of $3.9 million (11 cents per diluted share) from the early retirement of debt. In fiscal 2004, the Company also reported an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share, associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company. Operating income in fiscal 2004, inclusive of the items highlighted above, increased 50 percent to $138.0 million as compared to $92.3 million in the prior fiscal year. For fiscal 2004, operating margins were 4.2 percent as compared to 3.5 percent in fiscal 2003. If the net favorable cost of sales adjustments of $10.2 million and the expenses for warehouse relocation, severance, acquisition related expenses and asset impairment which total $7.0 million were excluded from results for fiscal 2004, operating income would be $134.8 million and operating margins would be 4.1 percent. For fiscal 2003, if the $1.6 million gain from termination of certain foreign pension plans were excluded, operating profits would be $90.7 million and operating margins would be 3.5 percent. In addition, if the gain arising from the recapture of the remaining original discount expense from the accounts receivable securitization program was excluded from the 2004 results and the losses related to the early extinguishment of debt were excluded from both years, income before extraordinary gain for fiscal 2004 would be $68.5 million or $1.77 per diluted share as compared to $44.2 million or $1.19 per diluted share in 2003. (NOTE: A RECONCILIATION TABLE FOR THE ABOVE ITEMS FOLLOWS AT THE END OF THIS RELEASE.) FOURTH QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "As expected, sales in the fourth quarter were lower than the third quarter due to the number of holidays in the quarter. However, we were encouraged by the fact that sales in the days immediately preceding and following the holidays were stronger than expected. As a result, sales in the fourth quarter were slightly better than we had anticipated. While our acquisition of DDI contributed $15.9 million to sales and favorable currency exchange rates added an additional $18.7 million, we still reported 22 percent organic sales growth as compared to the fourth quarter of 2003." "The organic growth that contributed to strong sales in the fourth quarter reflected many of the same trends that we saw during the first three quarters of 2004," continued Grubbs. "An improved economic
environment, increased levels of capital spending, product and market expansion and price increases driven by higher commodity prices all contributed to fourth quarter growth. Consistent with the past few quarters, the year-on-year sales growth has been fairly broad based, from both an end-market and a geographic perspective." "Sales in North America, inclusive of DDI sales of $15.9 million in the fourth quarter, were up 29 percent year-over-year. Excluding the sales of the recently acquired DDI operations and adjusting for the effects of a weaker U.S. dollar on Canadian sales of $6.7 million, organic growth in North America was 24 percent. Enterprise cabling sales again rose on increased demand from both new and existing customers, continued progress in the security market and data cabling price increases. Stronger industrial wire & cable sales resulted from a combination of increased demand from existing customers, the addition of new customers and the effects of higher copper prices. The operations of Pentacon, which were acquired in late 2002, also reported a 37 percent increase in sales resulting from improved demand from existing customers as well as the addition of new customers. Offsetting these positive trends was a modest year-on-year decline in sales to North American telecom original equipment manufacturers," said Grubbs. "In Europe, despite generally weak market conditions in communications and specialty wire & cable sales we still saw sales climb by 24 percent as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "Adjusting for the weaker U.S. dollar impact of $11.5 million, sales grew by approximately 14 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, where there was little year-on-year currency exchange rate effect, we saw a 24 percent increase in sales as a result of an increase in larger project sales and product line expansion. The fourth quarter is typically the strongest quarter of the year in emerging markets and this year was no exception as we produced record quarterly revenues of $64.2 million from these geographic markets. " FOURTH QUARTER OPERATING RESULTS "Our fourth quarter operating results were affected by a number of unusual items," said Grubbs. "If we set these unusual items aside, we had company-wide operating margins of 4.2 percent in the quarter. We continued to show progress in North America where operating margins for the fourth quarter, exclusive of the unusual items were 5.0 percent and 4.6 percent for the full year. In the emerging markets we produced our best ever year of operating results in these regions of the world. As a result of our strong operational leverage on record regional sales we netted operating margins of 5.0 percent in the fourth quarter and 3.5 percent for the full year. Our one area of disappointment was Europe where we continued to struggle to achieve operating margins at a level necessary to support the current operating structure for our communications and specialty wire & cable sales. As a result we reduced headcount to bring our cost structure more in line with current market conditions. On a positive note, the acquired OEM Supply operations of Anixter Walters Hexagon in Europe continued to show both sales and earnings growth. In the most recent quarter this business generated operating margins of 4.7 percent on record quarterly sales of $30.2 million." CASH FLOW "Cash flow from operations in the quarter was $43.7 million compared to $41.7 million in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "As a result of the strong cash flow in the quarter we were able to reduce borrowings during the period by $23.5 million and increase cash balances by $16.5 million. At the end of the year our debt-to-total capitalization ratio stood at 35.1 percent as compared to 35.8 percent (including amounts borrowed under the accounts receivable securitization facility) at the end of the prior fiscal year."
"In 2004 we funded a $44.6 million increase in working capital that was necessitated by the 18 percent organic sales growth we experienced during the year. At the same time we spent $32.9 million to acquire the assets and operations of DDI and paid a special dividend of $55.1 million to common shareholders," continued Letham. "We were able to complete these actions, simultaneously reduce leverage and still finish the year with cash balances of $53.4 million and significant unused debt capacity to support further growth as we enter the new year." BUSINESS OUTLOOK Concluding, Grubbs said, "The positive trends of the past few quarters have given us a solid base on which to build as we enter the new fiscal year. Although we expect solid growth during the coming year, our 2005 sales growth rates will likely not reach those achieved in 2004. We expect less depreciation in the value of the dollar, less commodity price inflation and no anticipated acquisitions. Our continued focus on providing real value to our customers and suppliers through supply chain services and complete product solutions will put us in a position to continue our product and market expansion and further our new customer acquisition initiatives. As we look to 2005, we remain optimistic that these factors will contribute to solid sales and earnings growth during the year." FOURTH QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the fourth quarter on Tuesday, February 1, 2005, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and over $500 million in inventory, 3) 164 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - RECONCILIATION TABLE - ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- a) Net favorable adjustments to cost of sales of $10.2 million arising primarily from the reduction in risks associated with the value of certain inventories. b) Unfavorable expenses of $4.4 million related to the relocation of the Company's largest distribution facility and severance costs associated with a staffing reduction in Europe. c) Gain of $6.4 million arising from the recapture of the remaining original issue discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when the accounts receivable securitization facility was initiated. d) Net decrease in taxes of $5.2 million associated with the items noted above.
- ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - RECONCILIATION TABLE - ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- a) Net favorable adjustments to cost of sales of $10.2 million arising primarily from the reduction in risks associated with the value of certain inventories. b) Unfavorable expenses of $5.2 million related to the relocation of the Company's largest distribution facility, severance costs associated with a staffing reduction in Europe and acquisition related charges. c) Impairment charge of $1.8 million for the write-off of intangible assets associated with the Pentacon trade name. d) Write-off of deferred financing costs associated with the early extinguishment of debt. e) Gain of $6.4 million arising from the recapture of the remaining original issue discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when the accounts receivable securitization facility was initiated. f) Net decrease in taxes of $3.8 million associated with the items noted above.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050216120009.txt.gz
TIME:20050216120009
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
On February 10, 2005, Mary Agnes Wilderotter, a director of the Company, notified the board of directors that she does not intend to stand for re-election at the Company's annual meeting in May 2005. Ms. Wilderotter's decision was based on her employment, as of November 1, 2004, as Chief Executive Officer of Citizens Communications Co., a customer of the Company.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050225141917.txt.gz
TIME:20050225141917
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
      On February 24, 2005, Anixter International Inc. and Anixter Inc. entered into a Terms Agreement with Banc of America Securities LLC, Wachovia Capital Markets, LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as representatives of the underwriters named therein (the "Terms Agreement"), with respect to the offering and sale of $200,000,000 of 5.95% Notes due 2015 (the "Notes"). The sale is scheduled to close on March 1, 2005. The Terms Agreement incorporates by reference an Underwriting Agreement of Anixter Inc. with respect to debt securities and Anixter International Inc. with respect to guarantees of debt securities, dated as of February 24, 2005 (the "Underwriting Agreement"). The Notes are to be issued under the Indenture by and among Anixter Inc., Anixter International Inc. and The Bank of New York, as trustee, dated as of September 9, 1996, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 24, 2005 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"). The Notes are being sold pursuant to an effective registration statement .
      A copy of the Terms Agreement, Underwriting Agreement and the First Supplemental Indenture are filed as Exhibit 99.1, 99.2 and 99.3, respectively, to this Report on Form 8-K, and are hereby incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
      (c) Exhibits
      The following exhibits are filed herewith:
 
      Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
Ladies and Gentlemen:
      We understand that Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell, and Anixter International Inc. (the "Guarantor") desires to fully and unconditionally guarantee as to payment of principal of and premium (if any) and interest on, $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's debt securities (the "Underwritten Securities"). Subject to the terms and conditions set forth or incorporated by reference herein, the underwriters named below (the "Underwriters") offer to purchase, severally and not jointly, the principal amount of Underwritten Securities opposite their names set forth below at the purchase price set forth below.
The Underwritten Securities shall have the following terms:
 
      All of the provisions contained in the document attached as Annex I hereto entitled "Underwriting Agreement" are hereby incorporated by reference in their entirety herein and shall be deemed to be a part of this Terms Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein. Terms defined in such document are used herein as therein defined.
 
      Please accept this offer no later than 6:00 o'clock P.M. (New York City time) on February 24, 2005 by signing a copy of this Terms Agreement in the space set forth below and returning the signed copy to us.

 
EXHIBIT 99.2
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell up to $300,000,000 aggregate initial public offering price of its debt securities (the "Securities"), from time to time, in or pursuant to one or more offerings on terms to be determined at the time of sale. The Securities will be unconditionally guaranteed (the "Guarantee") as to payment of principal, premium (if any) and interest by Anixter International Inc., the parent of the Company (the "Guarantor").
     The Securities will be issued in one or more series as senior indebtedness (the "Debt Securities") under an indenture, dated as of September 9, 1996, between the Company, the Guarantor and The Bank of New York, as trustee (the "Trustee"), as amended by the first supplemental indenture, dated as of February 24, 2005 (as so amended, the "Indenture"). Each series of Debt Securities may vary, as applicable, as to title, aggregate principal amount, interest rate or formula and timing of payments thereof, stated maturity date, redemption and/or repayment provisions, sinking fund requirements and any other variable terms established by or pursuant to the Indenture.
     Whenever the Company determines to make an offering of Securities through one or more underwriters (the "Underwriters"), the Company will enter into an agreement (each, a "Terms Agreement") providing for the sale of such Securities to, and the purchase and offering thereof by, such Underwriters, as well as any Underwriter substituted pursuant to Section 10 hereof). The Terms Agreement relating to the offering of Securities shall specify the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be issued (the "Underwritten Securities"), the name of each Underwriter participating in such offering (subject to substitution as provided in Section 10 hereof), the name of any Underwriter acting as manager or co-manager in connection with such offering, the aggregate principal amount of Underwritten Securities which each such Underwriter severally agrees to purchase, whether such offering is on a fixed or variable price basis and, if on a fixed price basis, the initial offering price, the price at which the Underwritten Securities are to be purchased by the Underwriters, the form, time, date and place of delivery and payment of the Underwritten Securities and any other material variable terms of the Underwritten Securities. The Terms Agreement, which shall be substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto, may take the form of an exchange of any standard form of written telecommunication between the Company and the Underwriters. Each offering of Underwritten Securities through a single Underwriter or
 
through an underwriting syndicate managed by an Underwriter will be governed by this Underwriting Agreement, as supplemented by the applicable Terms Agreement.
     The Company and the Guarantor have filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-09185), including pre-effective amendments Nos. 1, 2 and 3 with respect thereto (the "1996 Registration Statement"), and a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-121428), including pre-effective amendment No. 1 with respect thereto (the "2005 Registration Statement"), for the registration of the Securities and the Guarantee under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "1933 Act"), and the offering thereof from time to time in accordance with Rule 415 of the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1933 Act (the "1933 Act Regulations"), and the Company has filed such post-effective amendments thereto as may be required prior to the execution of the applicable Terms Agreement. Such registration statements (as so amended, if applicable) have been declared effective by the Commission and the Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "1939 Act"). Such registration statements (as so amended, if applicable), including the information, if any, deemed to be a part thereof pursuant to Rule 430A(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations (the "Rule 430A Information") or Rule 434(d) of the 1933 Act Regulations (the "Rule 434 Information"), are referred to herein collectively as the "Registration Statements"; and the final prospectus and the prospectus supplement relating to the offering of the Underwritten Securities, in the form first furnished to the Underwriters by the Company for use in connection with the offering of the Underwritten Securities, are collectively referred to herein as the "Prospectus"; provided, however, that all references to any of the "Registration Statements" and the "Prospectus" shall be deemed to include all documents incorporated therein by reference pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), prior to the execution of the applicable Terms Agreement; provided, further, that if the Company files any other registration statement with the Commission pursuant to Section 462(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations (the "Rule 462 Registration Statement"), then, after such filing, all references to "Registration Statements" shall be deemed to include the Rule 462 Registration Statement; and provided, further, that if the Company elects to rely upon Rule 434 of the 1933 Act Regulations, then all references to "Prospectus" shall be deemed to include the final or preliminary prospectus and the applicable term sheet or abbreviated term sheet (the "Term Sheet"), as the case may be, in the form first furnished to the Underwriters by the Company in reliance upon Rule 434 of the 1933 Act Regulations, and all references in this Underwriting Agreement to the date of the Prospectus shall mean the date of the Term Sheet. A "preliminary prospectus" shall be deemed to refer to any prospectus used before the registration statement became effective and any prospectus that omitted, as applicable, the Rule 430A Information, the Rule 434 Information or other information to be included upon pricing in a form of prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations, that was used after such effectiveness and prior to the execution and delivery of the applicable Terms Agreement. For purposes of this Underwriting Agreement, all references to the Registration Statements, Prospectus, Term Sheet or preliminary prospectus or to any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ("EDGAR").
     All references in this Underwriting Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included" or "stated" (or other references of like import)
 
in the Registration Statements (including references to the 1996 Registration Statement and the 2005 Registration Statement), Prospectus or preliminary prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, Prospectus or preliminary prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Underwriting Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statements, Prospectus or preliminary prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the 1934 Act which is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, Prospectus or preliminary prospectus, as the case may be.
     SECTION 1. REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES.
     (a) Representations and Warranties by the Company and the Guarantor. The Company and the Guarantor jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Underwriters, as of the date hereof, and to each Underwriter named in the applicable Terms Agreement, as of the date thereof and as of the Closing Time (as defined below) (in each case, a "Representation Date"), as follows:
     (1) Compliance with Registration Requirements. Each of the Company and the Guarantor meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act. Each of the Registration Statements and any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement has become effective under the 1933 Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statements or any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement has been issued under the 1933 Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, are contemplated by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information has been complied with. In addition, the Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
     At the respective times the Registration Statements, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto (including the filing of the Guarantor's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K with the Commission (the "Annual Report on Form 10-K")) became effective and at each Representation Date, the Registration Statements, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any amendments thereto complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1939 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1939 Act (the "1939 Act Regulations") and did not and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. At the date of the Prospectus and at the Closing Time, the Prospectus and any amendments and supplements thereto did not and will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. If the Company and the Guarantor elect to rely upon Rule 434 of the 1933 Act Regulations, the Company and the Guarantor will comply with the requirements of Rule 434. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statements or the Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter expressly for use in the Registration Statements or the Prospectus (that information being limited to that delivered by letter prior to the Closing Time).
 
     Each preliminary prospectus and prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statements as originally filed or as part of any amendment thereto, or filed pursuant to Rule 424 under the 1933 Act, complied when so filed in all material respects with the 1933 Act Regulations and, if applicable, each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with the offering of Underwritten Securities will, at the time of such delivery, be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
     (2) Incorporated Documents. The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus, at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission, complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "1934 Act Regulations") and, when read together with the other information in the Prospectus, at the date of the Prospectus and at the Closing Time, did not and will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
     (3) Independent Accountants. The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
     (4) Financial Statements. The financial statements of the Guarantor included in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus, together with the related schedules and notes, present fairly the financial position of the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries, at the dates indicated and the statement of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries for the periods specified. Except as otherwise disclosed in the Prospectus, such financial statements comply as to form with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States ("GAAP") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved. The supporting schedules, if any, included in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus present fairly in accordance with GAAP the information required to be stated therein. The selected financial data and the summary financial information of the Company and the Guarantor included in the Prospectus, if any, present fairly the information shown therein and, in the case of the Guarantor, have been compiled on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus. In addition, any pro forma financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries and the related notes thereto included in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein, have been prepared in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines with respect to pro forma financial statements and have been properly compiled on the bases described therein, and the assumptions used in the preparation thereof are reasonable and the adjustments used therein are appropriate to give effect to the transactions and circumstances referred to therein.
     (5) No Material Adverse Change in Business. Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus, except as otherwise
 
stated therein (A) there has been no material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the revenues, earnings, properties, business affairs or business prospects of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise (a "Material Adverse Effect"), whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, (B) there have been no transactions or series of related transactions entered into by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries, which are material with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise or the Guarantor and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, respectively, other than transactions that arise in the ordinary course of business and that are not adverse with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise or to the Guarantor and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, as the case may be, (C) there has been no dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made by the Company or the Guarantor on any class of their respective capital stock or (D) there has not been any obligation, contingent or otherwise, directly or indirectly incurred by the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries, that would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
     (6) Good Standing of the Guarantor and the Company. Each of the Guarantor and the Company has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and to enter into and perform its obligations under, or as contemplated by, this Underwriting Agreement and the applicable Terms Agreement. The Guarantor is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each other jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing would not result in a Material Adverse Effect.
     (7) Good Standing of Subsidiaries. Each "significant subsidiary" of the Guarantor (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X under the 1933 Act) (each, including the Company, a "Subsidiary" and, collectively, the "Subsidiaries"), has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing would not result in a Material Adverse Effect. All of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable and is owned by the Guarantor, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity. None of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Subsidiaries was issued in violation of preemptive or other similar rights arising by operation of law, under the charter or by-laws of any Subsidiary or under any agreement to which the Guarantor or any Subsidiary is a party, or otherwise.
     (8) Capitalization. If the Prospectus contains a "Capitalization" section, the authorized, issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each of the Guarantor and the Company is as set forth in the column entitled "Actual" under the "Capitalization" section of the Prospectus. Such shares of capital stock have been duly authorized and validly issued by the
 
Guarantor and the Company and are fully paid and non-assessable, and none of such shares of capital stock were issued in violation of preemptive or other similar rights arising by operation of law, under the respective charter and by-laws of the Guarantor and the Company or under any agreement to which the Guarantor, Company or any of their respective subsidiaries is a party, or otherwise.
     (9) Authorization of this Underwriting Agreement and Terms Agreement. This Underwriting Agreement has been duly authorized, and the applicable Terms Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor.
     (10) Authorization of Debt Securities and Guarantee. The Underwritten Securities have been, or as of the date of the Terms Agreement will have been, duly authorized by the Company for issuance and sale pursuant to this Underwriting Agreement and such Terms Agreement. Such Underwritten Securities, when issued and authenticated in the manner provided for in the applicable Indenture and delivered against payment of the consideration therefor specified in such Terms Agreement, will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting creditors' rights generally or by general equitable principles, and except further as enforcement thereof may be limited by (A) requirements that a claim with respect to any Debt Securities denominated other than in U.S. dollars (or a foreign or composite currency judgment in respect of such claim) be converted into U.S. dollars at a rate of exchange prevailing on a date determined pursuant to applicable law or (B) governmental authority to limit, delay or prohibit the making of payments outside the United States. Such Underwritten Securities will be in the form contemplated by, and each registered holder thereof is entitled to the benefits of, the applicable Indenture. The Guarantee has been, or as of the date of the Terms Agreement will have been, duly authorized by the Guarantor. The Guarantee will constitute a valid and legally binding obligation of the Guarantor, enforceable against the Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting creditors' rights generally or by general equitable principles, and except further as enforcement thereof may be limited by (A) requirements that a claim with respect to the guarantee of any Debt Securities denominated other than in U.S. dollars (or a foreign or composite currency judgment in respect of such claim) be converted into U.S. dollars at a rate of exchange prevailing on a date determined pursuant to applicable law or (B) governmental authority to limit, delay or prohibit the making of payments outside the United States.
     (11) Authorization of the Indenture. The Indenture has been, or prior to the issuance of the Debt Securities thereunder will have been, duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor and, upon such authorization, execution and delivery, will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company and the Guarantor, enforceable against the Company and the Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting creditors' rights generally or by general equitable principles.
     (12) Descriptions of the Underwritten Securities and Guarantee. The Underwritten Securities and the Guarantee being sold pursuant to the applicable Terms Agreement and the
 
Indenture, as of the date of the Prospectus, will conform in all material respects to the statements relating thereto contained in the Prospectus and will be in substantially the form filed or incorporated by reference, as the case may be, as an exhibit to the 2005 Registration Statement.
     (13) Absence of Defaults and Conflicts. Neither the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of its charter or by-laws or in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan or credit agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Guarantor or any Subsidiary is subject (collectively, "Agreements and Instruments"), except for such defaults that would not result in a Material Adverse Effect. The execution, delivery and performance of this Underwriting Agreement, the applicable Terms Agreement, Indenture and any other agreement or instrument entered into or issued or to be entered into or issued by the Company or the Guarantor in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby or in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus (including the issuance and sale of the Underwritten Securities and the use of the proceeds from the sale of the Underwritten Securities as described under the caption "Use of Proceeds") and compliance by the Company and the Guarantor with their respective obligations hereunder and thereunder have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action of the Company and the Guarantor and do not and will not, whether with or without the giving of notice or passage of time or both, conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default or Repayment Event (as defined below) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any assets, properties or operations of the Guarantor or any Subsidiary pursuant to any Agreements and Instruments, except for such conflicts, breaches, defaults, events or liens, charges or encumbrances that would not result in a Material Adverse Effect, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws of the Guarantor or any Subsidiary or any applicable law, statute, rule, regulation, judgment, order, writ or decree of any government, government instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Guarantor or any Subsidiary or any of their respective assets, properties or operations. As used herein, a "Repayment Event" means any event or condition which gives the holder of any note, debenture or other evidence of indebtedness (or any person acting on such holder's behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a portion of such indebtedness by the Guarantor or any Subsidiary.
     (14) Absence of Labor Dispute. No labor dispute with the employees of the Guarantor or any Subsidiary exists or, to the knowledge of the Guarantor, is imminent, other than disputes which would not be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
     (15) Absence of Proceedings. There is no action, suit, proceeding, inquiry or investigation before or by any court, arbitration panel or governmental agency or body, domestic or foreign, now pending, or to the knowledge of the Guarantor or any Subsidiary threatened, against or affecting the Guarantor, any subsidiary thereof or any of their respective officers or directors in their capacities as such officers and directors, which is required to be disclosed in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus (other than as stated therein), or which might reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, or which might reasonably be
 
expected to materially and adversely affect the assets, properties or operations thereof or the consummation of this Underwriting Agreement, the applicable Terms Agreement, the Underwritten Securities or the Indenture or the transactions contemplated herein or therein. The aggregate of all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Guarantor or any subsidiary thereof is a party or of which any of their respective assets, properties or operations is the subject which are not described in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
     (16) Accuracy of Exhibits. There are no contracts or documents that are required to be described in the Registration Statements or the Prospectus or to be filed as exhibits thereto which have not been so described and filed as required.
     (17) Absence of Further Requirements. No filing with, or authorization, approval, consent, license, order, registration, qualification or decree of, any court or governmental authority or agency is necessary or required for the performance by the Company or the Guarantor of their respective obligations under this Underwriting Agreement, the applicable Terms Agreement or the Indenture or the Underwritten Securities in connection with the transactions contemplated thereby, except such as have been already obtained or as may be required under state securities laws.
     (18) Possession of Intellectual Property. Each of the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries owns or possesses rights to use adequate patents, patent rights, licenses, inventions, copyrights, know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), trademarks, service marks, trade names or other intellectual property (collectively, "Intellectual Property") necessary to carry on the business now operated by it, and neither the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any Intellectual Property or of any facts or circumstances which would render any Intellectual Property invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
     (19) Possession of Licenses and Permits. Each of the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries possesses such permits, licenses, approvals, consents and other authorizations (collectively, "Governmental Licenses") issued by the appropriate federal, state, local or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by it. Each of the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries is in compliance with the terms and conditions of all such Governmental Licenses, except where the failure so to comply would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect. All of the Governmental Licenses are valid and in full force and effect, except where the invalidity of such Governmental Licenses or the failure of such Governmental Licenses to be in full force and effect would not result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice nor is any executive officer of the Guarantor or the Company otherwise aware of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any of such Governmental Licenses which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
     (20) Title to Property. Each of the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries has good and marketable title to all real property owned by it and good title to all other properties owned by it, in each case, free and clear of all mortgages, pledges, liens, security interests, claims, restrictions or encumbrances of any kind, except (A) as otherwise stated in the 2005 Registration Statement and the Prospectus or (B) those which do not, singly or in the aggregate, materially affect the value of such property and do not interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries; provided, however, that none of such mortgages, pledges, liens, security interests, claims, restrictions or encumbrances shall violate the Indenture. All of the leases and subleases material to the business of the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, and under which the Guarantor or the Subsidiary holds properties described in the Prospectus, are in full force and effect, and neither the Guarantor nor any of Subsidiaries has received any notice nor is any executive officer of the Guarantor or the Company otherwise aware of any material claim of any sort that has been asserted by anyone adverse to the rights of the Guarantor or any Subsidiary under any of the leases or subleases mentioned above, or affecting or questioning the rights of the Guarantor or such Subsidiary of the continued possession of the leased or subleased premises under any such lease or sublease.
     (21) Investment Company Act. The Company and the Guarantor are not, and upon the issuance and sale of the Underwritten Securities as herein contemplated and the application of the net proceeds therefrom as described in the Prospectus will not be, "investment companies" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "1940 Act").
     (22) Environmental Laws. Except as otherwise stated in the 2005 Registration Statement and the Prospectus and except as would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect (A) neither the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law and any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, hazardous substances, petroleum or petroleum products or asbestos containing materials (collectively, "Hazardous Materials") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, "Environmental Laws"), (B) the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (C) there are no pending or, to the best knowledge of the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries after reasonable investigation, threatened administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries, and (D) there are no events or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to form the basis of an order for clean-up or remediation, or an action, suit or proceeding by any private party or governmental body or agency, against or affecting the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries relating to any Hazardous Materials or the violation of any Environmental Laws.
     (23) Compliance with Cuba Act. The Company and the Guarantor have complied with, and are and will be in compliance with, the provisions of that certain Florida act relating to
 
disclosure of doing business with Cuba, codified as Section 517.075 of the Florida statutes, and the rules and regulations thereunder or are exempt therefrom.
     (24) Market Data. The statistical and market-related data included in the Prospectus are based on or derived from sources that the Guarantor and the Company believe to be reliable and accurate in all material respects or represent the Guarantor's or Company's good faith estimates that are made on the basis of data delivered from such sources.
     (25) 1934 Act Reports. The Guarantor is subject to Section 13 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act. The 2005 Registration Statement and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with Regulation G and with Item 10(e) of Regulation S-K.
     (26) Disclosure Controls and Procedures. The Guarantor has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such terms are defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the 1934 Act) designed to ensure that material information relating to the Guarantor, including its subsidiaries, is made known to the Guarantor's Chief Executive Officer and its Chief Financial Officer by others within those entities; such disclosure controls and procedures are effective to perform the functions for which they were established. The Guarantor's auditors and the audit committee of the board of directors of the Guarantor have been advised of: (i) any significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal controls over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the Guarantor's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information and (ii) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting, in each case, that have arisen since the date of the certifications included as Exhibits 31.1 and 31.2 to the Guarantor's most recent annual report on Form 10-K. Since the date of the most recent evaluation of such disclosure controls and procedures, there has been no change in internal controls that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, internal controls, including any corrective actions with regard to material weaknesses.
     (27) Accounting Controls and Procedures. The Guarantor has established and maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain asset accountability; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
     (28) Compliance with Laws. The Guarantor and each of its subsidiaries is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders, decrees and judgments, except where such non-compliance would not be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
     (29) Affiliate Transactions. Except as otherwise disclosed in the 2005 Registration Statement and the Prospectus, there are no material outstanding loans or advances or material guarantees of indebtedness by the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries to or for the benefit of any
 
of the officers or directors of the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of the members of the families of any of them.
     (30) No Undisclosed Relationships. No relationship, direct or indirect, exists between or among the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries on the one hand, and any of the directors, officers, stockholders, customers or suppliers of the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries on the other hand, that is required by the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations to be described in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus and that is not so described.
     (b) Officers' Certificates. Any certificate signed by any officer of the Guarantor or any subsidiary and delivered to any Underwriter or to counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Underwritten Securities shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Guarantor or such subsidiary to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby on the date of such certificate and, unless subsequently amended or supplemented, at each Representation Date subsequent thereto.
     SECTION 2. SALE AND DELIVERY TO UNDERWRITERS; CLOSING.
     (a) Underwritten Securities. The several commitments of the Underwriters to purchase the Underwritten Securities pursuant to the applicable Terms Agreement shall be deemed to have been made on the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and shall be subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth.
     (b) Payment. Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of, the Underwritten Securities shall be made at such place as shall be agreed upon by the Underwriters and the Company, at 10:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the third (fourth, if the pricing occurs after 4:30 P.M. (Eastern time) on any given day) business day after the date hereof (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10 hereof), or such other time not later than ten business days after such date as shall be agreed upon by the Underwriters and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called "Closing Time").
     Payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer to the account designated by the Company against delivery to the Underwriters of the Underwritten Securities to be purchased by them.
     (c) Denominations; Registration. The Underwritten Securities shall be in such denominations and registered in such names as the Underwriters may request in writing at least one full business day prior to the Closing Time. The Underwritten Securities will be made available for examination and packaging by the Underwriters in The City of New York not later than 10:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the business day prior to the Closing Time.
     SECTION 3. COVENANTS OF THE COMPANY. The Company and the Guarantor jointly and severally covenant with each Underwriter participating in the offering of Underwritten Securities, as follows:
     (a) Compliance with Securities Regulations and Commission Requests. The Company and the Guarantor, subject to Section 3(b), will comply with the requirements of Rule
 
430A of the 1933 Act Regulations and/or Rule 434 of the 1933 Act Regulations, if and as applicable, and will notify the Representative(s) immediately, and confirm the notice in writing, of (i) the effectiveness of any post-effective amendment to either of the Registration Statements or the filing of any supplement or amendment to the Prospectus, (ii) the receipt of any comments from the Commission, (iii) any request by the Commission for any amendment to either of the Registration Statements or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or for additional information, and (iv) the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statements or of any order preventing or suspending the use of any preliminary prospectus, or of the suspension of the qualification of the Underwritten Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or of the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for any of such purposes. The Company and the Guarantor will promptly effect the filings necessary pursuant to Rule 424 and will take such steps as it deems necessary to ascertain promptly whether the Prospectus transmitted for filing under Rule 424 was received for filing by the Commission and, in the event that it was not, it will promptly file the Prospectus. The Company and the Guarantor will make every reasonable effort to prevent the issuance of any stop order and, if any stop order is issued, to obtain the lifting thereof at the earliest possible moment.
     (b) Filing of Amendments. The Company and the Guarantor will give the Underwriters notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statements (including any filing under Rule 462(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations), any Term Sheet or any amendment, supplement or revision to either the prospectus included in the most recent Registration Statement at the time it became effective or to the Prospectus, whether pursuant to the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act or otherwise, will furnish the Underwriters with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing or use, as the case may be, will afford the Underwriters a reasonable opportunity to comment on any such document and will not file or use any such document to which the Underwriters or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object.
     (c) Delivery of Registration Statements. The Company and the Guarantor will deliver, on request, to the Underwriters and counsel for the Underwriters, without charge, conformed copies of the Registration Statements as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (including exhibits filed therewith or incorporated by reference therein and documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein) and conformed copies of all consents and certificates of experts. If applicable, the copies of the Registration Statements and each amendment thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
     (d) Delivery of Prospectuses. The Company and the Guarantor will deliver to each Underwriter, without charge, as many copies of each preliminary prospectus as such Underwriter may reasonably request, and the Company and the Guarantor hereby consent to the use of such copies for purposes permitted by the 1933 Act. The Company and the Guarantor will furnish to each Underwriter, without charge, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act, such number of copies of the Prospectus as such Underwriter may reasonably request. The Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies
 
thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
     (e) Continued Compliance with Securities Laws. The Company and the Guarantor will comply with the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations so as to permit the completion of the distribution of the Underwritten Securities as contemplated in this Underwriting Agreement and the applicable Terms Agreement and in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus. If at any time when the Prospectus is required by the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act to be delivered in connection with sales of the Securities, any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which it is necessary, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters or for the Company and the Guarantor, to amend the Registration Statements in order that the Registration Statements will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or to amend or supplement the Prospectus in order that the Prospectus will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser, or if it shall be necessary, in the opinion of such counsel, at any such time to amend the Registration Statements or amend or supplement the Prospectus in order to comply with the requirements of the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations, the Company will promptly prepare and file with the Commission, subject to Section 3(b) and at its own expense, such amendment or supplement as may be necessary to correct such statement or omission or to make the Registration Statements or the Prospectus comply with such requirements, and the Company and the Guarantor will furnish to the Underwriters, without charge, such number of copies of such amendment or supplement as the Underwriters may reasonably request.
     (f) Blue Sky Qualifications. The Company and the Guarantor will each use its best efforts, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to qualify the Underwritten Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions (domestic or foreign) as the Underwriters may designate and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than one year from the date of the applicable Terms Agreement; provided, however, that neither the Company nor the Guarantor shall be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. In each jurisdiction in which the Underwritten Securities have been so qualified, the Company and the Guarantor will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of such jurisdiction to continue such qualification in effect for a period of not less than one year from the date of such Terms Agreement.
     (g) Earnings Statement. The Guarantor will timely file such reports pursuant to the 1934 Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
 
     (h) Use of Proceeds. The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Underwritten Securities in the manner specified in the Prospectus under "Use of Proceeds".
     (i) Listing. The Company will use its best efforts to effect the listing of the Underwritten Securities, prior to the Closing Time, on any national securities exchange or quotation system if and as specified in the applicable Terms Agreement.
     (j) Restriction on Sale of Securities. Between the date of the applicable Terms Agreement and the Closing Time or such other date specified in such Terms Agreement, the Company and the Guarantor will not, without the prior written consent of the Underwriters, directly or indirectly, issue, sell, offer to sell, grant any option for the sale of, or otherwise dispose of, the Underwritten Securities specified in such Terms Agreement.
     (k) Reporting Requirements. The Guarantor, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act, will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
     SECTION 4. PAYMENT OF EXPENSES.
     (a) Expenses. The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, will pay all expenses incident to the performance of their obligations under this Underwriting Agreement or the applicable Terms Agreement, including (i) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statements (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (ii) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Underwriters of this Underwriting Agreement, any Terms Agreement, any Agreement among Underwriters, the Indenture and such other documents as may be required in connection with the offering, purchase, sale and delivery of the Underwritten Securities, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the Underwritten Securities and the Guarantee, or any certificates for the Underwritten Securities or the Guarantee, as applicable, to the Underwriters, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Company's and Guarantor's counsel, accountants and other advisors or agents (including transfer agents and registrars), as well as the fees and disbursements of the Trustee and its counsel, (v) the qualification of the Underwritten Securities and the Guarantee under state securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(f) hereof, including filing fees and the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection therewith and in connection with the preparation, printing and delivery of the Blue Sky Survey, and any amendment thereto, (vi) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of each preliminary prospectus, any Term Sheet and the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, (vii) the fees charged by nationally recognized statistical rating organizations for the rating of the Underwritten Securities, (viii) the fees and expenses incurred with respect to the listing of the Underwritten Securities, (ix) the filing fees incident to, and the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel to the Underwriters in connection with, the review, if any, by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. (the "NASD") of the terms of the sale of the Underwritten Securities, (x) the fees and expenses of any Underwriter acting in the capacity of a "qualified independent underwriter" (as defined in Rule 2720(b)(15) of the NASD), if applicable, and (xi) the fees and expenses of the officers and employees of the Company and
 
the Guarantor and any other expenses of the Company in connection with attending or hosting meetings with prospective purchasers of the Underwritten Securities.
     (b) Termination of Agreement. If the applicable Terms Agreement is terminated by the Underwriters in accordance with the provisions of Section 5, Section 9(b)(i) or the first clause of Section 9(b)(iii) hereof, the Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, shall reimburse the Underwriters for all of their out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters.
     SECTION 5. CONDITIONS OF UNDERWRITERS' OBLIGATIONS. The obligations of the Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Underwritten Securities pursuant to the applicable Terms Agreement are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company and the Guarantor contained in Section 1 hereof or in certificates of any officer of the Company and the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company and the Guarantor of their respective covenants and other obligations hereunder, and to the following further conditions:
     (a) Effectiveness of Registration Statements. The Registration Statements, including any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, have become effective under the 1933 Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statements shall have been issued under the 1933 Act or proceedings therefore initiated or threatened by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of counsel to the Underwriters. A prospectus containing information relating to the description of the Underwritten Securities, the specific method of distribution and similar matters shall have been filed with the Commission in accordance with Rule 424(b)(1), (2), (3), (4) or (5), as applicable (or any required post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and declared effective in accordance with the requirements of Rule 430A), or, if the Company has elected to rely upon Rule 434 of the 1933 Act Regulations, a Term Sheet including the Rule 434 Information shall have been filed with the Commission in accordance with Rule 424(b)(7).
     (b) Opinion of Counsel for Company and Guarantor. At Closing Time, the Underwriters shall have received the favorable opinion or opinions, dated as of Closing Time, of counsel for the Company and Guarantor (which counsel shall be acceptable to the Underwriters), in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, together with signed copies of such letter or letters for each of the Underwriters, to the effect as counsel to the Underwriters may reasonably request.
     (c) Opinion of Counsel for Underwriters. At Closing Time, the Underwriters shall have received the favorable opinion, dated as of Closing Time, of counsel for the Underwriters, together with signed copies of such letter for each of the other Underwriters, with respect to the matters requested by the Underwriters. In giving such opinion, such counsel may rely, as to all matters governed by the laws of jurisdictions other than the law of the State of New York, the federal law of the United States and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, upon the opinions of counsel satisfactory to the Underwriters. Such counsel may also state that, insofar as such opinion involves factual matters, they have relied, to the extent they deem proper,
 
upon certificates of officers of the Guarantor, the Company and their respective subsidiaries and certificates of public officials.
     (d) Officers' Certificate. At Closing Time, there shall not have been, since the date of the applicable Terms Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the revenue, earnings, properties, business affairs or business prospects of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, and the Underwriters shall have received certificates from the Company and the Guarantor, executed on their respective behalf by their respective President or a Vice President and the chief financial officer or chief accounting officer, in each case dated as of Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such material adverse change, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1 are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of the Closing Time, (iii) the Company or the Guarantor, as applicable, has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Time, and (iv) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statements has been issued and no proceedings for that purpose have been initiated or threatened by the Commission.
     (e) Accountant's Comfort Letter. At the time of the execution of the applicable Terms Agreement, the Underwriter shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP a letter dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Underwriters, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letter for each of the Underwriters, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus.
     (f) Bring-down Comfort Letter. At Closing Time, the Underwriters shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP a letter, dated as of Closing Time, to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished pursuant to subsection (e) of this Section 5, except that the specified date referred to shall be a date not more than three business days prior to the Closing Time.
     (g) Ratings. At Closing Time, the Underwritten Securities shall have the ratings accorded by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization," as defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) of the 1933 Act Regulations, if and as specified in the applicable Terms Agreement, and the Company shall have delivered to the Underwriters a letter, dated as of such date, from each such rating organization, or other evidence satisfactory to the Underwriters, confirming that the Underwritten Securities have such ratings. Since the time of execution of such Terms Agreement, there shall not have occurred a downgrading in the rating assigned to the Underwritten Securities or any of the Company's other securities by any such rating organization, and no such rating organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of the Underwritten Securities or any of the Company's other securities.
 
     (h) Approval of Listing. At Closing Time, the Underwritten Securities shall have been approved for listing, subject only to official notice of issuance, if and as specified in the applicable Terms Agreement.
     (i) No Objection. If the Registration Statements or an offering of Underwritten Securities has been filed with the NASD for review, the NASD shall not have raised any objection with respect to the fairness and reasonableness of the underwriting terms and arrangements.
     (j) Additional Documents. At Closing Time, counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Underwritten Securities as herein contemplated, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions, herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company and the Guarantor in connection with the issuance and sale of the Underwritten Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Underwriters and counsel for the Underwriters.
     (k) Termination of Terms Agreement. If any condition specified in this Section 5 shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, the applicable Terms Agreement may be terminated by the Underwriters by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to the Closing Time, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that Sections 1, 6, 7, 12 and 13 shall survive any such termination and remain in full force and effect.
     SECTION 6. INDEMNIFICATION.
     (a) Indemnification of Underwriters. The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
     (1) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statements (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430A Information and the Rule 434 Information deemed to be a part thereof, if applicable, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
     (2) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged
 
untrue statement or omission; provided that (subject to Section 6(d) below) any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company and the Guarantor; and
     (3) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by the Underwriters), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (i) or (ii) above.
provided, however, that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriters expressly for use in any Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the 430A Information and the Rule 434 Information deemed to be a part thereof, if applicable, or any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in a letter to the Company to be delivered prior to the Closing Time.
     (b) Indemnification of Company, Guarantor and Their Directors and Officers. Each Underwriter severally and not jointly agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, the Guarantor and their respective directors, officers who signed the Registration Statements, and each person, if any, who controls the Company or the Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act, against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in subsection (a) of this Section, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statements (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430A Information and the Rule 434 Information deemed to be a part thereof, if applicable, or any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter expressly for use in the Registration Statements (or any amendment thereto) or such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in a letter to the Company to be delivered prior to the Closing Time.
     (c) Actions against Parties; Notification. Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof (through the forfeiture or substantial rights and defenses) and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the managing underwriter(s), and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Guarantor. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action; provided, however, that
 
counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 6 or Section 7 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent (i) includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim; and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
     (d) Settlement without Consent if Failure to Reimburse. If at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by Section 6(a)(2) effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request; (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least 30 days prior to such settlement being entered into; and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement.
     SECTION 7. CONTRIBUTION. If the indemnification provided for in Section 6 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, from the offering of the Underwritten Securities pursuant to the applicable Terms Agreement; or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and of the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
     The relative benefits received by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the offering of the Underwritten Securities pursuant to the applicable Terms Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of such Underwritten Securities (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus, or, if Rule 434 is used, the corresponding location on the Term Sheet bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of such Underwritten Securities as set forth on such cover.
 
     The relative fault of the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by or on behalf of the Company or the Guarantor, on the one hand, or by or on behalf of the Underwriters, on the other hand, and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
     The Company, the Guarantor and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 7. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 7 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Underwritten Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
     For purposes of this Section 7, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company or the Guarantor, each officer of the Company or the Guarantor who signed the Registration Statements, and each person, if any, who controls the Company or the Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company or the Guarantor, respectively. The Underwriters' respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to the number or aggregate principal amount, as the case may be, of Underwritten Securities set forth opposite their respective names in the applicable Terms Agreement, and not joint.
     SECTION 8. REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES AND AGREEMENTS TO SURVIVE DELIVERY. All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Underwriting Agreement or the applicable Terms Agreement or in certificates of officers of the Company or the Guarantor submitted pursuant hereto or thereto shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or controlling person, or by or on behalf of the Company and the Guarantor, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Underwritten Securities.
 
     SECTION 9. TERMINATION.
     (a) Terms Agreement. The Underwriters may terminate a Terms Agreement, by notice to the Company and the Guarantor, at any time at or prior to the Closing Time, if (i) there has been, since the time of execution of such Terms Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the revenue, earnings, properties, business affairs or business prospects of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, or (ii) there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States or, if the Underwritten Securities include Debt Securities denominated or payable in, or indexed to, one or more foreign or composite currencies, in the international financial markets, or any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of the Underwriters, impracticable to market the Underwritten Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Underwritten Securities, or (iii) trading in any securities of the Guarantor has been suspended or limited by the Commission or the New York Stock Exchange, or if trading generally on the New York Stock Exchange or American Stock Exchange or in the over-the-counter market has been suspended or limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by either of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, the NASD or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a banking moratorium has been declared by either Federal or New York authorities or, if the Underwritten Securities include Debt Securities denominated or payable in, or indexed to, one or more foreign or composite currencies, by the relevant authorities in the related foreign country or countries, or (v) there is any material disruption of securities settlement or clearance services in the United States.
     (b) Liabilities. If a Terms Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section 9, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 hereof, and provided further that Sections 1, 6, 7, 12 and 13 shall survive such termination and remain in full force and effect.
     SECTION 10. DEFAULT BY ONE OR MORE OF THE UNDERWRITERS. If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail at the Closing Time to purchase the Underwritten Securities which it or they are obligated to purchase under the applicable Terms Agreement (the "Defaulted Securities"), then the other Underwriters shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if, however, such other Underwriters shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
     (a) if the number or aggregate principal amount, as the case may be, of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the number or aggregate principal amount, as the case may be, of Underwritten Securities to be purchased on such date pursuant to such Terms Agreement, the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations under such Terms Agreement bear to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters; or
 
     (b) if the number or aggregate principal amount, as the case may be, of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the number or aggregate principal amount, as the case may be, of Underwritten Securities to be purchased on such date pursuant to such Terms Agreement, such Terms Agreement shall terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter.
     No action taken pursuant to this Section 10 shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
     In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of the applicable Terms Agreement either the Underwriters or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Closing Time for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Registration Statements or the Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements.
     SECTION 11. NOTICES. All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be directed to the address set forth in the Terms Agreement; and notices to the Company and the Guarantor shall be directed to the Guarantor at 2301 Patriot Boulevard, Glenview, Illinois 60026, attention: Treasurer.
     SECTION 12. PARTIES. This Underwriting Agreement and the applicable Terms Agreement shall each inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Company, the Guarantor and the Underwriters and, upon execution of such Terms Agreement, any other Underwriters and their respective successors. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Underwriting Agreement or such Terms Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Underwriters, the Company and the Guarantor and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 6 and 7 and their heirs and legal representatives, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Underwriting Agreement or such Terms Agreement or any provision herein or therein contained.
     This Underwriting Agreement and such Terms Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof and thereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the parties hereto and thereto and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representatives, and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of Underwritten Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
     SECTION 13. GOVERNING LAW AND TIME. THIS UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT AND ANY APPLICABLE TERMS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SET FORTH HEREIN, SPECIFIED TIMES OF DAY REFER TO NEW YORK CITY TIME.
     SECTION 14. EFFECT OF HEADINGS. The Article and Section headings herein and the Table of Contents are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
     Dated as of February 24, 2005
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     We understand that Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell, and Anixter International Inc. (the "Guarantor") desires to unconditionally guarantee as to payment of principal of and premium (if any) and interest on, $ aggregate principal amount of the Company's debt securities (the "Underwritten Securities"). Subject to the terms and conditions set forth or incorporated by reference herein, the underwriters named below (the "Underwriters") offer to purchase, severally and not jointly, the principal amount of Underwritten Securities opposite their names set forth below at the purchase price set forth below.
     
Total [$]
 
     All of the provisions contained in the document attached as Annex I hereto entitled "Underwriting Agreement" are hereby incorporated by reference in their entirety herein and shall be deemed to be a part of this Terms Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein. Terms defined in such document are used herein as therein defined.
     Please accept this offer no later than : o'clock P.M. (New York City time) on , 20 by signing a copy of this Terms Agreement in the space set forth below and returning the signed copy to us.
     
     
          
     
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.3
 
 
 
 
 
     FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of February 24, 2005 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), between Anixter Inc. (the "Company"), Anixter International Inc. (the "Guarantor") and The Bank of New York, as trustee (the "Trustee").
     Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Indenture, dated as of September 9, 1996, among the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee (the "Indenture").
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Guarantor executed and delivered the Indenture to the Trustee to provide for the issuance from time to time of the Company's unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, guaranteed by the Guarantor, to be issued in one or more series unlimited as to principal amount;
     WHEREAS, Section 9.01(4) of the Indenture provides that the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Indenture to add, change or eliminate provisions in respect to one or more series of Securities.
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Guarantor desire to amend the Indenture with respect to all series of Securities hereafter issued under the Indenture;
     WHEREAS, all actions necessary to make this First Supplemental Indenture a legal, valid and binding obligation of the parties hereto in accordance with its terms and the terms of the Indenture have been performed; and
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Trustee desire to enter into, execute and deliver this First Supplemental Indenture in compliance with the provisions of the Indenture;
     NOW THEREFORE, the Company does hereby covenant and agree to and with the Trustee as follows:
     This Indenture is hereby amended as follows:
     1.1 . This First Supplemental Indenture is supplemental to the Indenture and does and shall be deemed to form a part of, and shall be construed with and as a part of, the Indenture for any and all purposes. Every Holder of Securities hereinafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby.
Supplemental Indenture
     1.2 . Section 101 ("Definitions") is hereby amended as follows:
Amendment of Section 101
     (a) The definition of "Funded Debt" is amended to add the following phrase at the end thereof:
 
"; it being understood that debt outstanding under a revolving credit or similar agreement which may be borrowed, repaid and reborrowed (and reimbursement obligations relating to letters of credit) shall not constitute Funded Debt."
     (b) The definition of "Unrestricted Subsidiary" is amended to delete the phrase ", including without limitation Signal Capital Corporation and its Subsidiaries."
     (c) The definitions of "Consolidated Net Tangible Assets," "Principal Facility," "Restricted Subsidiary" and "Unrestricted Subsidiary" are hereby amended to change the phrases "the date of the Indenture" and "the date of the applicable Indenture" in each place where they appear to "the date of the First Supplemental Indenture."
     (d) The definitions of "Continuing Directors," "Current Market Price," "Fair Market Value," "National Rating Agency" and "Restructuring Event" are deleted in their entirety.
     1.3 . Clause (i) of the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection (c) Section 104 ("Acts of Holders; Record Dates") is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Amendment to Section 104
     "(i) any Notice of Default pursuant to Section 501(4),"
     1.4 . Section 105 ("Notice, Etc., to Trustee, Company and Guarantor") is hereby amended to change the address for notices to the Company and the Guarantor to 2301 Patriot Boulevard, Glenview, Illinois, 60026-8020, Attention: Treasurer.
Amendment of Section 105
     1.5 . Section 501 ("Events of Default") is hereby amended to change the dollar amount referenced in paragraph (5) thereof from $10,000,000 to $25,000,000.
Amendment of Section 501
     1.6 . The second paragraph of Section 902 ("Supplemental Indentures with Consent of Holders") is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Amendment of Section 902
"A supplemental indenture which changes or eliminates any covenant or other provision of this Indenture which has expressly been included solely for the benefit of one or more particular previously created series of Securities, or which modifies the rights of the Holders of Securities of such previously created series with respect to such covenant or other provision, shall be deemed only to affect the rights under this Indenture of the Holders of Securities of such previously created series."
     1.7 . Section 1005 ("Restriction on Creation of Secured Debt") is hereby amended to change the phrase "the date hereof" to "the date of the First Supplemental Indenture", to reletter paragraph (k) as paragraph (l), to change the references to
Amendment of Section 1005
 
"(a) through (k)" to "(a) through (l)", and to add a new paragraph (k) which will read it its entirety as follows:
(k) Security Interests securing indebtedness of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary owing to an Unrestricted Subsidiary of the character described in clause (c) of the definition of Unrestricted Subsidiary that finances accounts receivables; or
     1.8 . Each of Section 1007 ("Restriction on Transfer of Principal Facilities"), Section 1008 ("Restriction on Senior Funded Debt by Restricted Subsidiaries of Company") and Section 1010 ("Redemption at the Option of the Holders in Certain Circumstances") is deleted in its entirety.
Amendment of Sections 1007, 1008 and 1010
     2.1 . The Trustee accepts the amendments to the Indenture effected by this First Supplemental Indenture and agrees to execute the trusts created by the Indenture as hereby amended, but only upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Indenture.
Acceptance by Trustee
     2.2 . The Trustee shall not be responsible for and makes no representation as to the validity or adequacy of this First Supplemental Indenture or the Securities, and it shall not be responsible for the recitals or any statement of the Company in this First Supplemental Indenture.
Trustee's Disclaimer
     2.3 . Except as hereby expressly amended, the Indenture and the Securities issued thereunder are in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect.
Ratification
     2.4 . This First Supplemental Indenture shall become effective as of the date first above written.
Effectiveness
     2.5 . This First Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without regard to the conflict of laws principals thereof (other than Section 5-1401 of the General Obligation Law).
Governing Law
     2.6 . This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts or with counterpart signatures, each of which as executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterpart Originals
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this First Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed and attested, all as of the day and year first above written.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050427174256.txt.gz
TIME:20050427174256
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended April 1, 2005. The Company's press release, dated April 26, 2005 is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release, dated April 26, 2005 issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended April 1, 2005.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 26, 2005 
First Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "The 11 percent organic sales growth in the first quarter, exclusive of the foreign exchange effects of a weaker dollar, was in line with our internal expectations. This growth allowed us to increase income before extraordinary gain by 46 percent and to improve operating margins to 4.5 percent in the most recent quarter. The combination of this sales and earnings growth with our strong financial position, including quarter-end cash balances of $167.9 million, puts us in a very good position to pursue further growth opportunities and to enhance shareholder value."
First Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended April 1, 2005, sales of $876.5 million produced net income of $20.4 million, or 51 cents per diluted share. Included in the current year's first quarter sales results were sales of $18.7 million from the June 22, 2004 acquisition of DDI.
In the prior year period, sales of $764.2 million generated income before extraordinary gain of $14.0 million, or 37 cents per diluted share. The year ago first quarter also included an after-tax extraordinary gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share, related to a 1983 matter regarding Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company.
Operating income in the first quarter increased 36 percent to $39.6 million as compared to $29.0 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.5 percent compared to 3.8 percent in the first quarter of 2004.
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the first quarter grew at an 11 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for $18.7 million in sales related to the June 2004 acquisition of DDI and $12.9 million for the foreign currency effects of a weaker US dollar. This organic growth rate was in line with our expectations of 8 to 12 percent growth for the year. Day-to-day business was strong throughout the quarter, while larger project business reflected a normal seasonal pattern of starting slow and then building momentum throughout the quarter."
"The organic growth in the quarter was particularly strong in our OEM Supply business which saw 27 percent organic growth after adjusting for the foreign exchange effects of $1.2 million and DDI sales of $18.7 million," continued Grubbs. "The growth with these customers reflects a combination of added SKUs to existing contracts, some new contracts and increased prices. Looking at revenue growth, we believe our strategy of building this business is solidly on track, with revenues in the most recent quarter annualizing to a full year run rate of approximately $475 million."
"Enterprise cabling sales in North America reported nearly 10 percent year-on-year sales gains. While sales rose on a combination of increased demand from both new and existing customers, continued progress in the security market and increased data cabling prices, these gains were offset by weaker major project sales early in the quarter. North American Industrial Wire & Cable sales grew by over 8 percent as a result of a combination of increased demand from existing customers, the addition of new customers and the effects of higher copper prices. An 8 percent year-on-year increase in sales to North American telecom OEMs was also encouraging," said Grubbs.
"In Europe, despite generally weak market conditions in enterprise cabling and specialty wire & cable sales, we still saw sales climb by 20 percent as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "Adjusting for the weaker U.S. dollar impact of $7.1 million, European sales grew by approximately 15 percent as compared to the year ago quarter, with growth in the OEM supply market being a major contributor to growth. In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, where there was little year-on-year currency exchange rate effect, we also saw an 8 percent increase in sales. Latin America reported solid year-on-year sales gains, while Asia had a drop in revenues due to fewer major customer projects in this year's first quarter."
First Quarter Operating Results
"Our first quarter operating results showed continued improvement in our efforts to increase operating margins," said Grubbs. "Our first quarter operating margins of 4.5 percent were the best first quarter operating margins we have reported since prior to the 2001  2003 recession. In North America, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.9 percent as compared to 4.0 percent in the year ago quarter. The improvement reflects a combination of better gross margins on improved sales mix and price increases. In Europe, where strong sales growth and substantial improvements in operating performance in the OEM Supply business were achieved, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 3.6 percent as compared to 3.2 percent in the year ago quarter. Emerging markets reported a slight drop in operating margins from 2.8 percent in the year ago quarter to 2.4 percent in the most recent quarter. The drop in emerging market operating margins reflects a combination of improved margins in Latin America on solid sales growth offset by a drop in operating margins in Asia on reduced sales volumes."
Refinancing and Cash Flow
"During the quarter we took advantage of strong bond market conditions and issued $200 million of 5.95% Senior unsecured notes due March 1, 2015," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President - Finance. "Net proceeds from this bond offering, which totaled $197.6 million, were used to reduce borrowings under our working capital and accounts receivable securitization facilities by a total of approximately $78.0 million. The remainder of the proceeds from the offering have been invested in short-term cash investments and are available for general corporate purposes including the intended call in June 2005 of the remaining $70.0 million of the Company's 7 percent zero coupon convertible notes due June 2020."
"Cash flow provided by operations in the quarter was $7.1 million compared to $10.9 million used in operations in the year ago quarter," continued Letham. "When the cash flow from operations is combined with the refinancing activities in the quarter, we have a net increase in borrowings of $110.1 million from the end of fiscal 2004. This resulted in a debt-to-total capitalization ratio at the end of the first quarter of 40.0 percent as compared to 35.1 percent at the end of fiscal 2004. At the same time cash balances have increased from $53.4 million at the end of fiscal 2004 to $167.9 million at the end of the first quarter of 2005."
Business Outlook
Concluding, Grubbs said, "The trends of the first quarter were positive and, for the most part, as we expected. We anticipate that the improvement in project quotation and booking activity that we saw as the quarter unfolded will lead to a continuation of solid year-over-year sales growth during the next couple of quarters. If these trends continue as expected, we should be in a position to report continuing improvements in earnings along with solid cash flow from operations throughout fiscal 2005. When these gains are combined with our very solid quarter-end financial position, we are in an excellent position to pursue additional organic and strategic growth opportunities."
First Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2005 first quarter on Tuesday, April 26, 2005, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and nearly $600 million in inventory, 3) 169 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements indicating the Company's expectations or beliefs concerning future events. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the Company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include changes in supplier relationships, foreign political, economic and currency risks, risks associated with inventory, commodity price fluctuations and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the Company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050602160020.txt.gz
TIME:20050602160020
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
     On May 26, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced the initiation of an offer at a price of 34 pence per share for the shares of Infast Group plc, ("Infast"), a U.K.-based distributor of fasteners and other "C" class inventory components to OEMs (the "Offer"). The offer has been unanimously recommended by the Infast Board of Directors. Anixter has received commitments to accept the offer from shareholders representing approximately 58.70 percent of the 114.34 million outstanding shares of Infast. The offer is subject to a number of conditions including a minimum acceptance level of 90 percent.
     The Company's press release issued in the United States and United Kingdom, both dated May 26, 2005, are attached as Exhibit 99.1 and 99.2, respectively. The recommended cash offer is attached as Exhibit 99.3.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today announced the initiation of an offer at a price of 34 pence per share for the shares of Infast Group plc, ("Infast"), a U.K.-based distributor of fasteners and other "C" class inventory components to OEMs (the "Offer").
GLENVIEW, IL, May 26, 2005 
The offer has been unanimously recommended by the Infast Board of Directors. Anixter has received commitments to accept the offer from shareholders representing approximately 58.70 percent of the 114.34 million outstanding shares of Infast. The offer is subject to a number of conditions including a minimum acceptance level of 90 percent.
In February 2005 Infast announced that it had reached an agreement to sell the last of its manufacturing operations. That transaction completed a multi-year restructuring program in which Infast sold a number of businesses unrelated to its current fastener and "C" class parts distribution business. In its audited financial statements for the financial year ended December 31, 2004 Infast reported sales and earnings before interest, taxes and exceptional items of $287.3 million (157.1 million) and $5.7 million (3.1 million), respectively, from the continuing distribution operations which Anixter is proposing to purchase. Currently Infast operates 25 distribution centers in the U.K. and 6 in the U.S. and in total employs approximately 900 people.
Based on the offer price of 34 pence per Infast Share, Anixter expects to pay a total of $72.2 million (39.47 million) for all of the outstanding and to be issued shares of Infast. As a result of the Acquisition, Anixter will assume the outstanding debt obligations of Infast which at December 31, 2004 totaled $25.4 million (13.9 million). The purchase of the shares will be funded from on-hand cash balances of Anixter.
Commenting on the proposed acquisition, Robert W. Grubbs, President and C.E.O. of Anixter International said, "The addition of the Infast operations to our existing OEM supply business is another significant step in positioning ourselves as a leader in the supply of fasteners and other small parts to original equipment manufacturers, service organizations and government support operations. The Infast customer base adds to and complements the existing base of multi-location and multi-national customers we service today. Once this transaction is complete we will have proforma annual 2005 projected sales in this market of approximately $755 million."
"As we have developed our position in this market place over the past three years our ability to provide quality products along with reliable supply chain services has positioned us well with the large multi-location and multi-national customers we serve. Our geographic presence, financial
 
strength and focus on service give us the ability to capitalize on the opportunities in the marketplace. The proposed acquisition, in addition to bringing important new customers to our business, also adds to the scale of our operations and brings a proven group of employees that will contribute to a continued focus on enhancing our service capabilities," continued Grubbs.
Concluding Grubbs said, "We expect this transaction to be immediately accretive to earnings. The completion of this proposed transaction will enhance our ability to compete effectively in this market on a global basis. Over time, as we blend the strengths, skills and capabilities of the Infast operations with our existing OEM Supply business, we expect the earnings contribution from the combined business to grow in a meaningful way."
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and nearly $600 million in inventory, 3) 169 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Further information about Anixter and the Offer, including the offer announcement, is available at Anixter's website at www.anixter.com.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
Earnings Accretion Statement
The statement above relating to earnings accretion should not be interpreted to mean that earnings per share for Infast or the combined group will necessarily be greater than those for the relevant preceding financial period
This announcement contains financial information shown in US dollars and pounds Sterling. In order to compare financial information the following exchange rates should be used: US$1 : 0.5469 and 1 : US$1.8285 being the exchange rates extracted from The Financial Times UK Edition published on 25 May 2004 (being the latest practicable date prior to the publication of this announcement)."
This announcement does not constitute an offer to sell or invitation to purchase any securities or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, pursuant to the Offer or otherwise. The Offer will be made solely by the offer document and the related form of acceptance accompanying the offer document, which will contain the full terms and conditions of the Offer, including details of how the offer may be accepted.
The availability of the Offer to Infast Shareholders who are not resident in United Kingdom or the United States may be affected by the laws of the relevant jurisdictions in which they are located or of which they are citizens. Such persons should inform themselves of, and observe, any applicable legal or regulatory
 
requirements of their jurisdictions. Further details in relation to overseas shareholders will be set out in the Offer Document.
The Offer is not being and will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into, or by use of the mails of, or by any means or instrumentality (including, without limitation, facsimile transmission, electronic mail, telex or telephone) of interstate or foreign commerce of, or any facilities of a national securities exchange of Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance by any such use, means, instrumentality or facility, directly or indirectly from or within Canada, Australia, Japan or any such jurisdiction.

 
EXHIBIT 99.2
 
This announcement is not for release, publication or distribution in or into Canada, Australia or Japan.
The boards of Anixter and Infast are pleased to announce that they have reached agreement on the terms of a recommended cash offer to be made by KPMG Corporate Finance on behalf of the Offeror, a wholly owned indirect subsidiary of Anixter, (outside of the United States) and by the Offeror in the United States, to acquire the entire issued and to be issued ordinary share capital of Infast, a UK based group focused on inventory management services.
Summary of the Offer
Commenting on the Offer, Robert Grubbs, President and Chief Executive Officer of Anixter, said:
"The addition of the Infast operations to our existing OEM supply business is another significant step in positioning ourselves as a leader in the supply of fasteners and other small parts to
 
original equipment manufacturers, service organisations and government support operations. The Infast customer base adds to and complements the existing base of multi-location and multi-national customers we service today. Once this transaction is complete we will have pro forma annual 2005 projected sales in this market of approximately $755 million."
Commenting on the Offer, Graham Titcombe, Chairman of Infast, said:
"Our business has changed radically since the Infast Board initiated a restructuring of Infast in 2004. The Infast Group has now re-shaped itself to focus on inventory management services reflecting the changing needs of its customer base. We believe a combination of Infast and Anixter will enhance our ability to achieve our business goals more speedily than would have been the case as an independent company. The Offer from Anixter represents good value to Infast Shareholders and makes sound commercial and operational sense."
This summary should be read in conjunction with the full text of the attached announcement.
Enquiries:
KPMG Corporate Finance, a division of KPMG LLP which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Services Authority for investment business activities, is acting for Anixter and the Offeror as financial adviser in relation to the Offer and is not acting for any other person in relation to the Offer. KPMG Corporate Finance will not be responsible to anyone other than Anixter and the Offeror for providing the protections afforded to its clients or for providing advice in relation to the contents of this announcement or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
Williams de Bro, which is authorised and regulated in the United Kingdom by the Financial Services Authority, is acting for Infast and for no one else in connection with the Offer and will not be responsible to anyone other than Infast for providing the protections afforded to clients of Williams de Bro or for giving advice in relation to the Offer or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
Under the provisions of Rule 8.3 of the City Code any person who, alone or acting together with any other person(s) pursuant to an agreement or understanding (whether formal or informal) to acquire or control relevant securities of Infast, owns or controls, or becomes the owner or
2
 
controller, directly or indirectly, of one per cent or more of any class of securities of Infast is required to disclose, by not later than 12.00 noon (London time) on the Business Day following the date of the relevant transaction, dealings in such securities of that company (or in any option in respect of, or derivative referenced to, any such securities) during the period to the First Closing Date, or, if later, the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional as to acceptances or lapses or is otherwise withdrawn.
Under the provisions of Rule 8.1 of the City Code, all dealings in relevant securities of Infast by the Offeror or Infast, or by any of their respective "associates" (within the meaning of the City Code) must also be disclosed. If you are in any doubt as to the application of Rule 8 to you, please contact an independent financial adviser authorised under the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000, consult the Panel's website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk or contact the Panel on telephone number +44 20 7638 0129; fax +44 20 7236 7013.
This announcement does not constitute an offer or invitation to purchase any securities or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, pursuant to the Offer or otherwise. The Offer will be made solely pursuant to the Offer Document and the Form of Acceptance accompanying the Offer Document, which will contain the full terms and conditions of the Offer, including details of how the Offer may be accepted.
The full text of the conditions and certain further terms of the Offer set out in Appendix I to this announcement form part of and should be read in conjunction with this announcement.
Appendix II to this announcement provides details of additional information regarding the Offer including the basis of calculations and sources of certain information included in this announcement.
Appendix III to this announcement contains definitions of the terms used in this announcement.
The availability of the Offer to Infast Shareholders who are not resident in United Kingdom or the United States may be affected by the laws of the relevant jurisdictions in which they are located or of which they are citizens. Such persons should inform themselves of, and observe, any applicable legal or regulatory requirements of their jurisdictions. Further details in relation to overseas shareholders will be set out in the Offer Document.
The Offer will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into, or by use of the mails of, or by any means or instrumentality (including, without limitation, facsimile transmission, electronic mail, telex or telephone) of interstate or foreign commerce of, or any facilities of a national securities exchange of Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance by any such use, means, instrumentality or facility, directly or indirectly from or within Canada, Australia, Japan or any such jurisdiction.
The Offer in the United States will be made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
This announcement may contain various "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act relating to the Offer, Anixter and Infast that are subject to risks and uncertainties, including those pertaining to the anticipated benefits to be realised from the proposed acquisition of Infast. The statements can
3
 
be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology such as "believe," "expects," "prospects," "estimated," "should," "may" or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology indicating Anixter's expectations or beliefs concerning future events. Anixter cautions that such statements are qualified by important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements, a number of which are identified in this announcement. Other factors could also cause actual results to differ materially from expected results included in these statements. These factors include changes in supplier relationships, foreign political, economic and currency risks, risks associated with inventory, commodity price fluctuations and risks associated with the integration of recently acquired companies.
The members of the Anixter Offer Committee accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement apart from the information in this announcement relating to the Infast Group, the Infast Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act) for which the Infast Directors accept responsibility. Subject as aforesaid, to the best of the knowledge and belief of the members of the Anixter Offer Committee (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case), the information contained in this announcement for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
The Offeror Directors, accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement relating to the Offeror, the Offeror Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act). To the best of the knowledge and belief of the Offeror Directors (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case), the information contained in this announcement for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
The Infast Directors accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement relating to the Infast Group, the Infast Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act). To the best of the knowledge and belief of the Infast Directors (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case) the information contained in this announcement relating to the Infast Group, the Infast Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of Section 346 of the Act) for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
 
4
 
This announcement is not for release, publication or distribution in or into Canada, Australia or Japan.
1. Introduction
The boards of Anixter and Infast are pleased to announce that they have reached agreement on the terms of a recommended cash offer to be made by KPMG Corporate Finance on behalf of the Offeror, a wholly owned indirect subsidiary of Anixter, (outside of the United States) and by the Offeror in the United States, to acquire the entire issued and to be issued ordinary share capital of Infast. The Offer values each Infast Share at 34 pence and Infast's entire existing issued ordinary share capital at approximately 38.88 million.
The Infast Directors, who have been so advised by Williams de Bro, consider the terms of the Offer to be fair and reasonable so far as Infast Shareholders are concerned. In providing advice to the Infast Directors, Williams de Bro has taken account of the Infast Directors' commercial assessments. Accordingly, the Infast Directors unanimously recommend that Infast Shareholders accept the Offer, as they have irrevocably undertaken to do (or procure to be done) in respect of their own beneficial holdings and the holdings of those persons connected with them comprising, in aggregate, 2,204,646 Infast Shares, representing 1.93 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
The Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings and a non binding letter of intent to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from certain Infast Shareholders in respect of a total of 67,116,162 Infast Shares representing approximately 58.70 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
2. The Offer
On behalf of the Offeror, KPMG Corporate Finance (outside of the United States) and the Offeror in the United States, will offer to acquire, on the terms and subject to the conditions set out in Appendix I of this announcement and those to be set out in the Offer Document and (for Infast Shareholders who hold certificated Infast Shares) in the Form of Acceptance, the entire issued and to be issued ordinary share capital of Infast on the following basis:
The Offer values the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast at approximately 38.88 million.
5
 
The Offer Price represents a premium of approximately:
The Infast Shares will be acquired by or on behalf of the Offeror fully paid up and free from all liens, equitable interests, charges, encumbrances, rights of pre-emption and other third party rights or interests and together with all rights now or hereafter attaching thereto, including the right to receive and retain all dividends and other distributions (if any) declared, made or paid on or after 26 May 2005 (other than the final dividend of 0.6 pence per Infast Share for the year ended 31 December 2004 which was announced on 3 March 2005 in the preliminary statement of results of Infast and approved at Infast's annual general meeting on 28 April 2005 and which will be paid on 3 June 2005 to Infast Shareholders on the share register at the close of business on 6 May 2005).
The Offer will extend to any Infast Shares which are unconditionally allotted or issued fully paid (or credited as fully paid) prior to the date on which the Offer closes (or such earlier date as the Offeror may, subject to the City Code and/or with the consent of the Panel, determine) pursuant to the exercise of options under the Infast Share Option Schemes or otherwise.
The Offer in the United States will be made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
3. Irrevocable undertakings and letter of intent to accept the Offer
The Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from the Infast Directors in respect of their entire beneficial holdings of Infast Shares and the holdings of those persons connected with them comprising, in aggregate, 2,204,646 Infast Shares, representing approximately 1.93 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast. These irrevocable undertakings will lapse only in the event of the Offer lapsing or being withdrawn.
The following table shows the number of Infast Shares in which each of the Infast Directors had an interest on the date of the irrevocable undertaking given by him, and in respect of which an irrevocable undertaking was given:
6
 
In addition, the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer in respect of holdings comprising, in aggregate, 43,864,164 Infast Shares and representing approximately 38.36 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast which will remain binding unless an offer is made or announced by a third party at a level which represents an improvement of 10 per cent or greater in the value of the Offer Price from the following:
In addition, the Offeror and Anixter have received an irrevocable undertaking to procure acceptance of the Offer from UBS Global Asset Management (UK) Limited in respect of 13,962,352 Infast Shares and representing approximately 12.21 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast which will remain binding unless an offer is made or announced by a third party at a level which represents an improvement of 5 per cent or greater in the value of the Offer Price.
The Offeror and Anixter have also received a non binding letter of intent to accept the Offer from Societe Generale Asset Management UK Limited in relation to 7,085,000 Infast Shares it manages representing 6.20 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
In total therefore, the Offeror has received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer and a non binding letter of intent, from Infast Shareholders in respect of 67,116,162 Infast Shares, representing approximately 58.70 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
4. Background to and reasons for the Offer
The acquisition of Infast will strategically expand the Anixter Group's European OEM supply business. Infast's key strengths include:
7
 
The acquisition of Infast will also enable the Anixter Group to leverage further its investment in the OEM supply marketplace with the aim of increasing its return on investment by enabling it to offer the capabilities of the combined companies to the consolidated customer base.
The Anixter Group's financial strength is highlighted by the fact that the Infast Shares will be acquired using existing cash balances of the Anixter Group. In addition, the Anixter Group has approximately $300 million of unused in-place borrowing facilities.
The Anixter Group intends to bring together the skills and capabilities of the Infast team with the Anixter fastener operations in the US and the UK. When combined with the financial resources of the Anixter Group, the Anixter Directors believe it will be an organisation with the potential to be the preferred fastener and other small components supplier to OEMs, service organisations and government support operations. With the Anixter Group's existing presence in 45 countries, the Anixter Directors believe the Anixter Group will be well positioned to expand its relationships with multinational customers which the Combined Group will support. The goal of the Anixter Group is to use a combination of its financial strength, global distribution platform, logistics capabilities, product and product application knowledge, and business systems to provide its and Infast's customers with the opportunity to streamline their supplier base and reduce their total cost of procuring, owning and deploying small parts to their production lines. The Anixter Directors also believe that a goal in the acquisition of Infast should be the facilitation of the growth and success of Infast's business and its employees.
Over time, the Anixter Directors expect the earnings contribution from the combined business to grow and expect the acquisition of Infast to be immediately accretive to earnings.
Please note that the above statement should not be interpreted to mean that earnings per share for Infast or the Combined Group will necessarily be greater than those for the relevant preceding financial period.
5. Information on Anixter
The Anixter Group is a leader in the provision of advance inventory management services, including procurement, just-in-time delivery, quality assurance testing, advisory engineering services, component kit production, small component assembly and e-commerce and electronic data interchange to a broad spectrum of customers. The Anixter Group's comprehensive supply chain management solutions are designed to reduce customer procurement and management costs and enhance overall production efficiencies. Inventory management services are frequently provided under customer contracts for periods in excess of one year and include the interfacing of the Anixter Group and customer information systems and the maintenance of dedicated distribution facilities.
Through a combination of its service capabilities and a portfolio of products from industry leading manufacturers, the Anixter Group is a leading global distributor of data, voice, video and security network communication products as well as fasteners and other small components which are incorporated into a wide variety of end use applications and include screws, bolts, nuts, washers, pins, rings, fittings, springs, electrical connectors and similar small parts, many of which are specialised or highly engineered for particular applications.
Since September 2002, the Anixter Group has acquired the assets or shares of three companies engaged in the supply of fasteners and other small components to OEM's including just-in-time
8
 
and direct line feed programs, which businesses, together with the Anixter Group's existing operations in these categories, are projected to account for over $475 million in 2005 revenues. During this time, the Anixter Group has developed its position in the market place and the Anixter Directors believe that the Anixter Group's ability to provide quality products along with reliable supply chain services has positioned the Anixter Group well with the large multi-location and multi-national customers it serves. The Anixter Directors believe that the Anixter Group's geographic presence, financial strength and focus on service give it the ability to capitalise on the opportunities in the market place.
Founded in 1957, Anixter is listed and traded on the New York Stock Exchange with a market capitalisation at 24 May 2005 (the last practicable date prior to the publication of this announcement) of approximately $1,386 million. For the year ended 31 December 2004, Anixter net sales were $3,275.2 million and operating income (earnings before interest and taxes) was $138 million. Total assets as at 1 April 2005 were $1,838.1 million.
The Anixter Group serves over 90,000 customers with 275,000 products from nearly 3,500 manufacturers. The Anixter Group currently has $600 million of inventory available for delivery and supports and services its customers from 169 warehouses with approximately 4.6 million square feet of space. The Anixter Group consists of 5,600 employees, based in 45 countries and processes more than 8,000 customer orders each day.
Financial information in respect of Anixter, for at least the last three financial years, has been publicly filed with or furnished to the SEC and Infast Shareholders may obtain this information via the SEC's EDGAR filing systems, accessible from the SEC's website at www.sec.gov
Anixter released its unaudited quarterly report for the three months ended 1 April 2005 on 26 April 2005. This report will be included in the Offer Document and contains details of current trading and prospects of Anixter.
Further information on Anixter can also be found on Anixter's website at www.anixter.com
6. Information on Infast
Infast is a UK based company, headquartered in Gloucestershire, operating 25 distribution centres in the UK and 6 in the US, employing approximately 900 people and operating through three principal divisions:
In its audited financial statements for the year ended 31 December 2004 Infast reported sales and earnings before interest, taxes and exceptional items of 157.1 million and 3.1 million, respectively from the continuing distribution operations which now comprise the Infast business.
Infast Shares are listed on the Official List and traded on the London Stock Exchange. Based on the Closing Price of 23.5 pence per Infast Share on 25 May 2005 (the last Business Day prior to the date of this announcement), Infast had a market capitalisation of approximately 26.87 million.
9
 
7. Current trading of Infast
On 28 April 2005, Infast announced that business performance in the first quarter of its current financial year was in line with its expectations and, since then, performance has continued in line with its expectations. The Infast Board remains confident in the prospects of the re-shaped business of the Infast Group.
8. Background to and reasons for recommending the Offer
After a period of uneven financial performance in 2003, the Infast Board commenced a restructuring programme in July 2004 which concluded in an exit from the Infast Group's manufacturing operations in February 2005. A subsequent focus by Infast on inventory management services was designed to meet the changing needs of the Infast Group's customers in an increasingly competitive market. The Infast Board believed that this shift in Infast's business structure was in the best interests of both customers and shareholders and the process has now been successfully completed.
Over the same period, the Infast Board instituted the merger of its "Industrial" and "Direct" operations in the UK to create a stronger, single source service channel to better service the needs of the market while, at the same time, a cost reduction plan in the Infast automotive division was implemented.
Infast's performance in the first four months of 2005 has been in line with the Infast Board's expectations and the Infast Directors remain confident in the prospects of the re-shaped Infast Group. However, the global market conditions for Infast's customers remain challenging and, in order to meet them, consolidation has become an important and growing feature of commercial life in the industry. Against this background, the Offer from Anixter provides an immediate cash return to Infast Shareholders of 34 pence per Infast Share, which represents a premium of 49.5 per cent to the Closing Price of 22.75 pence per Infast Share on 12 April 2005, being the last business day prior to the Initial Announcement. In addition the Infast Board believes a combination with Anixter will present opportunities for the Infast business which it would be unlikely to achieve in the short term as an independent organisation.
The Infast Directors have therefore concluded that the price and certainty offered by the Offer is attractive and accordingly they recommend that Infast Shareholders accept the Offer.
9. Management and employees
The Offeror Board has given assurances to the Infast Directors that, following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects, the existing employment rights, including pension rights, of all the employees of Infast will be fully safeguarded.
The Infast Directors have agreed to resign from the Infast Board upon the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects. Certain Infast Directors will continue to provide services to the Combined Group upon the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects.
10. Inducement fee
Pursuant to a letter dated 25 April 2005 from Infast to Anixter and in consideration of Anixter making preparations for the Offer, it was agreed that an inducement fee would be payable by Infast to Anixter on any of the following events (each a ""):
Payment Event
10
 
The amount of the break fee depends on the date of the Payment Event and is subject to a minimum of 64,795 and a maximum of 388,772 (inclusive of any irrecoverable VAT).
11. Infast Share Option Schemes
The Offer will extend to any Infast Shares which are issued or unconditionally allotted fully paid (or credited as fully paid) prior to the date on which the Offer closes (or such earlier date as the Offeror may, subject to the City Code, determine being not earlier than the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared wholly unconditional as to acceptances or, if later, the First Closing Date) pursuant to the exercise of options granted under the Infast Share Option Schemes.
To the extent that such options are not exercised and, in the event that the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, appropriate proposals will be made to Infast Option Holders in due course. The Offeror intends that such proposals shall take the form of an "exercise and accept" offer, allowing Infast Option Holders under the Infast 1997 Sharesave Scheme with an exercise price which is less than the Offer Price to exercise their options in accordance with their terms and accept the Offer. No such proposals will be made to Infast Option Holders whose options have been granted at an exercise price in excess of the Offer Price or which otherwise remain unexercisable in accordance with their terms.
12. Compulsory acquisition, de-listing and re-registration
If the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, it is the intention of the Offeror, assuming it receives acceptances under the Offer in respect of and/or otherwise acquires 90 per cent or more of the Infast Shares to which the Offer relates, to acquire compulsorily any outstanding Infast Shares pursuant to the provisions of sections 428 to 430F (inclusive) of the Act.
Following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects and as soon as it is able to do so (subject to any applicable requirements of the UK Listing Authority), the Offeror intends to procure that Infast will apply to the UK Listing Authority for the cancellation of the listing of the Infast Shares on the Official List and to the London Stock Exchange for cancellation of trading of Infast Shares on the London Stock Exchange's market for listed securities. It is anticipated that cancellation of Infast's listing and admission to trading will take effect no earlier than 20 Business Days following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects. It is also intended that resolutions will be proposed to re-register Infast as a private
11
 
company.
De-listing is likely to reduce significantly the liquidity and marketability of any Infast Shares in respect of which the Offer has not been accepted.
13. Financing
Full acceptance of the Offer (and assuming the exercise of all options capable of exercise in accordance with the performance conditions subject to which they were issued pursuant to the Infast Share Option Schemes) would result in a maximum cash consideration of approximately 39.47 million being payable by the Offeror to Infast Shareholders. The total consideration will be paid out of the existing cash resources of the Offeror.
14 Overseas Shareholders
The availability of the Offer to persons who are not residing in either of the United Kingdom or the United States may be affected by the laws of their relevant jurisdictions. Such persons should inform themselves of, and observe, any applicable legal or regulatory requirements of their jurisdiction. Further details in relation to overseas shareholders will be contained in the Offer Document.
The Offer will be made for the securities of a non-US company. The Offer will be made in accordance with the requirements of the City Code and will be subject to disclosure and other procedural requirements that are different from those under US law.
The Offer will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into Australia, Canada, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would constitute a breach of securities laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance from or within Australia, Canada, Japan or any such other jurisdiction. Accordingly, copies of this announcement and the Offer Document are not being, and must not be, directly or indirectly, mailed or otherwise forwarded, distributed or sent in, into or from Australia, Canada, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would constitute a breach of securities laws in that jurisdiction, and persons receiving this announcement or the Offer Document (including custodians, nominees and trustees) must not mail or otherwise distribute or send it or them in, into or from such jurisdictions as doing so may invalidate any purported acceptance of the Offer .
15 US Shareholders
The Offer will be open to Infast Shareholders resident in the United States. The Offer will be made by the Offeror for the securities of a non-US company. The Offer will be made in accordance with the requirements of the Code and will be subject to disclosure and procedural requirements that are different from those under United States law. Any financial statements included or incorporated in this announcement and to be included or incorporated in the Offer Document may have been prepared in accordance with non-US accounting standards that may not be comparable to the financial statements of US companies.
The Offer Document and the accompanying Form of Acceptance will contain important information about the Offer. The Offeror urges Infast Shareholders resident in the United States to read the Offer Document and the Form of Acceptance in their entirety before any decision is made as to the Offer. The Offeror makes no representation as to the adequacy or fairness of the Offer.
The Offer in the United States will be made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
12
 
The Offer Document will not be reviewed by any federal or state securities commission or regulatory authority in the United States, nor will any such commission or authority pass upon the accuracy or adequacy of the Offer Document. Any representation to the contrary is unlawful and may be a criminal offence.
16 Disclosure of interests in Infast
Save for the 67,116,162 Infast Shares in respect of which the Offeror has received irrevocable undertakings and a non binding letter of intent to accept the Offer, neither Anixter nor any of the Anixter Directors nor any Anixter subsidiary, nor, so far as Anixter is aware, any person acting in concert with Anixter for the purposes of the Offer, owns, controls or holds any Infast Shares or any securities convertible or exchangeable into, or rights to subscribe for, purchase or holds any options to purchase any Infast Shares or has entered into any derivative referenced to Infast Shares which remains outstanding.
In view of the requirement for confidentiality, Anixter has not made any enquiries in this respect of certain parties who may be deemed by the Panel to be acting in concert with it for the purposes of the Offer.
17. Further information
Your attention is drawn to the further information contained in the Appendices to this announcement.
The Offer Document and Form of Acceptance setting out in full the terms and conditions of the Offer will be dispatched to Infast Shareholders as soon as possible.
Enquiries:
KPMG Corporate Finance, a division of KPMG LLP which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Services Authority for investment business activities, is acting for Anixter and the Offeror as financial adviser in relation to the Offer and is not acting for any other person in relation to the Offer. KPMG Corporate Finance will not be responsible to anyone other than Anixter and the Offeror for providing the protections afforded to its clients or for providing advice in relation to the contents of this announcement or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
13
 
Williams de Bro, which is authorised and regulated in the United Kingdom by the Financial Services Authority, is acting for Infast and for no one else in connection with the Offer and will not be responsible to anyone other than Infast for providing the protections afforded to clients of Williams de Bro or for giving advice in relation to the Offer or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
Under the provisions of Rule 8.3 of the City Code any person who, alone or acting together with any other person(s) pursuant to an agreement or understanding (whether formal or informal) to acquire or control relevant securities of Infast, owns or controls, or becomes the owner or controller, directly or indirectly, of one per cent or more of any class of securities of Infast is required to disclose, by not later than 12.00 noon (London time) on the Business Day following the date of the relevant transaction, dealings in such securities of that company (or in any option in respect of, or derivative referenced to, any such securities) during the period to the First Closing Date, or, if later the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional as to acceptances or lapses or is otherwise withdrawn.
Under the provisions of Rule 8.1 of the City Code, all dealings in relevant securities of Infast by the Offeror or Infast, or by any of their respective "associates" (within the meaning of the City Code) must also be disclosed. If you are in any doubt as to the application of Rule 8 to you, please contact an independent financial adviser authorised under the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000, consult the Panel's website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk or contact the Panel on telephone number +44 20 7638 0129; fax +44 20 7236 7013.
This announcement does not constitute an offer or invitation to purchase any securities or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, pursuant to the Offer or otherwise. The Offer will be made solely pursuant to the Offer Document and the Form of Acceptance accompanying the Offer Document, which will contain the full terms and conditions of the Offer, including details of how the Offer may be accepted.
The full text of the conditions and certain further terms of the Offer set out in Appendix I to this announcement form part of and should be read in conjunction with this announcement.
Appendix II to this announcement provides details of additional information regarding the Offer including the basis of calculations and sources of certain information included in this announcement.,
Appendix III to this announcement contains definitions of the terms used in this announcement.
The availability of the Offer to Infast Shareholders who are not resident in United Kingdom or the United States may be affected by the laws of the relevant jurisdictions in which they are located or of which they are citizens. Such persons should inform themselves of, and observe, any applicable legal or regulatory requirements of their jurisdictions. Further details in relation to overseas shareholders will be set out in the Offer Document.
The Offer will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into, or by use of the mails of, or by any means or instrumentality (including, without limitation, facsimile transmission, electronic mail, telex or telephone) of interstate or foreign commerce of, or any facilities of a national securities exchange of Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance by any such use, means,
14
 
instrumentality or facility, directly or indirectly from or within Canada, Australia, Japan or any such jurisdiction.
The Offer in the United States will be made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
This announcement may contain various "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act relating to the Offer, Anixter and Infast that are subject to risks and uncertainties, including those pertaining to the anticipated benefits to be realised from the proposed acquisition of Infast. The statements can be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology such as "believe," "expects," "prospects," "estimated," "should," "may" or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology indicating Anixter's expectations or beliefs concerning future events. Anixter cautions that such statements are qualified by important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements, a number of which are identified in this announcement. Other factors could also cause actual results to differ materially from expected results included in these statements. These factors include changes in supplier relationships, foreign political, economic and currency risks, risks associated with inventory, commodity price fluctuations and risks associated with the integration of recently acquired companies
The members of the Anixter Offer Committee accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement apart from the information in this announcement relating to the Infast Group, the Infast Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act) for which the Infast Directors accept responsibility. Subject as aforesaid, to the best of the knowledge and belief of the members of the Anixter Offer Committee (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case), the information contained in this announcement for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
The Offeror Directors, accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement relating to the Offeror, the Offeror Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act). To the best of the knowledge and belief of the Offeror Directors (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case), the information contained in this announcement for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
The Infast Directors accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement relating to the Infast Group, the Infast Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act). To the best of the knowledge and belief of the Infast Directors (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case) the information contained in this announcement relating to the Infast Group, the Infast Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of Section 346 of the Act) for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
15
 
PART A: Conditions of the Offer
The Offer will be subject to the following conditions:
16
 
17
 
18
 
19
 
20
 
21
 
PART B: Certain further terms of the Offer
The Offer will be made on the terms and will be subject to the conditions which are set out in this Appendix I, those terms which will be set out in the Offer Document and (in respect of Infast Shares held in certificated form) the Form of Acceptance and such further terms as may be required to comply with the provisions of the City Code. This announcement does not constitute an offer or invitation to purchase any securities.
The Infast Shares will be acquired by or on behalf of the Offeror fully paid up and free from all liens, equitable interests, charges, encumbrances, rights of pre-emption and other third party rights or interests and together with all rights now or hereafter attaching thereto, including the right to receive and retain all dividends and other distributions (if any) declared, made or paid on or after 26 May 2005 (other than the final dividend of 0.6 pence per Infast Share for the year ended 31 December 2004 which was announced on 3 March 2005 in the preliminary statement of results of Infast and approved at Infast's annual general meeting on 28 April 2005 and which will be paid on 3 June 2005 to Infast Shareholders on the share register at the close of business on 6 May 2005).
The Offer will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into, or by use of the mails of, or by any means or instrumentality (including, without limitation, facsimile transmission, electronic mail,
22
 
telex or telephone) of interstate or foreign commerce of, or any facilities of a national securities exchange of Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance by any such use, means, instrumentality or facility, directly or indirectly from or within Canada, Australia, Japan or any such jurisdiction.
Accordingly, copies of this announcement and any other documents related to the Offer will not be, and must not be, mailed or otherwise distributed or sent in or into or from Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and persons receiving this announcement, or such other documents (including, without limitation, custodians, nominees and trustees) must not distribute or send them in, or into or from any such jurisdiction.
23
 
24
 
The following definitions apply throughout this announcement unless the context requires otherwise:
25
 
26
 
All times referred to are London time unless otherwise stated.
In this announcement all references to statutes or other forms of legislation shall, unless otherwise stated, be to statutes or forms of legislation of the United Kingdom.
27
 
The terms "subsidiary" and "subsidiary undertaking" as used in these definitions shall have the meanings given by the Act.
28

 
Exhibit 99.3
THIS DOCUMENT IS IMPORTANT AND REQUIRES YOUR IMMEDIATE ATTENTION. If you are in any doubt about the Offer and/or any action you should take, you are recommended to seek your own independent financial advice immediately from your stockbroker, bank manager, accountant, solicitor or other independent financial adviser, who, if you are taking advice in the United Kingdom, is an adviser duly authorised under the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 or, if not, from another appropriately authorised financial adviser in your own jurisdiction.
If you have sold or otherwise transferred all of your Infast Shares (other than pursuant to the Offer) you should send this document, together with the accompanying Form of Acceptance and reply-paid envelope as soon as possible to the purchaser or transferee or to the stockbroker, bank or other agent through whom the sale or transfer was effected, for onward delivery to the purchaser or transferee. However, such documents should not be forwarded, distributed or transmitted in or into Canada, Australia or Japan or any other jurisdiction, if to do so would constitute a violation of the relevant laws of such jurisdiction. If you have sold or otherwise transferred only part of your holding of Infast Shares, you should retain these documents.
KPMG Corporate Finance, a division of KPMG LLP which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Services Authority for investment business activities, is acting for Anixter and the Offeror as financial adviser in relation to the Offer and is not acting for any other person in relation to the Offer. KPMG Corporate Finance will not be responsible to anyone other than Anixter and the Offeror for providing the protections afforded to its clients or for providing advice in relation to the contents of this document or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
Williams de Bro, which is authorised and regulated in the United Kingdom by the Financial Services Authority, is acting for Infast and for no one else in connection with the Offer and will not be responsible to anyone other than Infast for providing the protections afforded to clients of Williams de Bro or for giving advice in relation to the Offer or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
Your attention is drawn to the letter from the Chairman of Infast set out in Part 1 of this document which contains the Infast Directors' unanimous recommendation that Infast Shareholders accept the Offer. The procedure for acceptance of the Offer is set out in paragraph 15 of the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance in Part 2 of this document and in respect of certificated Infast Shares in the accompanying Form of Acceptance. To accept the Offer, in respect of certificated Infast Shares, the Form of Acceptance must be completed and signed in accordance with the instructions printed thereon, and returned as soon as possible and, in any event, so as to be received by post or by hand (during normal business hours only) to Capita Registrars, Corporate Actions, PO Box 166, The Registry, 34 Beckenham Road, Beckenham, Kent BR3 4TH, England by no later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005. A reply-paid envelope for use within the United Kingdom is enclosed for your convenience. Acceptances in respect of Infast Shares held in uncertificated form (i.e. in CREST) should be made electronically through CREST so that the TTE instructions settle no later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005 by following the procedure set out in paragraph 15 of the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance in Part 2 of this document and Section 6 of Part B of Appendix I to this document. If you are a CREST sponsored member you should refer to your CREST sponsor as only your CREST sponsor will be able to send the necessary TTE instructions to CRESTCo.
The Offer in the United States is made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affilliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
The Offer is not being and will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into, or by use of the mails of, or by any means or instrumentality (including, without limitation, facsimile transmission, electronic mail, telex or telephone) of interstate or foreign commerce of, or any facilities of a national securities exchange of, Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance by any such use, means, instrumentality or facility, directly or indirectly, from or within Canada, Australia, Japan or any such jurisdiction.
Accordingly, copies of this document, the Form of Acceptance and any other documents related to the Offer are not being, and must not be, mailed or otherwise distributed or sent in or into or from Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and persons receiving this document, the Form of Acceptance or such other documents (including, without limitation, custodians, nominees and trustees) must not distribute or send them in, or into or from any such jurisdiction. Further details are contained in Section 7 of Part B of Appendix I to this document. Any person (including, without limitation, any nominee, trustee or custodian), who could, or otherwise intends, or who may have a contractual or legal obligation to forward this document and/or the accompanying Form of Acceptance and/or any other documents related to the Offer to any jurisdiction outside the United Kingdom or the United States should read Section 7 of Part B of Appendix I to this document and should take appropriate advice before taking any action.
Under the provisions of Rule 8.3 of the City Code any person who, alone or acting together with any other person(s) pursuant to an agreement or understanding (whether formal or informal) to acquire or control relevant securities of Infast, owns or controls, or becomes the owner or controller, directly or indirectly, of one per cent or more of any class of securities of Infast is required to disclose, by not later than 12.00 noon (London time) on the Business Day following the date of the relevant transaction, dealings in such securities of that company (or in any option in respect of, or derivative referenced to, any such securities) during the period to the First Closing Date, or, if later, the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional as to acceptances or lapses or is otherwise withdrawn.
Under the provisions of Rule 8.1 of the City Code, all dealings in relevant securities of Infast by the Offeror or Infast, or by any of their respective "associates" (within the meaning of the City Code) must also be disclosed. If you are in any doubt as to the application of Rule 8 to you, please contact an independent financial adviser authorised under the FSMA, consult the Panel's website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk or contact the Panel on telephone number +44 20 7638 0129; fax +44 20 7236 7013.
 
All times referred to are London time unless otherwise stated.
 
To Infast Shareholders and, for information only, to Infast Option Holders
Dear Shareholder,
Recommended Cash Offer by the Offeror for Infast
1. Introduction
It was announced on 13 April 2005 that the Infast Board was in discussions that might lead to an offer for Infast. Yesterday, the boards of Infast and Anixter announced that they had reached agreement on the terms of a recommended cash offer to be made by KPMG Corporate Finance on behalf of the Offeror, a wholly owned indirect subsidiary of Anixter, (outside of the United States) and by the Offeror in the United States to acquire the entire issued and to be issued ordinary share capital of Infast. The Offer values the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast at approximately 38.88 million.
I am writing, on behalf of the Infast Board, to explain the background to the Offer and the reasons why the Infast Directors consider the terms of the Offer to be fair and reasonable and are unanimously recommending that you accept the Offer.
2. The Offer
The Offer is being made on the following basis:
The Offer values the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast at approximately 38.88 million.
The Offer Price represents a premium of approximately:
The Infast Shares will be acquired pursuant to the Offer fully paid and free from all liens, equitable interests, charges, encumbrances, rights of pre-emption and other third party rights or interests and together with all rights now or hereafter attaching thereto, including the right to receive and retain all dividends and other distributions (if any) declared, made or paid on or after 26 May 2005 (other than the final dividend of 0.6 pence per Infast Share for the year ended 31 December 2004 which was announced on 3 March 2005 in the preliminary statement of results of Infast and approved at Infast's
 
annual general meeting on 28 April 2005 and which will be paid on 3 June 2005 to Infast Shareholders on the share register at the close of business on 6 May 2005).
The Offer extends to any Infast Shares which are unconditionally allotted or issued fully paid (or credited as fully paid) prior to the date on which the Offer closes (or such earlier date as the Offeror may, subject to the City Code and/or with the consent of the Panel, determine) pursuant to the exercise of options under the Infast Share Option Schemes or otherwise.
The formal Offer is set out in the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance in Part 2 of this document. The conditions and further terms of the Offer are set out in Appendix I to this document and the accompanying Form of Acceptance (in the case of certificated Infast Shares).
The Offer in the United States is made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
3. Background to and reasons for recommending the Offer
After a period of uneven financial performance in 2003, the Infast Board commenced a restructuring programme in July 2004 which concluded in an exit from the Infast Group's manufacturing operations in February 2005. A subsequent focus by Infast on inventory management services was designed to meet the changing needs of the Infast Group's customers in an increasingly competitive market. The Infast Board believed that this shift in Infast's business structure was in the best interests of both customers and shareholders and the process has now been successfully completed.
Over the same period, the Infast Board instituted the merger of its Industrial'' and Direct'' operations in the UK to create a stronger, single source service channel to better service the needs of the market while, at the same time, a cost reduction plan in the Infast automotive division was implemented.
Infast's performance in the first four months of 2005 has been in line with the Infast Board's expectations and the Infast Directors remain confident in the prospects of the re-shaped Infast Group. However, the global market conditions for Infast's customers remain challenging and, in order to meet them, consolidation has become an important and growing feature of commercial life in the industry. Against this background, the Offer from Anixter provides an immediate cash return to Infast Shareholders of 34 pence per Infast Share, which represents a premium of 49.5 per cent to the Closing Price of 22.75 pence per Infast Share on 12 April 2005, being the last business day prior to the Initial Announcement. In addition, the Infast Board believes a combination with Anixter will present opportunities for the business which it would be unlikely to achieve in the short term as an independent organisation.
The Infast Directors have therefore concluded that the price and certainty offered by the Offer is attractive and accordingly they recommend that Infast Shareholders accept the Offer.
4. Final dividend
Infast Shareholders will receive the final dividend of 0.6 pence per Infast Share for the year ended 31 December 2004 irrespective of whether or when the Offer becomes unconditional in all respects. This dividend will be paid on 3 June 2005 to Infast Shareholders on the register at the close of business on 6 May 2005.
5. Irrevocable undertakings and letter of intent to accept the Offer
The Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from the Infast Directors in respect of their entire beneficial holdings of Infast Shares and the holdings of those persons connected with them comprising in aggregate 2,204,646 Infast Shares representing approximately 1.93 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
In addition, the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from certain other Infast Shareholders in respect of a further 57,826,516 Infast Shares, representing approximately 50.57 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
The Offeror and Anixter have also received a non binding letter of intent from Societe  Generale Asset Management UK Limited in respect of 7,085,000 Infast Shares it manages representing approximately 6.20 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
In total therefore, the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer and a non binding letter of intent from Infast Shareholders in
 
respect of 67,116,162 Infast Shares, representing approximately 58.70 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast. Further details of the terms of these irrevocable undertakings (including the terms on which they lapse) and the letter of intent are contained in paragraph 5 of Appendix IV to this document.
6. Current trading
On 28 April 2005, Infast announced that business performance in the first quarter of its current financial year was in line with its expectations and, since then, performance has continued in line with its expectations. The Infast Board remains confident in the prospects of the re-shaped business of the Infast Group.
7. Management and employees
The Offeror Board has given assurances to the Infast Directors that following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects the existing employment rights, including pension rights, of all employees of Infast will be fully safeguarded.
The Infast Directors have agreed to resign from the Infast Board upon the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects. Details of the terms of such resignations and the terms on which certain Infast Directors will continue to provide services to the Combined Group are set out in paragraph 6 of Appendix IV to this document.
8. Infast Share Option Schemes
The Offer extends to any Infast Shares which are issued or unconditionally allotted fully paid (or credited as fully paid) prior to the date on which the Offer closes (or such earlier date as the Offeror may, subject to the City Code, determine being not earlier than the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared wholly unconditional as to acceptances or, if later, the First Closing Date) pursuant to the exercise of options granted under the Infast Share Option Schemes.
To the extent that such options are not exercised and, in the event that the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, appropriate proposals will be made to Infast Option Holders in due course. The Offeror intends that such proposals shall take the form of an "exercise and accept" offer, allowing Infast Option Holders under the Infast 1997 Sharesave Scheme with an exercise price which is less than the Offer Price to exercise their options in accordance with their terms and accept the Offer. No such proposals will be made to Infast Option Holders whose options have been granted at an exercise price in excess of the Offer Price or which otherwise remain unexercisable in accordance with their terms.
9. United Kingdom and United States Taxation
In deciding whether to accept the Offer, Infast Shareholders should take account of their own individual circumstances, particularly their tax position. Your attention is drawn to paragraph 12 of the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance set out in Part 2 of this document entitled "United Kingdom and United States Taxation". The Infast Directors are unable to consider the tax position of individual Infast Shareholders.
If you are in doubt as to your taxation position or if you are subject to taxation in any jurisdiction other than the United Kingdom and/or the United States, you should consult an appropriate professional adviser immediately.
10. Compulsory acquisition, delisting and re-registration
If the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, it is the intention of the Offeror, assuming it receives acceptances under the Offer in respect of and/or otherwise acquires 90 per cent or more of the Infast Shares to which the Offer relates, to acquire compulsorily any outstanding Infast Shares pursuant to the provisions of sections 428 to 430F (inclusive) of the Act.
Following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects and as soon as it is able to do so (subject to any applicable requirements of the UK Listing Authority), the Offeror intends to procure that Infast will apply to the UK Listing Authority for the cancellation of the listing of the Infast Shares on the Official List and to the London Stock Exchange for cancellation of trading of Infast Shares on the London Stock Exchange's market for listed securities. It is anticipated that cancellation of Infast's listing and admission to trading will take effect no earlier than 20 Business Days following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects. It is also intended that resolutions will be proposed to re-register Infast as a private company.
De-listing is likely to
 
reduce significantly the liquidity and marketability of any Infast Shares in respect of which the Offer has not been accepted.
11. Inducement fee
In consideration of, and as an inducement to Anixter and the Offeror making preparations for the Offer, Infast has agreed to pay to Anixter an inducement fee of up to 388,772 (including any irrecoverable VAT) in certain limited circumstances. This agreement is described in further detail in paragraph 8 of Appendix IV to this document.
12. Action to be taken
Your attention is drawn to paragraph 15 of the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance in Part 2 of this document and to the accompanying Form of Acceptance (in the case of certificated Infast Shares), which sets out the procedure for acceptance of the Offer. In order to accept the Offer:
13. Further information
Your attention is drawn to the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance on pages 7 to 18 of this document and to Appendices I, II, III and IV to this document, and, for those Infast Shareholders holding certificated Infast Shares, the accompanying Form of Acceptance.
14. Recommendation
The Infast Directors, who have been so advised by Williams de Bro, consider the terms of the Offer to be fair and reasonable so far as Infast Shareholders are concerned. In providing advice to the Infast Directors, Williams de Bro has taken account of the Infast Directors' commercial assessments.
Accordingly, the Infast Directors unanimously recommend that Infast Shareholders accept the Offer, as they have irrevocably undertaken to do (or procure to be done) in respect of their own beneficial holdings and the holdings of those persons connected with them comprising, in aggregate, 2,204,646 Infast Shares, representing 1.93 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
Yours sincerely
Graham Titcombe
Chairman
 
27 May 2005
To Infast Shareholders and, for information only, to Infast Option Holders
Dear Shareholder
1. Introduction
The boards of Anixter and Infast announced on 26 May 2005 that they had reached agreement on the terms of a recommended cash offer to be made by KPMG Corporate Finance on behalf of the Offeror, a wholly owned indirect subsidiary of Anixter, (outside of the United States) and by the Offeror in the United States, to acquire the entire issued and to be issued ordinary share capital of Infast. The Offer values each Infast Share at 34 pence and Infast's entire existing issued ordinary share capital at approximately 38.88 million.
This letter and Appendix I to this document together with the accompanying Form of Acceptance (in the case of certificated Infast Shares), contain the formal terms and conditions of the Offer.
Your attention is drawn to the letter of recommendation from the Chairman of Infast contained in Part 1 of this document which sets out the reasons why the Infast Directors, who have been so advised by Williams de Bro, consider the terms of the Offer to be fair and reasonable and why they are unanimously recommending that Infast Shareholders accept the Offer as the Infast Directors have irrevocably undertaken to do (or procure to be done) in respect of their own entire beneficial holdings and the holdings of those persons connected with them comprising of, in aggregate, 2,204,646 Infast Shares representing approximately 1.93 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
The Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings and a non binding letter of intent to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from certain Infast Shareholders in respect of a total of 67,116,162 Infast Shares representing approximately 58.70 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast. Further details of the irrevocable undertakings and the non binding letter of intent are set out in paragraph 3 of this letter.
Acceptances of the Offer in respect of certificated Infast Shares should be received by Capita Registrars at the address detailed in the Form of Acceptance by no later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005. Acceptances of the Offer in respect of uncertificated Infast Shares should be made electronically through CREST so that the TTE instruction settles no later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005 in accordance with the procedure set out in paragraph 15(ii)(b) of this letter and in Section 6 of Part B of Appendix I to this document.
 
2. The Offer
On behalf of the Offeror, KPMG Corporate Finance (outside of the United States) and the Offeror in the United States, hereby offer to acquire, on the terms and subject to the conditions set out in this document and (if you hold certificated Infast Shares) in the accompanying Form of Acceptance, the entire issued and to be issued ordinary share capital of Infast on the following basis:
The Offer values the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast at approximately 38.88 million.
The Offer Price represents a premium of approximately:
The Infast Shares will be acquired by or on behalf of the Offeror fully paid up and free from all liens, equitable interests, charges, encumbrances, rights of pre-emption and other third party rights or interests and together with all rights now or hereafter attaching thereto, including the right to receive and retain all dividends and other distributions (if any) declared, made or paid on or after 26 May 2005 (other than the final dividend of 0.6 pence per Infast Share for the year ended 31 December 2004 which was announced on 3 March 2005 in the preliminary statement of results of Infast and approved at Infast's annual general meeting on 28 April 2005 and which will be paid on 3 June 2005 to Infast Shareholders on the share register at the close of business on 6 May 2005).
The Offer extends to any Infast Shares which are unconditionally allotted or issued fully paid (or credited as fully paid) prior to the date on which the Offer closes (or such earlier date as the Offeror may, subject to the City Code and/or with the consent of the Panel, determine) pursuant to the exercise of options under the Infast Share Option Schemes or otherwise.
The Offer will initially be open for acceptance until 1.00 p.m. (London time) on 17 June 2005 but may be extended in accordance with the provisions of the City Code. The Offer is subject to the conditions and further terms set out in Appendix I to this document and in the Form of Acceptance (in the case of certificated Infast Shares) which accompanies this document.
The Offer in the United States is made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
3. Irrevocable undertakings and letter of intent to accept the Offer
The Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from the Infast Directors in respect of their entire beneficial holdings of Infast Shares and the holdings of those persons connected with them comprising, in aggregate, 2,204,646 Infast Shares, representing approximately 1.93 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
In addition, the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer from certain other Infast Shareholders in respect of a further 57,826,516 Infast Shares, representing approximately 50.57 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
The Offeror and Anixter have also received a non binding letter of intent from Societe  Generale Asset Management UK Limited in respect of 7,085,000 Infast Shares it manages representing approximately 6.20 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
In total therefore, the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer and a non binding letter of intent from Infast Shareholders in respect of 67,116,162 Infast Shares, representing approximately 58.70 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
Further details of the terms of these irrevocable undertakings (including the terms on which they lapse) and the letter of intent are contained in paragraph 5 of Appendix IV to this document.
 
4. Financing of the Offer
Full acceptance of the Offer (and assuming the exercise of all options capable of exercise in accordance with the performance conditions subject to which they were issued pursuant to the Infast Share Option Schemes) would result in a maximum cash consideration of approximately 39.47 million being payable by the Offeror to Infast Shareholders. The total consideration will be paid out of the existing cash resources of the Offeror. KPMG Corporate Finance is satisfied that sufficient cash resources are available to the Offeror to satisfy the maximum consideration payable on full acceptance of the Offer.
5. Background to and reasons for the Offer
The acquisition of Infast will strategically expand the Anixter Group's European OEM supply business. Infast's key strengths include:
The acquisition of Infast will also enable the Anixter Group to leverage further its investment in the OEM supply marketplace with the aim of increasing its return on investment by enabling it to offer the capabilities of the combined companies to the consolidated customer base.
The Anixter Group's financial strength is highlighted by the fact that the Infast Shares will be acquired using existing cash balances of the Anixter Group. In addition, the Anixter Group has approximately $300 million of unused in-place borrowing facilities.
The Anixter Group intends to bring together the skills and capabilities of the Infast team with the Anixter fastener operations in the US and the UK. When combined with the financial resources of the Anixter Group, the Anixter Directors believe it will be an organisation with the potential to be the preferred fastener and other small components supplier to OEMs, service organisations and government support operations. With the Anixter Group's existing presence in 45 countries the Anixter Directors believe the Anixter Group will be well positioned to expand its relationships with multinational customers which the Combined Group will support. The goal of the Anixter Group is to use a combination of its financial strength, global distribution platform, logistics capabilities, product and product application knowledge, and business systems to provide its and Infast's customers with the opportunity to streamline their supplier base and reduce their total cost of procuring, owning and deploying small parts to their production lines. The Anixter Directors also believe that a goal in the acquisition of Infast should be the facilitation of the growth and success of Infast's business and its employees.
Once this transaction is complete the Combined Group will have pro forma annual 2005 projected sales in the market of approximately $755 million. Over time, the Anixter Directors expect the earnings contribution from the combined business to grow and expect the acquisition of Infast to be immediately accretive to earnings.
Please note that the above statement should not be interpreted to mean that earnings per share for Infast or the Combined Group will necessarily be greater than those for the relevant preceding financial period.
6. Information on Anixter
The Anixter Group is a leader in the provision of advance inventory management services, including procurement, just-in-time delivery, quality assurance testing, advisory engineering services, component kit production, small component assembly and e-commerce and electronic data interchange to a broad spectrum of customers. The Anixter Group's comprehensive supply chain management solutions are designed to reduce customer procurement and management costs and enhance overall production efficiencies. Inventory management services are frequently provided under customer contracts for periods in excess of one year and include the interfacing of the Anixter Group and customer information systems and the maintenance of dedicated distribution facilities.
 
Through a combination of its service capabilities and a portfolio of products from industry leading manufacturers, the Anixter Group is a leading global distributor of data, voice, video and security network communication products as well as fasteners and other small components which are incorporated into a wide variety of end use applications and include screws, bolts, nuts, washers, pins, rings, fittings, springs, electrical connectors and similar small parts, many of which are specialised or highly engineered for particular applications.
Since September 2002, the Anixter Group has acquired the assets or shares of three companies engaged in the supply of fasteners and other small components to OEMs including just-in-time and direct line feed programs, which businesses, together with the Anixter Group's existing operations in these categories, are projected to account for over $475 million in 2005 revenues. During this time, the Anixter Group has developed its position in the market place and the Anixter Directors believe that the Anixter Group's ability to provide quality products along with reliable supply chain services has positioned the Anixter Group well with the large multi-location and multi-national customers it serves. The Anixter Directors believe that the Anixter Group's geographic presence, financial strength and focus on service give it the ability to capitalise on the opportunities in the market place.
Founded in 1957, Anixter is listed and traded on the New York Stock Exchange with a market capitalisation at 25 May 2005 (being the last practicable date prior to the publication of this document) of approximately $1,373 million. For the year ended 31 December 2004, Anixter net sales were $3,275.2 million and operating income (earnings before interest and taxes) was $138 million. Total assets as at 1 April 2005 were $1,838.1 million.
The Anixter Group serves over 90,000 customers with 275,000 products from nearly 3,500 manufacturers. The Anixter Group currently has $600 million of inventory available for delivery and supports and services its customers from 169 warehouses with approximately 4.6 million square feet of space. The Anixter Group consists of 5,600 employees, based in 45 countries and processes more than 8,000 customer orders each day.
Information on Anixter's trading prospects are detailed in the unaudited quarterly report of Anixter for the three months ended 1 April 2005 set out in Section D of Appendix II to this document.
Financial information in respect of Anixter, for at least the last three financial years, has been publicly filed with or furnished to the SEC and Infast Shareholders may obtain this information via the SEC's EDGAR filing systems, accessible from the SEC's website at www.sec.gov Further information on Anixter can also be found on Anixter's website at www.anixter.com
7. Information on Infast
Infast is a UK based company, headquartered in Gloucestershire, operating 25 distribution centres in the UK and 6 in the US, employing approximately 900 people and operating through three principal divisions:
In its audited financial statements for the year ended 31 December 2004 Infast reported sales and earnings before interest, taxes and exceptional items of 157.1 million and 3.1 million, respectively from the continuing distribution operations which now comprise the Infast business.
Infast Shares are listed on the Official List and traded on the London Stock Exchange. Based on the Closing Price of 33.25 pence per Infast Share on 26 May 2005 (the last Business Day prior to the date of this document), Infast had a market capitalisation of approximately 38.02 million.
Further financial information on the Infast Group is set out in Appendix III to this document.
8. Management and employees
The Offeror Board has given assurances to the Infast Directors that, following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects, the existing employment rights, including pension rights, of all the employees of Infast will be fully safeguarded.
The Infast Directors have agreed to resign from the Infast Board upon the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects. Details of the terms of such resignations and the terms on
 
which certain Infast Directors will continue to provide services to the Combined Group are set out in paragraph 6 of Appendix IV to this document.
9. Inducement fee
In consideration of, and as an inducement to Anixter and the Offeror making preparations for the Offer, Infast has agreed to pay to Anixter an inducement fee of up to 388,722 (including any irrecoverable VAT) in certain limited circumstances. This agreement is described in further detail in paragraph 8 of Appendix IV to this document.
10. Infast Share Option Schemes
The Offer extends to any Infast Shares which are issued or unconditionally allotted fully paid (or credited as fully paid) prior to the date on which the Offer closes (or such earlier date as the Offeror may, subject to the City Code, determine being not earlier than the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared wholly unconditional as to acceptances or, if later, the First Closing Date) pursuant to the exercise of options granted under the Infast Share Option Schemes.
To the extent that such options are not exercised and, in the event that the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, appropriate proposals will be made to Infast Option Holders in due course. The Offeror intends that such proposals shall take the form of an exercise and accept'' offer, allowing Infast Option Holders under the Infast 1997 Sharesave Scheme with an exercise price which is less than the Offer Price to exercise their options in accordance with their terms and accept the Offer. No such proposals will be made to Infast Option Holders whose options have been granted at an exercise price in excess of the Offer Price or which otherwise remain unexercisable in accordance with their terms.
11. Compulsory acquisition, de-listing and re-registration
If the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, it is the intention of the Offeror, assuming it receives acceptances under the Offer in respect of and/or otherwise acquires 90 per cent or more of the Infast Shares to which the Offer relates, to acquire compulsorily any outstanding Infast Shares pursuant to the provisions of sections 428 to 430F (inclusive) of the Act.
Following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects and as soon as it is able to do so (subject to any applicable requirements of the UK Listing Authority), the Offeror intends to procure that Infast will apply to the UK Listing Authority for the cancellation of the listing of the Infast Shares on the Official List and to the London Stock Exchange for cancellation of trading of Infast Shares on the London Stock Exchange's market for listed securities. It is anticipated that cancellation of Infast's listing and admission to trading will take effect no earlier than 20 Business Days following the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects. It is also intended that resolutions will be proposed to re-register Infast as a private company.
De-listing is likely to reduce significantly the liquidity and marketability of any Infast Shares in respect of which the Offer has not been accepted.
12. United Kingdom and United States taxation
(i) United Kingdom
The following paragraphs, which are intended as a general guide only, are based on current UK legislation and our understanding of the practice of the UK tax authority as at the date of this document. They summarise certain limited aspects of the UK taxation consequences of acceptance of the Offer and they relate only to the position of certain classes of taxpayer and only to those Infast Shareholders who hold their Infast Shares beneficially as an investment, otherwise than under a personal equity plan or an individual savings account, and who are resident or ordinarily resident and domiciled in the UK for taxation purposes.
If you are in any doubt as to your taxation position or if you are subject to taxation in any jurisdiction other than the UK, you should consult an appropriate independent professional adviser immediately.
(a) Taxation on chargeable gains
Individual Infast Shareholders
An Infast Shareholder, who is not subject to corporation tax, and who receives cash proceeds may, depending on his individual circumstances (including the availability of exemptions, reliefs and allowable losses), be liable to UK capital gains tax.
 
Depending upon the length of time for which the Infast Shareholder has held the Infast Shares, an indexation allowance and/or taper relief may be available to reduce the amount of gain which would otherwise be chargeable to UK capital gains tax. For non-corporate tax payers, indexation allowance was frozen as at April 1998, which means that no further entitlement to indexation allowance will arise from that date. Taper relief may, however, be available to reduce the amount of any gain arising on the disposal of Infast Shares. The amount of taper relief available is determined by reference to the period of ownership of the Infast Shares after 5 April 1998 and by whether the Infast Shareholder in question holds the shares as business or non-business assets.
On the assumption that the Infast Shares in question are held as non-business assets, then if there has been a qualifying period of ownership of 3 complete years falling after 5 April 1998, taper relief could reduce the chargeable gain by 5 per cent with a further 5 per cent relief arising in each complete year of ownership thereafter subject to maximum taper relief of 40 per cent. For Infast Shares acquired prior to 17 March 1998 which are held as non-business assets, an additional year's ownership is imputed for taper relief purposes.
Corporate Infast Shareholders
An Infast Shareholder, which is subject to corporation tax and which receives cash proceeds under the Offer, will generally be treated for the purposes of corporation tax on chargeable gains as having disposed of its Infast Shares and may, depending on the circumstances, be liable to UK corporation tax on chargeable gains.
Depending on the length of time for which the Infast Shareholder has held the Infast Shares, an indexation allowance may be available to reduce the gain which would otherwise be chargeable to corporation tax.
(b) Other direct tax matters
Special tax provisions may apply to Infast Shareholders who have acquired or acquire their Infast Shares by exercising options under the Infast Share Option Schemes including provisions imposing a charge to income tax when such an option is exercised. Such Infast Shareholders are therefore advised to seek their own independent professional advice in this regard.
(c) Stamp duty and stamp duty reserve tax (SDRT'')
No stamp duty or SDRT will be payable by Infast Shareholders as a result of accepting the Offer.
Liability to taxation in respect of capital gains and income tax will depend on the individual circumstances of Infast Shareholders. Any Infast Shareholder or Infast Option Holder who is in any doubt about his own tax position or who is subject to tax in any jurisdiction other than the UK should consult an appropriate independent professional adviser immediately.
(ii) United States
The following paragraphs summarise the material United States federal income tax considerations that arise in connection with the Offer. They are based on the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (the Internal Revenue Code''), as amended, applicable treasury regulations, administrative guidance and court decisions as in effect as of the date of this document. The summary only relates to the position of an Infast Shareholder who holds Infast Shares as a capital asset and is (i) a US citizen or resident, or (ii) a corporation or other business entity (treated as a corporation for US federal income tax purposes) organised under the laws of the United States. The summary does not address tax consequences that may vary with, or are contingent on, the particular circumstances of any Infast Shareholder. In addition, it does not address any non-income tax or any foreign, state or local tax consequences that arise in connection with the Offer.
The summary below is intended only as a general guide to the taxation position under United States tax law and does not constitute tax or legal advice. Any Infast Shareholder who is in any doubt as to his taxation position, who is resident or otherwise subject to taxation in a jurisdiction outside the United States, or who requires more detailed information should consult his own independent professional adviser immediately.
The receipt of cash in exchange for Infast Shares under the Offer will be taxable to an Infast Shareholder for US tax purposes. In general, an Infast Shareholder resident in the US for tax purposes will recognise gain or loss in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of cash received and such Infast Shareholder's adjusted tax basis in its Infast Shares.
 
Assuming that the Infast Shares are held as a capital asset, gain or loss generally recognised on the exchange would be capital gain or loss, except to the extent attributable to accrued but unpaid dividends. The character of gain or loss as long-term or short-term capital gain or loss will depend on a number of factors including, the length of time the Infast Shareholder has held its Infast Shares. Generally, if an Infast Shareholder has held its Infast Shares for more than one year, it will recognise a long-term capital gain or loss. In contrast, if an Infast Shareholder has held its Infast Shares for one year or less, it will recognise a short-term capital gain or loss. Long-term capital gains recognised by certain Infast Shareholders who are individuals will generally be subject to a reduced rate of United States federal income tax. A capital gain that is not a long-term capital gain is taxed at ordinary income rates. The deduction of capital losses by non-corporate and corporate shareholders is subject to certain limitations under the Internal Revenue Code.
13. Overseas Shareholders
The attention of Infast Shareholders who are citizens or residents of jurisdictions outside the United Kingdom or the United States or who are holding shares for such citizens or residents and any persons (including, without limitation, any custodian, nominee or trustee) who may have an obligation to forward any document in connection with the Offer outside the United Kingdom or United States is drawn to Section 5(c), 6(c) and 7 of Part B of Appendix I to this document and to the relevant provisions of the Form of Acceptance, which they should read before taking any action.
The availability of the Offer to Infast Shareholders who are not residing in either of the United Kingdom or the United States may be affected by the laws of their relevant jurisdictions. Such persons should inform themselves of, and observe, any applicable legal or regulatory requirements of their jurisdiction. If you remain in any doubt, you should consult your professional adviser in the relevant jurisdiction without delay.
The Offer is not being made, and will not be made, directly or indirectly, in or into Australia, Canada or Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so will violate the laws in that jurisdiction. Accordingly, copies of this document, the Form of Acceptance and any accompanying documents relating to the Offer are not being, and must not be, mailed or otherwise howsoever forwarded, distributed or sent in, into or from Australia, Canada or Japan or any such jurisdiction. Persons receiving such documents (including, without limitation, nominees, trustees and custodians) should observe these restrictions and must not mail or otherwise howsoever forward, distribute or send such documents in, into or from Australia, Canada, Japan or any such other jurisdiction. Doing so may invalidate any related purported acceptance of the Offer.
All Infast Shareholders (including custodians, nominees or trustees) who would, or otherwise intend to, or may have a legal or contractual obligation to, forward this document and/or the Form of Acceptance and/or any related documents to any jurisdiction outside the United Kingdom or the United States, should read further details in this regard, which are contained in Section 7 of Part B of Appendix I to this document before taking any action.
14. US Shareholders
The Offer is open to Infast Shareholders resident in the United States. The Offer is being made by the Offeror for the securities of a non-US company. The Offer is being made in accordance with the requirements of the Code and is subject to disclosure and procedural requirements that are different from those under United States law. Any financial statements included or incorporated in this document may have been prepared in accordance with non-US accounting standards that may not be comparable to the financial statements of US companies.
This document and (in the case of holders of certificated Infast Shares) the accompanying Form of Acceptance contain important information about the Offer. The Offeror urges Infast Shareholders resident in the United States to read this document and (in the case of holders of certificated Infast Shares) the Form of Acceptance in their entirety before any decision is made as to the Offer. The Offeror makes no representation as to the adequacy or fairness of the Offer.
The Offer in the United States is made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
This document has not been reviewed by any federal or state securities commission or regulatory authority in the United States, nor has any such commission or authority passed upon the accuracy or adequacy of this document. Any representation to the contrary is unlawful and may be a criminal offence.
 
This document may contain various forward-looking statements'' within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act and Section 21E of the Exchange Act relating to the Offer, Anixter and Infast are subject to risks and uncertainties, including those pertaining to the anticipated benefits to be realised from the proposed acquisition of Infast. The statements can be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology such as believe,'' expects,'' prospects,'' estimated,'' should,'' may'' or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology indicating Anixter's and the Offeror's expectations or beliefs concerning future events. Anixter and the Offeror caution that such statements are qualified by important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements, a number of which are identified in this document. Other factors could also cause actual results to differ materially from expected results included in these statements. These factors include changes in supplier relationships, foreign political, economic and currency risks, risks associated with inventory, commodity price fluctuations and risks associated with the integration of recently acquired companies.
15. Procedure for acceptance of the Offer
This section should be read together with Appendix I to this document and, in respect of certificated Infast Shares, the notes to, and instructions on, the Form of Acceptance which shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and form part of, the terms of the Offer.
Holders of Infast Shares in certificated form (i.e. not in CREST) may only accept the Offer in respect of such Infast Shares by completing and returning the enclosed Form of Acceptance in accordance with the procedure set out in paragraph (i) below. Holders of Infast Shares held in certificated form, but under different designations, should complete a separate Form of Acceptance for each designation.
Holders of Infast Shares in uncertificated form (i.e. in CREST) may only accept the Offer in respect of such Infast Shares by a TTE instruction in accordance with the procedures set out in paragraph (ii) below and, if those shares are held under different member account IDs, should send a separate TTE instruction for each member account ID.
(i) Infast Shares held in certificated form (i.e. not in CREST)
(a) To accept the Offer
To accept the Offer in respect of all of your Infast Shares held in certificated form, you must complete boxes 1, 2 and 4 of the enclosed Form of Acceptance and, if appropriate, boxes 3, 5 and/or 6 of the Form of Acceptance.
To accept the Offer in respect of less than all of your Infast Shares held in certificated form you must insert in box 1 of the Form of Acceptance such lesser number of Infast Shares in respect of which you wish to accept the Offer in accordance with the instructions printed thereon. If you do not insert a number in box 1 of the Form of Acceptance, or if you insert in box 1 a number which is greater than the number of Infast Shares that you hold in certificated form, your acceptance will be deemed to be in respect of all the Infast Shares held by you in certificated form.
If you have any queries as to how to complete the Form of Acceptance, please telephone Capita Registrars on 0870 162 3121 (or +44 (0) 208 639 2157 if telephoning from outside the UK). Additional Forms of Acceptance are available from Capita Registrars on request.
In all cases individuals must sign box 2 of the Form of Acceptance in the presence of a witness, who should also sign in accordance with the instructions printed thereon. Any Infast Shareholder which is a company should execute in the manner described in the Form of Acceptance.
(b) Return of Form of Acceptance
To accept the Offer in respect of Infast Shares in certificated form, you must return a Form of Acceptance duly completed, signed and witnessed. The completed, signed and witnessed Form of Acceptance together with your share certificate(s) for such Infast Shares and/or other document(s) of title, should be returned by post or (during normal business hours only) by hand to Capita Registrars, Corporate Actions, PO Box 166, The Registry, 34 Beckenham Road, Beckenham, Kent BR3 4TH, England A reply-paid envelope (for use within the UK) is enclosed for your convenience. No acknowledgement of receipt of documents will be given.
as soon as possible but in any event so as to be received not later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005.
Any Form of Acceptance received in an envelope postmarked in Canada, Australia or Japan or otherwise appearing to the Offeror or its agents to have been sent from any of these jurisdictions will be deemed, unless otherwise determined by the Offeror in its absolute discretion, not to constitute a
 
valid acceptance of the Offer. For further information for overseas shareholders see paragraph 13 above and Section 7 of Part B of Appendix I to this document.
The Form of Acceptance is issued only to the addressee(s) and the unique designated account printed on it. The Form of Acceptance is a personalised form and is not transferable between different: (i) accounts; or (ii) uniquely designated accounts.
Anixter, the Offeror and Capita Registrars accept no liability for any instructions that do not comply with the conditions set out in this document, the Form of Acceptance and the accompanying materials.
(c) Share certificates not readily available or lost
If your Infast Shares are in certificated form but your share certificate(s) and/or other document(s) of title is/are not readily available or is/are lost, your Form(s) of Acceptance should nevertheless be completed, signed and returned, as stated above, so as to arrive not later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005, together with any share certificate(s) and/or other document(s) of title that you have available, accompanied by a letter stating that the balance will follow or that you have lost one or more of your share certificate(s) and/or document(s) of title. You should then arrange for the relevant share certificate(s) and/or other document(s) of title to be forwarded as soon as possible thereafter. No acknowledgement of receipt of documents will be given. In the case of loss, you should write as soon as possible to Infast's registrars, Capita Registrars, The Registry, 34 Beckenham Road, Beckenham, Kent BR3 4TU, England requesting a letter of indemnity for lost share certificate(s) and/or other document(s) of title which, when completed in accordance with the instructions given, should be returned by post or by hand (during normal business hours only) to Capita Registrars, Corporate Actions, PO Box 166, The Registry, 34 Beckenham Road, Beckenham, Kent BR3 4TH, England as set out in paragraph (b) above.
(d) Validity of Acceptances
Without prejudice to Part B of Appendix I to this document, subject to provisions of the City Code, the Offeror reserves the right to treat as valid in whole or in part any acceptance of the Offer which is not entirely in order or which is not accompanied by the relevant share certificate(s) and/or other document(s) of title. In that event, no payment of cash under the Offer will be made until after the relevant share certificate(s) and/or document(s) of title or indemnity satisfactory to the Offeror have been received.
(ii) Infast Shares held in uncertificated form (that is, in CREST)
(a) General
If your Infast Shares are in uncertificated form, to accept the Offer you should take (or procure the taking of) the action set out below to transfer the Infast Shares in respect of which you wish to accept the Offer to the appropriate escrow balance, specifying Capita IRG Plc (in its capacity as a CREST participant under the Escrow Agent's participant ID referred to below) as the Escrow Agent, as soon as possible
and in any event so that the TTE instruction settles not later than 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005. Please note that settlement cannot take place at weekends or on bank holidays (or other times at which the CREST system is non-operational)  you should therefore ensure you time the input of any TTE instructions accordingly.
The input and settlement of a TTE instruction in accordance with this paragraph (ii) will (subject to satisfying the requirements set out in Part B of Appendix I to this document) constitute an acceptance of the Offer in respect of the number of Infast Shares so transferred to escrow.
Only your CREST sponsor will be able to send the TTE instruction(s) to CRESTCo in relation to your Infast Shares.
If you are a CREST sponsored member, you should refer to your CREST sponsor before taking any action.
After settlement of a TTE instruction, you will not be able to access the Infast Shares concerned in CREST for any transaction or charging purposes. If the Offer becomes or is declared wholly unconditional, the Escrow Agent will transfer the Infast Shares concerned to itself in accordance with Section 6(e) of Part B of Appendix I of this document.
You are recommended to refer to the CREST manual published by CRESTCo for further information on the CREST procedures outlined below.
You should note that CRESTCo does not make available special procedures, in CREST, for any particular corporate action. Normal system timings and limitations will therefore apply in connection
 
with a TTE instruction and its settlement. You should therefore ensure that all necessary action is taken by you (or by your CREST sponsor) to enable a TTE instruction relating to your Infast Shares to settle prior to 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005. In this connection you are referred in particular to those sections of the CREST manual concerning practical limitations of the CREST system and timings.
(b) To accept the Offer
To accept the Offer in respect of Infast Shares held in uncertificated form, you should send (or, if you are a CREST sponsored member, procure that your CREST sponsor sends) a TTE instruction to CRESTCo which must be properly authenticated in accordance with CRESTCo's specifications and which must contain, in addition to the other information that is required for a TTE instruction to settle in CREST, the following details:
The Offeror will make an appropriate announcement if any of the details contained in this paragraph (b) alter for any reason.
(c) Deposits of Infast Shares into, and withdrawals of Infast Shares from, CREST
Normal CREST procedures (including timings) apply in relation to any Infast Shares that are, or are to be, converted from uncertificated to certificated form, or from certificated to uncertificated form, during the course of the Offer (whether any such conversion arises as a result of a transfer of Infast Shares or otherwise). Holders of Infast Shares who are proposing to convert any such Infast Shares are recommended to ensure that the conversion procedures are implemented in sufficient time to enable the person holding or acquiring the Infast Shares as a result of the conversion to take all necessary steps in connection with an acceptance of the Offer (in particular, as regards delivery of share certificate(s) and/or other document(s) of title and/or transfers to an escrow balance as described above) prior to 1.00 p.m. on 17 June 2005).
(d) Validity of acceptances
Holders of Infast Shares in uncertificated form who wish to accept the Offer should note that the TTE instruction will only be a valid acceptance of the Offer as at the relevant closing date if it has settled on or before 1.00 p.m. (London time) on that date. A Form of Acceptance which is received in respect of Infast Shares held in uncertificated form will not constitute a valid acceptance and will be disregarded.
(iii) General
If you are in any doubt as to the procedures for acceptance, please contact Capita Registrars, Corporate Actions, PO Box 166, The Registry, 34 Beckenham Road, Beckenham, Kent BR3 4TH, England or by telephone on 0870 162 3121 (or, if outside the UK, +44 (0) 208 639 2157). You are reminded that, if you are a CREST sponsored member, you should contact your CREST sponsor before taking any action.
 
16. Settlement
Subject to the Offer becoming or being declared unconditional in all respects and save to the extent that the Panel permits any extension of such periods, (except as provided in Section 7 of Part B of Appendix I to this document in the case of certain Infast Shareholders who are not resident in the UK or the United States) settlement of the consideration to which any Infast Shareholder is entitled under the Offer will be effected (i) in the case of acceptances received, complete in all respects, by the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects, within 14 days of such date, or (ii) in the case of acceptances received, complete in all respects, after the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional in all respects but while the Offer remains open for acceptance, within 14 days of such receipt, in the following manner:
(a) Infast Shares in uncertificated form (that is, in CREST)
Where an acceptance relates to Infast Shares in uncertificated form, the cash consideration to which the accepting Infast Shareholder is entitled will be paid by means of a CREST payment in favour of the accepting Infast Shareholder's payment bank in respect of the cash consideration due, in accordance with the CREST payment arrangements. The Offeror reserves the right to settle all or any part of the cash consideration referred to above, for all or any accepting Infast Shareholder(s), in the manner referred to in paragraph (b) below, if, for any reason, it wishes to do so.
(b) Infast Shares in certificated form (that is, not in CREST)
Where an acceptance relates to Infast Shares in certificated form, cheques for cash due will be despatched by first class post (or by such other method as may be approved by the Panel) to accepting Infast Shareholders or their appointed agents (but not in or into Canada, Australia or Japan) at the recipient's risk. All such cash payments will be made in pounds sterling by cheque drawn on a branch of a UK clearing bank.
(c) General
If the Offer does not become or is not declared unconditional in all respects:
All communications, documents and remittances sent by, to, or from Infast Shareholders or their appointed agents will be sent at their own risk.
17. Further information
Your attention is drawn to the further information contained in the Appendices to this document and to the accompanying Form of Acceptance. The Appendices and the Form of Acceptance contain material information which may not be summarised elsewhere in this document.
 
18. Action to be taken
To accept the Offer:
If you have any queries, please contact Capita Registrars on 0870 162 3121 or, from outside the UK, +44 (0) 208 639 2157.
 
PART A: CONDITIONS OF THE OFFER
The Offer is subject to the following conditions:
 
 
 
For the purposes of these conditions, "the Wider Infast Group" means Infast and its subsidiary undertakings, associated undertakings and any other undertakings in which Infast and/or such undertakings (aggregating their interests) have a substantial interest and "the Wider Anixter Group" means Anixter and its subsidiary undertakings, associated undertakings and any other undertakings in which Anixter and/or such undertakings (aggregating their interests) have a substantial interest and, for these purposes, "substantial interest" means a direct or indirect interest in 30 per cent or more of the equity or voting capital of an undertaking and "Disclosed" shall mean fairly disclosed in any of the documents, papers or information made available to the Offeror, any member of the wider Anixter Group or any of the Offeror's financial or legal adviser by Infast and its financial and legal advisers prior to 26 May 2005; or (ii) disclosed by being publicly announced through a Regulatory Information Service prior to 26 May 2005; or (iii) disclosed in the annual report and accounts of Infast for the year ended 31 December 2004.
The Offeror reserves the right to waive, in whole or in part, all or any of the conditions other than condition (a).
 
The Offeror shall be under no obligation to waive or treat as satisfied any of conditions (b) to (h) inclusive by a date earlier than the latest date specified above for the satisfaction thereof, notwithstanding that such condition or the other conditions of the Offer may at such earlier date have been waived or satisfied and that there are at such earlier date no circumstances indicating that any such conditions may not be capable of satisfaction. If the Offeror is required by the Panel to make an offer for Infast Shares under the provisions of Rule 9 of the Code, the Offeror may make such alterations to the above conditions, including condition (a), as are necessary to comply with the provisions of that Rule.
The Offer will lapse unless all of the conditions set out above (other than condition (a)) are satisfied or (if capable of waiver) waived or, where appropriate, determined by the Offeror in its opinion to be or to remain satisfied, by midnight on the later of the twenty first day after the First Closing Date and the date which is 21 days after the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional as to acceptances, or such later date as the Offeror may, with the consent of the Panel, decide.
The Offer will lapse if, before 1.00 p.m. (London time) on the later of the First Closing Date or the date on which the Offer becomes or is declared unconditional as to acceptances, the Secretary of State for Trade and Industry announces a reference of the Offer or Acquisition to the Competition Commission.
If the Offer so lapses, the Offer will cease to be capable of further acceptance and the Offeror and accepting Infast Shareholders shall then cease to be bound by Forms of Acceptance and Electronic Acceptances submitted at or before the time when the Offer so lapses.
 
PART B: FURTHER TERMS OF THE OFFER
Except where the context requires otherwise, any reference in this Part B of this Appendix I and in the Form of Acceptance to:
The following further terms apply to the Offer, unless the contrary is expressed or the context requires otherwise.
 
acceptance being a valid acceptance of the Offer that (i) it is received by Capita Registrars on or before 26 July 2005; (ii) the relevant Infast Shareholder shall have applied to withdraw his acceptance of the competing offer but that the Infast Shares to which such withdrawal relates shall not have been released from escrow before 26 July 2005 by the escrow agent to the competing offer; and (iii) the Infast Shares to which the special form of acceptance relates are not transferred to escrow in accordance with the procedure for acceptance set out in the letter from KPMG Corporate Finance contained in Part 2 of this document on or before 26 July 2005, but an undertaking is given that they will be so transferred as soon as possible thereafter. Infast Shareholders wishing to use such forms of acceptance should apply to Capita Registrars on 0870 162 3121 between 9.00 a.m. and 5.00 p.m. on the Business Day preceding 26 July 2005 in order that such special forms can be despatched. Notwithstanding the right to use such special form of acceptance, holders of Infast Shares in uncertificated form may not use a Form of Acceptance (or any other purported acceptance form) for the purpose of accepting the Offer in respect of such shares.
 
and the announcement will specify the percentage of the Infast Shares represented by each of these figures.
 
4. Revised Offer
 
and any such revised Offer represents on the date on which the revision is announced (on such basis as KPMG Corporate Finance may consider appropriate) an improvement (or no diminution) in the value of the consideration or terms offered compared with the consideration or terms previously offered, the benefit of the revised Offer will, subject to Sections 4(c) and (d) and 7 of this Part B of Appendix I, be made available to any Infast Shareholders who have accepted the Offer in its original or previously revised form(s) (each a "Previous Acceptor"). The acceptance by or on behalf of a Previous Acceptor of the Offer in its original or any previously revised form(s) will, subject to Sections 4(c) and (d) and 7 of this Part B of Appendix I, be treated as an acceptance of the Offer as so revised and will also constitute the appointment of any director of the Offeror or any duly authorised representative of KPMG Corporate Finance or any of their respective agents as his/her attorney and/or agent with authority to accept any such revised Offer on behalf of such Previous Acceptor and, if such revised Offer includes alternative forms of consideration, to make on his/her behalf such elections for and/or accept such alternative forms of consideration on his/her behalf in such proportions as such attorney and/or agent in his/her absolute discretion thinks fit, and to execute on behalf of and in the name of such Previous Acceptor all such further documents (if any) and take such further actions (if any) as may be required to give effect to such elections and/or acceptances. In making any such election and/or acceptance, the attorney and/or agent will take into account the nature of any previous elections and/or acceptances made by or on behalf of the Previous Acceptor and such other facts or matters as he/she may reasonably consider relevant. The attorney and/or agent shall not be liable to any Infast Shareholder or other person in making any such election and/or acceptance or in making any determination in respect thereof.
 
and, in order that the desired change of election can be effected, must include:
5. Form Of Acceptance
Each Infast Shareholder by whom, or on whose behalf, any Form of Acceptance is executed and lodged with Capita Registrars, subject to the rights of withdrawal set out in Section 3 of this Part B of Appendix I, irrevocably (so as to bind him/her and his/her personal or legal representatives, heirs, successors and assigns) undertakes, represents, warrants and agrees to and with the Offeror, KPMG Corporate Finance, Capita Registrars and their respective agents to the following effect:
 
 
 
(subject to the Offer becoming unconditional in all respects) Infast or any of its agents, as the case may be, in the exercise of any of the powers and/or appointments and/or authorities hereunder and to fully indemnify and hold harmless each such person against any losses arising therefrom;
6. Electronic Acceptances
Each Infast Shareholder who holds Infast Shares in uncertificated form by whom, or on whose behalf, an Electronic Acceptance is made, subject to the rights of withdrawal set out in Section 3 of this Part B of Appendix I irrevocably (so as to bind him/her and his/her personal or legal representatives, heirs, successors and assigns) undertakes, represents, warrants and agrees to and with the Offeror, KPMG Corporate Finance, Capita Registrars and their respective agents to the following effect that:
 
provided that the warranties and representations above shall be deemed not be given if the Infast Shareholder purports to accept the Offer by sending (or, if a CREST sponsored member, procuring that his CREST sponsor sends a) Restricted Escrow Transfer and a Restricted ESA Instruction pursuant to Section 7(d) of this Part B of Appendix I.
In this Section 6, "Electronic Acceptance Shares" means Infast Shares in uncertificated form referred to in Section 6(a) above in respect of which an accepting Infast Shareholder has not validly withdrawn his acceptance.
 
 
7. Overseas Shareholders
 
behalf of either of them) shall be fully indemnified and held harmless by such overseas person for any such issue, transfer or other taxes or duties or other requisite payments as the Offeror or KPMG Corporate Finance may be required to pay.
If you are an Overseas Person and you are in any doubt about your position, you should consult your professional adviser in the relevant jurisdiction.
 
Each Restricted ESA Instruction must, in order for it to be valid and settle, include the following details:
 
by announcement in the UK through a Regulatory Information Service and an announcement in the United States or in any other appropriate manner, or by paid advertisement in a national newspaper published and circulated in the UK and an announcement made in the United States in such manner as is reasonably calculated to inform US shareholders (in which event such notice shall be deemed to have been sufficiently given, notwithstanding any failure by any such Infast Shareholder(s) to receive or see such notice) and all references in this document to notice or the provision of information in writing by or on behalf of the Offeror shall be construed accordingly.
 
Fair Trading has indicated that the Secretary of State for Trade and Industry intends to refer the Offer or the Acquisition to the Competition Commission under the provisions of the Enterprise Act 2002, or the Secretary of State has made an announcement to the same effect. If the Offer lapses then the Offer will cease to be capable of further acceptance and the Offeror and accepting Infast Shareholders shall then cease to be bound by Forms of Acceptance and Electronic Acceptances submitted at or before the time when the Offer so lapses.
 
 
 
The Offeror was incorporated in England and Wales on 11 April 2005 as Eagerport Limited. The registered office of the Offeror is 1 York Road, Uxbridge, Middlesex UB8 1RN and its registered number is 5419459. The Offeror, a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of Anixter, has a current issued share capital of 1.00 divided into 1 ordinary share of 1.00. The issued share in the Offeror is currently held by Anixter International Limited, a wholly owned indirect subsidiary of Anixter.
The directors of the Offeror are as follows:
Dennis Letham John Dul William Banks
The Offeror was formed for the purpose of making the Offer. Prior to the Initial Announcement, the Offeror had not carried on any business nor entered into any obligation other than in connection with the Offer and the financing to the Offer. The Offeror has not paid any dividends and no accounts have been prepared for the Offeror.
Information on Anixter's trading prospects are detailed in the unaudited quarterly Report of Anixter for the three months ended 1 April 2005 in section D of this Appendix II.
Financial information in respect of Anixter, for at least the last three financial years, has been publicly filed with or furnished to the SEC and Infast Shareholders may obtain this information via the SEC's EDGAR filing systems, accessible from the SEC's website at www.sec.gov
Further information on Anixter can also be found on Anixter's website at www.anixter.com
*A: Audit, C: Compensation, E: Executive, N: Nominating & Governance
The financial and other information on Anixter contained in this Appendix II has been extracted from:
 
Set out below is the unaudited quarterly report of Anixter for the three months ended 1 April 2005 which was released on 26 April 2005.
Anixter International Inc. Reports 46 per cent Increase in First Quarter Income Before Extraordinary Gain on 15 per cent Sales Increase
 Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended April 1, 2005.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 26, 2005
First Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "The 11 percent organic sales growth in the first quarter, exclusive of the foreign exchange effects of a weaker dollar, was in line with our internal expectations. This growth allowed us to increase income before extraordinary gain by 46 percent and to improve operating margins to 4.5 percent in the most recent quarter. The combination of this sales and earnings growth with our strong financial position, including quarter-end cash balances of $167.9 million, puts us in a very good position to pursue further growth opportunities and to enhance shareholder value."
First Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended April 1, 2005, sales of $876.5 million produced net income of $20.4 million, or 51 cents per diluted share. Included in the current year's first quarter sales results were sales of $18.7 million from the June 22, 2004 acquisition of DDI.
In the prior year period, sales of $764.2 million generated income before extraordinary gain of $14.0 million, or 37 cents per diluted share. The year ago first quarter also included an after-tax extraordinary gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share, related to a 1983 matter regarding Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company.
Operating income in the first quarter increased 36 percent to $39.6 million as compared to $29.0 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.5 percent compared to 3.8 percent in the first quarter of 2004.
 
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the first quarter grew at an 11 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for $18.7 million in sales related to the June 2004 acquisition of DDI and $12.9 million for the foreign currency effects of a weaker US dollar. This organic growth rate was in line with our expectations of 8 to 12 percent growth for the year. Day-to-day business was strong throughout the quarter, while larger project business reflected a normal seasonal pattern of starting slow and then building momentum throughout the quarter."
"The organic growth in the quarter was particularly strong in our OEM Supply business which saw 27 percent organic growth after adjusting for the foreign exchange effects of $1.2 million and DDI sales of $18.7 million," continued Grubbs. "The growth with these customers reflects a combination of added SKUs to existing contracts, some new contracts and increased prices. Looking at revenue growth, we believe our strategy of building this business is solidly on track, with revenues in the most recent quarter annualizing to a full year run rate of approximately $475 million."
"Enterprise cabling sales in North America reported nearly 10 percent year-on-year sales gains. While sales rose on a combination of increased demand from both new and existing customers, continued progress in the security market and increased data cabling prices, these gains were offset by weaker major project sales early in the quarter. North American Industrial Wire & Cable sales grew by over 8 percent as a result of a combination of increased demand from existing customers, the addition of new customers and the effects of higher copper prices. An 8 percent year-on-year increase in sales to North American telecom OEMs was also encouraging," said Grubbs.
"In Europe, despite generally weak market conditions in enterprise cabling and specialty wire & cable sales, we still saw sales climb by 20 percent as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "Adjusting for the weaker U.S. dollar impact of $7.1 million, European sales grew by approximately 15 percent as compared to the year ago quarter, with growth in the OEM supply market being a major contributor to growth. In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, where there was little year-on-year currency exchange rate effect, we also saw an 8 percent increase in sales. Latin America reported solid year-on-year sales gains, while Asia had a drop in revenues due to fewer major customer projects in this year's first quarter."
First Quarter Operating Results
"Our first quarter operating results showed continued improvement in our efforts to increase operating margins," said Grubbs. "Our first quarter operating margins of 4.5 percent were the best first quarter operating margins we have reported since prior to the 2001  2003 recession. In North America, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.9 percent as compared to 4.0 percent in the year ago quarter. The improvement reflects a combination of better gross margins on improved sales mix and price increases. In Europe, where strong sales growth and substantial improvements in operating performance in the OEM Supply business were achieved, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 3.6 percent as compared to 3.2 percent in the year ago quarter. Emerging markets reported a slight drop in operating margins from 2.8 percent in the year ago quarter to 2.4 percent in the most recent quarter. The drop in emerging market operating margins reflects a combination of improved margins in Latin America on solid sales growth offset by a drop in operating margins in Asia on reduced sales volumes."
Refinancing and Cash Flow
"During the quarter we took advantage of strong bond market conditions and issued $200 million of 5.95% Senior unsecured notes due March 1, 2015," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President  Finance. "Net proceeds from this bond offering, which totaled $197.6 million, were used to reduce borrowings under our working capital and accounts receivable securitization facilities by a total of approximately $78.0 million. The remainder of the proceeds from the offering have been invested in short-term cash investments and are available for general corporate purposes including the intended call in June 2005 of the remaining $70.0 million of the Company's 7 percent zero coupon convertible notes due June 2020."
"Cash flow provided by operations in the quarter was $7.1 million compared to $10.9 million used in operations in the year ago quarter," continued Letham. "When the cash flow from operations is combined with the refinancing activities in the quarter, we have a net increase in borrowings of $110.1 million from the end of fiscal 2004. This resulted in a debt-to-total capitalization ratio at the end of the first quarter of 40.0 percent as compared to 35.1 percent at the end of fiscal 2004. At the
 
same time cash balances have increased from $53.4 million at the end of fiscal 2004 to $167.9 million at the end of the first quarter of 2005."
Business Outlook
Concluding, Grubbs said, "The trends of the first quarter were positive and, for the most part, as we expected. We anticipate that the improvement in project quotation and booking activity that we saw as the quarter unfolded will lead to a continuation of solid year-over-year sales growth during the next couple of quarters. If these trends continue as expected, we should be in a position to report continuing improvements in earnings along with solid cash flow from operations throughout fiscal 2005. When these gains are combined with our very solid quarter-end financial position, we are in an excellent position to pursue additional organic and strategic growth opportunities."
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and nearly $600 million in inventory, 3) 169 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements indicating the Company's expectations or beliefs concerning future events. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the Company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include changes in supplier relationships, foreign political, economic and currency risks, risks associated with inventory, commodity price fluctuations and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the Company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
Additional information about Anixter is available on the Internet at http://www.anixter.com.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
Sales and Earnings from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes
The Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements set forth in the Anixter Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 31 December 2003 are an integral part of this statement.
 
PART A: AUDITED FINANCIAL INFORMATION
The financial information relating to Infast contained in this Appendix III has been extracted without material adjustment from the published audited accounts of Infast for each of the 3 years ended 31 December 2004. Such information does not constitute statutory accounts within the meaning of Section 240 of the Act. The statutory accounts for the above three years have been delivered to the Registrar of Companies in England and Wales pursuant to Section 242 of the Act. The audit reports in respect of these periods were unqualified and did not contain any statement under Section 237(2) or (3) of the Act. The auditors of Infast for the three years ended 31 December 2004 were Ernst & Young LLP, Chartered Accountants and Registered Auditors, Birmingham. Group'' in this Part A means the Infast Group.
 
CONSOLIDATED PROFIT AND LOSS ACCOUNT
 
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET
 
CONSOLIDATED CASH FLOW STATEMENT
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF TOTAL RECOGNISED GAINS AND LOSSES
 
NOTES TO THE ACCOUNTS
The accounts have been prepared in accordance with applicable accounting standards under the historical cost convention.
The Group accounts include the accounts of the Parent Company and all its subsidiary undertakings, all of which are drawn up to 31December 2004.
st
Subsidiaries acquired during the year are accounted for under the acquisition method of accounting, and are consolidated from the date of acquisition. Subsidiaries disposed of during the year are consolidated up to the date of disposal.
Transactions and balances between subsidiary undertakings have been eliminated; no profit is taken on sales between subsidiary undertakings until the products are sold to customers outside the Group.
Goodwill representing the excess of the consideration over the fair value of the separable net assets acquired, arising on the acquisition of subsidiary undertakings prior to 1 January 1998, has been written off against reserves in the year in which it arose. Goodwill eliminated in this way is charged to the Profit and Loss Account on any subsequent disposal of the business to which it is related. Goodwill previously eliminated against reserves has not been reinstated.
st
Goodwill arising on the acquisition of subsidiary undertakings since 1January 1998 is capitalised in the Group Balance Sheet and amortised over its useful economic life up to a maximum of twenty years. It is reviewed for impairment at the end of the first full financial year following the acquisition and in other periods if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be recoverable.
st
As permitted by Section 230 of the Companies Act 1985, the Company has not presented its Profit and Loss account. The loss for the financial year dealt with in the accounts of Infast amounts to 4.5m (2003: loss 2.1m, 2002: profit 1.9m).
Expenditure on research and development is written off as it is incurred.
Properties are stated at cost to the Group and depreciation is provided on a straight-line basis at the following rates:
Leasehold properties  over the life of the lease for short-term leasehold property and fifty years for long leasehold property.
Freehold buildings  at 2 per cent per annum.
These assets are stated at cost to the Group and are depreciated on a straight-line basis over their anticipated useful lives, at annual rates varying between 10 per cent and 33 /per cent for plant and equipment and 20 per cent and 50 per cent for motor vehicles.
1
3
The carrying values of tangible fixed assets are reviewed for impairment if events or changes in circumstances indicate the carrying values may not be recoverable.
Assets held under finance leases and hire purchase contracts are capitalised at the fair value of the asset at the inception of the lease, with an equivalent liability categorised as appropriate under creditors due within and after more than one year.
The interest element of the rental obligations is charged to the Profit and Loss account over the period of the lease and represents a constant proportion of the balance of the capital repayments outstanding.
Rentals under operating leases are charged to the Profit and Loss account on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
 
Stocks are valued at the lower of cost and net realisable value. Cost consists of direct materials, labour, and where appropriate, production overheads.
Turnover represents the value of goods and services supplied to customers, excluding value added tax and transactions within the Group.
For defined contribution schemes, employers' contributions are written off to the Profit and Loss account as incurred. In the case of defined benefit schemes, contributions are charged to the Profit and Loss account so as to spread the costs of pensions over employees' working lives with their employers. Contributions are determined by qualified actuaries on the basis of regular valuations.
Corporation tax is provided on taxable profits at the rate ruling for the accounting year.
Deferred taxation is recognised in respect of all timing differences that have originated but not reversed at the Balance Sheet date where transactions or events have occurred at that date that will result in an obligation to pay more, or a right to pay less, or to receive more tax, with the following exceptions:
Deferred tax is measured on an undiscounted basis at the tax rates that are expected to apply in the periods in which the timing differences reverse, based on tax rates and laws enacted or substantively enacted at the Balance Sheet date.
Assets and liabilities recorded in foreign currencies are translated into sterling at the rates ruling at the end of the year. Exchange movements arising from the retranslation of the net investment in overseas subsidiary undertakings are disclosed as movements on reserves.
Exchange movements relating to borrowings which have been used to finance or provide a hedge against foreign equity investments are taken to reserves to the extent that they are matched by exchange movements on those investments, together with the taxation thereon.
All other profits or losses arising from exchange movements have been dealt with in the Profit and Loss account.
Trading results of overseas subsidiaries are translated into sterling at average exchange rates for the year.
k.      Financial instruments
The Group uses a combination of foreign currency borrowings to hedge foreign currency denominated assets and forward contracts to manage known trading exposures. Forward contracts are accounted for as hedges at the inception of contracts. As a result, gains and losses on foreign exchange contracts are offset against the foreign exchange gains and losses on the related financial assets and liabilities. Gains or losses arising on hedging instruments which are cancelled due to the termination of underlying exposure are taken to the Profit and Loss account immediately. Finance costs associated with debt issuances are charged to the Profit and Loss account over the life of the instruments.
The Group has taken advantage of the exemption available to exclude short term debtors and creditors from its derivatives and financial instrument disclosures.
 
4.1m of the Goodwill at the year end relates to a business acquired in the USA (2003: 4.7m, 2002: 5.5m). The remainder relates to the acquisition of a business in the UK. After adjusting for goodwill which relates to continuing operations, capital employed of 49.9m (2003: 53.7m, 2002: 52.9m) relates to the UK and 7.7m (2003: 8.2m, 2002: 8.5m) to North America.
0.3m of goodwill amortised in the year relates to the business acquired in the USA (2003: 0.3m, 2002: 0.3m), the remainder relates to the acquisition of a business in the UK. The operating exceptional items relates to businesses in the UK. Therefore operating profit of 2.6m (2003: 1.5m, 2002: 4.8m) originated from the UK and an operating loss of 0.7m (2003: nil, 2002: loss of 0.6m) from North America.
Turnover, operating profit and capital employed all relate to the Company's sole activity of the provision of inventory management services.
 
Non-audit fees paid to auditors in the UK in 2004 amounted to 60,501 (2003: 63,816, 2002 109,562).
There was an operating cash outflow in respect of the 2004 charge of 0.3m. The 2003 charge gave rise to an operating cash outflow of 0.2m in 2003 and 0.2m in 2004.
 
4. Exceptional items (continued)
The charge in 2004 relates to the Company's decision to exit from its manufacturing operations which is now completed, consequently these operations are shown as discontinued in these accounts. There was a net cash outflow of 1.5m relating to this charge in the year. During 2002, an amount of 1.3m was provided against a fixed asset investment which represented an initial loan of $3.4m to Haden International Group, Inc. The loan was made in respect of the disposal of the Process Engineering division in 1999. There was no cash flow effect of this provision.
5. Employee costs
All employees are involved in the provision of inventory management services.
6. Net interest
 
7. Taxation on profit on ordinary activities
a. (Credit)/charge:
Included within the tax charge are the following amounts of tax arising on sale or closures of businesses:
The tax credit of 1.3m (2003: charge 0.2m, 2002: charge 1.2m) includes a tax credit of 0.1m (is stated net of a tax credit of: 2003: 0.1m, 2002: nil) relating to operating exceptional costs incurred during the year of 0.4m (2003: 0.4m, 2002: nil).
The effective tax rate, excluding goodwill amortisation and realisation, was 28% (2003: 9%, 2002: 27%).
b. Reconciliations of current tax charge
Disallowed expenses above relate to goodwill amortisation and realisation.
 
7. Taxation on profit on ordinary activities (continued)
c. Factors affecting future tax charges
Based on current capital investment plans, the Company expects to be able to broadly balance claims of capital allowances to depreciation in future years.
Tax losses in the UK with a value of 0.1m (2003: nil, 2002: 0.2m) and in the US of 0.3m (2003: 0.1m, 2002: nil) have not been recognised as their use is not currently certain.
8. Dividends
9. Loss/earnings per share
The calculation of basic loss per share of 10.6p (2003: basic earnings 0.7p, 2002: basic earnings 0.6p) is based on the Group loss after tax of 12.1m (2003: profit 0.8m, 2002: profit 0.7m) and on the weighted average number of 20p ordinary shares in issue during the year of 114.3m (2003: 114.3m, 2002: 114.3m).
The calculation of diluted loss per share of 10.6p (2003: earnings of 0.7p, 2002: earnings of 0.6p) is based on the Group loss after tax of 12.1m (2003: profit 0.8m, 2002: profit 0.7m) and 114.4m (2003: 114.6m, 2002: 114.3m) ordinary shares as shown below:
 
9. Loss/earnings per share (continued)
Adjusted basic earnings per share is calculated as follows:
The adjusted basic earnings per share is presented so as to show more clearly the underlying performance of the Group for continuing operations.
10. Intangible fixed assets
 
10. Intangible fixed assets (continued)
 
11. Tangible fixed assets
 
11. Tangible fixed assets (continued)
12. Fixed asset investments
 
12. Fixed asset investments (continued)
Other investments
Other investments for the Group relate to the advance of a loan of $4.4m (including rolled up interest) to Haden International Group, Inc.
13. Stocks
14. Debtors
The pension cost prepayment of 0.4m (2003: 0.4m, 2002: 0.4m) represents the difference between the pension cost and the amount funded on the defined benefit HMH pension scheme, as such it will be utilised over a period greater than one year.
 
15. Creditors: amounts falling due within one year
16. Creditors: amounts falling due after more than one year
 
17. Provisions for liabilities and charges (continued)
The provision held in respect of disposals relates to closure and sale costs and is expected to be spent in 2005.
The Group deferred taxation liability consists of the following:
18. Reserves
 
18. Reserves (continued)
The cumulative amount of goodwill written off resulting from acquisitions (adjusted for disposals and other goodwill adjustments) between 1 January 1987 and 31December 1997 is approximately 22.3m (2003: 29.8m, 2002: 29.8m). The amount of goodwill written off prior to this date is not readily determinable but is not considered material.
st
st
Goodwill arising on acquisitions since 1January 1998 has been capitalised in the Group balance sheet.
st
19. Reconciliation of movements in equity shareholders' funds
20. Analysis of net debt
 
20. Analysis of net debt (continued)
Debt falls due as shown in the table below:
The non cash movement represents the inception of finance leases.
The none cash movement represents the inception of finance leases.
Debt falls due as shown in the table below:
The non cash movement represents the inception of finance leases.
 
20. Analysis of net debt (continued)
Debt falls due as shown in the table below:
All of the Group's borrowings, excluding hire purchase debt, are on an unsecured basis. The finance lease debt is secured on the assets to which it relates (Note 11).
All of the financial liabilities detailed above are sterling denominated and bear a variable rate of interest, based on the bank's base rate, except for:
The Group's only financial asset, at the end of the year, which was non-sterling denominated was a US dollar denominated loan to Haden International Group, Inc., which is repayable over the period January 2005 to July 2008. The carrying value of the loan at 31December 2004 was 0.7m (2003: 0.8m, 2002: 1.0m). The gross value of the loan bears interest at a weighted average fixed rate of 14%.
st
As permitted under FRS 13 short term debtors and creditors have been excluded from the above analysis.
The Group's US dollar denominated net assets are broadly matched by the US dollar denominated loan and bank overdraft. The Group's exposure to foreign exchange risk as at 31December 2004 is considered immaterial.
st
As at 31December 2004 the market values of the financial assets and liabilities referred to above were not materially different to book value based on prevailing interest rates and the security offered. A 1% movement in interest rates would have an immaterial effect on the aggregate fair values of these financial assets and liabilities.
st
The Group's borrowing facilities available as at 31December 2004 in respect of which all conditions precedent had been met were as follows:
st
Of the available facilities 4.9m of the uncommitted facilities was undrawn at 31December 2004 (2003: 7.8m, 2002: 4.3m).
st
 
21. Reconciliation of net cash flow to movement in net debt
22. Reconciliation of operating profit to net cash inflow from operating activities
23. Major non cash transactions
During the year the Group entered into finance lease purchase arrangements in respect of assets with a total value at the inception of the leases of 1.8m (2003: 0.4m, 2002: 0.7m).
 
24. Commitments
Capital Commitments
Operating Lease Commitments
The Group leases a number of properties and certain items of plant and equipment under operating leases. The minimum annual rentals under these leases are as follows:
There are no other contracted capital commitments.
25. Contingent Liabilities
The Company has guaranteed certain facilities, including those of HSBC Bank plc, granted to subsidiary undertakings in the normal course of trade.
The Company has guaranteed the liabilities of Haden International Group, Inc. (HIG), the purchaser of the Group's Process Engineering division in 1999, under the terms of the lease of its main operating facility. The annual rentals payable under the lease are approximately $1.5m. Funds amounting to $1.8m (that the parties have agreed will rise to $3m by the end of 2005) are currently held in escrow for use by the Company in the event that HIG fails to meet its obligations under the lease.
 
 
The following table sets out the Closing Price for Infast Shares as derived from the Daily Official List on:
For the purposes of this Appendix IV:
 
(a) Interests in Infast Shares
 
Each of the Infast Directors has delivered an undertaking (each an ) to the Offeror and Anixter pursuant to which each Infast Director has irrevocably undertaken: (i) to accept or procure the acceptance of the Offer in respect of all the Infast Shares (if any) in which he has an interest on the date of the Irrevocable Undertaking, and any Infast Shares in which he might thereafter have an interest; and (ii) not to exercise the votes or the rights attaching to the Infast Shares held by him, (if any) other than in a manner consistent with the consummation of the Offer. The Irrevocable Undertakings will cease to be binding if the Offer lapses or is withdrawn. These undertakings cover any Infast Shares issued on the exercise of options while the Offer remains open for acceptance.
"Irrevocable Undertaking"
The following table shows the number of Infast Shares in which each of the Infast Directors had an interest on the date of the Irrevocable Undertaking given by him, and in respect of which an Irrevocable Undertaking was given:
In addition, the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer in respect of holdings comprising, in aggregate, 43,864,164 Infast Shares and representing approximately 38.36 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast
 
which will remain binding unless an offer is made or announced by a third party at a level which represents an improvement of 10 per cent or greater in the value of the Offer Price from the following:
In addition, the Offeror and Anixter have received an irrevocable undertaking to procure acceptance of the Offer from UBS Global Asset Management (UK) Limited in respect of 13,962,352 Infast Shares and representing approximately 12.21 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast which will remain binding unless an offer is made or announced by a third party at a level which represents an improvement of 5 per cent or greater in the value of the Offer Price.
The Offeror and Anixter have also received a non binding letter of intent to accept the Offer from Societe Generale Asset Management UK Limited in relation to 7,085,000 Infast Shares it manages representing 6.20 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
In total, therefore the Offeror and Anixter have received irrevocable undertakings to accept (or procure acceptance of) the Offer and a non binding letter of intent, from Infast Shareholders in respect of 67,116,162 Infast Shares representing approximately 58.70 per cent of the entire existing issued ordinary share capital of Infast.
(a) Executive Directors
Robert P Sternick
Robert Sternick is employed by Infast as Chief Executive Officer pursuant to the terms of a service agreement dated 25 April 2001. His period of employment commenced on 14 May 2001. Robert Sternick's service agreement is terminable by 12 months' written notice given by either party, or in the case of Infast immediately with the payment of salary and benefits in lieu of notice. Infast may also terminate Robert Sternick's employment forthwith without notice or payment in lieu in certain circumstances (serious or persistent breach of the terms of his service agreement, serious negligence or gross misconduct in the performance of his duties, conduct bringing himself or Infast into disrepute, conviction of an arrestable criminal offence (other than a road traffic offence for which a non-custodial penalty is imposed), he is adjudged bankrupt or makes any arrangement or composition with his creditors or has an interim order made against him pursuant to section 252 of the Insolvency Act 1986, he becomes incapable by reason of mental disorder of discharging his duties, he becomes prohibited by law from being a director, he voluntarily resigns as a director of Infast, he causes any agreement entered into by Infast relating to the provision of his services to be terminated without notice by any other party to such agreement, or he becomes unfit to perform his duties following a medical examination (conducted pursuant to the terms of the service agreement)). Robert Sternick's salary was originally 180,000 per annum inclusive of any directors' fees, subject to review on 1 January each year. Robert Sternick's current salary is 230,000. The Executive Directors' Incentive Plan 2005 gives Robert Sternick a potential maximum bonus of 60% of his salary based on divisional performance plus a further 10% based on half year, full year, divisional and group performance; no bonus was paid for the year ended 31 December 2004. He is also entitled to be granted options over Infast Shares, details of which are contained in paragraph 4 of this Appendix IV.
Robert Sternick is entitled to join the Director's Section of the Infast Money Purchase Pension Scheme, subject to its terms and a retirement age of 60. Robert Sternick may at his sole option and upon giving the Company 9 months' written notice prior to his 60th birthday, postpone his retirement age to a date not later than his 63rd birthday. Infast's contributions to his fund in the pension scheme shall not be less that 35% of his salary. He has death in service cover of four times his annual salary. Robert Sternick is provided with private medical expenses insurance for himself, his spouse and his children under the age of 18 years or who continue in full time education beyond the age of 18 years. Robert Sternick has membership of Infast's permanent health insurance scheme. He is entitled to be paid his salary during any periods of absence from work due to sickness, injury or
 
other incapacity up to a maximum of 26 weeks in any 52 week period. If he is absent from work due to sickness, injury or other incapacity for a continuous period of 26 weeks or more then he is entitled to receive such benefits (if any) as are available to him under the permanent health insurance scheme or (if no such sums are available) such sum as the board may in its absolute discretion decide. He has the benefit of a car (with a value of up to 50,000). He is entitled to be reimbursed by Infast for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred by him in the performance of his duties. He is entitled to 25 working days' paid holiday in each calendar year (in addition to the usual public and bank holidays). Robert Sternick will be subject to certain restrictive covenants for a period of six or twelve months upon termination of his service agreement.
Michael Jonathan Francis Parker
Jon Parker is employed by Infast as an Executive Director and Group Company Secretary pursuant to the terms of a service agreement dated 26 October 2000. The commencement date of his employment was deemed to be 20 June 1994. Jon Parker's service agreement is terminable by 12 months' written notice given by either party. Infast may also terminate his employment forthwith without notice or payment in lieu in certain circumstances (serious or persistent breach of the terms of his service agreement, serious negligence or gross misconduct in the performance of his duties, conduct bringing himself or Infast into disrepute, conviction of an arrestable criminal offence (other than a road traffic offence for which a non-custodial penalty is imposed), he is adjudged bankrupt or makes any arrangement or composition with his creditors or has an interim order made against him pursuant to section 252 of the Insolvency Act 1986, he becomes incapable by reason of mental disorder of discharging his duties, he becomes prohibited by law from being a director, he voluntarily resigns as a director of Infast, he causes any agreement entered into by Infast relating to the provision of his services to be terminated without notice by any other party to such agreement, or he becomes unfit to perform his duties following a medical examination (conducted pursuant to the terms of the service agreement)). Jon Parker's salary was originally 80,000 per annum inclusive of any directors' fees, subject to review on 1 January each year. Jon Parker's current salary is 110,000. The Executive Directors' Incentive Plan 2005 gives Jon Parker a potential maximum bonus of 60% of his salary based on divisional performance plus a further 10% based on half year, full year, divisional and group performance; no bonus was paid for the year ended 31 December 2004. Details of Jon Parker's share options are contained in paragraph 4 of this Appendix IV.
Jon Parker is entitled to remain a member of the Director's Section of the Infast Money Purchase Pension Scheme, subject to its terms and rules and a retirement age of 60. Infast's contributions to Jon Parker's fund in this scheme is not less that 35% of his salary from time to time. Jon Parker is provided with private medical expenses insurance for himself, his spouse and his children under the age of 18 years or who continue in full time education beyond the age of 18 years. Jon Parker has membership of Infast's permanent health insurance scheme. He is entitled to be paid his salary during any periods of absence from work due to sickness, injury or other incapacity up to a maximum of 26 weeks in any 52 week period. If he is absent from work due to sickness, injury or other incapacity for a continuous period of 26 weeks or more then he is entitled to receive such benefits (if any) as are available to him under the permanent health insurance scheme or (if no such sums are available) such sum as the board may in its absolute discretion decide. He has elected to receive a car allowance of 12,500 per annum plus private fuel in lieu of a car. He is entitled to be reimbursed by Infast for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred by him in the performance of his duties. He is entitled to 25 working days' paid holiday in each calendar year (in addition to the usual public and bank holidays). Jon Parker will be subject to certain restrictive covenants for a periods of six or twelve months upon termination of his service agreement.
John Robert Kimber
John Kimber is employed by Infast as Finance Director pursuant to the terms of a service agreement dated 7 October 1997. The commencement date of his employment was deemed to be 9 March 1987. John Kimber's service agreement is terminable by 12 months' written notice given by either party, or in the case of Infast immediately with the payment of salary and benefits in lieu of notice. Infast may also terminate the employment forthwith without notice or payment in lieu in certain circumstances (serious or persistent breach of the terms of his service agreement, serious negligence or gross misconduct in the performance of his duties, conduct bringing himself or Infast into disrepute, his conviction of an arrestable criminal offence (other than a road traffic offence for which a non-custodial penalty is imposed), he is adjudged bankrupt or makes any arrangement or composition with his creditors or has an interim order made against him pursuant to section 252 of the Insolvency Act 1986, he becomes incapable by reason of mental disorder of discharging his duties, he becomes
 
prohibited by law from being a director, he voluntarily resigns as a director of Infast, he causes any agreement entered into by Infast relating to the provision of his services to be terminated without notice by any other party to such agreement, or he becomes unfit to perform his duties following a medical examination (conducted pursuant to the terms of the service agreement)). John Kimber's salary was originally 110,000 per annum inclusive of any directors' fees and is subject to review on 1 January each year. John Kimber's current salary is 164,000. The Executive Directors' Incentive Plan 2005 gives John Kimber a potential maximum bonus of 60% of his salary, based on divisional performance, plus a further 10% based on half year, full year, divisional and group performance; no bonus was paid for the year ended 31 December 2004. Details of John Kimber's share options are contained in paragraph 4 of this Appendix IV.
John Kimber is entitled to remain a member of the Director's Section of the HMH Pension Scheme, a defined benefit scheme which will provide one sixtieth of final salary, per year of service, on retirement. John Kimber is provided with private medical expenses insurance for himself and his children under the age of 18 years or who continue in full time education beyond the age of 18 years. John Kimber has membership of Infast's permanent health insurance scheme. He is entitled to be paid his salary during any periods of absence from work due to sickness, injury or other incapacity up to a maximum of 26 weeks in any 52 week period. If he is absent from work due to sickness, injury or other incapacity for a continuous period of 26 weeks or more then he is entitled to receive such benefits (if any) as are available to him under the terms of the permanent health insurance scheme or (if no such sums are available) such sum as the board may in its absolute discretion decide. He has the benefit of a car. He is entitled to be reimbursed by Infast for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred by him in the performance of his duties. He is entitled to 25 working days' paid holiday in each calendar year (in addition to the usual public and bank holidays). John Kimber will be subject to certain restrictive covenants for a period of six or twelve months upon termination of his service agreement.
(b) Non-Executive Directors
Richard Seguin
Richard Seguin was appointed as a non-executive director of Infast by a letter of appointment dated 7 January 2003. His appointment took effect from 13 January 2003 for an initial period of 3 years, renewable at the option of Infast. His duties are those of a non-executive director of a listed public company, including attendance of board meetings and those of the remuneration, nomination and audit committees. Richard Seguin receives a fee of 25,000 per annum, subject to review biennially on 1 January. The first review took place on 1 January 2005 and it was decided that there would be no increase in Richard Seguin's fees. He is entitled to reclaim any travelling and similar expenses. Richard Seguin is entitled to be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred in seeking and obtaining independent professional advice in furtherance of his duties as a director where it would be inappropriate to seek advice from Infast's own advisers. The appointment may be terminated by six months' notice by either party. Additionally, Infast has the right to terminate the appointment immediately in certain circumstances (disqualification from being a public company director, unable to perform his duties through incapacity, conviction of a criminal offence (other than minor road traffic offences) or gross breach of duty).
Anthony G Bruce
Tony Bruce was appointed as a non-executive director of Infast by letter dated 12 March 1997. His appointment took effect from 1 April 1997. His duties are those of a non-executive director of a listed public company, including attending board meetings and those of the remuneration and other committees. Tony Bruce receives a fee of 25,000 per annum in respect of his position as a non-executive director plus 8,000 as compensation for his duties as the Chairman of the Audit Committee. Both elements of these fees are subject to review biennially on 1 January, the first review having taken place on 1 January 1999. The most recent review took place on 1 January 2005, where it was decided that there would be no increase in Tony Bruce's fees. He is entitled to reclaim any travelling and similar expenses incurred on Infast's business. The appointment may be terminated by six months' notice by either party. Additionally, Infast has the right to terminate the appointment immediately in certain circumstances (disqualification from being a public company director, unable to perform his duties through incapacity, conviction of a criminal offence (other than minor road traffic offences) or gross breach of duty).
 
D Graham Titcombe
Graham Titcombe was appointed as non-executive chairman of Infast by letter dated 4 July 2002. His appointment took effect from 24 September 2002 for an initial period of 3 years, renewable at the option of Infast. His duties are those of a non-executive chairman of a listed public company, including chairing board meetings, attending meetings of the remuneration, nomination and audit committees, as well as the company's annual general meetings and any extraordinary general meetings. Graham Titcombe receives a fee of 75,000 per annum which is subject to review biennially on 1 January, the first review having taken place on 1 January 2003. The most recent review took place on 1 January 2005, where it was decided that there would be no increase in Graham Titcombe's fees. He is entitled to reclaim any travelling and similar expenses incurred on Infast's business, together with a right to seek independent legal advice at Infast's expense. The appointment may be terminated by six months' notice by either party. Additionally, Infast has the right to terminate the appointment immediately in certain circumstances (disqualification from being a public company director, unable to perform his duties through incapacity, conviction of a criminal offence (other than minor road traffic offences) or gross breach of duty).
Save as disclosed herein:
 
(d) Resignation and compensation arrangements with Non Executive Infast Directors
 
Full acceptance of the Offer (and assuming the exercise of all options capable of exercise in accordance with the performance conditions subject to which they were issued pursuant to the Infast Share Option Schemes) would result in a maximum cash consideration of approximately 39.47 million being payable by the Offeror to Infast Shareholders. The total consideration will be paid out of existing cash resources of the Offeror. KPMG Corporate Finance is satisfied that sufficient cash resources are available to the Offeror to satisfy the maximum cash consideration payable on full acceptance of the Offer.
8. Inducement Fee Agreement
Pursuant to a letter dated 25 April 2005 from Infast to Anixter and in consideration of Anixter making preparations for the Offer, it was agreed that an inducement fee would be payable by Infast to Anixter on any of the following events (each a ):
"Payment Event"
The amount of the break fee depends on the date of the Payment Event and is subject to a minimum of 64,795 and a maximum of 388,772 (inclusive of any irrecoverable VAT).
 
 
 
Copies of the following documents are available for inspection during normal business hours on any weekday (public holidays excepted) at the offices of Baker & McKenzie, 100 New Bridge Street, London, EC4V 6JA, while the Offer remains open for acceptance:
27 May 2005
 
The following definitions apply throughout this document unless the context requires otherwise:
 
 
All times referred to are London time unless otherwise stated.
In this document and in the accompanying Form of Acceptance all references to statutes or other forms of legislation shall, unless otherwise stated, be to statutes or forms of legislation of the United Kingdom.
The terms "subsidiary" and "subsidiary undertaking" as used in these definitions shall have the meanings given by the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050712152942.txt.gz
TIME:20050712152942
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
On July 8, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") declared its tender offer to purchase the shares of Infast Group plc, ("Infast"), a U.K.-based distributor of fasteners and other "C" class inventory components to OEMs (the "Offer"), "wholly unconditional." The cash offer price of 34 pence per share (approximately $72 million) for the shares was subject, among other things, to the Company receiving 90% of the stock through the tender offer, which conditions were met. The Company has replaced the Infast directors with its own appointees effective July 8, 2005. The Company's press releases issued in the United States and United Kingdom are attached as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release issued in United States, dated July 11, 2005, issued by Anixter International Inc. 99.2 Press Release issued in United Kingdom, dated July 8, 2005, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today issued the following comments with respect to announcements made on July 8, 2005 regarding its offer for the shares of Infast Group plc ("Infast").
GLENVIEW, IL, July 11, 2005 
As of July 8, 2005 Anixter's offer for the shares of Infast became wholly unconditional. Anixter announced on July 6, 2005 that at 1.00 p.m. (London time) on July 5, 2005, acceptances of the offer had been received with respect to 95.22 percent of the outstanding shares of Infast. On July 8, 2005 the incumbent directors of Infast resigned and they were replaced with a board of directors comprised of Anixter executives. Anixter has also begun the process of delisting the shares of Infast. At this time the offer remains open for further acceptances with regard to the Infast shareholders that had not yet accepted the offer. At an appropriate future date Anixter will exercise its rights under sections 428 to 430F (inclusive) of the UK Companies Act 1985 to compulsorily acquire any remaining Infast shares from holders that have not accepted the offer. Financial results of Infast will be reported with those of Anixter beginning with the third quarter of 2005.
Commenting on the offer, Bob Grubbs, President and CEO of Anixter, said, "We are pleased that we were successful with our offer for the shares of Infast. We believe it is an important addition to that portion of our business which supplies fasteners and other small parts to original equipment manufacturers. With the addition of Infast we will have projected annual sales in the OEM Supply market of approximately $750 million per year."
"When our capabilities in the OEM Supply market in the US and the UK are combined with our global distribution capabilities, we think we are in a unique position to serve the needs of our growing customer list, wherever and whenever our customers require support. We have a significant amount of work in front of us to ensure that the acquisitions of the past couple of years come together in a way that allows our customers to enjoy consistent and seamless world class service from all of our OEM Supply operations. We are confident that the capabilities, skills and dedication of the employees throughout the various acquired companies will allow us to be successful in meeting our customers' needs," commented Grubbs.
"Our goal is to continue to build the Anixter Fasteners
sm
name into a world class brand that is recognized by customers and suppliers as being the best and most cost effective supply chain solution for procurement or deployment of fasteners and other small parts in support of manufacturing operations," said Grubbs.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 275,000 products and nearly $600 million in inventory, 3) 169 warehouses with more than 4.6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 200 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.

EXHIBIT 99.2
Immediate Release 8 July 2005
This announcement is not for release, publication or distribution in or into Canada, Australia or Japan.
Further to the announcement on 6 July 2005 by Eagerport Limited (the "Offeror") that the Offer had become unconditional as to acceptances, the Offeror announces that all of the remaining conditions of the Offer have now either been satisfied or waived. Accordingly, the Offer has been declared unconditional in all respects and will remain open for acceptance until further notice.
As stated in the Offer Document, it is the Offeror's intention to procure that Infast applies to the UK Listing Authority for cancellation of the listing of the Infast Shares on the Official List and to the London Stock Exchange for cancellation of trading of Infast Shares on the London Stock Exchange's market for listed securities. It is anticipated that cancellation of Infast's listing and admission to trading will take effect no earlier than 8 August 2005. De-listing is likely to reduce significantly the liquidity and marketability of any Infast Shares in respect of which the Offer has not been accepted.
Infast Shareholders who have not yet accepted the Offer, and who wish to do so, should accept the Offer as soon as possible. The procedures for acceptance of the Offer are set out on pages 14 to 16 of the Offer Document and in respect of certificated holders only, in the Form of Acceptance. Additional copies of the Offer Document and Form of Acceptance can be obtained from Capita Registrars (telephone 0870 162 3121, or +44 (0) 208 639 2157 if telephoning from outside the UK).
Terms defined in the Offer Document dated 27 May 2005 have the same meaning in this announcement save where the context requires otherwise.
Enquiries:
KPMG Corporate Finance, a division of KPMG LLP which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Services Authority for investment business activities, is acting for Anixter and the Offeror as financial adviser in relation to the Offer and is not acting for any other person in relation to the Offer. KPMG Corporate Finance will not be responsible to anyone other than Anixter and the Offeror for providing the protections afforded to its clients or for providing advice in relation to the contents of this announcement or any transaction or arrangement referred to herein.
This announcement does not constitute an offer or invitation to purchase any securities or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, pursuant to the Offer or otherwise. The Offer is being made solely pursuant to the Offer Document and the Form of Acceptance accompanying the Offer Document, which contain the full terms and conditions of the Offer, including details of how the Offer may be accepted.
The Offer is not being made, directly or indirectly, in or into, or by use of the mails of, or by any means or instrumentality (including, without limitation, facsimile transmission, electronic mail, telex or telephone) of interstate or foreign commerce of, or any facilities of a national securities exchange of Canada, Australia, Japan or any jurisdiction where to do so would violate the laws in that jurisdiction and the Offer will not be capable of acceptance by any such use, means, instrumentality or facility, directly or indirectly from or within Canada, Australia, Japan or any such jurisdiction.
The Offer in the United States is being made solely by the Offeror, and neither KPMG LLP, KPMG Corporate Finance, nor any of its respective affiliates, is making the Offer in the United States.
The members of the Anixter Offer Committee accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement. To the best of the knowledge and belief of the members of the Anixter Offer Committee (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case), the information contained in this announcement for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.
The Offeror Directors, accept responsibility for the information contained in this announcement relating to the Offeror, the Offeror Directors and their immediate families and persons connected with them (within the meaning of section 346 of the Act). To the best of the knowledge and belief of the Offeror Directors (who have taken all reasonable care to ensure that such is the case), the information contained in this announcement for which they accept responsibility is in accordance with the facts and does not omit anything likely to affect the import of such information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20050728161654.txt.gz
TIME:20050728161654
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 26, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended July 1, 2005. The Company's press release, dated July 26, 2005 is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated July 26, 2005 issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended July 1, 2005.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 26, 2005 
Second Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "In the most recent quarter, we again saw good, broad-based organic growth. An increase in larger project volume and strong growth in the OEM Supply market were significant contributors. The solid organic growth we experienced in the current quarter generated a significant increase in earnings over the prior year, which again put us in the position of reporting improved operating margins. The trends underlying our organic growth appear to remain intact. Assuming these trends continue, then with the acquisition of Infast we should be well positioned for continued growth."
Second Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended July 1, 2005, sales of $936.1 million produced net income of $24.4 million, or 61 cents per diluted share. Included in the current year's second quarter results were sales of $18.7 million from DDI, which was acquired on June 22, 2004. Second quarter net income and diluted earnings per share contain an after-tax charge of $0.7 million, or 2 cents per diluted share, for the write-off of unamortized debt issuance costs on the 7 % Liquid Yield Option Notes that were retired on June 28, 2005, prior to their maturity. Also, the current quarter tax expense was favorably impacted by $1.4 million, or 3 cents per diluted share, as a result of a favorable tax ruling in Europe.
In the prior year period, sales of $813.1 million generated net income of $16.8 million, or 44 cents per diluted share, including an after-tax charge of $0.4 million, or 1 cent per diluted share, for the early retirement of debt.
Operating income in the second quarter increased 37 percent to $46.2 million as compared to $33.7 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.9 percent compared to 4.2 percent in the second quarter of 2004.
Six Month Results
For the six-month period ended July 1, 2005, sales of $1,812.6 million produced net income of $44.8 million, or $1.12 per diluted share. Results for the first six months include an after-tax charge of $0.7 million, or 2 cents per diluted share, for the early retirement of debt and a tax credit of $1.4 million, or 3 cents per diluted share, for the favorable tax ruling in Europe. Excluding the favorable tax credit, the tax rate for the first six months of 2005 was 38.5 percent versus 39.0 percent during the first half of 2004. Sales for the first six months of 2005 include sales of $37.4 million from DDI.
Sales of $1,577.3 million in the first six months of 2004 resulted in income before extraordinary gain of $30.8 million, or 81 cents per diluted share, including an after-tax charge of $0.4 million, or 1 cent per diluted share, from the early retirement of debt.
In the first six months of 2004, the Company also reported an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share, associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company.
Operating income in the first six months of 2005 increased 37 percent to $85.8 million as compared to $62.7 million in the year ago period. For the first six-month period of 2005, operating margins were 4.7 percent as compared to 4.0 percent in the first six months of 2004.
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the second quarter grew at an 11 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for $18.7 million in sales related to the June 2004 acquisition of DDI and $12.8 million for the foreign currency effects of a weaker U.S. dollar. This was in line with our expectations of an 8 to 12 percent organic growth rate for the year."
"Similar to what we saw in the first quarter, the growth was particularly strong in our fastener and small component OEM Supply business which saw 20 percent organic growth after adjusting for the foreign exchange effects of $0.8 million and DDI sales of $18.7 million," continued Grubbs. "The growth in this market continues to reflect a combination of added SKUs to existing contracts, some new contracts and increased prices. We believe the recent acquisition of Infast will provide us with another growth vehicle in the OEM Supply market going forward. "
"Overall, North American sales benefited from good general economic growth, an increase in the number of larger projects and a strengthening of the Canadian dollar. Enterprise cabling and security solutions sales in North America reported a $37 million increase, or 11 percent year-on-year sales gain, $2.6 million of which was due to the stronger Canadian dollar. The increase was a result of improved demand from both new and existing customers, continued strong growth in the security market, product line expansion and data cabling price increases. Canadian enterprise cabling sales growth, even after elimination of foreign exchange effects, was particularly strong as compared to the year ago period. North American Industrial Wire & Cable sales grew by $23.6 million, or more than 14 percent, as a result of a combination of increased demand from existing customers, the addition of new customers, the effects of higher copper prices and the stronger Canadian dollar. The one weak spot in North America was in sales to telecom OEMs where we saw a year-on-year drop in sales of about 33 percent," said Grubbs.
"In Europe, we saw sales climb by 24 percent as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "Adjusting for the weaker U.S. dollar impact of $4.4 million, European sales grew by approximately 21 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. This was fueled by strong growth in the OEM Supply market and an increase in the number of large projects. In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we also saw a 30 percent increase in year-on-year sales, which included a 3 percent favorable currency exchange rate effect. Latin America again reported very strong year-on-year sales gains, while sales in Asia declined by 3 percent versus the prior year's second quarter."
Second Quarter Operating Results
"With the continued sales growth reported in the second quarter, we were able to further leverage our cost structure and increase operating margins to 4.9 percent," said Grubbs. "The current quarter compares favorably to the 4.2 percent operating margin reported in the year ago period as well as the 4.5 percent reported in the first quarter of this fiscal year. In North America, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 5.4 percent as compared to 4.4 percent in the year ago quarter. The improvement reflects a combination of better gross margins on improved sales mix and price increases. In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 3.4 percent as compared to 3.3 percent in the year ago quarter. While we continue to generate solid operating margins in our European OEM Supply business, our communication business continues to suffer from comparatively weak demand and very competitive pricing. Emerging markets reported an increase in operating margins from 2.9 percent in the year ago quarter to 4.4 percent in the most recent quarter due to the solid sales growth in Latin America."
Infast Acquisition
Commenting on the acquisition of Infast Group plc, Grubbs said, "During the second quarter we announced the acquisition of Infast Group plc, which as previously reported, was completed on July 8, 2005. We believe that this transaction is an important step in continuing to build our presence in the OEM Supply market. With this acquisition we now have annualized projected sales in this market of approximately $750 million. We have over 1,900 employees serving a growing list of customers from 75 facilities in the U.S., UK, Canada, France and Italy."
"With the critical mass we have established and the name recognition we are building, we believe we are in a good position to use this base of business to drive further organic growth through the addition of SKUs to existing contracts, by adding additional facilities to existing customer relationships as well as by adding new customers. Given our established global presence we are also well positioned to follow our growing customer base to countries outside of our current OEM Supply market base."
"At the same time, we know we have a long list of system and facility integration actions that need to be completed along with building common processes and practices across the acquired companies. But we also know that as we complete these tasks we will be in an excellent position to achieve better leverage of the investment we have made in this market and to build a more customer friendly platform that will facilitate global growth," added Grubbs.
Early Retirement of Debt and Cash Flow
"As had been planned, at the end of the second quarter we retired the remaining outstanding 7 percent Liquid Yield Options Notes maturing 2020," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "These notes were redeemed using on-hand cash balances resulting from our March 2005 Senior Note Offering. As a result of this $70 million reduction in borrowings, our quarter end debt-to-total capitalization ratio has been reduced to 38 percent from 40 percent at the end of the first quarter of 2005. This compares to a debt-to-total capitalization ratio, including the then off-balance sheet borrowings related to the Company's account receivable securitization facility, of 38 percent at the end of the prior year's second quarter."
Commenting on cash flow and cash balances, Letham said, "In the most recent quarter, cash used in operations was $24.6 million. The large use of cash in the quarter was driven by working capital needs associated with strong sales in the later weeks of the quarter. We ended the quarter with on-hand cash balances of $102.2 million. Approximately $74.8 million of the on-hand cash balance is being used during the third quarter of 2005 to pay for the acquisition of the shares of Infast and related transaction costs. When these outlays are complete we will remain in solid financial shape, with an expectation of positive free cash flow from operations for the full year and over $395.0 million of unused available credit lines to support future organic and strategic growth."
Business Outlook
Concluding, Grubbs said, "Generally the business conditions and trends of the past few quarters remain in place and continue to support our annual organic sales growth expectations of 8 to 12 percent. Organic growth should support a continuing trend of improved earnings performance in the coming quarters. In the near term the completion of the Infast acquisition is expected to increase our quarterly revenues by an additional 7 to 8 percent from their current run rate. While the acquisition of Infast is expected to increase our quarterly operating profits, over the next few quarters it will also cause us to report slightly lower operating margins because the current operating margins on the Infast business are below our currently reported levels. However, as Infast becomes more integrated into the Company we expect to bring those margins to the same level as the rest of our OEM Supply operations over time."
Second Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2005 second quarter on Tuesday, July 26, 2005, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $600 million in inventory, 3) 200 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 220 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20051004132831.txt.gz
TIME:20051004132831
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
On September 29, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") renewed for an additional 364 days the accounts receivable securitization program it has had in place since October 2000. The applicable Amendment No. 3 to Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of September 29, 2005, is attached as Exhibit 4.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
4.1 Amendment No. 3 to Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement dated September 29, 2005.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 4.1
EXECUTION COPY
THIS AMENDMENT NO. 3 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES PURCHASE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of September 29, 2005, among ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the ""), ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), as the initial Servicer, each financial institution party hereto as a Financial Institution, FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION CORPORATION ("") and THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (f/k/a Three Pillars Funding Corporation) (" "), as conduits, (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and SUNTRUST CAPITAL MARKETS and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. (successor by merger to Bank One, NA) (""), as managing agents (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and JPMorgan, as agent for the Purchasers (the "").
Amendment
Seller
Anixter
Falcon
Three
Pillars
Conduits
Conduit
JPMorgan
Managing Agents
Managing Agent
Agent
WHEREAS, the Seller, Anixter, the Financial Institutions, Falcon, Three Pillars, the Managing Agents and the Agent are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1. . Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
SECTION 2. . Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the parties hereto agree that the Agreement is amended as follows:
Amendment to the Agreement
Section 3
(a) Section 9.1(f) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
CH1 3332702v.2
"(f) As at the end of any Collection Period: (i) the average of the Delinquency Ratios as of the end of such Collection Period and the two preceding Collection Periods shall exceed 14.00%; (ii) the average of the Dilution Trigger Ratios as of the end of such Collection Period and the two preceding Collection Periods shall exceed 4.0%; or (iii) the average of the Loss-to-Liquidation Ratios as of the end of such Collection Period and the two preceding Collection Periods shall exceed 5.25%."
(b) The definition of the term "" set forth in to the Agreement is amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows
Liquidity Termination Date
Exhibit I
"" means September 28, 2006.
Liquidity Termination Date
SECTION 3. . This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when the Agent shall have received a copy of this Amendment duly executed by each of the parties hereto.
Effective Date
SECTION 4. . In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, each of the Seller Parties represents and warrants to the Agent and the Purchasers, as to itself, that:
Representations and Warranties of the Seller Parties
(a) The representations and warranties of such Seller Party set forth in of the Agreement, as hereby amended, are true, correct and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof and there exists no Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event on the date hereof, provided that in the case of any representation or warranty in that expressly relates to facts in existence on an earlier date, the reaffirmation thereof under this shall be made as of such earlier date.
Section 5.1
Section 5.1
Section 4(a)
(b) The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Seller Party and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Seller Party, enforceable against such Seller Party in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
SECTION 5. . The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
SECTION 6. . From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
SECTION 7. . THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
CHOICE OF LAW
SECTION 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Execution of Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered by their duly authorized officers as of the date first written above:
ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, as the Seller
By: Name: Title: ANIXTER INC., as the initial Servicer
     
By: Name: Title: FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION CORPORATION
     
By: Name: Ronald J. Atkins Title: Authorized Signatory JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. (successor by merger to Bank One, NA), as a Financial Institution, a Managing Agent and as Agent
     
By: Name: Ronald J. Atkins Title: Vice President THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (f/k/a Three Pillars
     
Funding Corporation) By: Name:
     
Title: Authorized Signatory
SUNTRUST BANK, as a Financial Institution
By : Name: Title:
     
SUNTRUST CAPITAL MARKETS INC., as a Managing Agent
By: Name: Title:
     


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20051025175814.txt.gz
TIME:20051025175814
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 25, 2005, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2005. The Company's press release, dated October 25, 2005 is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated October 25, 2005 issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended September 30, 2005.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 25, 2005 
Third Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
*The 13 and 39 weeks ended October 1, 2004 diluted income per share amounts have been restated in accordance with EITF 04-08, "The Effect of Contingently Convertible Debt on Diluted Earnings Per Share."
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "In the most recent quarter, we again saw good, broad-based organic growth throughout our existing markets. In particular, we saw strong organic growth in Canada as well as in our Wire & Cable end-market, where strong copper prices added to good underlying demand trends. The organic growth we experienced in the current quarter again generated a significant increase in operating profits and earnings over the prior year. The trends supporting this growth appear to remain intact and consistent with recent quarters."
Third Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended September 30, 2005, sales of $1.01 billion produced net income of $25.1 million, or 62 cents per diluted share. Included in the current year's third quarter results were sales of $60.0 million from Infast, which was acquired on July 8, 2005. In the prior year period, sales of $849.6 million generated net income of $17.2 million, or 44 cents per diluted share, including an after-tax charge of $1.5 million, or 4 cents per diluted share, for certain asset impairment and acquisition-related charges.
Operating income in the third quarter increased 45 percent to $48.9 million as compared to $33.9 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 4.8 percent compared to 4.0 percent in the third quarter of 2004. The year ago period operating income was negatively affected by $2.6 million of asset impairment and acquisition-related charges.
Nine Month Results
For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2005, sales of $2.82 billion produced net income of $69.9 million, or $1.74 per diluted share. Results for the first nine months include an after-tax charge of $0.7 million, or 2 cents per diluted share, for the early retirement of debt and a tax credit of $1.4 million, or 3 cents per diluted share, for a favorable tax ruling in Europe. Sales for the first nine months of 2005 include sales of $60.0 million from Infast and an incremental $36.6 million from the June 22, 2004 acquisition of the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics, Inc.
Sales of $2.43 billion in the first nine months of 2004 resulted in income before extraordinary gain of $48.0 million, or $1.25 per diluted share. The prior year period includes a $1.5 million, or 4 cents per diluted share, after-tax charge for asset impairment and acquisition-related charges, along with an after-tax charge of $0.4 million, or 1 cent per diluted share, from the early retirement of debt.
In the first nine months of 2004, the Company also reported an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share, associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company.
Operating income in the first nine months of 2005 increased 40 percent to $134.7 million as compared to $96.6 million in the year ago period. For the first nine-month period of 2005, operating margins were 4.8 percent as compared to 4.0 percent in the first nine months of 2004. Operating income and operating margins in the year ago period were affected by the $2.6 million asset impairment charge and other acquisition-related charges.
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the third quarter grew at an 11 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for $60.0 million in sales related to the July 8, 2005 acquisition of Infast and $9.0 million for the foreign currency effects of a weaker U.S. dollar. This was in line with our expectations of an 8 to 12 percent organic growth rate for the year."
Grubbs continued, "Overall, North American sales benefited from good general economic growth, a strengthening of the Canadian dollar, strong copper prices and end-market demand in the Wire & Cable market, solid growth in the OEM Supply market and a rebound in sales to the telecom OEM marketplace. Our enterprise cabling and security solutions market continues to benefit from strong growth in the security market and product line expansion," said Grubbs.
"Outside of North America, we saw sales climb by 42 percent in Europe as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "The major factor in European sales growth was the July 8, 2005 acquisition of Infast, which added $54.1 million to European sales in the quarter. Exchange rates had no significant impact on year-on year sales comparisons in the third quarter. Adjusting for the Infast sales, European sales organically grew by just 3 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. The low growth rate in Europe reflects weak market conditions in much of continental Europe and a summer slowdown that was more pronounced than historical vacation-impacted sales patterns."
Grubbs continued, "In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 19 percent increase in year-on-year sales, which included a $2.1 million favorable currency exchange rate effect. Latin America again reported very strong year-on-year sales gains of 22 percent. In Asia, following a couple of quarters of negative year-on-year sales comparisons, we saw sales increase by 9 percent versus the prior year's third quarter."
Third Quarter Operating Results
"As had been expected, our operating margins in the third quarter, while showing substantial improvement over the third quarter of last year, did drop when compared to the operating margins reported in the second quarter of this year," said Grubbs. "This drop from the second to the third quarter of this year is due to the acquisition of Infast. As expected, until we are able to more fully integrate the business systems and operations of that acquisition into our existing business model, the operating margins from that acquisition will be dilutive to our company-wide operating margins. Nevertheless, the Infast acquisition added $1.0 million to our third quarter operating profits."
Grubbs went on to say, "In North America, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 5.7 percent as compared to 4.5 percent in the year ago quarter. The improvement reflects better leveraging of the operating cost structure on higher sales volumes. In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 2.1 percent as compared to 1.9 percent in the year ago quarter. The improvement in operating margins reflects continued growth and improved profitability in the OEM Supply business in Europe and comparatively flat sales and operating margins in our communications business. Our communications business in Europe continues to suffer from comparatively weak demand and very competitive pricing. Emerging markets reported an increase in operating margins from 2.9 percent in the year ago quarter to 3.4 percent in the most recent quarter due to the solid sales growth in this segment."
Infast Acquisition
Commenting on the acquisition of Infast, Grubbs said, "On July 8, 2005 we completed the acquisition of Infast. This acquisition further strengthens our position in the OEM Supply market. As we noted at the time of the acquisition, we now have annualized projected sales in this market of approximately $750 million which represents about 19 percent of our current company-wide sales run rate. We have over 1,900 employees serving a growing list of customers from 75 facilities in the US, UK, Canada, France and Italy."
"We face a significant amount of business systems and operations integration work in the coming quarters to ensure we are able to maximize the performance of this business. Based on the steadily improving profitability of our previous acquisitions in this market we are convinced we will succeed, but it will take several quarters to successfully integrate the operations and show meaningful progress," Grubbs continued.
"We are especially pleased with the initial customer reaction to this latest acquisition," added Grubbs. "Our initial view that this series of acquisitions would give us the critical mass to create a brand capable of driving significant organic growth is proving to be valid, given our success with new account acquisitions and expanded customer relationships. The level of quotation activity for new business in this market also remains very healthy, which bodes well for our future."
Cash Flow, Leverage and Special Dividend
"During the quarter we generated cash flow from operations of $7.8 million," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "With an expectation of slightly softer sequential sales in the fourth quarter, based on normal seasonal patterns, we expect continued positive cash flow from operations through the balance of 2005 resulting not only from earnings improvement, but also from seasonally lower working capital requirements."
Commenting on quarter-end leverage ratios, Letham said, "Because of the relatively low levels of leverage over the past few quarters and an expectation of sales growth rates that will result in continued earnings improvement and positive cash flows, the Board declared a special dividend on September 15, 2005. That dividend, of $4.00 per common share, is payable on October 31, 2005 to shareholders of record on October 14, 2005. The $156.0 million outlay for the dividend has been reflected in the September 30, 2005 balance sheet as a dividend payable with a corresponding reduction in shareholders' equity. As a result, we ended the quarter with a debt-to-total capital ratio of 45.5 percent. This compares to 38.0 percent at the end of the year ago quarter and 35.1 percent at the end of 2004. At the same time we ended the quarter with total cash balances of $106.7 million."
"We believe this dividend is an excellent way to enhance shareholder value, while simultaneously leaving the company with the financial flexibility to support all reasonable organic growth scenarios. In addition, we remain in a position to complete further strategic acquisitions should compelling opportunities present themselves in the near term," concluded Letham.
Repatriation of Foreign Earnings
Commenting on the Company's consideration to repatriate foreign earnings to avail itself of the lower tax rates available under the American Jobs Creation Act, Letham said, "During the fourth quarter of this year we may repatriate approximately $75 million in accumulated foreign earnings from Canada, as was disclosed as a possibility in our second quarter Form 10-Q. If we do adopt and execute such a plan of repatriation in the manner currently contemplated, then in the fourth quarter, the Company would record an additional tax provision that it currently estimates to be approximately $7.6 million, as disclosed in that second quarter Form 10-Q. Such a repatriation would be funded by a combination of on-hand cash balances and local borrowings in Canada and would be used to fund pension plan payments and ongoing non-executive compensation costs in the United States."
Business Outlook
Concluding, Grubbs said, "We are pleased with the broad-based growth we have achieved so far in 2005 and the significant improvement in earnings that has resulted. In general, the business conditions and trends of the past few quarters remain in place and should support a continuing trend of favorable earnings performance on a year-over-year comparison in the quarters ahead. Looking at the upcoming quarter, however, we expect to see the same fourth quarter seasonal patterns we normally experience. Specifically, that encompasses the fewer number of shipping days due to the Thanksgiving and Christmas holiday periods and extended factory shutdowns at the holiday time for a significant number of our OEM Supply customers, which historically has caused a slight contraction in sales when compared to the third quarter. We expect these factors to combine for a consecutive quarter sales drop in the fourth quarter of approximately 2 to 3 percent when compared to the third quarter results reported today. Even after taking this sequential drop into account, we still expect to report year-on-year operating performance improvements consistent with the trends of recent quarters."
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2005 third quarter on Tuesday, October 25, 2005, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $650 million in inventory, 3) 200 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 220 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20060105171937.txt.gz
TIME:20060105171937
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
================================================================================ UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): January 1, 2006 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c)) ================================================================================
ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT Effective January 1, 2006, an employment agreement was made and entered into by and between Anixter Inc. and Robert W. Grubbs, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer of Anixter International Inc. Anixter International Inc. is also a party to this Agreement, but solely for purposes of guaranteeing the undertakings made by Anixter Inc. with respect to certain benefit plans, programs or arrangements of Anixter International Inc. Effective January 1, 2006, an employment agreement was made and entered into by and between Anixter Inc. and Dennis J. Letham, Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer of Anixter International Inc. Anixter International Inc. is also a party to this Agreement, but solely for purposes of guaranteeing the undertakings made by Anixter Inc. with respect to certain benefit plans, programs or arrangements of Anixter International Inc. Copies of the employment agreements with Robert W. Grubbs, Jr., and Dennis J. Letham are included as Exhibits 10.1 and 10.2, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference. ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS Anixter International Inc. announced that its Board of Directors has been expanded with the appointment of Linda Walker Bynoe as a director, effective as of January 1, 2006. Bynoe has also been named to serve on Anixter's Compensation and Nominating & Governance Committees. Ms. Bynoe is currently President and Chief Executive Officer of Telemat Ltd., a project management and consulting firm based in Chicago. Ms. Bynoe also manages a private equity investment portfolio. Prior to joining Telemat in 1989, she held positions in the Capital Markets Division of Morgan Stanley (1978 - 1989) and in public accounting (1975 - 1978), where she obtained her license as a Certified Public Accountant. Ms. Bynoe currently serves as a director of Dynegy Inc., a wholesale power generator; Simon Property Group, Inc., a real estate investment trust engaged in the ownership and management of retail real estate; Prudential Retail Mutual Funds, a diversified fund complex; and Fidelity Life Association, a mutual insurance company. A copy of the press release, dated January 3, 2006, which announces this appointment, is included as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. January 5, 2006 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ------------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.1 EXECUTION COPY CEO FORM EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT This Employment Agreement is made and entered into as of the Effective Date (as defined below) by and between Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation having its principal place of business in Glenview, Illinois ("Company"), and Robert W. Grubbs, Jr., a resident of the state of Illinois ("Executive"). Anixter International Inc, a Delaware corporation ("Parent"), is also a party to this Agreement, but solely for purposes of guaranteeing the undertakings made by Company with respect to certain benefit plans, programs or arrangements of Parent and for purposes of Sections 4(a) and 4(b) below. RECITALS A. Executive currently is employed by Company as its Chief Executive Officer and holds the same office with respect to Parent. B. Company and Executive now desire to enter into this Agreement which shall, from and after the Effective Date, govern the terms and conditions of Executive's continued employment by Company. NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises and the promises and covenants herein, the parties hereby agree as follows: AGREEMENT 1. Definitions. When used in this Agreement and initially capitalized, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below: (a) "Accrued Base Salary" means any unpaid Base Salary of Executive earned through the Termination Date. (b) "Accrued Bonus Amount" means any formally awarded but unpaid Annual Incentive Bonus with respect to a Fiscal Year. (c) "Accrued Vacation Amount" means all compensation payable to Executive following his Termination for accrued but unused vacation days determined in accordance with Company's vacation policy. (d) "Affiliate" means with respect to any Person any entity controlled by, under the control of, under common control with such Person within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. (e) "Agreement" means this Agreement as in effect from time to time. (f) "Annual Incentive Bonus" means with respect to a Fiscal Year the award, if any, granted to Executive by the Committee under the terms of the Anixter International, Inc. Management Incentive Plan, as approved by the shareholders of Parent on May 20, 2004, or any
other short term incentive compensation plan subsequently established by Parent or Company for the benefit of executive level employees of Company. (g) "Base Salary" means the annual salary amount as in effect from time to time with respect to Executive under Section 5(a). (h) "Benefits" means any benefits which are vested and accrued prior to or on the Termination Date and to which Executive is otherwise entitled under the terms of any employee benefit plan, program, or arrangement sponsored by Company or any Affiliate of Company, including Parent. (i) "Board" means the Board of Directors of Parent. (j) "Business" means the distribution of data, voice, video, security network communication, specialty wire and cable products, "C" class inventory components, and such additional products as Company may distribute in the future and the provision of inventory management services with respect to such products or components. (k) "Cause" means a termination of Executive's employment by formal action of the Board, following the procedure set forth in Section 6(h) below, for any of the following reasons: (i) embezzlement, dishonesty, fraud or any illegal or unethical act or omission in connection with the performance of Executive's duties under this Agreement or as an employee of Company that materially injures or reasonably could materially injure Company or any Affiliate or that the Board, in its sole discretion, determines is unbecoming of or detrimental to the position held by Executive or which does or reasonably could materially impair Executive's ability to satisfactorily perform his duties hereunder; (ii) conviction of (or plea of nolo contendere to) any (A) felony or (B) other crime involving moral turpitude or any other conviction (or plea of nolo contendere) that reasonably could materially impair Executive's ability to satisfactorily perform his duties hereunder; (iii) any material and willful breach by Executive of the terms of this Agreement or any other willful act or omission that materially injures or has the potential to materially injure Company or any Affiliate or materially impairs or has the potential to materially impair Executive's satisfactory performance of his duties hereunder, which, if curable, remains uncured following ten (10) days written notice to Executive describing such breach. (iv) Improper, willful and material disclosure or use of Company's or any Affiliate's Proprietary Information or other willful material breach of Executive's fiduciary obligation to Company or any Affiliate of Company; or (v) Executive's willful failure or refusal to follow the lawful and good faith directions of the Board, which, if curable, remains uncured following ten (10) days' written notice to Executive describing such failure or refusal. -2-
For purposes of this definition, no act or failure to act on the part of Executive shall be considered "willful" unless done, or omitted to be done, by him in bad faith or without a reasonable belief that his action or omission are in the best interests of Company or its Affiliates. Any act or omission, based upon directions given pursuant to a resolution duly adopted by the Board or based upon the advice of counsel for Company or Parent shall be conclusively presumed to be done, or omitted to be done, in good faith and in the best interests of Company or its Affiliates. (l) "Change in Control" means (i) the approval by the shareholders of Company or Parent of a plan of complete liquidation or dissolution of Company or Parent, (ii) the consummation of a sale of all or substantially all of the assets of Company or Parent; (iii) the consummation of any transaction as a result of which any person (within the meaning of such term under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934), other than the Zell Group, becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934), directly or indirectly, of securities of Company or Parent representing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total voting power of all voting securities of Company or Parent then issued and outstanding; (iv) the consummation of a merger, consolidation, reorganization, or business combination, other than a merger, consolidation, reorganization or business combination which would result in the voting securities of Company or Parent outstanding immediately prior thereto continuing to represent (either by remaining outstanding or by being converted into voting securities of the surviving entity) more than fifty percent (50%) of the combined voting securities of Company or Parent or the surviving entity immediately after such merger, consolidation, reorganization of business combination; or (v) individuals who, as of the date of this Agreement, constitute the Board ("Incumbent Board") or their Successors cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the Board. For purposes of this definition an individual shall be considered a Successor to a member of the Incumbent Board if such individual's election or nomination for election by the stockholders of Parent was approved by a majority of the Incumbent Board and such approval was not given in response to an actual or threatened contest regarding the election or removal of directors. (m) "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. (n) "Committee" means the Compensation Committee of the Board as duly constituted from time to time. (o) "Company" has the meaning given to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. (p) "Competitive Business" means any business activity (other than the Business) in which Company or any Affiliate is actively engaged at the time Executive's employment terminates. (q) "Creation" has the meaning given to such term in Section 10 hereof. (r) "Disability" means a determination by the Board acting in good faith that (i) Executive is unable to perform the essential functions of his job with or without reasonable -3-
accommodation as a result of a physical or mental condition and (ii) such condition can reasonably be expected to continue for an indefinite period. (s) "Equity Award" means any award granted to Executive under the Anixter International Inc. 2001 Stock Incentive Plan or any prior or successor stock incentive plan of Parent or Company. (t) "Executive" has the meaning given to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. (u) "Effective Date" means January 1, 2006. (v) "Fiscal Year" means the fiscal year of Parent. (w) "Good Reason" means any of the following conditions (not consented to in advance by Executive in writing or ratified subsequently by Executive in writing), but only if such condition remain(s) in effect thirty (30) days after written notice to the Board from Executive of his intention to terminate his Employment for Good Reason which specifically identifies such condition: (i) Any material breach by Company of this Agreement with respect to its obligation to pay compensation, or provide benefits, to Executive; (ii) Any material, adverse change in Executive's title or authority as measured against Executive's title or authority immediately prior to such change; (iii) Assigning Executive duties which are inconsistent with the duties of the Chief Executive Officer of Company as historically defined or requiring Executive to report other than to the Board or its Chair; or (iv) Any relocation of Company's principal business office to a location that is more than 100 miles from Company's current principal business office during the Protected Period following a Change in Control. (x) "Parent" has the meaning given to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. (y) "Person" means any individual or any trust, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other entity. (z) "Pro Rata Bonus" means the Annual Incentive Bonus, if any, awarded to Executive consistent with the compensation practices established by the Committee with respect to other former executive level employees of Company with respect to the Fiscal Year in which Executive's employment terminates based on (i) the Company's actual financial performance against such financial performance targets as may have been set by the Committee for such Fiscal Year and (ii) the portion of such Fiscal Year during which Executive was employed. -4-
(aa) "Proprietary Information" has the meaning given to such term in Section 10. (bb) "Protected Period" means the period commencing 60 days before the Effective Date of a Change in Control and ending on the second anniversary of such Change in Control. (cc) "Separation Amount" means the sum of (i) twenty-four (24) months Base Salary, at the rate in effect on the Termination Date, and (ii) the Termination Bonus Amount. (dd) "Target Bonus Amount" has the meaning given to such term in Section 5. (ee) "Termination" means a termination of Executive's employment with Company and all its Affiliates for any reason, provided that such termination of employment would be considered a termination of employment for purposes of Section 409A of the Code. (ff) "Termination Bonus Amount" means the sum of the actual Annual Incentive Bonuses awarded and paid to Executive with respect to the two Fiscal Years immediately preceding the Fiscal Year in which the Termination Date occurs. (gg) "Termination Date" means the date as of which a Termination occurs with respect to Executive. (hh) "Zell Group" means Samuel Zell and his Affiliates. 2. Employment. From and after the Effective Date, Company hereby agrees to employ Executive for the Term of this Agreement as specified below and Executive hereby agrees to accept such ongoing employment for such Term on the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement. 3. Term. The Term of this Agreement shall commence on the Effective Date and continue until this Agreement is terminated in accordance with Section 6 below. 4. Title, Position and Duties. (a) Executive shall be employed as the Chief Executive Officer of Company and shall also serve as the Chief Executive Officer of Parent. Executive shall report directly to the Chairman of the Board and have such duties and responsibilities as are traditionally associated with such position at the Company and such additional duties and responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to Executive by the Board, provided such duties and responsibilities are consistent with the office of Chief Executive Officer of Company as historically constituted. Such duties and responsibilities may include providing services to or on behalf of Parent or any Affiliate of Parent. (b) Executive shall diligently and to the best of his abilities assume, perform, and discharge all duties and responsibilities inherent is his position or otherwise assigned to Executive from time to time and shall fully and completely comply with any and all written rules, procedures or policies of Company or Parent as from time to time in effect. Executive -5-
shall devote all of his business time and efforts to Company and its Affiliates and shall not, without prior written consent from the Board, accept other employment or perform or render any services for compensation, or have a direct or indirect ownership interest in any other business, other than in the form of publicly traded securities constituting less than one percent (1%) of the vote or value of the outstanding securities of such public entity. The foregoing notwithstanding, Executive shall be allowed to engage in passive personal investment activity and charitable, educational, religious and similar types of non-compensated activities and speaking engagements, provided that such activity or service does not interfere with Executive's performance of his duties and responsibilities hereunder. The time involved in such activities, provided it is not significant, shall not be treated as vacation time. (c) Executive shall perform his duties and responsibilities at Company's principal business office. Executive acknowledges that his duties and responsibilities may require significant travel. (d) Executive hereby represents and warrants that there is no legal restriction on his ability to accept employment with Company or to perform his duties and responsibilities hereunder and that Executive is not subject to any contractual covenant that could restrict his activities on behalf of Company in any way. (e) During the term of his service as Chief Executive Officer of Company and Parent, Executive shall be nominated by the Board for election as a director of Parent and shall serve, without additional compensation, as a member of the Board, subject to his being so elected by the stockholders of Parent. 5. Compensation and Benefits. Executive shall be compensated by Company for his services as follows: (a) Base Salary. Executive shall be paid a Base Salary at an annual rate of Eight Hundred Five Thousand Dollars ($805,000.00) payable in equal installments in accordance with Company's normal payroll practice. At least annually, the Committee shall review Executive's Base Salary with a view to making such adjustment to such Base Salary as the Committee shall deem reasonable and appropriate, in its sole discretion, in light of Executive's performance and the financial performance of Company and Parent, provided that no such adjustment shall be made to reduce the Base Salary below Eight Hundred Five Thousand Dollars ($805,000.00) annually without Executive's written consent, unless such reduction is made in conjunction with and consistent with an overall reduction in base compensation paid to the senior executives of Company as a group. (b) Annual Bonus Compensation. Executive currently is eligible to participate in Parent's Management Incentive Plan. Executive shall continue to be eligible to participate in the Management Incentive Plan or such other short term incentive plan as Company or Parent may adopt from time to time for the benefit of its senior executives and to earn Annual Incentive Bonuses under such plan as may from time to time be in effect based on the financial performance of Company and Executive's personal performance against annual targets, goals or other criteria as may be set by the Committee from time to time. Executive's Target Bonus Amount under the Management Incentive Plan shall be Seven Hundred Seventy-Five Thousand -6-
Dollars ($775,000.00). The Committee shall have the right to adjust such Target Bonus Amount from time to time consistent with similar adjustments made to the bonus opportunities of other senior executives, but shall not reduce the amount of such Target Bonus Amount under the Management Incentive Plan without Executive's written consent, unless such reduction is made in conjunction with and consistent with an overall reduction in target bonuses for the senior executives of Company as a group. The amount of Executive's Target Bonus Amount under any successor plan, program or arrangement shall be set by the Compensation Committee in its sole discretion, provided that Executive's total Base Salary and target bonus opportunity under such successor plan shall be reasonably equivalent to his total Base Salary and Target Bonus Amount under the Management Incentive Plan immediately prior thereto. The Committee shall with respect to each Fiscal Year advise Executive of the criteria to be utilized by the Committee in determining the amount of any actual bonus award under the Management Incentive Plan or any successor plan. The amount of any Annual Incentive Bonus, if any, shall be determined by the Committee in its sole discretion taking into consideration the financial performance of Company and the achievement of the identified bonus criteria, including any of Executive's personal performance criteria. Any Annual Incentive Bonus awarded to Executive shall be paid to Executive at the same time as Annual Incentive Bonuses are paid to other senior executives of Company. (c) Equity Based Compensation. Executive shall be eligible to receive awards under the Anixter International Inc. 2001 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended, or any successor equity based compensation plan for senior executives as may be adopted by Parent or Company from time to time. The timing, number of options, shares or equity units involved, and terms and conditions of all such awards shall be determined by the Committee in its sole discretion and shall be subject to the terms of the plan under which such award is made. As a condition to receiving such grants, Executive agrees not to make an election under Section 83(b) of the Code with respect to any such grant. (d) Benefits. Executive shall be eligible, on at least the same basis as other similarly situated members of senior management of Company, to participate in and to receive benefits under any of Company's employee benefit plans, programs or arrangements, in accordance with the terms of such plans, programs or arrangements as in effect from time to time. Company agrees to take all reasonable and necessary steps amend the Anixter Inc. Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan such that (i) in the event Executive's employment is terminated under Section 6(d) below, Executive would be entitled to a pro rata vested benefit under such plan based on the months of Executive's employment from and after August 2004 through and including August 2009 and (ii) in the event Executive's employment is terminated under Section 6(d) below during the Protected Period, Executive would be entitled to a full vested benefit under the Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan. (e) Expense Reimbursement. Executive shall be entitled to reimbursement from Company for all reasonable and customary travel and other business expenses incurred by Executive in carrying out his duties under this Agreement, in accordance with the general reimbursement policy of Company as in effect from time to time. Executive shall report all such reimbursable expenditures to Company not less frequently than monthly accompanied by adequate records and other documentary evidence as required by Company's reimbursement policy, and federal or state tax statutes or regulations governing the substantiation of such -7-
expenditures. Executive's right to reimbursement in accordance with Company's policies as in effect from time to time shall survive termination of this Agreement. (f) Vacation. Executive shall be entitled to paid vacation time in accordance with Company's vacation policy as in effect from time to time. (g) Withholding. Company shall have the right to deduct and withhold from any taxable compensation paid to or for the benefit of Executive hereunder, whether paid in cash or in property, any federal, state or local income, employment or other taxes required by law to be withheld by Company with respect to such payment or any other taxable payment or transfer made by Company for the benefit of Executive. (h) Right of Offset/ Right of Recoupment. Company shall have the right to offset any and all amounts due and owing from Executive to Company or any Affiliate against any obligation of Company to pay compensation to Executive. To the extent required by law, Company shall have a right of recoupment from Executive to the extent compensation, in any form, is awarded or is paid to Executive based on the reported financial results of Company or its Affiliates and such financial results are subsequently required to be restated by Company's independent auditors. No payment or benefits provided Executive hereunder shall be reduced by any amount Executive may earn or receive from employment with another employer or any other source. 6. Termination of Employment. (a) Termination by Executive Other than for Good Reason. Executive may terminate his employment during the Term upon ninety (90) days prior written notice to Company for other than Good Reason (as defined below). In such event, this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied, except that Executive shall be entitled to and shall be subject to the following as applicable: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, or Accrued Bonus Amount; (ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in such plans shall terminate as of the Termination Date, except as otherwise required by law; and (iii) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grant, provided that in the event Executive fails to provide the required ninety (90) days advance written notice of his Termination, Executive's rights with respect to any unvested Equity Awards shall immediately terminate and be forfeited. (b) Death or Disability. Executive's employment shall automatically terminate upon his death and such employment shall terminate at Company's election in the event of his Disability, unless otherwise prohibited by law. In such event, this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully -8-
satisfied and discharged, except that Executive or his legal representatives, as applicable, will be entitled to and subject to the following: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, Accrued Bonus Amount or Pro Rata Bonus; (ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in all such plans shall terminate as of the date his employment terminates, except as otherwise required by law; (iii) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grant. (iv) If the Termination is due to Disability, the payments specified in paragraph (d)(iii) below, provided that Executive's right to such payments shall be contingent upon Executive's execution of a release of all claims against Company in the form of Exhibit A hereto and further provided that Company's payment obligation shall be reduced and offset by any and all payments to or on behalf of Executive under any disability insurance coverage paid for by Company. (c) Termination for Cause. Company may terminate Executive's employment for Cause at any time by following the procedure set forth in paragraph (h) below. In such event, this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied and discharged, except that Executive be entitled to and shall be subject to the following as applicable: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, or Accrued Bonus Amount; (ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in all such plans shall terminate as of the date Executive's employment terminates, except as otherwise required by law; (iii) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grant, except that Executive's rights with respect to any unvested Equity Awards shall immediately terminate and be forfeited. (d) Termination By Company Other Than for Cause or By Executive for Good Reason. Company may terminate Executive's employment without Cause at any time without prior notice and Executive may terminate his employment for Good Reason upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to Company as set forth herein, subject to the Company's right to cure within such thirty (30) day period. Subject to paragraph (e) below, in the event of such a Termination this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied and discharged, except that,contingent upon Executive's execution of a release of all claims against Company in the form of Exhibit A hereto, -9-
Executive or his legal representatives, as applicable, will be entitled to and subject to the following: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, Accrued Bonus Amount or Pro Rata Bonus; (ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in all such plans shall terminate as of the date Executive's employment terminates, except as otherwise required by law or expressly otherwise provided herein; (iii) Payment of an amount equal to the Separation Amount, payable as follows: (i) on the first day of the seventh calendar month following the month in which the Termination Date occurs, Executive shall be paid twenty-five percent (25%) of the Separation Amount and on the first day of the month for the next eighteen (18) months, Executive shall be paid 4.166667 percent of the Separation Amount; provided, however, that in the event the payments made under this paragraph are not subject to Section 409A(a)(2)(A)(i) of the Code on the Termination Date, then the Separation Amount shall be paid in twenty-four (24) equal installments commencing on the first day of the month coincident with or next following the Termination Date. (iv) Executive shall be entitled to continue participation for himself and his eligible dependants under Company's group health plan on the same terms as applicable to active employees for a period equal to the lesser of (i) twenty-four (24) months or (ii) the period from the Termination Date through the date Executive or such dependents, as the case may be, first become eligible for coverage under any group health plan of another employer; (v) Executive shall be eligible to elect COBRA continuation coverage as of the second anniversary of the Termination Date, assuming that Executive or his dependents were not otherwise eligible for coverage under any group health plan of another employer prior to such date; and (vi) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grants, provided that any Equity Award which would have vested during the one hundred eighty days following the Termination Date shall be deemed vested on the Termination Date. (e) Termination Related to Change in Control. In the event that Company elects to terminate the employment of Executive other than for Cause or Executive elects to terminate such employment for Good Reason and the Termination Date is within the Protected Period any and all Equity Awards which are not vested on the Termination Date shall be deemed to have vested on the Termination Date. (f) Conditional Post-Termination Rights. EXECUTIVE ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT HIS RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS OR ANY OTHER CONSIDERATION FOLLOWING A TERMINATION OF HIS EMPLOYMENT IS EXPRESSLY CONDITIONED ON EXECUTIVE EXECUTING AND DELIVERING TO COMPANY THE FORM OF RELEASE ATTACHED HERETO AS EXHIBIT A HERETO. -10-
(g) Limitation On Payment Obligation. The foregoing notwithstanding, except as otherwise expressly provided below, in no event shall Company be obligated to make payments to Executive following his Termination that would constitute "excess parachute payments" within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code. The foregoing notwithstanding, in the event Company believes that any payment due Executive would be constitute an "excess parachute payment" and Executive will be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code, Company and Executive agree that (i) if the aggregate of all "parachute payments" (as such term is defined in Section 280G of the Code) does not exceed 333% of the "base amount" (as such term in defined in Section 280G of the Code), then the parachute payments shall be reduced to 299.99% of such base amount, or (ii) if the aggregate of all parachute payments exceeds 333% of the base amount, then Company shall pay to Executive the sum of (A) 299.99% of the base amount and (B) One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). (h) For Cause Termination Procedure. The Board shall only terminate Executive for Cause under paragraph (c) above after providing Executive with (i) at least ten days prior to the proposed termination date, written notice setting forth in detail the basis for the proposed termination, (ii) the opportunity to appear before the Board, with counsel, and provide rebuttal to such proposed termination, and (iii) written notice following such appearance confirming such termination and certifying that the decision to terminate Executive for Cause was approved by at least seventy-five percent of the members of the Board, excluding Executive. Unless otherwise directed by the Board, from and after the date of the notice under (i) above of the proposed termination, Executive shall be relieved of his duties and responsibilities and shall be considered to be on a paid leave of absence pending any final action by the Board confirming such proposed termination. 7. Confidentiality. Executive acknowledges that by virtue of his employment with Company, he has and will in the future be exposed to or has had or may have access to confidential information of Company or its Affiliates regarding its or their businesses (whether or not developed by Executive), including, but not limited to, algorithms, source code, system designs, data formats, analytical processes, methodologies, business practices, financial information or projections, customer lists or records, customer information, employee records, shareholder records, mark-ups, project materials, marketing techniques, supplier information, accounting methodologies, Creations or other information that gives, or may give, Company or its Affiliates an advantage in the marketplace against its competitors (all of the foregoing are hereinafter referred to collectively as the "Proprietary Information" except for information that was in the public domain when acquired or developed by Company, or that subsequently enters the public domain other than as a result of a breach of this or any other agreement or covenant). Executive further acknowledges that it would be possible for Executive, upon termination of his employment with Company, to use the Proprietary Information to benefit other individuals or entities, and that to the extent Executive engages in the Business or Competitive Activities for himself or others following the termination of his employment it is highly likely that such activity would inevitably require his use or disclosure of Proprietary Information. Executive acknowledges that Company has expended considerable time and resources in the development of the Proprietary Information and that the Proprietary Information has been disclosed to or learned by Executive solely in connection with Executive's employment with Company. Executive acknowledges that the Proprietary Information constitutes a proprietary and exclusive interest of Company, and, therefore, Executive agrees that during the term of his employment -11-
and after the termination thereof, for whatever reason, anywhere in the world, Executive shall not directly or indirectly disclose the Proprietary Information to any person, firm, court, governmental entity or body, corporation or other entity or use the Proprietary Information in any manner, except in connection with the business and affairs of Company or pursuant to a validly issued and enforceable court or administrative order. In the event that any court, administrative hearing officer or other judicial or governmental representative shall request or demand disclosure of any Proprietary Information, Executive shall promptly notify Company of the same and cooperate with Company to obtain appropriate protective orders in respect thereof. Executive further agrees to execute such further agreements or understandings regarding his agreement not to misuse or disclose Proprietary Information or Creations as Company may reasonably request. 8. Non-Solicitation/Non-Competition. Executive covenants and agrees that, while employed by Company, and for a period of 24 months following the termination of his employment for any reason, including during the Protected Period, he shall not: (a) without the written consent of the Board, directly or indirectly engage or assist any person engaging in the Business or any Competitive Activity (as defined below), individually, or as an officer, director, employee, agent, consultant, owner, partner, lender, manager, member, principal, or in any other capacity, or render any services to any entity which is engaged in the Business or Competitive Business; provided, however, that the ownership by Executive of not more than one percent (1%) of any class of equity security of any entity engaged in the Business or any Competitive Business shall not be deemed a breach of this Section provided such securities are listed on a national securities exchange or quotation system or have been registered under Section 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Upon the written request of Executive, the Board will advise Executive whether or not a specific activity which Executive in contemplating would violate the foregoing restriction, provided that (I) such request is made prior to Executive engaging in such activity and (II) Executive provides the Board with such information as the Board determines is necessary to make such determination. The current and continuing effectiveness of any such determination shall be conditioned on all such information provided by Executive being complete and accurate in all material respects; or (b) in any manner, directly or indirectly attempt to divert, take away, solicit, or assist others in soliciting any current or prospective customer, supplier, independent contractor or service provider of Company or any Affiliate or otherwise interfere with the relationship between Company or any Affiliate and any current or prospective customer, service provider, supplier, independent contractor, or shareholder; or (c) directly or indirectly solicit for employment other than on behalf of Company, seek to induce or influence any person to leave employment with Company, offer employment to, or employ any person who was an employee of Company within 6 months of such solicitation or offer; or (d) make any comment (whether or not true) to any Person that could be interpreted, whether or not in fact so interpreted, as critical or disparaging of Company or any of its Affiliates or that otherwise could be reasonably expected to be detrimental to Company or any of its Affiliates or their employees or operations, provided that the foregoing limitation shall not -12-
apply to truthful testimony as a witness in any administrative or other legal proceeding, compliance with any obligations imposed under applicable law, or assertion of a defense against any claim of breach of this Agreement by Company, or to his statements or disclosures to officers or directors of Company or Parent, and shall not require Executive to make false statements or disclosures. 9. Return of Materials. Executive shall, at any time upon the request of Company, and in any event upon his Termination for any reason, immediately return and surrender to Company all originals and all copies, regardless of medium, of all algorithms, source code, system designs, data formats, forms, records, notes, memoranda, price lists, supplier lists, brochures, project materials, sales materials, manuals, letterhead, business cards and other property belonging to Company, its Affiliates, or any of its clients, as the case may be, created or obtained by Executive as a result of or in the course of or in connection with Executive's employment regardless of whether such items constitute Proprietary Information. Executive acknowledges that all such materials are, and will remain, the exclusive property of Company. 10. Creations and Other Matters. (a) Executive agrees that all materials, inventions, discoveries, improvements or the like that Executive, individually or with others, may originate, develop or reduce to practice while employed with Company relating to the business or products of Company, Company's actual or demonstrably anticipated research or development or any work performed by Executive for Company (individually, a "Creation" and collectively, the "Creations") shall, as between Company and Executive, belong to and be the sole property of Company. Executive hereby waives any and all "moral rights," including, but not limited to, any right to identification of authorship, right of approval on modifications or limitation on subsequent modification, that Executive may have in respect of any Creation. Executive further agrees, without further consideration, to promptly disclose each such Creation to Company and to such other individuals as Company may direct. Executive further agrees to execute and to join others in executing such applications, assignments and other documents as may be necessary or convenient to vest in Company or any client of Company, as appropriate, full title to each such Creation and as may be reasonably necessary or convenient to obtain United States and foreign patents or copyrights thereon to the extent Company or any client of Company, as appropriate, may choose. Executive further agrees to testify in any legal or administrative proceeding relative to any such Creation whenever requested to do so by Company, provided that Company agrees to reimburse Executive for any reasonable expenses incurred in providing such testimony. (b) The foregoing covenant shall not apply to any Creation for which no equipment, supplies, facilities, or trade secret information of Company was used and which was developed entirely on Executive's own time, unless (i) the Creation relates to (A) the business of Company or (B) any actual or reasonably anticipated research or development of Company or (ii) the Creation results from any work performed by Executive for Company. 11. Post-Termination Cooperation. Executive agrees that following his Termination for any reason he will be available on a reasonable basis consistent with and subject to Executive's other responsibilities to assist Company and its Affiliates, and will upon request assist Company and its Affiliates, (i) as necessary, for a period of twelve (12) months in order to insure the -13-
orderly transition of his duties and responsibilities and (ii) for a period of sixty (60) months in the prosecution or defense of any claims, suits, litigation, arbitrations, investigations, or other proceedings, whether pending or threatened involving Company or any Affiliate. Such assistance shall include, but not by way of limitation, attending meetings with and truthfully and completely answering questions posed by representatives of Company. Company shall reimburse Executive for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred at the request of Company upon submission of appropriate supporting documents. In addition, if Company is not then currently obligated to make severance payments to Executive under the terms of this Agreement, Company shall compensate executive for such time at a rate of $2,000.00 per day for providing such assistance. 12. Remedies. Executive acknowledges that in the event that his employment with Company terminates for any reason, he will be able to earn a livelihood without violating the foregoing restrictions and that his ability to earn a livelihood without violating such restrictions is a material condition to his employment with Company. Executive acknowledges that compliance with the covenants set forth in Sections 7 through 11 hereof is necessary to protect the business, goodwill and Proprietary Information of Company and its clients and that a breach of these restrictions will irreparably and continually damage Company or its clients for which money damages may not be adequate. Consequently, Executive agrees that, in the event that he breaches or threatens to breach any of these covenants, Company shall be entitled to a temporary, preliminary or permanent injunction in order to prevent the continuation of such harm without any obligation to post a bond. In addition, without limiting Company's remedies for any breach of any restriction on Executive set forth in Sections 7 through 11 hereof, except as required by law, the obligation of Company to pay any amounts payable to Executive under Section 6 of this Agreement is contingent upon Executive's acting in accordance with the covenants of Sections 7 through 11 and in the event of any breach of such obligations, Company's obligation to make further payments shall terminate and Company shall be entitled to recoup from Executive all payments previously made to Executive under Section 6. Nothing in this agreement, however, shall be construed to prohibit Company from also pursuing any other remedy, the parties having agreed that all remedies are to be cumulative. The parties expressly agree that Company may, in its sole discretion, choose to enforce the covenants in Sections 7 through 11 hereof in part or to enforce any of said covenants to a lesser extent than that set forth herein. 13. Survival. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, Executive's obligations in Sections 7 through 11 (to the extent provided therein) and Company's obligations to make payments under Section 6 shall survive the termination of this Agreement. 14. Revision. The parties hereto expressly agree that in the event that any of the provisions, covenants, warranties or agreements in this Agreement are held to be in any respect an unreasonable restriction upon Executive or are otherwise invalid, for whatsoever cause, then the court so holding is hereby authorized to (a) reduce the territory to which said covenant, warranty or agreement pertains, the period of time in which said covenant, warranty or agreement operates or the scope of activity to which said covenant, warranty or agreement pertains or (b) effect any other change to the extent necessary to render any of the restrictions contained in this Agreement enforceable. -14-
15. Dispute Resolution. In the event of any dispute or claim relating to or arising out of this Agreement (including, but not limited to, any claims of breach of contract, wrongful termination or age, sex, race or other discrimination), Executive and Company agree that all such disputes shall be fully and finally resolved by binding arbitration conducted by the American Arbitration Association ("AAA") in Chicago, Illinois in accordance with the AAA's National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes, provided, however, that this arbitration provision shall not apply to, and Company shall be free to seek, injunctive or other equitable relief with respect to any actual or threatened breach or violation by Executive of his obligations under Sections 7 through 11 hereof in any court having appropriate jurisdiction. Executive acknowledges that by accepting this arbitration provision he is waiving any right to a jury trial in the event of a covered dispute. The arbitrator may, but is not required, to order that the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover from the losing party its attorneys' fees and costs incurred in any arbitration arising out of this Agreement. 16. Interpretation. Executive and Company agree that this Agreement shall be interpreted in accordance with and governed by the internal laws of the State of Illinois. 17. Successors and Assigns. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon Company and its successors and assigns. In view of the personal nature of the services to be performed under this Agreement by Executive, he shall not have the right to assign or transfer any of his rights, obligations or benefits under this Agreement, except as otherwise noted herein. 18. Notice. Any notice provided for in this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed given on the date it is delivered in person or sent via overnight delivery service to the other party and addressed, In the case of Company, to: Anixter Inc. 2301 Patriot Boulevard Glenview, IL 60025 Attn: General Counsel And in the case of Executive, to Robert W. Grubbs, Jr. 4641 Lake Point Circle Long Grove, IL 60047 Or such other addresses as either party may designate by giving written notice of a change of address in the manner provided above. Notices given by personal delivery shall be deemed given on the date of delivery. Notices given by overnight courier service shall be deemed given upon deposit with the courier. If notice is given to a business address, receipt by a receptionist or any other person employed at such business address shall be deemed to constitute actual delivery to the addressee. -15-
19. Validity. If any one or more of the provisions (or any part thereof) of this Agreement shall be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions (or any part thereof) shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby. Each term and provision of this agreement shall be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law and any invalid, illegal or unenforceable term or provision shall be deemed replaced by a term or provision that is valid and enforceable and that comes closest to expressing the intention of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable term or provision. 20. Entire Agreement - Prior Agreements. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between Executive and Company regarding the terms and conditions of his employment. This Agreement supersedes all prior negotiations, representations or agreements between Executive and Company, whether written or oral, concerning Executive's employment by Company, including, but not by way of limitation, that certain, Employment Agreement, dated July 22, 1999, by and between Company and Executive and all amendments thereto. The foregoing notwithstanding, except as otherwise expressly provided herein, entering into this Agreement shall not effect the rights and obligations of Company and Executive with respect to any Equity Awards or any prior equity incentive compensation plan of Company or Parent or the rights and obligations of Company and Executive under the Anixter Inc. Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, effective as of August 4, 2004. In entering into this agreement, Executive has consulted with independent legal counsel and has not relied upon any representation not set forth herein. 21. Modification. This Agreement may only be modified or amended by a supplemental written agreement signed by Executive and Company. 22. Insurance and Indemnification. For the period from the date hereof through at least the tenth anniversary of Executive's termination, or the maximum period allowed under the applicable insurance policy, if shorter, Company agrees (i) to name Executive as an insured party on all directors and officers liability insurance maintained by Company or Parent for the benefit of its officers or directors and provide coverage on at least the same basis as other covered persons and (ii) to provide Executive with at least the same indemnification rights as it provides to its other officers. 23. Non-Disparagement. Company, on behalf of itself and all of its Affiliates agrees that during the term of this Agreement and for a period of twenty-four months after the Termination Date, they shall not formally make any comment (whether or not true) to any Person that could be interpreted, whether or not in fact so interpreted, as critical or disparaging of Executive or that otherwise could be reasonably expected to be detrimental to Executive, provided that the foregoing limitation shall not apply to truthful testimony as a witness in any administrative or legal proceeding, statements or disclosures made in compliance with other obligations imposed under applicable law, or assertion of a defense against any claim of breach of this Agreement by Executive, and shall not require Company or any Affiliate to make false statements or disclosures. 24. Counterparts. The parties may execute this Agreement in one or more counterparts, all of which together shall constitute but one Agreement. -16-
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date and year written below. ANIXTER INC. Date: By: ------------------------------- ------------------------------------ Its: ----------------------------------- Date: ROBERT W. GRUBBS, JR. ------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: By: ------------------------------- ------------------------------------ Its: ----------------------------------- But only for the limited purposes expressly noted in the introductory paragraph hereof -17-
EXHIBIT A FORM OF RELEASE Date: ________________________ In consideration of the agreement of Anixter Inc. ("Company") to enter into that certain Employment Agreement, dated as January 1, 2006, with the undersigned and the promises and covenants of Company made there under, the undersigned, on behalf of himself and his respective heirs, representatives, executors, family members, and assigns hereby fully and forever releases and discharges Company and its past, present and future shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, attorneys, investors, administrators, affiliates, divisions, subsidiaries, predecessors, successors and assigns from and against, and agrees not to sue or otherwise institute or cause to be instituted any legal, alternative dispute resolution or administrative proceeding concerning, any claim, duty, obligation or cause of action relating to any matters of any kind, whether presently known or unknown, suspected or unsuspected, that he may possess arising from any omissions, acts or facts that have occurred through the date his employment terminates, including without limitation: A. Any and all claims relating to or arising from his employment by Company and the termination of such employment; B. Any and all claims under his Employment Agreement; C. Any and all claims for wrongful discharge, termination in violation of good policy, discrimination, breach of contract, both expressed or implied, covenants of good faith or fair dealing, both expressed or implied, promissory estoppel, negligent or intentional infliction of emotional distress, negligent or intentional misrepresentation, negligent or intentional interference with contract or prospective economic advantage, unfair business practice, defamation, libel, slander, negligence, personal injury, assault, battery, invasion of privacy, false imprisonment, or conversion; D. Any and all claims for violation of any federal, state or municipal statute, including, without limitation, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Civil Rights Act of 1991, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, and all amendments to each such Act as well as the regulations issued there under; E. Any and all claims based on the violation of the federal or any state constitution; F. Any and all claims for attorneys' fees and costs. The foregoing release shall not apply with respect to Company's payment obligations under Sections 5 and 6 of the Employment Agreement or the undersigned's rights under any "employee benefit plans" as that term is defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security -18-
Act of 1974, as amended. THE UNDERSIGNED ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (I) HE HAS BEEN ADVISED BY COMPANY TO CONSULT A LAWYER OF HIS OWN CHOICE PRIOR TO EXECUTING THIS RELEASE AND HAS DONE SO OR VOLUNTARILY DECLINED TO SEEK SUCH COUNSEL, (II) HE HAS READ THIS RELEASE AND UNDERSTANDS THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS HEREOF AND THE BINDING NATURE HEREOF, (III) HE HAS HAD AT LEAST TWENTY-ONE (21) DAYS WITHIN WHICH TO CONSIDER THE TERMS OF THIS RELEASE AND EXECUTED THIS RELEASE VOLUNTARILY AND WITHOUT DURESS OR UNDUE INFLUENCE ON THE PART OF COMPANY, (IV) HE HAS SEVEN (7) DAYS TO REVOKE HIS EXECUTION OF THIS RELEASE AND THAT SUCH EXECUTION SHALL NOT BE EFFECTIVE UNTIL SEVEN (7) DAYS FOLLOWING DELIVERY TO COMPANY, AND (V) HE UNDERSTANDS THAT HIS RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS UNDER SECTION 6 OF THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT IS SUBJECT TO AND CONDITIONED ON THE UNDERSIGNED'S FULL AND COMPLETE COMPLIANCE WITH THE COVENANTS FOLLOWING HIS TERMINATION AND SUBJECT TO FULL RECOUPMENT BY COMPANY IN THE EVENT OF A VIOLATION OF ANY COVENANT. Initially capitalized terms used in this release and defined in the Agreement shall have the meanings given to such terms under the Agreement. ------------------------------------- Printed Name ------------------------------------- Signature Date: ---------------------------------- - --------------------------------- Notary My Commission expires _______________. -19-

Exhibit 10.2 EXECUTION COPY CFO FORM EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT This Employment Agreement is made and entered into as of the Effective Date (as defined below) by and between Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation having its principal place of business in Glenview, Illinois ("Company"), and Dennis J. Letham, a resident of the state of Illinois ("Executive"). Anixter International Inc, a Delaware corporation ("Parent"), is also a party to this Agreement, but solely for purposes of guaranteeing the undertakings made by Company with respect to certain benefit plans, programs or arrangements of Parent and for purposes of Sections 4(a) and 4(b) below. RECITALS A. Executive currently is employed by Company as its Chief Financial Officer and holds the same office with respect to Parent. B. Company and Executive now desire to enter into this Agreement which shall, from and after the Effective Date, govern the terms and conditions of Executive's continued employment by Company. NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises and the promises and covenants herein, the parties hereby agree as follows: AGREEMENT 1. Definitions. When used in this Agreement and initially capitalized, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below: (a) "Accrued Base Salary" means any unpaid Base Salary of Executive earned through the Termination Date. (b) "Accrued Bonus Amount" means any formally awarded but unpaid Annual Incentive Bonus with respect to a Fiscal Year. (c) "Accrued Vacation Amount" means all compensation payable to Executive following his Termination for accrued but unused vacation days determined in accordance with Company's vacation policy. (d) "Affiliate" means with respect to any Person any entity controlled by, under the control of, under common control with such Person within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. (e) "Agreement" means this Agreement as in effect from time to time. (f) "Annual Incentive Bonus" means with respect to a Fiscal Year the award, if any, granted to Executive by the Committee under the terms of the Anixter International, Inc. Management Incentive Plan, as approved by the shareholders of Parent on May 20, 2004, or any
other short term incentive compensation plan subsequently established by Parent or Company for the benefit of executive level employees of Company. (g) "Base Salary" means the annual salary amount as in effect from time to time with respect to Executive under Section 5(a). (h) "Benefits" means any benefits which are vested and accrued prior to or on the Termination Date and to which Executive is otherwise entitled under the terms of any employee benefit plan, program, or arrangement sponsored by Company or any Affiliate of Company, including Parent. (i) "Board" means the Board of Directors of Parent. (j) "Business" means the distribution of data, voice, video, security network communication, specialty wire and cable products, "C" class inventory components, and such additional products as Company may distribute in the future and the provision of inventory management services with respect to such products or components. (k) "Cause" means a termination of Executive's employment by formal action of the Board, following the procedure set forth in Section 6(h) below, for any of the following reasons: (i) embezzlement, dishonesty, fraud or any illegal or unethical act or omission in connection with the performance of Executive's duties under this Agreement or as an employee of Company that materially injures or reasonably could materially injure Company or any Affiliate or that the Board, in its sole discretion, determines is unbecoming of or detrimental to the position held by Executive or which does or reasonably could materially impair Executive's ability to satisfactorily perform his duties hereunder; (ii) conviction of (or plea of nolo contendere to) any (A) felony or (B) other crime involving moral turpitude or any other conviction (or plea of nolo contendere) that reasonably could materially impair Executive's ability to satisfactorily perform his duties hereunder; (iii) any material and willful breach by Executive of the terms of this Agreement or any other willful act or omission that materially injures or has the potential to materially injure Company or any Affiliate or materially impairs or has the potential to materially impair Executive's satisfactory performance of his duties hereunder, which, if curable, remains uncured following ten (10) days written notice to Executive describing such breach. (iv) Improper, willful and material disclosure or use of Company's or any Affiliate's Proprietary Information or other willful material breach of Executive's fiduciary obligation to Company or any Affiliate of Company; or (v) Executive's willful failure or refusal to follow the lawful and good faith directions of the Board, which, if curable, remains uncured following ten (10) days' written notice to Executive describing such failure or refusal. -2-
For purposes of this definition, no act or failure to act on the part of Executive shall be considered "willful" unless done, or omitted to be done, by him in bad faith or without a reasonable belief that his action or omission are in the best interests of Company or its Affiliates. Any act or omission, based upon directions given pursuant to a resolution duly adopted by the Board or based upon the advice of counsel for Company or Parent shall be conclusively presumed to be done, or omitted to be done, in good faith and in the best interests of Company or its Affiliates. (l) "Change in Control" means (i) the approval by the shareholders of Company or Parent of a plan of complete liquidation or dissolution of Company or Parent, (ii) the consummation of a sale of all or substantially all of the assets of Company or Parent; (iii) the consummation of any transaction as a result of which any person (within the meaning of such term under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934), other than the Zell Group, becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934), directly or indirectly, of securities of Company or Parent representing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total voting power of all voting securities of Company or Parent then issued and outstanding; (iv) the consummation of a merger, consolidation, reorganization, or business combination, other than a merger, consolidation, reorganization or business combination which would result in the voting securities of Company or Parent outstanding immediately prior thereto continuing to represent (either by remaining outstanding or by being converted into voting securities of the surviving entity) more than fifty percent (50%) of the combined voting securities of Company or Parent or the surviving entity immediately after such merger, consolidation, reorganization of business combination; or (v) individuals who, as of the date of this Agreement, constitute the Board ("Incumbent Board") or their Successors cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the Board. For purposes of this definition an individual shall be considered a Successor to a member of the Incumbent Board if such individual's election or nomination for election by the stockholders of Parent was approved by a majority of the Incumbent Board and such approval was not given in response to an actual or threatened contest regarding the election or removal of directors. (m) "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. (n) "Committee" means the Compensation Committee of the Board as duly constituted from time to time. (o) "Company" has the meaning given to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. (p) "Competitive Business" means any business activity (other than the Business) in which Company or any Affiliate is actively engaged at the time Executive's employment terminates. (q) "Creation" has the meaning given to such term in Section 10 hereof. (r) "Disability" means a determination by the Board acting in good faith that (i) Executive is unable to perform the essential functions of his job with or without reasonable -3-
accommodation as a result of a physical or mental condition and (ii) such condition can reasonably be expected to continue for an indefinite period. (s) "Equity Award" means any award granted to Executive under the Anixter International Inc. 2001 Stock Incentive Plan or any prior or successor stock incentive plan of Parent or Company. (t) "Executive" has the meaning given to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. (u) "Effective Date" means January 1, 2006. (v) "Fiscal Year" means the fiscal year of Parent. (w) "Good Reason" means any of the following conditions (not consented to in advance by Executive in writing or ratified subsequently by Executive in writing), but only if such condition remain(s) in effect thirty (30) days after written notice to the Board from Executive of his intention to terminate his Employment for Good Reason which specifically identifies such condition: (i) Any material breach by Company of this Agreement with respect to its obligation to pay compensation, or provide benefits, to Executive; (ii) Any material, adverse change in Executive's title or authority as measured against Executive's title or authority immediately prior to such change; (iii) Assigning Executive duties which are inconsistent with the duties of the Chief Financial Officer of Company as historically defined or requiring Executive to report other than to the Chief Executive Officer; or (iv) Any relocation of Company's principal business office to a location that is more than 100 miles from Company's current principal business office during the Protected Period following a Change in Control. (x) "Parent" has the meaning given to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. (y) "Person" means any individual or any trust, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other entity. (z) "Pro Rata Bonus" means the Annual Incentive Bonus, if any, awarded to Executive consistent with the compensation practices established by the Committee with respect to other former executive level employees of Company with respect to the Fiscal Year in which Executive's employment terminates based on (i) the Company's actual financial performance against such financial performance targets as may have been set by the Committee for such Fiscal Year and (ii) the portion of such Fiscal Year during which Executive was employed. -4-
(aa) "Proprietary Information" has the meaning given to such term in Section 10. (bb) "Protected Period" means the period commencing 60 days before the Effective Date of a Change in Control and ending on the second anniversary of such Change in Control. (cc) "Separation Amount" means the sum of (i) twenty-four (24) months Base Salary, at the rate in effect on the Termination Date, and (ii) the Termination Bonus Amount. (dd) "Target Bonus Amount" has the meaning given to such term in Section 5. (ee) "Termination" means a termination of Executive's employment with Company and all its Affiliates for any reason, provided that such termination of employment would be considered a termination of employment for purposes of Section 409A of the Code. (ff) "Termination Bonus Amount" means the sum of the actual Annual Incentive Bonuses awarded and paid to Executive with respect to the two Fiscal Years immediately preceding the Fiscal Year in which the Termination Date occurs. (gg) "Termination Date" means the date as of which a Termination occurs with respect to Executive. (hh) "Zell Group" means Samuel Zell and his Affiliates. 2. Employment. From and after the Effective Date, Company hereby agrees to employ Executive for the Term of this Agreement as specified below and Executive hereby agrees to accept such ongoing employment for such Term on the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement. 3. Term. The Term of this Agreement shall commence on the Effective Date and continue until this Agreement is terminated in accordance with Section 6 below. 4. Title, Position and Duties. (a) Executive shall be employed as the Chief Financial Officer of Company and shall also serve as the Chief Financial Officer of Parent. Executive shall report directly to the Chief Executive Officer of Company and have such duties and responsibilities as are traditionally associated with the position of Chief Financial Officer at the Company and such additional duties and responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to Executive by the Chief Executive Officer or the Board, provided such duties and responsibilities are consistent with the office of Chief Financial Officer of Company as historically constituted. Such duties and responsibilities may include providing services to or on behalf of Parent or any Affiliate of Parent. (b) Executive shall diligently and to the best of his abilities assume, perform, and discharge all duties and responsibilities inherent is his position or otherwise assigned to Executive from time to time and shall fully and completely comply with any and all written rules, procedures or policies of Company or Parent as from time to time in effect. Executive -5-
shall devote all of his business time and efforts to Company and its Affiliates and shall not, without prior written consent from the Board, accept other employment or perform or render any services for compensation, or have a direct or indirect ownership interest in any other business, other than in the form of publicly traded securities constituting less than one percent (1%) of the vote or value of the outstanding securities of such public entity. The foregoing notwithstanding, Executive shall be allowed to engage in passive personal investment activity and charitable, educational, religious and similar types of non-compensated activities and speaking engagements, provided that such activity or service does not interfere with Executive's performance of his duties and responsibilities hereunder. The time involved in such activities, provided it is not significant, shall not be treated as vacation time. (c) Executive shall perform his duties and responsibilities at Company's principal business office. Executive acknowledges that his duties and responsibilities may require significant travel. (d) Executive hereby represents and warrants that there is no legal restriction on his ability to accept employment with Company or to perform his duties and responsibilities hereunder and that Executive is not subject to any contractual covenant that could restrict his activities on behalf of Company in any way. 5. Compensation and Benefits. Executive shall be compensated by Company for his services as follows: (a) Base Salary. Executive shall be paid a Base Salary at an annual rate of Three Hundred Eighty-Five Thousand Dollars ($385,000.00) payable in equal installments in accordance with Company's normal payroll practice. At least annually, the Committee shall review Executive's Base Salary with a view to making such adjustment to such Base Salary as the Committee shall deem reasonable and appropriate, in its sole discretion, in light of Executive's performance and the financial performance of Company and Parent, provided that no such adjustment shall be made to reduce the Base Salary below Three Hundred Eighty-Five Thousand Dollars ($385,000.00) annually without Executive's written consent, unless such reduction is made in conjunction with and consistent with an overall reduction in base compensation paid to the senior executives of Company as a group. (b) Annual Bonus Compensation. Executive currently is eligible to participate in Parent's Management Incentive Plan. Executive shall continue to be eligible to participate in the Management Incentive Plan or such other short term incentive plan as Company or Parent may adopt from time to time for the benefit of its senior executives and to earn Annual Incentive Bonuses under such plan as may from time to time be in effect based on the financial performance of Company and Executive's personal performance against annual targets, goals or other criteria as may be set by the Committee from time to time. Executive's Target Bonus Amount under the Management Incentive Plan shall be Three Hundred Sixty-Five Thousand Dollars ($365,000.00). The Committee shall have the right to adjust such Target Bonus Amount from time to time consistent with similar adjustments made to the bonus opportunities of other senior executives, but shall not reduce the amount of such Target Bonus Amount under the Management Incentive Plan without Executive's written consent, unless such reduction is made in conjunction with and consistent with an overall reduction in target bonuses for the senior -6-
executives of Company as a group. The amount of Executive's Target Bonus Amount under any successor plan, program or arrangement shall be set by the Compensation Committee in its sole discretion, provided that Executive's total Base Salary and target bonus opportunity under such successor plan shall be reasonably equivalent to his total Base Salary and Target Bonus Amount under the Management Incentive Plan immediately prior thereto. The Committee shall with respect to each Fiscal Year advise Executive of the criteria to be utilized by the Committee in determining the amount of any actual bonus award under the Management Incentive Plan or any successor plan. The amount of any Annual Incentive Bonus, if any, shall be determined by the Committee in its sole discretion taking into consideration the financial performance of Company and the achievement of the identified bonus criteria, including any of Executive's personal performance criteria. Any Annual Incentive Bonus awarded to Executive shall be paid to Executive at the same time as Annual Incentive Bonuses are paid to other senior executives of Company. (c) Equity Based Compensation. Executive shall be eligible to receive awards under the Anixter International Inc. 2001 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended, or any successor equity based compensation plan for senior executives as may be adopted by Parent or Company from time to time. The timing, number of options, shares or equity units involved, and terms and conditions of all such awards shall be determined by the Committee in its sole discretion and shall be subject to the terms of the plan under which such award is made. As a condition to receiving such grants, Executive agrees not to make an election under Section 83(b) of the Code with respect to any such grant. (d) Benefits. Executive shall be eligible, on at least the same basis as other similarly situated members of senior management of Company, to participate in and to receive benefits under any of Company's employee benefit plans, programs or arrangements, in accordance with the terms of such plans, programs or arrangements as in effect from time to time. Company agrees to take all reasonable and necessary steps amend the Anixter Inc. Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan such that (i) in the event Executive's employment is terminated under Section 6(d) below, Executive would be entitled to a pro rata vested benefit under such plan based on the months of Executive's employment from and after August 2004 through and including August 2009 and (ii) in the event Executive's employment is terminated under Section 6(d) below during the Protected Period, Executive would be entitled to a full vested benefit under the Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan. (e) Expense Reimbursement. Executive shall be entitled to reimbursement from Company for all reasonable and customary travel and other business expenses incurred by Executive in carrying out his duties under this Agreement, in accordance with the general reimbursement policy of Company as in effect from time to time. Executive shall report all such reimbursable expenditures to Company not less frequently than monthly accompanied by adequate records and other documentary evidence as required by Company's reimbursement policy, and federal or state tax statutes or regulations governing the substantiation of such expenditures. Executive's right to reimbursement in accordance with Company's policies as in effect from time to time shall survive termination of this Agreement. (f) Vacation. Executive shall be entitled to paid vacation time in accordance with Company's vacation policy as in effect from time to time. -7-
(g) Withholding. Company shall have the right to deduct and withhold from any taxable compensation paid to or for the benefit of Executive hereunder, whether paid in cash or in property, any federal, state or local income, employment or other taxes required by law to be withheld by Company with respect to such payment or any other taxable payment or transfer made by Company for the benefit of Executive. (h) Right of Offset/ Right of Recoupment. Company shall have the right to offset any and all amounts due and owing from Executive to Company or any Affiliate against any obligation of Company to pay compensation to Executive. To the extent required by law, Company shall have a right of recoupment from Executive to the extent compensation, in any form, is awarded or is paid to Executive based on the reported financial results of Company or its Affiliates and such financial results are subsequently required to be restated by Company's independent auditors. No payment or benefits provided Executive hereunder shall be reduced by any amount Executive may earn or receive from employment with another employer or any other source. 6. Termination of Employment. (a) Termination by Executive Other than for Good Reason. Executive may terminate his employment during the Term upon ninety (90) days prior written notice to Company for other than Good Reason (as defined below). In such event, this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied, except that Executive shall be entitled to and shall be subject to the following as applicable: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, or Accrued Bonus Amount; (ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in such plans shall terminate as of the Termination Date, except as otherwise required by law; and (iii) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grant, provided that in the event Executive fails to provide the required ninety (90) days advance written notice of his Termination, Executive's rights with respect to any unvested Equity Awards shall immediately terminate and be forfeited. (b) Death or Disability. Executive's employment shall automatically terminate upon his death and such employment shall terminate at Company's election in the event of his Disability, unless otherwise prohibited by law. In such event, this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied and discharged, except that Executive or his legal representatives, as applicable, will be entitled to and subject to the following: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, Accrued Bonus Amount or Pro Rata Bonus; -8-
(ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in all such plans shall terminate as of the date his employment terminates, except as otherwise required by law; (iii) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grant. (iv) If the Termination is due to Disability, the payments specified in paragraph (d)(iii) below, provided that Executive's right to such payments shall be contingent upon Executive's execution of a release of all claims against Company in the form of Exhibit A hereto and further provided that Company's payment obligation shall be reduced and offset by any and all payments to or on behalf of Executive under any disability insurance coverage paid for by Company. (c) Termination for Cause. Company may terminate Executive's employment for Cause at any time by following the procedure set forth in paragraph (h) below. In such event, this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied and discharged, except that Executive be entitled to and shall be subject to the following as applicable: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, or Accrued Bonus Amount; (ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in all such plans shall terminate as of the date Executive's employment terminates, except as otherwise required by law; (iii) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grant, except that Executive's rights with respect to any unvested Equity Awards shall immediately terminate and be forfeited. (d) Termination By Company Other Than for Cause or By Executive for Good Reason. Company may terminate Executive's employment without Cause at any time without prior notice and Executive may terminate his employment for Good Reason upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to Company as set forth herein, subject to the Company's right to cure within such thirty (30) day period. Subject to paragraph (e) below, in the event of such a Termination this Agreement shall terminate as of the Termination Date and the obligations of Company hereunder shall be deemed fully satisfied and discharged, except that ,contingent upon Executive's execution of a release of all claims against Company in the form of Exhibit A hereto, Executive or his legal representatives, as applicable, will be entitled to and subject to the following: (i) Payment of any Accrued Base Salary, Accrued Vacation Amount, Accrued Bonus Amount or Pro Rata Bonus; -9-
(ii) Benefits in accordance with the terms of the applicable employee benefit plans; provided, that, Executive's participation in all such plans shall terminate as of the date Executive's employment terminates, except as otherwise required by law or expressly otherwise provided herein; (iii) Payment of an amount equal to the Separation Amount, payable as follows: (i) on the first day of the seventh calendar month following the month in which the Termination Date occurs, Executive shall be paid twenty-five percent (25%) of the Separation Amount and on the first day of the month for the next eighteen (18) months, Executive shall be paid 4.166667 percent of the Separation Amount; provided, however, that in the event the payments made under this paragraph are not subject to Section 409A(a)(2)(A)(i) of the Code on the Termination Date, then the Separation Amount shall be paid in twenty-four (24) equal installments commencing on the first day of the month coincident with or next following the Termination Date. (iv) Executive shall be entitled to continue participation for himself and his eligible dependants under Company's group health plan on the same terms as applicable to active employees for a period equal to the lesser of (i) twenty-four (24) months or (ii) the period from the Termination Date through the date Executive or such dependents, as the case may be, first become eligible for coverage under any group health plan of another employer; (v) Executive shall be eligible to elect COBRA continuation coverage as of the second anniversary of the Termination Date, assuming that Executive or his dependents were not otherwise eligible for coverage under any group health plan of another employer prior to such date; and (vi) Executive's rights with respect to any Equity Awards shall be determined under the terms of the plan under which such Equity Awards were granted and the terms of any grant agreement covering such grants, provided that any Equity Award which would have vested during the one hundred eighty days following the Termination Date shall be deemed vested on the Termination Date. (e) Termination Related to Change in Control. In the event that Company elects to terminate the employment of Executive other than for Cause or Executive elects to terminate such employment for Good Reason and the Termination Date is within the Protected Period any and all Equity Awards which are not vested on the Termination Date shall be deemed to have vested on the Termination Date. (f) Conditional Post-Termination Rights. EXECUTIVE ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT HIS RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS OR ANY OTHER CONSIDERATION FOLLOWING A TERMINATION OF HIS EMPLOYMENT IS EXPRESSLY CONDITIONED ON EXECUTIVE EXECUTING AND DELIVERING TO COMPANY THE FORM OF RELEASE ATTACHED HERETO AS EXHIBIT A HERETO. (g) Limitation On Payment Obligation. The foregoing notwithstanding, except as otherwise expressly provided below, in no event shall Company be obligated to make payments to Executive following his Termination that would constitute "excess parachute payments" within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code. The foregoing notwithstanding, in the event -10-
Company believes that any payment due Executive would be constitute an "excess parachute payment" and Executive will be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code, Company and Executive agree that (i) if the aggregate of all "parachute payments" (as such term is defined in Section 280G of the Code) does not exceed 333% of the "base amount" (as such term in defined in Section 280G of the Code), then the parachute payments shall be reduced to 299.99% of such base amount, or (ii) if the aggregate of all parachute payments exceeds 333% of the base amount, then Company shall pay to Executive the sum of (A) 299.99% of the base amount and (B) One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). (h) For Cause Termination Procedure. The Board shall only terminate Executive for Cause under paragraph (c) above after providing Executive with (i) at least ten days prior to the proposed termination date, written notice setting forth in detail the basis for the proposed termination, (ii) the opportunity to appear before the Board, with counsel, and provide rebuttal to such proposed termination, and (iii) written notice following such appearance confirming such termination and certifying that the decision to terminate Executive for Cause was approved by at least seventy-five percent of the members of the Board, excluding Executive. Unless otherwise directed by the Board, from and after the date of the notice under (i) above of the proposed termination, Executive shall be relieved of his duties and responsibilities and shall be considered to be on a paid leave of absence pending any final action by the Board confirming such proposed termination. 7. Confidentiality. Executive acknowledges that by virtue of his employment with Company, he has and will in the future be exposed to or has had or may have access to confidential information of Company or its Affiliates regarding its or their businesses (whether or not developed by Executive), including, but not limited to, algorithms, source code, system designs, data formats, analytical processes, methodologies, business practices, financial information or projections, customer lists or records, customer information, employee records, shareholder records, mark-ups, project materials, marketing techniques, supplier information, accounting methodologies, Creations or other information that gives, or may give, Company or its Affiliates an advantage in the marketplace against its competitors (all of the foregoing are hereinafter referred to collectively as the "Proprietary Information" except for information that was in the public domain when acquired or developed by Company, or that subsequently enters the public domain other than as a result of a breach of this or any other agreement or covenant). Executive further acknowledges that it would be possible for Executive, upon termination of his employment with Company, to use the Proprietary Information to benefit other individuals or entities, and that to the extent Executive engages in the Business or Competitive Activities for himself or others following the termination of his employment it is highly likely that such activity would inevitably require his use or disclosure of Proprietary Information. Executive acknowledges that Company has expended considerable time and resources in the development of the Proprietary Information and that the Proprietary Information has been disclosed to or learned by Executive solely in connection with Executive's employment with Company. Executive acknowledges that the Proprietary Information constitutes a proprietary and exclusive interest of Company, and, therefore, Executive agrees that during the term of his employment and after the termination thereof, for whatever reason, anywhere in the world, Executive shall not directly or indirectly disclose the Proprietary Information to any person, firm, court, governmental entity or body, corporation or other entity or use the Proprietary Information in any manner, except in connection with the business and affairs of Company or pursuant to a -11-
validly issued and enforceable court or administrative order. In the event that any court, administrative hearing officer or other judicial or governmental representative shall request or demand disclosure of any Proprietary Information, Executive shall promptly notify Company of the same and cooperate with Company to obtain appropriate protective orders in respect thereof. Executive further agrees to execute such further agreements or understandings regarding his agreement not to misuse or disclose Proprietary Information or Creations as Company may reasonably request. 8. Non-Solicitation/Non-Competition. Executive covenants and agrees that, while employed by Company, and for a period of 24 months following the termination of his employment for any reason, including during the Protected Period, he shall not: (a) without the written consent of the Board, directly or indirectly engage or assist any person engaging in the Business or any Competitive Activity (as defined below), individually, or as an officer, director, employee, agent, consultant, owner, partner, lender, manager, member, principal, or in any other capacity, or render any services to any entity which is engaged in the Business or Competitive Business; provided, however, that the ownership by Executive of not more than one percent (1%) of any class of equity security of any entity engaged in the Business or any Competitive Business shall not be deemed a breach of this Section provided such securities are listed on a national securities exchange or quotation system or have been registered under Section 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Upon the written request of Executive, the Board will advise Executive whether or not a specific activity which Executive in contemplating would violate the foregoing restriction, provided that (I) such request is made prior to Executive engaging in such activity and (II) Executive provides the Board with such information as the Board determines is necessary to make such determination. The current and continuing effectiveness of any such determination shall be conditioned on all such information provided by Executive being complete and accurate in all material respects; or (b) in any manner, directly or indirectly attempt to divert, take away, solicit, or assist others in soliciting any current or prospective customer, supplier, independent contractor or service provider of Company or any Affiliate or otherwise interfere with the relationship between Company or any Affiliate and any current or prospective customer, service provider, supplier, independent contractor, or shareholder; or (c) directly or indirectly solicit for employment other than on behalf of Company, seek to induce or influence any person to leave employment with Company, offer employment to, or employ any person who was an employee of Company within 6 months of such solicitation or offer; or (d) make any comment (whether or not true) to any Person that could be interpreted, whether or not in fact so interpreted, as critical or disparaging of Company or any of its Affiliates or that otherwise could be reasonably expected to be detrimental to Company or any of its Affiliates or their employees or operations, provided that the foregoing limitation shall not apply to truthful testimony as a witness in any administrative or other legal proceeding, compliance with any obligations imposed under applicable law, or assertion of a defense against any claim of breach of this Agreement by Company, or to his statements or disclosures to -12-
officers or directors of Company or Parent, and shall not require Executive to make false statements or disclosures. 9. Return of Materials. Executive shall, at any time upon the request of Company, and in any event upon his Termination for any reason, immediately return and surrender to Company all originals and all copies, regardless of medium, of all algorithms, source code, system designs, data formats, forms, records, notes, memoranda, price lists, supplier lists, brochures, project materials, sales materials, manuals, letterhead, business cards and other property belonging to Company, its Affiliates, or any of its clients, as the case may be, created or obtained by Executive as a result of or in the course of or in connection with Executive's employment regardless of whether such items constitute Proprietary Information. Executive acknowledges that all such materials are, and will remain, the exclusive property of Company. 10. Creations and Other Matters. (a) Executive agrees that all materials, inventions, discoveries, improvements or the like that Executive, individually or with others, may originate, develop or reduce to practice while employed with Company relating to the business or products of Company, Company's actual or demonstrably anticipated research or development or any work performed by Executive for Company (individually, a "Creation" and collectively, the "Creations") shall, as between Company and Executive, belong to and be the sole property of Company. Executive hereby waives any and all "moral rights," including, but not limited to, any right to identification of authorship, right of approval on modifications or limitation on subsequent modification, that Executive may have in respect of any Creation. Executive further agrees, without further consideration, to promptly disclose each such Creation to Company and to such other individuals as Company may direct. Executive further agrees to execute and to join others in executing such applications, assignments and other documents as may be necessary or convenient to vest in Company or any client of Company, as appropriate, full title to each such Creation and as may be reasonably necessary or convenient to obtain United States and foreign patents or copyrights thereon to the extent Company or any client of Company, as appropriate, may choose. Executive further agrees to testify in any legal or administrative proceeding relative to any such Creation whenever requested to do so by Company, provided that Company agrees to reimburse Executive for any reasonable expenses incurred in providing such testimony. (b) The foregoing covenant shall not apply to any Creation for which no equipment, supplies, facilities, or trade secret information of Company was used and which was developed entirely on Executive's own time, unless (i) the Creation relates to (A) the business of Company or (B) any actual or reasonably anticipated research or development of Company or (ii) the Creation results from any work performed by Executive for Company. 11. Post-Termination Cooperation. Executive agrees that following his Termination for any reason he will be available on a reasonable basis consistent with and subject to Executive's other responsibilities to assist Company and its Affiliates, and will upon request assist Company and its Affiliates, (i) as necessary, for a period of twelve (12) months in order to insure the orderly transition of his duties and responsibilities and (ii) for a period of sixty (60) months in the prosecution or defense of any claims, suits, litigation, arbitrations, investigations, or other proceedings, whether pending or threatened involving Company or any Affiliate. Such -13-
assistance shall include, but not by way of limitation, attending meetings with and truthfully and completely answering questions posed by representatives of Company. Company shall reimburse Executive for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred at the request of Company upon submission of appropriate supporting documents. In addition, if Company is not then currently obligated to make severance payments to Executive under the terms of this Agreement, Company shall compensate executive for such time at a rate of $2,000.00 per day for providing such assistance. 12. Remedies. Executive acknowledges that in the event that his employment with Company terminates for any reason, he will be able to earn a livelihood without violating the foregoing restrictions and that his ability to earn a livelihood without violating such restrictions is a material condition to his employment with Company. Executive acknowledges that compliance with the covenants set forth in Sections 7 through 11 hereof is necessary to protect the business, goodwill and Proprietary Information of Company and its clients and that a breach of these restrictions will irreparably and continually damage Company or its clients for which money damages may not be adequate. Consequently, Executive agrees that, in the event that he breaches or threatens to breach any of these covenants, Company shall be entitled to a temporary, preliminary or permanent injunction in order to prevent the continuation of such harm without any obligation to post a bond. In addition, without limiting Company's remedies for any breach of any restriction on Executive set forth in Sections 7 through 11 hereof, except as required by law, the obligation of Company to pay any amounts payable to Executive under Section 6 of this Agreement is contingent upon Executive's acting in accordance with the covenants of Sections 7 through 11 and in the event of any breach of such obligations, Company's obligation to make further payments shall terminate and Company shall be entitled to recoup from Executive all payments previously made to Executive under Section 6. Nothing in this agreement, however, shall be construed to prohibit Company from also pursuing any other remedy, the parties having agreed that all remedies are to be cumulative. The parties expressly agree that Company may, in its sole discretion, choose to enforce the covenants in Sections 7 through 11 hereof in part or to enforce any of said covenants to a lesser extent than that set forth herein. 13. Survival. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, Executive's obligations in Sections 7 through 11 (to the extent provided therein) and Company's obligations to make payments under Section 6 shall survive the termination of this Agreement. 14. Revision. The parties hereto expressly agree that in the event that any of the provisions, covenants, warranties or agreements in this Agreement are held to be in any respect an unreasonable restriction upon Executive or are otherwise invalid, for whatsoever cause, then the court so holding is hereby authorized to (a) reduce the territory to which said covenant, warranty or agreement pertains, the period of time in which said covenant, warranty or agreement operates or the scope of activity to which said covenant, warranty or agreement pertains or (b) effect any other change to the extent necessary to render any of the restrictions contained in this Agreement enforceable. 15. Dispute Resolution. In the event of any dispute or claim relating to or arising out of this Agreement (including, but not limited to, any claims of breach of contract, wrongful termination or age, sex, race or other discrimination), Executive and Company agree that all such -14-
disputes shall be fully and finally resolved by binding arbitration conducted by the American Arbitration Association ("AAA") in Chicago, Illinois in accordance with the AAA's National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes, provided, however, that this arbitration provision shall not apply to, and Company shall be free to seek, injunctive or other equitable relief with respect to any actual or threatened breach or violation by Executive of his obligations under Sections 7 through 11 hereof in any court having appropriate jurisdiction. Executive acknowledges that by accepting this arbitration provision he is waiving any right to a jury trial in the event of a covered dispute. The arbitrator may, but is not required, to order that the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover from the losing party its attorneys' fees and costs incurred in any arbitration arising out of this Agreement. 16. Interpretation. Executive and Company agree that this Agreement shall be interpreted in accordance with and governed by the internal laws of the State of Illinois. 17. Successors and Assigns. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon Company and its successors and assigns. In view of the personal nature of the services to be performed under this Agreement by Executive, he shall not have the right to assign or transfer any of his rights, obligations or benefits under this Agreement, except as otherwise noted herein. 18. Notice. Any notice provided for in this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed given on the date it is delivered in person or sent via overnight delivery service to the other party and addressed, In the case of Company, to: Anixter Inc. 2301 Patriot Boulevard Glenview, IL 60025 Attn: General Counsel And in the case of Executive, to Dennis J. Letham 357 E. Washington Ave. Lake Bluff, IL 60044 Or such other addresses as either party may designate by giving written notice of a change of address in the manner provided above. Notices given by personal delivery shall be deemed given on the date of delivery. Notices given by overnight courier service shall be deemed given upon deposit with the courier. If notice is given to a business address, receipt by a receptionist or any other person employed at such business address shall be deemed to constitute actual delivery to the addressee. 19. Validity. If any one or more of the provisions (or any part thereof) of this Agreement shall be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions (or any part thereof) shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby. Each term and provision of this agreement shall be valid and enforceable to -15-
the fullest extent permitted by law and any invalid, illegal or unenforceable term or provision shall be deemed replaced by a term or provision that is valid and enforceable and that comes closest to expressing the intention of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable term or provision. 20. Entire Agreement - Prior Agreements. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between Executive and Company regarding the terms and conditions of his employment. This Agreement supersedes all prior negotiations, representations or agreements between Executive and Company, whether written or oral, concerning Executive's employment by Company, including, but not by way of limitation, that certain, Employment Agreement, dated July 22, 1999, by and between Company and Executive and all amendments thereto. The foregoing notwithstanding, except as otherwise expressly provided herein, entering into this Agreement shall not effect the rights and obligations of Company and Executive with respect to any Equity Awards or any prior equity incentive compensation plan of Company or Parent or the rights and obligations of Company and Executive under the Anixter Inc. Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, effective as of August 4, 2004. In entering into this agreement, Executive has consulted with independent legal counsel and has not relied upon any representation not set forth herein. 21. Modification. This Agreement may only be modified or amended by a supplemental written agreement signed by Executive and Company. 22. Insurance and Indemnification. For the period from the date hereof through at least the tenth anniversary of Executive's termination, or the maximum period allowed under the applicable insurance policy, if shorter, Company agrees (i) to name Executive as an insured party on all directors and officers liability insurance maintained by Company or Parent for the benefit of its officers or directors and provide coverage on at least the same basis as other covered persons and (ii) to provide Executive with at least the same indemnification rights as it provides to its other officers. 23. Non-Disparagement. Company, on behalf of itself and all of its Affiliates agrees that during the term of this Agreement and for a period of twenty-four months after the Termination Date, they shall not formally make any comment (whether or not true) to any Person that could be interpreted, whether or not in fact so interpreted, as critical or disparaging of Executive or that otherwise could be reasonably expected to be detrimental to Executive, provided that the foregoing limitation shall not apply to truthful testimony as a witness in any administrative or legal proceeding, statements or disclosures made in compliance with other obligations imposed under applicable law, or assertion of a defense against any claim of breach of this Agreement by Executive, and shall not require Company or any Affiliate to make false statements or disclosures. 24. Counterparts. The parties may execute this Agreement in one or more counterparts, all of which together shall constitute but one Agreement. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date and year written below. -16-
ANIXTER INC. Date: By: ------------------------------- ------------------------------------ Its: ----------------------------------- Date: ------------------------------- ---------------------------------------- DENNIS J. LETHAM ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Date: By: ------------------------------- ------------------------------------ Its: ----------------------------------- But only for the limited purposes expressly noted in the introductory paragraph hereof -17-
EXHIBIT A FORM OF RELEASE Date: ________________________ In consideration of the agreement of Anixter Inc. ("Company") to enter into that certain Employment Agreement, dated as January 1, 2006, with the undersigned and the promises and covenants of Company made there under, the undersigned, on behalf of himself and his respective heirs, representatives, executors, family members, and assigns hereby fully and forever releases and discharges Company and its past, present and future shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, attorneys, investors, administrators, affiliates, divisions, subsidiaries, predecessors, successors and assigns from and against, and agrees not to sue or otherwise institute or cause to be instituted any legal, alternative dispute resolution or administrative proceeding concerning, any claim, duty, obligation or cause of action relating to any matters of any kind, whether presently known or unknown, suspected or unsuspected, that he may possess arising from any omissions, acts or facts that have occurred through the date his employment terminates, including without limitation: A. Any and all claims relating to or arising from his employment by Company and the termination of such employment; B. Any and all claims under his Employment Agreement; C. Any and all claims for wrongful discharge, termination in violation of good policy, discrimination, breach of contract, both expressed or implied, covenants of good faith or fair dealing, both expressed or implied, promissory estoppel, negligent or intentional infliction of emotional distress, negligent or intentional misrepresentation, negligent or intentional interference with contract or prospective economic advantage, unfair business practice, defamation, libel, slander, negligence, personal injury, assault, battery, invasion of privacy, false imprisonment, or conversion; D. Any and all claims for violation of any federal, state or municipal statute, including, without limitation, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Civil Rights Act of 1991, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, and all amendments to each such Act as well as the regulations issued there under; E. Any and all claims based on the violation of the federal or any state constitution; F. Any and all claims for attorneys' fees and costs. The foregoing release shall not apply with respect to Company's payment obligations under Sections 5 and 6 of the Employment Agreement or the undersigned's rights under any "employee benefit plans" as that term is defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security -18-
Act of 1974, as amended. THE UNDERSIGNED ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (I) HE HAS BEEN ADVISED BY COMPANY TO CONSULT A LAWYER OF HIS OWN CHOICE PRIOR TO EXECUTING THIS RELEASE AND HAS DONE SO OR VOLUNTARILY DECLINED TO SEEK SUCH COUNSEL, (II) HE HAS READ THIS RELEASE AND UNDERSTANDS THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS HEREOF AND THE BINDING NATURE HEREOF, (III) HE HAS HAD AT LEAST TWENTY-ONE (21) DAYS WITHIN WHICH TO CONSIDER THE TERMS OF THIS RELEASE AND EXECUTED THIS RELEASE VOLUNTARILY AND WITHOUT DURESS OR UNDUE INFLUENCE ON THE PART OF COMPANY, (IV) HE HAS SEVEN (7) DAYS TO REVOKE HIS EXECUTION OF THIS RELEASE AND THAT SUCH EXECUTION SHALL NOT BE EFFECTIVE UNTIL SEVEN (7) DAYS FOLLOWING DELIVERY TO COMPANY, AND (V) HE UNDERSTANDS THAT HIS RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS UNDER SECTION 6 OF THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT IS SUBJECT TO AND CONDITIONED ON THE UNDERSIGNED'S FULL AND COMPLETE COMPLIANCE WITH THE COVENANTS FOLLOWING HIS TERMINATION AND SUBJECT TO FULL RECOUPMENT BY COMPANY IN THE EVENT OF A VIOLATION OF ANY COVENANT. Initially capitalized terms used in this release and defined in the Agreement shall have the meanings given to such terms under the Agreement. ------------------------------------- Printed Name ------------------------------------- Signature Date: ---------------------------------- - --------------------------------- Notary My Commission expires ________________. -19-

Exhibit 99.1 FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR AND MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC ANNOUNCES ADDITION TO BOARD OF DIRECTORS GLENVIEW, IL, JANUARY 3, 2006 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), announced that its Board of Directors has been expanded with the appointment of Linda Walker Bynoe as a director, effective as of January 1, 2006. The addition of Bynoe increases the number of directors to 11. Bynoe has also been named to serve on Anixter's Compensation and Nominating & Governance Committees. Ms. Bynoe is currently President and Chief Executive Officer of Telemat Ltd., a project management and consulting firm based in Chicago. Ms. Bynoe also manages a private equity investment portfolio. Prior to joining Telemat in 1989, she held positions in the Capital Markets Division of Morgan Stanley (1978 - 1989) and in public accounting (1975 - 1978), where she obtained her license as a Certified Public Accountant. Ms. Bynoe currently serves as a director of Dynegy Inc., a wholesale power generator; Simon Property Group, Inc., a real estate investment trust engaged in the ownership and management of retail real estate; Prudential Retail Mutual Funds, a diversified fund complex; and Fidelity Life Association, a mutual insurance company. "We are delighted to have Linda join the Anixter board and look forward to working with her," said Robert Grubbs, President and Chief Executive Officer. "We expect that her extensive experience in providing transactional and strategic advisory services to diverse clients will help us capitalize on the opportunities and challenges that lie ahead." ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $650 million in inventory, 3) 200 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 220 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20060201165558.txt.gz
TIME:20060201165558
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
================================================================================ UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): January 31, 2006 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.)
2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c)) ================================================================================
ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On January 31, 2006, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 30, 2005. The Company's press release, dated January 31, 2006 is attached as Exhibit 99.1. ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated January 31, 2006 issued by Anixter International Inc.
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. February 1, 2006 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham ------------------------------------ Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX

EXHIBIT 99.1 FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR AND MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS RECORD FOURTH QUARTER OPERATING INCOME ON SALES OF $1.03 BILLION GLENVIEW, IL, JANUARY 31, 2006 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended December 30, 2005. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (In millions, except per share amounts) Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "Sales in the most recent quarter were stronger than expected, as the anticipated slowdown surrounding the Thanksgiving and Christmas holiday periods was less pronounced than historical patterns had indicated. At the same time, all-time high copper prices had a positive effect on our sales and earnings in the specialty wire & cable market. These two factors, along with continued organic growth throughout many areas of the business, drove record operating income results for the Company during the quarter." FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended December 30, 2005, sales of $1.03 billion produced an all-time high quarterly operating income of $54.7 million and net income of $20.1 million, or 49 cents per diluted share. As previously reported, an incremental income tax provision of $7.7 million or 19 cents per diluted share was recorded related to the repatriation to the U.S. of accumulated foreign earnings under the American Jobs Creation Act. The quarter also included sales of $66.4 million from Infast, which was acquired on July 8, 2005. In the prior year period, sales of $848.3 million generated operating income of $41.4 million and net income of $25.6 million, or 64 cents per diluted share. These prior year results benefited from a number of unusual items. Operating income benefited from net favorable adjustments to cost of
sales of $10.2 million ($6.1 million after-tax, or 15 cents per diluted share) due to a reduction in the risks associated with the value of certain inventories. Operating results in the 2004 fourth quarter were also affected by a number of unfavorable expense items, including moving costs related to the relocation of the Company's largest distribution center and severance costs associated with a reduction in staffing levels in Europe. These unfavorable operating expense items combined to reduce fourth quarter operating earnings by $4.4 million ($2.9 million after-tax, or 7 cents per diluted share). Lastly, due to the consolidation of the accounts receivable securitization facility, the prior year fourth quarter benefited from a gain of $6.4 million ($3.8 million after-tax, or 9 cents per diluted share) arising from the recapture of the remaining original discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when the accounts receivable securitization facility was initiated. Operating income in the most recent quarter of $54.7 million, a record for any quarter in the Company's history, resulted in operating margins of 5.3 percent. If the additional income tax provision of $7.7 million (or 19 cents per diluted share) related to the repatriation of accumulated foreign earnings was excluded, then net income would have been $27.8 million, or 67 cents per diluted share. Excluding the additional tax provision of $7.7 million identified above, the tax rate for the recent quarter was 38.4 percent versus 38.9 percent in the prior year fourth quarter. (NOTE: A TABLE RECONCILING ALL OF THE ABOVE ITEMS FOLLOWS AT THE END OF THIS RELEASE) TWELVE MONTH RESULTS For the twelve-month period ended December 30, 2005, sales of $3.85 billion produced operating income of $189.4 million and net income of $90.0 million, or $2.22 per diluted share. Sales for 2005 include $126.4 million from Infast, which was acquired on July 8, 2005, and incremental revenues of $36.7 million from the June 22, 2004 acquisition of the assets and operations of Distribution Dynamics, Inc. Net income for the year includes the previously mentioned $7.7 million additional tax provision related to the repatriation of foreign earnings, a charge of $1.2 million ($0.7 million after-tax, or 2 cents per diluted share) related to the early retirement of debt and a tax credit of $1.4 million, or 3 cents per diluted share, related to a favorable income tax ruling in Europe. Sales of $3.28 billion in 2004 produced operating income of $138.0 million and resulted in income before extraordinary gain of $73.6 million, or $1.90 per diluted share. In addition to the previously mentioned $10.2 million net favorable adjustments to cost of sales, the operating expense items of $4.4 million and the $6.4 million gain on the consolidation of the accounts receivable facility, the prior year also includes a $2.6 million ($1.5 million after-tax, or 4 cents per diluted share) charge for asset impairment and acquisition-related charges, along with a charge of $0.7 million ($0.4 million after-tax, or 1 cent per diluted share) for the early retirement of debt. In 2004, the Company also reported an extraordinary after-tax gain of $4.1 million, or 11 cents per diluted share, associated with the receipt of $4.7 million of cash for a 1983 matter related to Itel Corporation, the predecessor of the Company. Operating income in 2005 of $189.4 million resulted in operating margins of 4.9 percent. If the $1.2 million charge for the early retirement of debt, the tax credit in Europe and the incremental tax provision related to the repatriation of accumulated foreign earnings were excluded from net income, then net income in 2005 would have been $97.0 million, or $2.39 per diluted share. Excluding the favorable income tax ruling in Europe and the additional tax provision of $7.7
million identified above, the tax rate for the year was 38.8 percent versus 39.0 percent in the prior year. (NOTE: A TABLE RECONCILING ALL OF THE ABOVE ITEMS FOLLOWS AT THE END OF THIS RELEASE) FOURTH QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the fourth quarter grew at a 14 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for the $66.4 million in sales related to the July 8, 2005 acquisition of Infast and $5.4 million for the foreign currency effects of a stronger U.S. dollar. This was the highest quarterly organic growth rate experienced in 2005." Grubbs continued, "Fourth quarter organic growth in the specialty wire & cable market benefited from record copper prices, continued strength in market demand and new customer acquisition. During the quarter, market-based copper prices averaged approximately $2.03 per pound, compared to the year ago fourth quarter of $1.38 per pound, accounting for approximately $15 million of the year-on-year increase in sales. The fourth quarter sales comparison also benefited from the fact that the New Year's holiday fell within our fiscal 2006 calendar, while last year it fell within the 2004 fiscal year." "Similar to previous quarters, throughout the fourth quarter we saw strong demand in virtually all of our end markets, both by geography and by product set. Our efforts to expand our customer base and product set continued to positively impact our results," said Grubbs. "In North America, sales grew by 17 percent. In addition to the impact of high copper prices, North American sales were up $3.6 million due to the stronger Canadian dollar and $4.9 million due to the acquisition of Infast. These three items represented 4 percent of the 17 percent sales growth. Outside of North America, we saw sales climb by 37 percent in Europe as compared to the year ago quarter," commented Grubbs. "The major factor driving European sales growth was the July 8, 2005 acquisition of Infast, which added $61.5 million to European sales in the quarter. Adjusting for the stronger U.S. dollar impact of $10.3 million and for the Infast sales, European sales grew organically by just two percent as compared to the year ago quarter. The low organic growth rate reflects weak market conditions in much of continental Europe. In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 21 percent increase in year-on-year sales, which included a $1.3 million favorable currency exchange rate effect. Specifically, Latin America again reported very strong year-on-year sales gains of 24 percent. In Asia, we saw sales increase by 12 percent versus the prior year's fourth quarter," continued Grubbs. FOURTH QUARTER OPERATING RESULTS "In the fourth quarter, operating margins were a solid 5.3 percent," said Grubbs. "We approached the fourth quarter with a tight grip on operating expenses in anticipation of a 'normal' seasonal slowdown. Because end market-demand failed to show the expected seasonal turndown and copper prices reached record levels, we were easily able to maintain our gross margin. This situation, combined with the tightly controlled operating expenses, generated record levels of quarterly operating profits."
Grubbs continued, saying, "In North America, where our specialty wire & cable business is concentrated, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 6.5 percent. In Europe, operating margins in the fourth quarter of 2005 were 1.2 percent as compared to 0.3 percent in the year ago quarter, after adjusting for severance costs in the fourth quarter of 2004. Our enterprise cabling and security solutions business in Europe, as it has for the past few quarters, continued to suffer from comparatively weak demand and very competitive pricing. Also, as we expected, the recently acquired Infast operations contributed positively to operating income. Emerging markets reported operating margins of 4.5 percent in the most recent quarter as compared to 5.0 percent in the year ago quarter - when Asia Pacific reported an exceptionally strong quarter." SPECIAL DIVIDEND, LEVERAGE AND CASH FLOW "The major cash flow event of the fourth quarter was the payment of the special $4.00 per share dividend, which resulted in a total cash outflow of $154 million," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "As a result of this dividend payment, the company's debt-to-total capital ratio increased to 47.0 percent at the end of 2005 as compared to 35.1 percent at the end of 2004." "Due to this distribution of capital, which management and the Board determined to be in excess of the near-term needs of the Company, combined with the improved operating performance, we have been able to substantially increase the Company's return on equity," continued Letham. "Cash flow from operations for the full-year of 2005 was slightly positive. As we enter 2006, it is our expectation that our organic growth rates, which we continue to believe will be between 8 to 12 percent for the year, will generate positive cash flow from operations. The combination of this expected cash flow with the $293 million in unused credit facilities gives the Company the resources and flexibility necessary to fulfill its strategic growth needs in the coming year," said Letham. BUSINESS OUTLOOK Concluding, Grubbs said, "We are pleased with the strong finish to fiscal 2005 and the results for the year overall. As we head into 2006, the overall economic outlook appears to be reasonably stable. Good execution on our part in continuing to develop our global security products business, the global expansion of our specialty wire & cable business and the integration and consolidation of recent acquisitions will be the important factors to our success in 2006. While regional economic conditions and commodity price fluctuations have the potential to negatively impact 2006, we believe our market opportunities and focus will create the opportunity to have another solid year of earnings growth in 2006." FOURTH QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the 2005 fourth quarter on Tuesday, January 31, 2006, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site,
StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $700 million in inventory, 3) 200 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 220 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - RECONCILIATION TABLE a) Unfavorable tax adjustment of $7.7 million related to the repatriation of accumulated foreign earnings. b) Net favorable adjustments to cost of sales of $10.2 million arising primarily from the reduction in risks associated with the value of certain inventories. c) Unfavorable expenses of $4.4 million related to the relocation of the Company's largest distribution facility and severance costs associated with a staffing reduction in Europe. d) Gain of $6.4 million arising from the recapture of the remaining original issue discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when the accounts receivable securitization facility was initiated. e) Net decrease in taxes of $5.2 million associated with the items noted in b), c) and d) above.
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - RECONCILIATION TABLE a) Write-off of deferred financing costs associated with the early extinguishment of debt. b) Net unfavorable tax adjustments of $5.8 million related to the repatriation of accumulated foreign earnings, the tax credit in Europe and the tax effect associated with the item noted in a) above c) Net favorable adjustments to cost of sales of $10.2 million arising primarily from the reduction in risks associated with the value of certain inventories. d) Unfavorable expenses of $5.2 million related to the relocation of the Company's largest distribution facility, severance costs associated with a staffing reduction in Europe and acquisition-related charges. e) Impairment charge of $1.8 million for the write-off of intangible assets associated with the Pentacon tradename. f) Gain of $6.4 million arising from the recapture of the remaining original issue discount expense that was recorded in 2000 when the accounts receivable securitization facility was initiated. g) Net decrease in taxes of $3.8 million associated with the items noted in a), c), d), e) and f) above.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20060426172906.txt.gz
TIME:20060426172906
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 25, 2006 COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 1-5989 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 94-1658138 (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 2301 PATRIOT BLVD. GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 (224) 521-8000 (Address and telephone number of principal executive offices) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On April 25, 2006, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2006. The Company's press release, dated April 25, 2006 is attached as Exhibit 99.1. ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated April 25, 2006 issued by Anixter International Inc.
SIGNATURES PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, THE REGISTRANT HAS DULY CAUSED THIS REPORT TO BE SIGNED ON ITS BEHALF BY THE UNDERSIGNED, THEREUNTO DULY AUTHORIZED. ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. April 26, 2006 By: /s/ Dennis J. Letham --------------------------------------- Dennis J. Letham Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NO. DESCRIPTION 99.1 Press Release, dated April 25, 2006 issued by Anixter International Inc.

FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: EXHIBIT 99.1 AT THE COMPANY: AT ASHTON PARTNERS: DENNIS LETHAM CHRIS KETTMANN CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER INVESTOR AND MEDIA INQUIRIES (224) 521-8601 (312) 553-6716 ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. REPORTS FIRST QUARTER NET INCOME OF 74 CENTS PER DILUTED SHARE ON SALES OF $1.07 BILLION GLENVIEW, IL, APRIL 25, 2006 - Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006. FIRST QUARTER HIGHLIGHTS o Record quarterly sales of $1.07 billion, including $70.1 million from the July 8, 2005 acquisition of Infast Group plc ("Infast"), rose 22 percent compared to sales of $876.5 million in the year ago quarter. o Record quarterly operating income of $59.6 million reflects a 51 percent increase from the $39.6 million reported in the first quarter of 2005. o Net income in the quarter increased 53 percent, to $31.3 million, from $20.4 million in last year's first quarter. o Diluted earnings per share rose 45 percent to 74 cents per share from 51 cents per share in the prior year quarter. o Cash flow from operations was $12.9 million as compared to $7.1 million in the year ago quarter. FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (In millions, except per share amounts) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "Sales in the most recent quarter reflect a continuation of the trends of the past several quarters. We again saw solid, broad-based sales growth in nearly all of the end markets we serve. Growth was particularly strong in the electrical and electronic wire & cable market due to strong end-market customer demand. Our continued success in the first quarter led to record quarterly sales and operating performance for the company." - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
FIRST QUARTER RESULTS For the three-month period ended March 31, 2006, sales of $1.07 billion produced net income of $31.3 million, or 74 cents per diluted share. Included in the current year's first quarter were sales of $70.1 million from Infast, which was acquired on July 8, 2005. In the prior year period, sales of $876.5 million generated net income of $20.4 million, or 51 cents per diluted share. Operating income in the first quarter increased 51 percent to $59.6 million as compared to $39.6 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 5.6 percent as compared to 4.5 percent in the first quarter of 2005. FIRST QUARTER SALES TRENDS Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the first quarter grew at a 15 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for the acquisition of Infast and the negative effects of a stronger U.S. dollar that reduced comparative first quarter sales by $5.2 million. This was one of the highest rates of organic growth we have experienced in any quarter since the economic recovery began in 2004." Grubbs continued, "Our organic growth was the result of strong demand from customers in nearly all end markets. As has been the case over the past few quarters we saw continued growth in larger project business particularly as it relates to data center builds in the enterprise cabling market and in the natural resources market within our electrical and electronic wire & cable market. At the same time, we have seen continued strong growth in security product sales. Lastly, rising copper prices contributed to our organic growth in the most recent quarter. During the quarter, market-based copper prices averaged approximately $2.25 per pound, as compared to $1.47 per pound in the year ago first quarter. We estimate that the higher copper prices accounted for approximately $24.2 million of our year-on-year increase in sales." "In North America we saw sales grow by 20 percent. In addition to strong end-market demand, North American sales were up $6.5 million due to the stronger Canadian dollar, $5.1 million due to the acquisition of Infast, and $22.6 million due to higher copper prices," commented Grubbs. "Outside of North America, we saw sales climb by 30 percent in Europe as compared to the year ago quarter. The major factor in European sales growth was the July 8, 2005 acquisition of Infast, which added $65.0 million to European sales in the quarter. At the same time, sales comparisons versus the first quarter of the prior year were negatively affected by $12.6 million due to the stronger U.S. dollar. Adjusting for the Infast sales and exchange rate differences, European sales declined by 1 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. This slight decline reflects weak market conditions in much of continental Europe." "In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 26 percent increase in year-on-year sales, which included a $0.9 million favorable currency exchange rate effect. Specifically, Latin America reported very strong year-on-year sales gains of 29 percent. In Asia Pacific, we saw sales increase by 18 percent versus the prior year's first quarter," continued Grubbs. FIRST QUARTER OPERATING RESULTS "As a result of strong sales growth in most major end markets, first quarter operating margins were 5.6 percent," said Grubbs. "In North America the 20 percent sales growth resulted in better
operating leverage that generated operating margins of 6.0 percent as compared to 4.9 percent in the prior year first quarter." "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 3.4 percent as compared to 3.6 percent in the year ago quarter. Solid operating performance improvement was partially offset by the need to record a provision of $1.1 million for a lease guarantee related to a facility operated by a former Infast affiliate that ceased operations. Excluding this charge, our European operating margins in the most recent quarter would have been 3.8 percent. Our European OEM Supply business had its best operating quarter since the mid-2005 acquisition of Infast, with operating margins of 4.3 percent. This solid operating performance, however, was partially negated by the lease guarantee provision of $1.1 million that reduced the reported first quarter OEM operating margin to 3.3 percent." Commenting further, Grubbs said, "Our communications business in Europe, as it has for the past few quarters, continued to be challenged by comparatively weak demand and very competitive pricing." "Aided by a favorable sales tax-related settlement in Australia of $2.2 million, Emerging Markets reported operating margins of 7.4 percent in the most recent quarter as compared to 2.4 percent in the year ago quarter. Excluding the favorable sales tax-related adjustment, operating margins in the Emerging Markets in the first quarter were 4.3 percent. Strong revenue growth, particularly in Latin America, continues to allow us to better leverage infrastructure costs in these markets," added Grubbs. CASH FLOW AND LEVERAGE "Given the incremental working capital requirements that typically accompany strong organic sales growth, we were pleased that we were able to manage working capital growth to a level that produced $12.9 million of cash flow from operations in the first quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "As a result of the positive cash flow in the quarter, we were able to reduce our debt-to-total capital leverage ratio from 47.0 percent at year-end to 45.1 percent at the end of the first quarter." "At the end of the first quarter, we had available unused credit facilities of $293.2 million. With the unused credit facilities and the expectation of continued positive cash flow from operations during the balance of the year, we have the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives such as acquisitions." BUSINESS OUTLOOK Concluding, Grubbs said, "We are pleased with the strong start to the new fiscal year. The overall economic outlook appears to be reasonably stable. As always, our ability to execute our strategic initiatives, such as continued development of our security products business on a global basis, integration and consolidation of recent acquisitions and product line expansion in our European and Emerging Markets businesses will be a key to how successful we are for the full year. As we look to the remainder of 2006, the largest potential negative we face would be a drop in copper prices from the historic high levels of recent months. Assuming a reasonable level of successful execution on our part and barring a dramatic drop in copper prices or overall economic softening, we expect to generate continued solid year-on-year earnings growth through the balance of the year."
FIRST QUARTER EARNINGS REPORT Anixter will report results for the 2006 first quarter on Tuesday, April 25, 2006, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at www.anixter.com. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at www.companyboardroom.com, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (www.streetevents.com). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days. ABOUT ANIXTER Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and nearly $725 million in inventory, 3) 197 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 220 cities in 45 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE. Safe Harbor Statement The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ANIXTER IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET AT www.anixter.com
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20060728165905.txt.gz
TIME:20060728165905
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 25, 2006, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2006. The Company's press release, dated July 25, 2006 is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release, dated July 25, 2006 issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended June 30, 2006.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 25, 2006 
Second Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "We were very pleased with our results, with sales in the most recent quarter reflecting a significant acceleration of the trends of the past several quarters. We experienced very solid, broad-based sales growth in nearly all of the end markets we serve and we made continued progress on our initiatives to grow our security business and supply chain service offerings. Second quarter growth was particularly strong in the electrical and electronic wire & cable market due to strong end-market customer demand, global expansion of the markets served and higher copper prices. Our success in these areas during the second quarter led to record quarterly sales and operating performance for the company."
Second Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended June 30, 2006, sales of $1.24 billion produced net income of $49.4 million, or $1.15 per diluted share. Included in the current year's second quarter results were sales of $74.8 million from the Infast and IMS acquisitions, which were completed in July 2005 and May 2006, respectively. In the prior year period, sales of $936.1 million generated net income of $24.4 million, or 61 cents per diluted share.
Operating income in the second quarter increased 97 percent to $91.0 million as compared to $46.2 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 7.3 percent as compared to 4.9 percent in the second quarter of 2005.
First Half 2006 Results
For the six-month period ended June 30, 2006, sales of $2.31 billion produced net income of $80.7 million, or $1.89 per diluted share. Included in the 2006 six-month results were sales of $144.9 million related to the acquisitions of Infast and IMS. In the prior year period, sales of $1.81 billion produced net income of $44.8 million or $1.12 per diluted share.
Operating income in the first six months of fiscal 2006 increased 75 percent to $150.6 million as compared to $85.8 million in the year ago period. Operating margins in the first six months of 2006 were 6.5 percent as compared to 4.7 percent in the prior year period.
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the second quarter grew at a 23 percent organic rate year-over-year after adjusting for the Infast and IMS acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange impact of $14.0 million on second quarter sales. This was one of the highest quarterly organic growth rates in the company's history, even after allowing for sharply higher copper prices, and clearly exceeded our target organic growth rate of 8 to 12 percent."
Grubbs continued, "The factors driving our strong organic growth were consistent with those we have seen the past few quarters, although at a significantly accelerated pace. In the most recent quarter, we saw very strong growth in larger project business particularly as it relates to data center builds in the enterprise cabling market and with natural resources customers within our electrical and electronic wire & cable market. At the same time, we have seen continued strong growth in security product sales. Lastly, rising copper prices again contributed to our organic growth in the most recent quarter. During the quarter, market-based copper prices averaged approximately $3.39 per pound, compared to $1.53 per pound in the year ago second quarter and $2.25 per pound in the first quarter of 2006. We estimate that the higher copper prices accounted for an estimated $48 million of our year-on-year increase in sales within the electrical wire & cable market in the second quarter. Taking the impact of copper prices, acquisitions and foreign exchange out of the mix, however, we were still able to grow by nearly 18 percent over the prior year second quarter."
"Specifically, in North America we saw year-on-year sales grow by 31 percent to $922.7 million in the most recent quarter. In addition to strong end-market demand, North American sales were up $14.7 million due to the stronger Canadian dollar, $9.4 million due to the acquisitions of Infast and IMS, and an estimated $43 million due to higher copper prices," commented Grubbs. "Outside of North America, we saw sales climb by 46 percent in Europe as compared to the year ago quarter. The major factor driving European sales growth, with exchange rate differences in the quarter being immaterial, was the July 2005 acquisition of Infast, which added $65.5 million to European sales in the quarter. Adjusting for the Infast sales, European sales grew by 6 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. Most of the increase is attributable to a combination of market share gains and higher copper prices, which added an estimated $5 million to sales in the electrical wire & cable business in that area."
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 13 percent increase in year-on-year sales, with a negligible impact from currency exchange rate effects. The primary driver of the overall revenue increase was very strong year-on-year sales growth of 29 percent in Asia Pacific," continued Grubbs.
Second Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of very strong sales growth, second quarter operating margins were a record 7.3 percent as compared to 4.9 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, the 31 percent sales growth resulted in better operating leverage that generated operating margins of 8.3 percent as compared to 5.4 percent in the prior year second quarter. While strong market conditions and market share gains were the primary drivers of the sales growth and improved profitability, copper prices also played a major part in the strong second quarter operating results in North America. Record copper prices added an estimated $43 million to the sales of our North American electrical wire & cable sales. At the same time, the quick run-up in copper prices during the quarter significantly raised gross margins on electrical wire & cable sales from the sell-through of lower cost inventory. All in all, this year's second quarter North American operating profits benefited by an estimated $15 million due to the volume effects of higher copper prices combined with the gross margin effects."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.3 percent as compared to 3.4 percent in the year ago quarter. This improvement reflects a combination of organic sales growth, tight controls that resulted in a reduction of expenses, excluding expenses from the acquired Infast operations and an estimated $1 million benefit from higher copper prices. Organic sales growth in Europe continues to be a challenge given general economic conditions. Nonetheless, we were encouraged by the results in the most recent quarter because we achieved not only year-on-year sales growth but also significant quarter-on-quarter organic sales growth in our largest end market  enterprise cabling and security solutions."
"Operating margins in the Emerging Markets in the second quarter were 5.5 percent as compared to 4.4 percent in the year ago quarter. Continued sales growth throughout these markets has allowed us to better leverage infrastructure costs and improve operating margins" added Grubbs.
,
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Given the incremental working capital requirements that accompany strong organic sales growth, as expected we reported negative cash flow from operations in the second quarter of $52.5 million," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "When the second quarter negative cash flow is combined with the positive cash flow from operations in the first quarter, our year-to-date cash flow from operations is a negative $39.6 million. Despite the incremental borrowings to support the increased sales-volume-driven working capital requirements and to fund the purchase of IMS, strong net income performance has created a slight reduction of our debt-to-total capital leverage ratio from 47.0 percent at year-end to 46.2 percent at the end of the second quarter."
"For the second quarter our weighted average cost of borrowed capital was 5.3 percent compared to 5.1 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the second quarter, 66 percent of our total borrowings of $704.4 million were fixed, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging arrangements. We had $230.2 million of available, unused credit facilities at June 30, 2006. These available, unused credit facilities provide us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the coming quarters."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "The first half of 2006 has been a record-setting period of revenue growth and operating profitability for Anixter. This record performance is the result of strong underlying market fundamentals, solid progress on our strategic initiatives to build our security business, additions to our supply chain services offering, expansion of our product offering and the benefits of increased copper prices. As we enter the second half of the year, our ability to continue to execute our strategic initiatives, together with further progress on the integration of recent acquisitions, will be the keys to our success in the coming quarters. Matching our revenue growth rate from the second quarter is unlikely; however, assuming a reasonable level of successful execution on our part and barring a dramatic drop in copper prices or significant overall economic softening, we do expect to generate solid year-on-year earnings growth resulting from organic revenue growth that will likely exceed our annual target of 8 to 12 percent through the balance of the year."
Second Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2006 second quarter on Tuesday, July 25, 2006, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $800 million in inventory, 3) 204 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 227 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20060925120927.txt.gz
TIME:20060925120927
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On September 25, 2006, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported that it has entered into a settlement with the Internal Revenue Service as to the federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its subsidiaries for the tax years of 1996 through 1998, resulting in a substantial refund. For further information about the settlement, see the Companys press release, dated September 25, 2006, attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated September 25, 2006 issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE)("Anixter"), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers, today reported that it has entered into a settlement with the Internal Revenue Service as to the federal income tax liabilities of Anixter and its subsidiaries for the tax years 1996 through 1998.
GLENVIEW, IL, September 25, 2006 
Under the terms of this settlement, the Company will be able to deduct certain losses on its U.S. tax return arising from changes in the IRS regulations that became effective in 1996. The refund associated with this tax issue will be approximately $13.7 million, plus applicable interest, and will be recorded in the Company's third quarter results.
As a result of this settlement and the completion of the 2005 federal tax return, the Company will also be adjusting its income tax reserves and payables during the third quarter of 2006 (currently expected to be approximately $4.4 million of additional income tax benefit). The total estimated effect on the third quarter tax provision will be approximately $18.1 million or 41 cents per diluted share. At the same time Anixter will record as income, net of applicable tax thereon, approximately $4.8 million or 11 cents per diluted share as the estimated amount of interest to be received on the settlement.
The 1996-1998 refund has been approved by the Joint Committee on Taxation of the U. S. Congress and is expected to be received in the next few weeks.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $800 million in inventory, 3) 204 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 227 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20061024171251.txt.gz
TIME:20061024171251
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 24, 2006, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended September 29, 2006. The Companys press release, dated October 24, 2006, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated October 24, 2006, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

FOR FURTHER INFORMATION: EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended September 29, 2006.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 24, 2006 
Third Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "Our focus on supply chain services and our continued progress in the security and OEM markets, along with solid growth in our core markets, produced record sales and operating results in the third quarter. As has been the case over the past several quarters, third quarter growth was broad-based across all the geographies and markets we serve."
Third Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended September 29, 2006, sales of $1.33 billion produced net income of $76.2 million, or $1.76 per diluted share. Included in the current year's third quarter results were sales of $13.6 million from the acquisition of IMS in May 2006. The current quarter results include $22.8 million, or 53 cents per diluted share, of income primarily associated with a refund to be received from the U. S. Internal Revenue Service resulting from the final settlement of income taxes covering the period of 1996 through 1998. The interest income portion of this settlement of $7.7 million (after-tax impact of $4.7 million) is reflected on the income statement on the other, net line. The remaining portion of the settlement is recorded as an $18.1 million reduction to the tax provision. In the prior year period, sales of $1.01 billion generated net income of $25.1 million, or 62 cents per diluted share.
Operating income in the third quarter increased 97 percent to $96.1 million as compared to $48.9 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 7.2 percent as compared to 4.8 percent in the third quarter of 2005.
Nine Month Results
For the nine-month period ended September 29, 2006, sales of $3.64 billion produced net income of $156.9 million, or $3.66 per diluted share. When compared to the first nine months of the prior year, 2006 year-to-date sales were favorably affected by $165.4 million related to the acquisitions of Infast in July 2005 and IMS in May 2006. The nine-month results include the same described effects as those noted above related to the tax settlement with the Internal Revenue Service for the third quarter. In the prior year period, sales of $2.82 billion produced net income of $69.9 million, or $1.74 per diluted share.
Operating income in the first nine months of fiscal 2006 increased 83 percent to $246.7 million as compared to $134.7 million in the year ago period. Operating margins in the first nine months of 2006 were 6.8 percent as compared to 4.8 percent in the prior year period.
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the third quarter grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 28 percent after adjusting for the IMS acquisition and the favorable foreign exchange impact of $21.1 million on third quarter sales. The year-over-year organic growth clearly exceeded our target of 8 to 12 percent, as we again saw very strong customer demand across a broad mix of our business."
Grubbs continued, "The factors driving our organic growth were consistent with those we have seen the past few quarters. In the most recent quarter, we saw very strong growth in larger project business, particularly as it relates to data center builds in the enterprise cabling market and energy and natural resources customers within our electrical and electronic wire & cable market. At the same time, we have continued to experience strong growth in the security and OEM markets. Lastly, rising copper prices continued to contribute to our organic growth in the most recent quarter. During the quarter, market-based copper prices averaged approximately $3.54 per pound, compared to $1.70 per pound in the year ago third quarter and $3.39 per pound in the second quarter of 2006. We estimate that the higher copper prices accounted for an estimated $68 million of our year-on-year quarterly increase in sales within the electrical wire & cable market. After taking out the impact of copper prices, the IMS acquisition and foreign exchange, however, we were still able to grow sales by nearly 22 percent over the prior year third quarter." "Specifically, in North America we saw year-over-year sales grow by 33 percent to $991.7 million in the most recent quarter. In addition to strong end-market demand, North American sales were up $10.8 million due to the stronger Canadian dollar, $13.6 million due to the acquisition of IMS, and an estimated $63 million due to higher copper prices," commented Grubbs. "In Europe, we saw sales climb by 26 percent as compared to the year ago quarter, of which $10.6 million was due to exchange rate differences and $5 million was due to higher copper prices in the electrical wire & cable business. Without exchange rate differences and copper effects, sales in Europe still grew organically by 18 percent as compared to the year ago quarter."
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 39 percent increase in year-on-year sales, with a negligible impact from currency exchange rate effects. Growth was strong throughout the segment as both Asia Pacific and Latin America posted year-on-year growth rates in excess of 38 percent," continued Grubbs.
Third Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of very strong sales growth, third quarter operating margins were 7.2 percent as compared to 4.8 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, the 33 percent sales growth resulted in better operating leverage, which generated operating margins of 7.8 percent as compared to 5.7 percent in the prior year third quarter. While strong market conditions and market share gains were the primary drivers of the sales growth and improved profitability, copper prices again played a meaningful part in the strong third quarter operating results. As noted, copper prices added an estimated $63 million to North American electrical wire & cable sales, which had the effect of adding an estimated $17 million to third quarter operating income as compared to the year ago quarter."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 5.0 percent as compared to 2.1 percent in the year ago quarter. This significant improvement in operating margins reflects the operating leverage we gained as a result of strong organic sales growth. Operating results in the quarter did benefit marginally from higher copper prices, which added an estimated $1 million to operating income and 35 basis points to operating margins. We were encouraged by the results in the most recent quarter, but anticipate that maintaining consistently solid organic sales growth will remain a challenge."
"Third quarter operating margins in the Emerging Markets were 6.9 percent as compared to 3.4 percent in the year ago quarter. Continued sales growth throughout these markets has allowed us to better leverage infrastructure costs and improve operating margins" added Grubbs.
,
Cash Flow and Leverage
"With organic growth rates again running above levels at which we can generate positive cash flow from operations, due to the high working capital requirements associated with such growth, we saw an increase in outstanding debt balances during the quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "Although borrowings increased in the quarter, our strong operating performance, combined with the recording of the tax settlement with the Internal Revenue Service, meant shareholders equity grew at an even faster rate. As a result, we were again able to reduce our debt-to-total capital leverage ratio. At the end of the third quarter that ratio was 44.7 percent as compared to 47.0 percent at the end of last year."
"For the third quarter our weighted average cost of borrowed capital was 5.5 percent compared to 5.0 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the third quarter, 63 percent of our total borrowings of $732.6 million were fixed, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging arrangements. We also had $208.1 million of available, unused credit facilities at September 29, 2006, which provide us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the coming quarters."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "The first nine months of 2006 have been a record-setting period of revenue growth and operating profitability for Anixter. This record performance is the result of strong underlying market fundamentals, solid progress on our strategic initiatives to build our security and OEM business, additions to our supply chain services offering, the expansion of our product offering and the benefits of increased copper prices. As we enter the final quarter of the year, our ability to continue executing on our strategic initiatives, together with further progress on the integration of recent acquisitions, will be the keys to our success."
"While the fundamentals support a continuation of the trends of the past few quarters, the fourth quarter is generally negatively affected by the large number of holidays and customer facility shutdowns coincident with those holidays. As a result, it is our expectation that we will see a modest decline in fourth quarter sales versus the third quarter results reported today, but that we will once again experience improved results compared to the prior year. Looking forward to 2007, we expect full year organic sales growth to be within our target of 8 to 12 percent assuming no sudden significant changes in copper prices."
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2006 third quarter on Tuesday, October 24, 2006, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 204 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 227 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070104144804.txt.gz
TIME:20070104144804
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On January 4, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that, under a previously authorized share repurchase program, it may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding common shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company currently has approximately 39.5 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated January 4, 2007, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated January 4, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced that, under a previously authorized share repurchase program, it may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding common shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions.
Glenview, IL, January 4, 2007 
Anixter currently has approximately 39.5 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 325,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 204 warehouses with more than 5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 227 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070130172642.txt.gz
TIME:20070130172642
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
     On January 30, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 29, 2006. The Company's press release, dated January 30, 2007, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter and year ended December 29, 2006.
GLENVIEW, IL, January 30, 2007 
Fourth Quarter Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Highlights
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, said, "Strong fourth quarter results completed a series of record-setting quarters leading to a record year in terms of sales and earnings. While solid underlying conditions in all of the markets we serve enhanced this performance, it was our consistent execution of our strategy to expand our product and service offerings that drove the all-time results. In 2007, we will continue to focus on improving our operating performance by consistently providing customers with the products and services they value in each of the end markets we serve."
 
Fourth Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended December 29, 2006, sales of $1.30 billion produced net income of $52.4 million, or $1.20 per diluted share. Included in the current year's fourth quarter results were sales of $23.5 million from the acquisitions of IMS and MFU in May and October 2006, respectively. The current quarter includes net income of $4.2 million or 10 cents per diluted share primarily related to tax benefits associated with its foreign operations. Included in the net income associated with these tax benefits is $0.8 million of interest expense that is reflected as a part of the other, net line in the accompanying income statement.
In the prior year period, sales of $1.03 billion generated net income of $20.1 million, or 49 cents per diluted share. The year ago quarter included an incremental tax provision of $7.7 million or 19 cents per diluted share, related to the repatriation of accumulated foreign earnings under the American Jobs Creation Act.
Operating income in the fourth quarter increased 65 percent to $90.4 million as compared to $54.7 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 7.0 percent as compared to 5.3 percent in the fourth quarter of 2005.
Twelve Month Results
For the twelve-month period ended December 29, 2006, sales of $4.94 billion produced net income of $209.3 million, or $4.86 per diluted share. When compared to the twelve months of the prior year, 2006 sales were favorably affected by $191.2 million related to the acquisitions of Infast in July 2005, IMS in May 2006 and MFU in October 2006.
In addition to the previously discussed tax benefits recorded in this year's fourth quarter associated with the company's foreign operations, the twelve-month results include $22.8 million, or 53 cents per diluted share, of income primarily associated with a refund from the U. S. Internal Revenue Service ("IRS"). This refund was the result of the final settlement of income taxes covering the period of 1996 through 1998. The interest income portion of this settlement of $7.7 million (after-tax impact of $4.7 million) is reflected on the income statement in the other, net line. The remaining portion of the settlement is recorded as an $18.1 million reduction to the tax provision.
In the prior year period, sales of $3.85 billion produced net income of $90.0 million, or $2.22 per diluted share. The results in 2005 were negatively affected by the incremental tax provision related to the repatriation of foreign earnings, as described above.
Operating income for the twelve months of fiscal 2006 increased 78 percent to $337.1 million as compared to $189.4 million in the year ago period. Operating margins in the twelve months of 2006 were 6.8 percent as compared to 4.9 percent in the prior year period.
Fourth Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the fourth quarter grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 22 percent after adjusting for the IMS and MFU acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange impact of $25.3 million. This growth rate clearly exceeded our target of 8 to 12 percent, as we again saw very strong customer demand across a broad mix of our business."
 
Grubbs continued, "The factors driving our organic growth were consistent with those we have seen the past few quarters. In the most recent quarter, we again saw very strong larger project business, particularly as it relates to data center builds in the enterprise cabling market and energy and natural resources customers within the electrical wire & cable market. At the same time, we have continued to experience strong growth in the security and OEM markets. Lastly, copper prices continued to contribute to our organic growth in the most recent quarter. During the quarter, market-based copper prices averaged approximately $3.20 per pound, compared to $2.03 per pound in the year ago fourth quarter and $3.54 per pound in the third quarter of 2006. We estimate that the higher copper prices accounted for $58.4 million of our year-on-year quarterly increase in sales within the electrical wire & cable market. After taking out the estimated impact of copper prices, the IMS and MFU acquisitions and foreign exchange, however, we were still able to grow sales by 16 percent over the prior year fourth quarter."
"Specifically, in North America we saw year-over-year sales grow by 23 percent to $918.5 million in the most recent quarter. In addition to strong end-market demand, North American sales were up $4.8 million due to the stronger Canadian dollar, $12.5 million from the acquisition of IMS, and higher copper prices added $53.6 million," commented Grubbs. "In Europe, we saw sales climb by 38 percent compared to the year ago quarter. Driving this sales growth were positive exchange rate differences of $19.9 million, the October 2006 acquisition of MFU that added $10.9 million, and higher copper prices that added $4.8 million to the electrical wire & cable business sales. Without exchange rate differences, acquisitions, and copper price benefits, sales in Europe still grew organically by 20 percent compared to the year ago quarter."
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 33 percent increase in year-on-year sales, with a negligible impact from currency exchange rate. Growth was particularly strong in Asia Pacific, which rose over 50 percent year-on-year," continued Grubbs.
Fourth Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of very strong sales growth, fourth quarter operating margins were 7.0 percent compared to 5.3 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, the 23 percent sales growth drove better operating leverage, which generated operating margins of 8.2 percent compared to 6.5 percent in the prior year fourth quarter. While strong market conditions and market gains were the primary drivers of the sales growth and improved profitability, copper prices again played a meaningful part in the strong fourth quarter operating results. As noted, copper prices added an estimated $53.6 million to North American electrical wire & cable sales, which added an estimated $9.2 million to fourth quarter operating income as compared to the year ago quarter."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 2.6 percent as compared to 1.2 percent in the year ago quarter. This significant improvement in operating margins reflects the cost leverage we derived from strong organic sales growth. Operating results in the quarter did benefit marginally from higher copper prices, which added an estimated $0.4 million to operating income and 10 basis points to operating margins. At the same time, operating expenses in the current quarter included $1.3 million for the relocation and consolidation of several facilities and a restructuring of certain pension plans. We anticipate that additional expenses for relocation and consolidation of facilities will be incurred in coming quarters as we rationalize the infrastructure associated with companies we have acquired in the past few years. We are encouraged by our results, but as we noted in the third quarter, maintaining consistent organic sales growth will remain a challenge."
"Fourth quarter operating margins in the Emerging Markets were 7.2 percent as compared to 4.5 percent in the year ago quarter. Continued sales growth throughout these markets once again allowed us to leverage costs and improve operating margins" added Grubbs.
,
 
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the fourth quarter we generated cash from operations of $17 million," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "Despite this positive cash flow from operations our borrowings in the fourth quarter increased as a result of the October acquisition of MFU. Importantly, during 2006 we were able to fund our increased working capital needs, complete three acquisitions for total consideration of $90.5 million all while improving our debt leverage ratio. At the end of the fourth quarter debt-to-total capital was 45.7 percent down from 47.0 percent at the end of last year."
"For the fourth quarter our weighted average cost of borrowed capital was 5.4 percent compared to 5.0 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the fourth quarter, 56 percent of our total borrowings of $809.3 million were assigned fixed interest rates, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging arrangements. We also had $140.5 million of available, unused credit facilities at December 29, 2006. This provides the resources and flexibility to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the coming quarters."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "2006 was a record-setting period of revenue growth and operating profitability for Anixter. This record performance was the result of strong underlying market fundamentals, solid progress on our strategic initiatives to build our security and OEM business, additions to our supply chain service offering, and an expanded product offering and favorable copper prices. As we enter 2007, our ability to continue executing on our strategic initiatives, together with further progress on the integration of recent acquisitions, will be the keys to our success."
"The market fundamentals that underlie the positive trends of the past few quarters appear to remain firmly in place. The one exception to this view is with respect to copper prices. While we anticipate copper prices will remain above long-term price trends, we expect that with the exception of the first quarter, quarterly average prices in 2007 will be below the levels experienced in 2006. Despite this copper price expectation, we believe the market fundamentals and our growth strategies will once again combine to generate full-year organic sales growth within our target of 8 to 12 percent."
Fourth Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2006 fourth quarter on Tuesday, January 30, 2007, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
 
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 212 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 239 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations  Reconciliation Table
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations  Reconciliation Table
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070212125653.txt.gz
TIME:20070212125653
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On February 12, 2007, Anixter International Inc. announced that it intends to offer convertible senior notes in a private offering, subject to market conditions and other factors. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated February 12, 2007, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated February 12, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), today announced its intention to offer, subject to market and other conditions, approximately $275 million principal amount of Convertible Senior Notes due 2013 through offerings to qualified institutional buyers pursuant to Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"). The notes will be convertible under certain circumstance. Upon conversion, holders will receive cash up to the principal amount, and any excess conversion amount will be delivered, at our election, in cash, common stock, or a combination of cash and common stock. The interest rate, conversion price and other terms are to be negotiated between Anixter and the initial purchasers of the notes. Anixter also expects to grant the initial purchasers an option to purchase additional notes to cover over-allotments.
GLENVIEW, IL, February 12, 2007 
Anixter expects to use the net proceeds from the offering and the proceeds of the warrant transactions referred to below to purchase approximately $100 million worth of its common stock contemporaneously with the closing of the sale of the notes. This purchase will be in addition to Anixter's recently completed 1.0 million share repurchase program. In addition, proceeds from the transactions will be used to fund a convertible note hedge transaction, comprised of a purchased call option, that Anixter expects to enter into with an affiliate of the initial purchasers of the notes. This convertible note hedge transaction is expected to offset the dilution to Anixter's common stock upon conversion of the notes. Anixter also expects to enter into a separate warrant transaction with an affiliate of the initial purchasers. The remaining proceeds from the transactions will be used for general corporate purposes, including to reduce borrowings under the Company's revolving credit facilities and funding under its accounts receivable securitization facility.
This notice does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities. Any offers of the securities will be made only by means of a private offering memorandum. The notes and the shares of Anixter common stock issuable upon conversion have not been, and will not be, registered under the Securities Act or the securities laws of any other jurisdiction and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 212 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 239 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070213140114.txt.gz
TIME:20070213140114
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On February 12, 2007, Anixter International Inc. announced the pricing of its private offering of $300 million principal amount of Convertible Senior Notes due 2013. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated February 12, 2007, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated February 12, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), today announced the pricing of $300 million principal amount of Convertible Senior Notes due 2013. The notes are being sold in a private placement to qualified institutional buyers pursuant to Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"). The $300 million principal amount includes notes to be issued pursuant to an overallotment option, which option has already been exercised.
GLENVIEW, IL, February 12, 2007 
The notes will pay interest semiannually at a rate of 1.00 percent per annum. The notes will be convertible, at the holders option, at an initial conversion rate of 15.753 shares per $1,000 principal amount of notes, which represents a 15 percent conversion premium based on the last reported sale price of $55.20 per share of Anixter's common stock on February 12, 2007. The notes will be convertible under certain circumstances. Upon conversion, holders will receive cash up to the principal amount, and any excess conversion value will be delivered, at Anixter's election, in cash, common stock or a combination of cash and common stock.
Anixter estimates the net proceeds from this offering will be approximately $292.5 million after deducting estimated discounts, commissions and expenses.
Anixter expects to use the net proceeds from the offering and proceeds of approximately $52.0 million from the warrant transaction referred to below to purchase $110.4 million worth of its common stock contemporaneously with the closing of the sale of the notes. In addition, approximately $88.8 million will be used to fund a convertible note hedge transaction that Anixter expects to enter into with an affiliate of the initial purchasers of the notes. This convertible note hedge transaction is intended to offset the dilution to Anixter's common stock upon conversion of the notes. The remaining proceeds from the transactions will be used for general corporate purposes, including to reduce borrowings under the Company's revolving credit facilities and funding under its accounts receivable securitization facility.
In addition, Anixter expects to enter into a separate warrant transaction with an affiliate of one of the initial purchasers. The warrant transaction and the convertible note hedge transaction will generally have the effect of increasing the conversion price of the notes. The warrants associated with the notes have an exercise price that is 50 percent higher than the closing price of Anixter's common stock on February 12, 2007.
This notice does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities. Any offers of the securities will be made only by means of a private offering memorandum. The notes and the shares of Anixter common stock issuable upon conversion have not been registered under the Securities Act or the securities laws of any other jurisdiction and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 212 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 239 cities in 46 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070216150533.txt.gz
TIME:20070216150533
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
     On February 12, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") entered into a purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") under which it agreed to sell $300 million aggregate principal amount of its 1% Senior Convertible Notes due 2013 (the "Notes") to Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Banc of America Securities LLC, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and Wachovia Capital Markets, LLC (collectively, the "Initial Purchasers"). The $300 million aggregate principal amount of Notes includes $25 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes issued in connection with an option granted to the Initial Purchasers to cover overallotments. On February 12, 2007, the Initial Purchasers exercised the aforementioned option in whole. The Purchase Agreement contains customary representations, warranties and covenants by the Company. Under the terms of the Purchase Agreement, the Company has agreed to indemnify the Initial Purchasers against certain liabilities. The Initial Purchasers and their affiliates engage in commercial banking, investment banking and other commercial dealings with the Company in the ordinary course of business. A copy of the Purchase Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. The net proceeds from the offering, after deducting the Initial Purchasers' discount and the estimated offering expenses payable by the Company, were approximately $295.2 million.
     The closing of the sale of the Notes occurred on February 16, 2006. The Notes and the shares of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the "Common Stock"), issuable in certain circumstances upon conversion of the Notes, have not been registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"). The Company offered and sold the Notes to the Initial Purchasers in reliance on the exemption from registration provided by Section 4(2) of the Securities Act. The Initial Purchasers then sold the Notes to qualified institutional buyers pursuant to the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A under the Securities Act.
     The Notes are governed by an indenture, dated as of February 16, 2006 (the "Indenture"), between the Company and the Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as trustee (the "Trustee"). A copy of the Indenture is attached hereto as Exhibit 4.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
     The Notes have an aggregate principal amount of $300 million. The Notes will bear interest at a rate of 1% per year, payable semiannually in arrears in cash on February 15 and August 15 of each year, beginning on August 15, 2007. The Notes will mature on February 15, 2013. The Notes will be convertible into cash and, if applicable, shares of Common Stock based on a conversion rate of 15.753 shares of Common Stock per $1,000 principal amount of Notes (which is equal to an initial conversion price of approximately $63.48 per share), subject to adjustment, only under the following circumstances: (1) if the closing price of the Common Stock reaches, or the trading price of the Notes falls below, specified thresholds, (2) if specified distributions to holders of the Common Stock occur, (3) if a fundamental change occurs or (4) during the period from, and including, January 15, 2013 to, but excluding, the maturity date. Upon conversion, for each $1,000 in principal amount of Notes, a holder will receive, in lieu of shares of Common Stock, an amount in cash equal to the lesser of $1,000 or the conversion value, determined in the manner set forth in the Indenture, of the number of shares of Common Stock equal to the conversion rate. If the conversion value exceeds $1,000, the Company will also deliver, at its election, cash or Common Stock or a combination of cash and Common Stock for the conversion value in excess of $1,000.
     The holders of the Notes who convert their Notes in connection with certain fundamental changes, as defined in the Indenture, may be entitled to a make-whole premium in the form of an increase in the conversion rate. Additionally, in the event of a fundamental change, the holders of the Notes may require the Company to purchase all or a portion of their Notes at a purchase price equal to 100% of the principal amount of Notes, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any.
     The Notes and the related Indenture contain customary terms and customary events of default, including without limitation, failure to pay when due any principal amount or a fundamental change purchase price and certain cross defaults to other indebtedness. If an event of default shall have happened and is continuing, either the trustee or the holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may declare the principal of the Notes and any accrued and unpaid interest
Table of Contents
through the date of such declaration immediately due and payable. Upon any such declaration, such principal and interest shall become due and payable immediately. In the case of certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency relating to the Company or Anixter Inc., the principal amount of the Notes together with any accrued interest through the occurrence of such event shall automatically become and be immediately due and payable.
     The Notes are unsecured and rank equally in right of payment with all of the Company's other existing and future unsubordinated indebtedness.
     In connection with the sale of the Notes, the Company entered into a registration rights agreement, dated as of February 16, 2007, with the representative of the Initial Purchasers (the "Registration Rights Agreement"). Under the Registration Rights Agreement, the Company has agreed to (a) file within 90 days after the closing of the offering of the Notes a shelf registration statement with respect to the resale of the Notes and the shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Notes and (b) use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement to become effective no later than 180 days after the closing of the offering of the Notes. The Company will use its reasonable best efforts to keep the shelf registration statement effective for a period of two years after the closing of the offering of the Notes or until the earlier of (i) the sale pursuant to a shelf registration statement of all of the Notes and Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Notes, and (ii) the date when holders (other than holders that are the Company's "affiliates") of the Notes and Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Notes are able to sell all such securities immediately without restriction. The Company will be required to pay additional interest, subject to some limitations, to the holders of the Notes if it fails to comply with its obligations to register the Notes and the Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Notes. A copy of the Registration Rights Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 4.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
     On February 12, 2007, the Company entered into convertible note hedge with respect to its Common Stock (the "Convertible Note Hedge") with Merrill Lynch International, an affiliate of one of the Initial Purchasers (the "Dealer"). The Convertible Note Hedge covers, subject to customary anti-dilution adjustments, 4,725,900 shares of Common Stock at a strike price of $63.48, which corresponds to the initial conversion price of the Notes. The Company also entered into a separate warrant transaction whereby the Company has sold to the Dealer a warrant to acquire, subject to customary anti-dilution adjustments, 4,725,900 shares of Common Stock (the "Warrant"). The Warrant has a strike price of $82.80. The Warrant may not be exercised prior to May 16, 2013, and expires over the 40 business days beginning on such date. The net cost of the Convertible Note Hedge and Warrant transactions to the Company is approximately $36.8 million. A copy of the Confirmation of OTC Convertible Note Hedge is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.2 and a copy of the Confirmation of OTC Warrant Transaction is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.3, each of which is incorporated herein by reference.
     The Convertible Note Hedge and Warrant are separate contracts entered into by the Company with the Dealer, are not part of the terms of the Notes and will not affect the holders' rights under the Notes. The Convertible Note Hedge is expected to offset the potential dilution upon conversion of the Notes in the event that the market value per share of the Common Stock at the time of exercise is greater than approximately $63.48, which corresponds to the initial conversion price of the Notes.
     If the market value per share of the Common Stock at the time of conversion of any Notes is above the strike price of the Convertible Note Hedge, the Convertible Note Hedge will, in most cases, entitle the Company to receive from the Dealer in the aggregate the same number of shares of Common Stock as the Company would be required to issue to the holder of the converted Notes. Additionally, if the market price of the Common Stock at the time of exercise of the Warrant exceeds the strike price of the Warrant, the Company will owe the Dealer shares of Common Stock. The Convertible Note Hedge and Warrant may be settled for cash at the Company's election.
Table of Contents
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
     On February 16, 2007, the Company issued $300 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes. The description of the Notes and the related Indenture contained in Item 1.01 above is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 3.02. Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities.
     On February 12, 2007, the Company agreed to sell $300 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes to the Initial Purchasers in a private placement pursuant to exemptions from the registration requirements of the Securities Act. The closing of the sale of the Notes occurred on February 16, 2007. The net proceeds from the offering, after deducting the Initial Purchasers' discount and the estimated offering expenses payable by the Company, were approximately $292.5 million. The Initial Purchasers received an aggregate discount of $6.75 million in connection with the offering of the Notes.
     The Company offered and sold the Notes to the Initial Purchasers in reliance on the exemption from registration provided by Section 4(2) of the Securities Act. The Initial Purchasers then sold the Notes to qualified institutional buyers pursuant to the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A under the Securities Act. The Company relied on these exemptions from registration based in part on representations made by the Initial Purchasers in the Purchase Agreement.
     The Notes and the underlying Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
     On February 12, 2007, the Company agreed to sell to the Dealer a Warrant to acquire, subject to customary antidilution adjustments, 4,725,900 shares of Common Stock. The Warrant may not be exercised prior to May 16, 2013, expires over the 40 business days beginning on such date, and has a strike price of $82.80. On February 16, 2007, the Company received proceeds of $52.05 million from the sale of the Warrant.
     The Company offered and sold the Warrant in reliance on the exemption from registration provided by Section 4(2) of the Securities Act. The Company relied on this exemption from registration based in part on representations made by the Dealer.
     The Warrant and the underlying Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the Warrant have not been registered under the Securities Act and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
     Additional information relating to the Notes and the Warrant is contained in Item 1.01 and is incorporated herein by reference.
     This report on Form 8-K does not constitute an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to buy, any security and shall not constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any jurisdiction in which such offering would be unlawful.
Table of Contents
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     THIS INDENTURE, dated as of February 16, 2007, is between Anixter International Inc., a corporation duly organized under the laws of the State of Delaware (the "Company"), and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., a national banking association, as Trustee (the "Trustee").
     In consideration of the purchase of the Securities (as defined herein) by the Holders thereof, the parties hereto agree as follows for the benefit of one another and for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders of the Company's 1% Senior Convertible Notes Due 2013.
     Section 1.01. .
Definitions
     "Additional Interest" has the meaning specified in the Registration Rights Agreement. All references herein to interest accrued or payable as of any date shall include any Additional Interest accrued or payable as of such date as provided in the Registration Rights Agreement.
     "Affiliate" means, with respect to any specified person, any other person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with such specified person. For the purposes of this definition, "control" when used with respect to any person means the power to direct the management and policies of such person, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise; and the terms "controlling" and "controlled" have meanings correlative to the foregoing.
     "Agent" means any Registrar, Paying Agent or Conversion Agent.
     "Applicable Procedures" means, with respect to any conversion, transfer or exchange of beneficial ownership interests in a Global Security, the rules and procedures of the Depositary, to the extent applicable to such conversion, transfer or exchange.
     "Bankruptcy Law" means Title 11 of the United States Code entitled "Bankruptcy" or any other law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, winding up, liquidation, reorganization or relief of debtors, whether in effect on the date hereof or hereafter.
     "Board of Directors" means the board of directors of the Company or any duly authorized committee of such board, or any equivalent body in a limited partnership, limited liability company or other entity serving substantially the same function as a board of directors of a corporation.
     "Board Resolution" means, with respect to any Person, a duly adopted resolution (or other similar action) of the Board of Directors of such Person or a duly authorized committee thereof, as applicable.
     "Business Day" means any day other than a Saturday or a Sunday or any other day on which banking institutions in The City of New York are authorized or required by law to close.
 
     "Capital Stock" of any Person means any and all shares, interests, rights to purchase, warrants, options, participations or other equivalents of or interests in (however designated) the equity of such Person, but excluding any debt securities convertible into such equity.
     "Cash" or "cash" means such coin or currency of the United States as at any time of payment is legal tender for the payment of public and private debts.
     "Certificated Security" means a Security that is in substantially the form attached as Exhibit A but that does not include the information or the schedule called for by footnote 1 thereof.
     "Change of Control" means the occurrence of any of the following events:
     (1) any "person" or "group" (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act) is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act, except that a person shall be deemed to have beneficial ownership of all shares that such person has the right to acquire, whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time), directly or indirectly, of Voting Stock representing 50% or more of the total voting power of all outstanding Voting Stock; or
     (2) the Company consolidates with, or merges with or into, another person or the Company sells, assigns, conveys, transfers, leases or otherwise disposes of all or substantially all of its assets to any person other than any such transaction where immediately after such transaction the person or persons that "beneficially owned" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act) immediately prior to such transaction, directly or indirectly, Voting Stock representing a majority of the total voting power of all outstanding Voting Stock, "beneficially own or owns" (as so determined), directly or indirectly, Voting Stock representing a majority of the total voting power of the outstanding Voting Stock of the surviving or transferee person; or
     (3) during any consecutive two-year period, the Continuing Directors cease for any reason to constitute a majority of the Board of Directors; or
     (4) the adoption of a plan of liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, it will not constitute a Change of Control if 100% of the consideration for the Company's Common Stock (excluding cash payments for fractional shares and cash payments made in respect of dissenters' appraisal rights) in the transaction or transactions constituting the Change of Control consists of common stock and any associated rights listed on a United States national securities exchange or quoted on a national automated dealer quotation system, or which will be so traded or quoted when issued or exchanged in connection with the Change of Control, and as a result of such transaction or transactions the Securities become convertible solely into such common stock.
     "Closing Price" means, with respect to the Company's Common Stock or any other securities on any Trading Day, the reported last sale price per share (or, if no last sale price is reported, the average of the bid and ask prices per share or, if more than one in either case, the
 
average of the average bid and the average ask prices per share) on such date reported by the New York Stock Exchange, or, if the Company's Common Stock or such securities are not listed on the New York Stock Exchange, as reported by the principal national securities exchange on which the Company's Common Stock or such securities are listed, or if no such prices are available, the Closing Price per share shall be the fair value of a share of Common Stock or other security as reasonably determined by the Board of Directors (which determination shall be conclusive and shall be evidenced by an Officer's Certificate delivered to the Trustee).
     "Common Stock" means the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share, or any successor common stock thereto.
     "Company" means the party named as such in the first paragraph of this Indenture until a successor replaces it pursuant to the applicable provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter "Company" shall mean such successor Company.
     "Company Request" or "Company Order" means a written request or order signed in the name of the Company by any one of its Chairman of the Board, its Chief Executive Officer, its President, its Chief Operating Officer, its Chief Financial Officer or a Vice President (regardless of Vice Presidential designation), and by any one of its Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer, any other Vice President (regardless of Vice Presidential designation), its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and delivered to the Trustee.
     "Continuing Directors" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who was (a) a member of such Board of Directors on the date of this Indenture or (b) nominated for election or elected to such Board of Directors with the approval of a majority of the continuing directors who were members of such board at the time of such nomination or election.
     "Conversion Price" per share of Common Stock as of any day means the result obtained by dividing (i) $1,000 by (ii) the then applicable Conversion Rate.
     "Conversion Rate" means initially 15.753 shares of Common Stock for each $1,000 principal amount of Securities, as adjusted from time to time pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture.
     "Conversion Reference Period" means:
     (1) for Securities that are converted during the one-month period prior to the Final Maturity Date of the Securities, the 20 consecutive Trading Days preceding and ending on the Final Maturity Date, subject to any extension due to a Market Disruption Event; and
     (2) in all other instances, the 20 consecutive Trading Days beginning on the third Trading Day following the Conversion Date.
     "Conversion Value" means the average of the Daily Conversion Values for each of the 20 consecutive Trading Days of the Conversion Reference Period.
 
     "Corporate Trust Office" means the office of the Trustee at which at any particular time the trust created by this Indenture shall be administered, which office at the date of the execution of this Indenture is located at 2 North LaSalle Street, Suite 1020, Chicago, IL 60602, Attention: Corporate Trust Administration, or at any other time at such other address as the Trustee may designate from time to time by notice to the Holders and the Company.
     "Daily Conversion Value" means, with respect to any Trading Day, for each $1,000 principal amount of Securities, an amount equal to the product of (i) the applicable Conversion Rate and (ii) the Volume Weighted Average Price per share of Common Stock on such Trading Day.
     "Daily Share Amount" means, for each Trading Day during the Conversion Reference Period and each $1,000 principal amount of Securities surrendered for conversion, a number of shares of Common Stock (but in no event less than zero) determined by the following formula:
     "Default" means any event that is, or after notice or passage of time or both would be, an Event of Default.
     "Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as in effect from time to time.
     "Final Maturity Date" means February 15, 2013.
     "Fundamental Change" means the occurrence of a Change of Control or a Termination of Trading.
     "Fundamental Change Effective Date" means the date on which any Fundamental Change becomes effective.
     "Fundamental Change Purchase Price" of any Security, means 100% of the principal amount of the Security to be purchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, but excluding, the Fundamental Change Purchase Date.
     "GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board or in such other statements by such other entity as have been approved by a significant segment of
 
the accounting profession, which are in effect (i) with respect to periodic reporting requirements, from time to time, and (ii) otherwise on the date hereof.
     "Global Security" means a Security in global form that is in substantially the form attached as Exhibit A and that includes the legend called for in footnote 1 thereof and the related schedule and which is deposited with the Depositary or its custodian and registered in the name of the Depositary or its nominee.
     "Holder" or "Holder of a Security" means the person in whose name a Security is registered on the Registrar's books.
     "Indebtedness" means, with respect to any Person, obligations (other than nonrecourse obligations) of such Person for borrowed money or evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments.
     "Indenture" means this instrument as originally executed (including all exhibits and schedules thereto) and as it may from time to time be supplemented or amended by one or more indentures supplemental hereto entered into pursuant to the applicable provisions hereof, including the provisions of the TIA that are automatically deemed to be part of this Indenture by operation of the TIA.
     "Initial Purchasers" means Merrill Lynch & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Banc of America Securities LLC, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and Wachovia Capital Markets, LLC.
     "Interest Payment Date" means February 15 and August 15 of each year, commencing August 15, 2007.
     "Issue Date" means the date of this Indenture.
     "Market Disruption Event" means the occurrence or existence for more than one half hour period in the aggregate on any scheduled Trading Day for the Common Stock of any suspension or limitation imposed on trading (by reason of movements in price exceeding limits permitted by the New York Stock Exchange or otherwise) in the Common Stock or in any options, contracts or future contracts relating to the Common Stock, and such suspension or limitation occurs or exists at any time before 1:00 p.m. (New York City time) on such day.
     "Officer" means the Chairman, any Vice Chairman, the President, the Chief Executive Officer, any Vice President, the Chief Financial Officer, the Chief Operating Officer, the Treasurer or any Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary of the Company.
     "Officer's Certificate" means a certificate signed by an Officer of the Company and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to, and delivered to, the Trustee; , , that for purposes of Section 5.03, "Officer's Certificate" means a certificate signed by the principal executive officer, principal financial officer, principal operating officer, principal accounting officer or treasurer of the Company.
provided
however
 
     "Operating Company" means Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation and a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company.
     "Opinion of Counsel" means a written opinion of counsel, who may be an employee of or counsel for the Company and which opinion shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee.
     "Person" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, trust, unincorporated organization or government or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
     "Registration Rights Agreement" means the Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2007, among the Company and the Initial Purchasers, as amended and supplemented from time to time in accordance with its terms.
     "Regular Record Date" means, with respect to each Interest Payment Date, the February 1 or August 1, as the case may be, immediately preceding such Interest Payment Date.
     "Restricted Global Security" means a Global Security that is a Restricted Security.
     "Restricted Security" means a Security required to bear the restrictive legends called for in footnotes 2 and 3 set forth in the form of Security annexed as Exhibit A.
     "Rule 144" means Rule 144 under the Securities Act or any successor to such Rule.
     "Rule 144A" means Rule 144A under the Securities Act or any successor to such Rule.
     "SEC" means the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
     "Securities" means the $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 1% Senior Convertible Notes due 2013, or any $1,000 principal amount thereof (each a "Security"), as amended or supplemented from time to time, that are issued under this Indenture.
     "Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as in effect from time to time.
     "Securities Custodian" means the Trustee, as custodian with respect to the Securities in global form, or any successor thereto.
     "Special Record Date" for the payment of any Defaulted Interest means a date fixed by the Trustee pursuant to Section 2.16.
     "Stated Maturity" means, with respect to any installment of interest or principal on any Security, the date on which such payment of interest or principal shall become due and payable.
     "Subsidiary" means, in respect of any Person, any corporation, association, partnership or other business entity of which more than 50% of the total voting power of shares of Capital Stock entitled (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency within the control of such
 
Person to satisfy) to vote in the election of directors, managers, general partners or trustees thereof is at the time owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by (i) such Person, (ii) such Person and one or more Subsidiaries of such Person or (iii) one or more Subsidiaries of such Person.
     "Termination of Trading" shall be deemed to have occurred if the Company's Common Stock (or other common stock into which the Securities are then convertible) is not listed on a United States national securities exchange or approved for quotation and trading on a national automated dealer quotation system or established automated over-the-counter trading market in the United States or ceases to be so traded or quoted in contemplation of a delisting or withdrawal of approval.
     "TIA" means the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder as in effect on the date of this Indenture, except to the extent that the Trust Indenture Act or any amendment thereto expressly provides for application of the Trust Indenture Act as in effect on another date.
     "Trading Day" means any day on which (i) there is no Market Disruption Event and (ii) the New York Stock Exchange is open for trading, or, if the Common Stock is not listed on the New York Stock Exchange, any day on which the principal national securities exchange on which the Common Stock is listed is open for trading, or, if the Common Stock is not listed on a national securities exchange, any Business Day. A "Trading Day" only includes those days that have a scheduled closing time of 4:00 p.m. (New York City time) or the then standard closing time for regular trading on the relevant exchange or trading system.
     "Trading Price" of the Securities on any date of determination means, solely for the purposes of Article 4, the average of the secondary market bid quotations obtained by the Trustee for $5.0 million principal amount of Securities at approximately 3:30 p.m., New York City time, on such determination date from three nationally recognized securities dealers the Company selects, which may include the Initial Purchasers; that if three such bids cannot reasonably be obtained by the Trustee, but two such bids are obtained, then the average of the two bids shall be used, and if only one such bid can reasonably be obtained by the Trustee, that one bid shall be used. If the Trustee cannot reasonably obtain at least one bid for $5.0 million principal amount of Securities from a nationally recognized securities dealer or, in the reasonable judgment of the Company, the bid quotations are not indicative of the secondary market value of the Securities, then the Trading Price per $1,000 principal amount of Securities will be deemed to be less than 98% of the product of the Closing Price of the Company's Common Stock and the then applicable Conversion Rate per $1,000 principal amount of Securities.
provided
     "Trustee" means the party named as such in the first paragraph of this Indenture until a successor replaces it in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter means the successor.
     "Trust Officer" means, with respect to the Trustee, any officer assigned to the Corporate Trust Office having direct responsibility for the administration of this Indenture, and also, with respect to a particular matter, any other officer to whom such matter is referred because of such officer's knowledge of and familiarity with the particular subject.
 
     "Vice President" when used with respect to the Company or the Trustee, means any vice president, whether or not designated by a number or a word or words added before or after the title "vice president."
     "Volume Weighted Average Price" per share of Common Stock on any Trading Day means such price as displayed on Bloomberg (or any successor service) page AXE <equity> VAP in respect of the period from 9:30 a.m. to 4:00 p.m., New York City time, on such Trading Day; or, if such price is not available, the Volume Weighted Average Price means the market value per share of the Common Stock on such day as determined by a nationally recognized independent investment banking firm retained for this purpose by the Company.
     "Voting Stock" of any Person means Capital Stock of the class or classes pursuant to which the holders of such Capital Stock have the general voting power under ordinary circumstances to elect at least a majority of the board of directors, managers or trustees of such Person (irrespective of whether or not at the time Capital Stock of any other class or classes shall have or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency).
     Section 1.02. .
Other Definitions
 
     Section 1.03. .
Trust Indenture Act Provisions
     Whenever this Indenture refers to a provision of the TIA, that provision is incorporated by reference in and made a part of this Indenture. The following TIA term used in this Indenture has the following meaning:
     "obligor" on the indenture securities means the Company or any other obligor on the Securities.
     All other terms used in this Indenture that are defined in the TIA, defined by TIA reference to another statute or defined by any SEC rule and not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them therein.
     Section 1.04. .
Rules Of Construction
     For all purposes of this Indenture, except as otherwise provided or unless the context otherwise requires:
     (1) a term has the meaning assigned to it;
     (2) an accounting term not otherwise defined has the meaning assigned to it in accordance with GAAP;
     (3) words in the singular include the plural, and words in the plural include the singular;
     (4) the term "merger" includes a statutory share exchange and the term "merged" has a correlative meaning;
     (5) the masculine gender includes the feminine and the neuter;
     (6) the terms "include", "including", and similar terms should be construed as if followed by the phrase "without limitation";
     (7) references to agreements and other instruments include subsequent amendments thereto; and
     (8) all "Article", "Exhibit" and "Section" references are to Articles, Exhibits and Sections, respectively, of or to this Indenture unless otherwise specified herein, and the
 
terms "herein," "hereof" and other words of similar import refer to this Indenture as a whole and not to any particular Article, Section or other subdivision.
     Section 2.01. .
Form and Dating
     The Securities and the Trustee's certificate of authentication shall be substantially in the respective forms set forth in Exhibit A, which Exhibit is incorporated in and made part of this Indenture. The Securities may include such letters, numbers or other marks of identification and such notations, legends, endorsements or changes as the Officer executing the same may approve (execution thereof to be conclusive evidence of such approval) and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Indenture, or as may be required by the Trustee, the Depositary, or as may be required to comply with any applicable law or with any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto or with any rule or regulation of any national securities exchange or automated quotation system on which the Securities may be listed or quoted, or to conform to usage, or to indicate any special limitations or restrictions to which any particular Securities are subject. Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication.
     (a) . All of the Securities are initially being offered and sold to qualified institutional buyers as defined in Rule 144A (collectively, "QIBs" or individually, each a "QIB") in reliance on Rule 144A under the Securities Act and shall be issued initially in the form of one or more Restricted Global Securities, which shall be deposited on behalf of the purchasers of the securities represented thereby with the Trustee, at its Corporate Trust Office, as custodian for the depositary, The Depository Trust Company ("DTC", and such depositary, or any successor thereto, being hereinafter referred to as the "Depositary"), and registered in the name of its nominee, Cede & Co. (or any successor thereto), for the accounts of participants in the Depositary, duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as hereinafter provided. The aggregate principal amount of the Restricted Global Securities may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Securities Custodian as hereinafter provided, subject in each case to compliance with the Applicable Procedures.
Restricted Global Securities
     (b) . The Global Security shall represent such of the outstanding Securities as shall be specified therein and each shall provide that it shall represent the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Securities from time to time endorsed thereon and that the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Securities represented thereby may from time to time be reduced or increased, as appropriate, to reflect exchanges, purchases or conversions of such Securities.
Global Securities In General
     Members of, or participants in, the Depositary ("Agent Members") shall have no rights under this Indenture with respect to any Global Security held on their behalf by the Depositary or under the Global Security, and the Depositary (including, for this purpose, its nominee) may be treated by the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee as the absolute owner and Holder of such Global Security for all purposes whatsoever. Notwithstanding the
 
foregoing, nothing herein shall (1) prevent the Company, the Trustee or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by the Depositary or (2) impair, as between the Depositary and its Agent Members, the operation of customary practices governing the exercise of the rights of a Holder of any Security.
     (c) . The Company shall execute and the Trustee shall, in accordance with this Section 2.01(c), authenticate and deliver initially one or more Global Securities that (1) shall be registered in the name of the Depositary or its nominee, (2) shall be delivered by the Trustee to the Depositary or pursuant to the Depositary's instructions and (3) shall bear legends substantially to the following effect:
Book Entry Provisions
     "UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY (AND ANY PAYMENT HEREON IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL SINCE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN. THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF. THIS SECURITY IS EXCHANGEABLE FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR ITS NOMINEE ONLY IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE AND, UNLESS AND UNTIL IT IS EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR SECURITIES IN DEFINITIVE FORM, THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT AS A WHOLE BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY SUCH NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY."
     Section 2.02. .
Execution and Authentication
     (a) The aggregate principal amount of Securities which may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture is limited to $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount, except as provided in Sections 2.08 and 2.09.
     (b) The Securities shall be executed on behalf of the Company by one of its Officers. The signatures of any of the Officers on the Securities may be manual or facsimile.
     (c) Securities bearing the manual or facsimile signatures of individuals who were at any time the proper officers of the Company shall bind the Company, notwithstanding that such
 
individuals or any of them have ceased to hold such offices prior to the authentication and delivery of such Securities or did not hold such offices at the date of such Securities.
     (d) No Security shall be entitled to any benefit under this Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose unless there appears on such Security a certificate of authentication substantially in the form provided for herein duly executed by the Trustee by manual signature of an authorized officer, and such certificate upon any Security shall be conclusive evidence, and the only evidence, that such Security has been duly authenticated and delivered hereunder and is entitled to the benefits of this Indenture.
     (e) The Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery Securities for original issue in the aggregate principal amount of up to $300,000,000 upon receipt of a Company Order. The Company Order shall specify the amount of Securities to be authenticated, shall provide that all such Securities will be represented by a Global Security and the date on which each original issue of Securities is to be authenticated.
     (f) The Trustee shall act as the initial authenticating agent. Thereafter, the Trustee may appoint an authenticating agent acceptable to the Company to authenticate Securities. An authenticating agent may authenticate Securities whenever the Trustee may do so. Each reference in this Indenture to authentication by the Trustee includes authentication by such agent. An authenticating agent shall have the same rights as an Agent to deal with the Company or an Affiliate of the Company.
     (g) The Securities shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons and only in denominations of $1,000 principal amount and any integral multiple thereof.
     Section 2.03. .
Registrar, Paying Agent and Conversion Agent
     (a) The Company shall maintain one or more offices or agencies where Securities may be presented for registration of transfer or for exchange (each, a "Registrar"), one or more offices or agencies where Securities may be presented or surrendered for payment (each, a "Paying Agent"), one or more offices or agencies where Securities may be presented for conversion (each, a "Conversion Agent") and one or more offices or agencies where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served. The Company will at all times maintain a Paying Agent, Conversion Agent, Registrar and an office or agency where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. One of the Registrars (the "Primary Registrar") shall keep a register of the Securities and of their transfer and exchange. At the option of the Company, any payment of cash may be made by check mailed to the Holders at their addresses set forth in the register of Holders.
     (b) The Company shall enter into an appropriate agency agreement with any Agent not a party to this Indenture, that the Agent may be an Affiliate of the Trustee. The agreement shall implement the provisions of this Indenture that relate to such Agent. The Company shall notify the Trustee of the name and address, and any change in the name or address, of any Agent not a party to this Indenture. If the Company fails to maintain a Registrar, Paying Agent, Conversion Agent, or agent for service of notices and demands in any place
provided
 
required by this Indenture, or fails to give the foregoing notice, the Trustee shall act as such. The Company or any Affiliate of the Company may act as Paying Agent (except for the purposes of Article 9).
     (c) The Company hereby initially designates the Trustee as Paying Agent, Registrar, Securities Custodian and Conversion Agent, and designates the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee as the office or agency of the Company for each of the aforesaid purposes and as the office or agency where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served.
     Section 2.04. .
Paying Agent To Hold Money In Trust
     Unless otherwise specified herein, prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on each due date of the payment of principal of, or interest on, any Securities, the Company shall deposit a sum sufficient to pay such principal or interest so becoming due. A Paying Agent shall hold in trust for the benefit of Holders of Securities or the Trustee all money held by the Paying Agent for the payment of principal of, or interest on, the Securities, and shall notify the Trustee of any failure by the Company (or any other obligor on the Securities) to make any such payment. If the Company or an Affiliate of the Company acts as Paying Agent, it shall, before 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on each due date of the principal of, or interest on, any Securities, segregate the money and hold it as a separate trust fund for the benefit of Holders. The Company at any time may require a Paying Agent to pay all money held by it to the Trustee, and the Trustee may at any time during the continuance of any Default, upon written request to a Paying Agent, require such Paying Agent to pay forthwith to the Trustee all sums so held in trust by such Paying Agent. Upon doing so, the Paying Agent (other than the Company) shall have no further liability for the money.
     Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of or interest on any Security and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal or interest has become due and payable shall promptly be paid to the Company or (if then held by the Company) shall be discharged from such trust; and the Holder of such Security shall thereafter, as an unsecured general creditor, look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, may at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in the and (national edition), and mail to each such Holder, notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such notification, publication and mailing, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will promptly be repaid to the Company.
provided
however
New York Times
The Wall Street Journal
     Section 2.05. .
Conversion Agent To Hold Money In Trust
     The Company shall require each Conversion Agent (that is not the Trustee) to agree in writing that the Conversion Agent will hold in trust for the benefit of Holders or the Trustee all cash and shares of Common Stock delivered by the Company to the Conversion Agent for the
 
delivery of amounts due upon conversion, and will notify the Trustee of any default by the Company in making any such delivery.
     While any such default continues, the Trustee may require a Conversion Agent to deliver all cash and shares of Common Stock delivered by the Company to it to the Trustee. Upon payment over to the Trustee, the Conversion Agent (if other than the Company or a Subsidiary) shall have no further liability in respect of such amounts. If the Company or a Subsidiary acts as Conversion Agent, it shall segregate and hold in a separate trust fund for the benefit of the Holders all cash and shares of Common Stock held by it as Conversion Agent. Upon any bankruptcy or reorganization proceedings relating to the Company, the Trustee shall serve as Conversion Agent for the Securities.
     Section 2.06. .
Lists of Holders of Securities
     The Trustee shall preserve in as current a form as is reasonably practicable the most recent list available to it of the names and addresses of Holders of Securities. The Company shall furnish or cause the Registrar to furnish to the Trustee (a) semiannually, not more than 10 days after each Regular Record Date, a list, in such form as the Trustee may reasonably require, of the names and addresses of the Holders as of such Regular Record Date; and (b) at such other times as the Trustee may request in writing, within 30 days after receipt by the Company of any such request, a list of similar form and content to that in subsection (a) hereof as of a date not more than 15 days prior to the time such list is furnished; , , that if and so long as the Trustee shall be the Primary Registrar, no such list need be furnished.
provided
however
     Section 2.07. .
Transfer and Exchange
     (a) Subject to compliance with any applicable additional requirements contained in Section 2.13, when a Security is presented to a Registrar with a request to register a transfer thereof or to exchange such Security for an equal principal amount of Securities of other authorized denominations, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange as requested if its requirements for such transactions are met; , , that every Security presented or surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange shall be duly endorsed or accompanied by an assignment form and, if applicable, a transfer certificate each in the form included in Exhibit A, and completed in a manner satisfactory to the Registrar and duly executed by the Holder thereof or its attorney duly authorized in writing. To permit registration of transfers and exchanges, upon surrender of any Security for registration of transfer or exchange at an office or agency maintained pursuant to Section 2.03, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate Securities of a like aggregate principal amount at the Registrar's request. Any exchange or transfer shall be without charge, except that the Company or the Registrar may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax or similar governmental charge that may be imposed in relation thereto; provided that this sentence shall not apply to any exchange pursuant to Section 2.11, 2.13(a), 4.02(d) or 10.06.
provided
however
     (b) Neither the Company, any Registrar nor the Trustee shall be required to register the transfer of or exchange any Securities or portions thereof in respect of which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been delivered and not withdrawn by the Holder thereof (except, in the case of the purchase of a Security in part, the portion thereof not to be purchased).
 
     (c) All Securities issued upon any transfer or exchange of Securities shall be valid obligations of the Company, evidencing the same debt and entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as the Securities surrendered upon such registration of transfer or exchange.
     (d) Any Registrar appointed pursuant to Section 2.03 shall provide to the Trustee such information as the Trustee may reasonably require in connection with the delivery by such Registrar of Securities upon transfer or exchange of Securities.
     (e) Each Holder of a Security agrees to indemnify the Company and the Trustee against any liability that may result from the registration of transfer, exchange or assignment of such Holder's Security in violation of any provision of this Indenture and/or applicable United States federal or state securities law.
     (f) The Trustee shall have no obligation or duty to monitor, determine or inquire as to compliance with any restrictions on transfer imposed under this Indenture or under applicable law with respect to any transfer of any interest in any Security (including any transfers between or among Agent Members or other beneficial owners of interests in any Global Security) other than to require delivery of such certificates and other documentation or evidence as are expressly required by, and to do so if and when expressly required by the terms of, this Indenture, and to examine the same to determine substantial compliance as to form with the express requirements hereof.
     Section 2.08. .
Replacement Securities
     (a) If (1) any mutilated Security is surrendered to the Trustee, or (2) the Company and the Trustee receive evidence to their satisfaction of the destruction, loss or theft of any Security, and there is delivered to the Company and the Trustee, such security or indemnity, in each case, as may be required by them to save each of them harmless, then, in the absence of notice to the Company or the Trustee that such Security has been acquired by a protected purchaser, the Company shall execute and upon a Company Request the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, in exchange for any such mutilated Security or in lieu of any such destroyed, lost or stolen Security, a replacement Security of like tenor and principal amount, bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
     (b) If any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security has become or is about to become due and payable, or is about to be purchased by the Company pursuant to Article 3, or converted pursuant to Article 4, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a new Security, pay, purchase or convert such Security, as the case may be.
     (c) Upon the issuance of any new Securities under this Section 2.08, the Company may require the payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in relation thereto and any other expenses (including the fees and expenses of counsel and the Trustee) in connection therewith.
     (d) Every new Security issued pursuant to this Section 2.08 in lieu of any mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall constitute an original additional contractual obligation of the Company, whether or not the mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be at any time
 
enforceable by anyone, and shall be entitled to all benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately with any and all other Securities duly issued hereunder.
     (e) The provisions of this Section 2.08 are (to the extent lawful) exclusive and shall preclude (to the extent lawful) all other rights and remedies with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities.
     Section 2.09. .
Outstanding Securities
     (a) Securities outstanding ("Outstanding") at any time are all Securities authenticated by the Trustee, except for those canceled by it, those purchased pursuant to Article 3, those converted pursuant to Article 4, those delivered to the Trustee for cancellation or surrendered for transfer or exchange and those described in this Section 2.09 as not Outstanding.
     (b) If a Security is replaced pursuant to Section 2.08, such replaced Security ceases to be Outstanding unless the Company receives proof satisfactory to it that the replaced Security is held by a protected purchaser.
     (c) If a Paying Agent holds in respect of the Outstanding Securities on a Fundamental Change Purchase Date or the Final Maturity Date money sufficient to pay the principal of and accrued interest on Securities (or portions thereof) payable on that date, then on and after such Fundamental Change Purchase Date or Final Maturity Date, as the case may be, such Securities (or portions thereof, as the case may be) shall cease to be Outstanding and interest on them shall cease to accrue.
     (d) Subject to the restrictions contained in Section 2.10, a Security does not cease to be Outstanding because the Company or an Affiliate of the Company holds the Security.
     Section 2.10. .
Treasury Securities
     In determining whether the Holders of the required principal amount of Securities have concurred in any request, demand, authorization, notice, direction, waiver or consent, Securities owned by the Company or any other obligor on the Securities or by any Affiliate of the Company or of such other obligor shall be disregarded, except that, for purposes of determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying on any such request, demand, authorization, notice, direction, waiver or consent, only Securities which a Trust Officer of the Trustee actually knows are so owned shall be so disregarded.
     Section 2.11. .
Temporary Securities
     Until definitive Securities are ready for delivery, the Company may prepare and execute, and, upon receipt of a Company Order, the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, temporary Securities. Temporary Securities shall be substantially in the form of definitive Securities but may have variations that the Company with the consent of the Trustee considers appropriate for temporary Securities. Without unreasonable delay, the Company shall prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver definitive Securities in exchange for temporary Securities representing an equal principal amount of Securities. The temporary Securities will be exchanged for definitive Securities in accordance with Sections 2.07 and 2.13 hereof. Until so
 
exchanged, temporary Securities shall have the same rights under this Indenture as the definitive Securities.
     Section 2.12. .
Cancellation
     The Company at any time may deliver Securities to the Trustee for cancellation. The Registrar, the Paying Agent and the Conversion Agent shall forward to the Trustee any Securities surrendered to them for transfer, exchange, purchase, payment or conversion. The Trustee and no one else shall cancel, in accordance with its standard procedures, all Securities surrendered for transfer, exchange, purchase, payment, conversion or cancellation and shall dispose of the cancelled Securities in accordance with its customary procedures or deliver the canceled Securities to the Company upon request. All Securities which are purchased or otherwise acquired by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries prior to the Final Maturity Date pursuant to Article 3 shall be delivered to the Trustee for cancellation, and the Company may not hold or resell such Securities or issue any new Securities to replace any such Securities or any Securities that any Holder has converted pursuant to Article 4. The Trustee shall maintain a record of all canceled Securities. The Trustee shall provide the Company a list of all Securities that have been canceled from time to time as requested by the Company in writing.
     Section 2.13. .
Legend; Additional Transfer and Exchange Requirements
     (a) If Securities are issued upon the transfer, exchange or replacement of Securities subject to restrictions on transfer and bearing the legends set forth on the forms of Securities attached as Exhibit A (collectively, the "Legend"), or if a request is made to remove the Legend on a Security, the Securities so issued shall bear the Legend, or the Legend shall not be removed, as the case may be, unless there is delivered to the Company and the Registrar such satisfactory evidence, which shall include an Opinion of Counsel if requested by the Company or such Registrar, as may be reasonably required by the Company and the Registrar, that neither the Legend nor the restrictions on transfer set forth therein are required to ensure that transfers thereof comply with the provisions of Rule 144A or Rule 144 under the Securities Act or that such Securities are not "restricted" within the meaning of Rule 144 under the Securities Act; provided that no such evidence need be supplied in connection with the sale of such Security pursuant to a registration statement that is effective at the time of such sale. Upon (1) provision of such satisfactory evidence if requested or (2) notification by the Company to the Trustee and Registrar of the sale of such Security pursuant to a registration statement that is effective at the time of such sale, the Trustee, at the written direction of the Company, shall authenticate and deliver a Security that does not bear the Legend. If the Legend is removed from the face of a Security and the Security is subsequently held by an Affiliate of the Company, the Legend shall be reinstated.
     (b) A Global Security may not be transferred, in whole or in part, to any Person other than the Depositary or a nominee or any successor thereof, and no such transfer to any such other Person may be registered; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any transfer of a Security that is issued in exchange for a Global Security but is not itself a Global Security. No transfer of a Security to any Person shall be effective under this Indenture or the Securities unless and until such Security has been registered in the name of such Person. Notwithstanding any other
provided
 
provisions of this Indenture or the Securities, transfers of a Global Security, in whole or in part, shall be made only in accordance with this Section 2.13.
     (c) Subject to Section 2.13(b) and in compliance with Section 2.13(d), every Security shall be subject to the restrictions on transfer provided in the Legend. Whenever any Restricted Security other than a Restricted Global Security is presented or surrendered for registration of transfer or in exchange for a Security registered in a name other than that of the Holder, such Security must be accompanied by a certificate in substantially the form set forth in Exhibit A, dated the date of such surrender and signed by the Holder of such Security, as to compliance with such restrictions on transfer. The Registrar shall not be required to accept for such registration of transfer or exchange any Security not so accompanied by a properly completed certificate.
     (d) The restrictions imposed by the Legend upon the transferability of any Security shall cease and terminate when such Security has been sold pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act or transferred in compliance with Rule 144 under the Securities Act (or any successor provision thereto) or, if earlier, upon the expiration of the holding period applicable to sales thereof under Rule 144(k) under the Securities Act (or any successor provision). Any Security as to which such restrictions on transfer shall have expired in accordance with their terms or shall have terminated may, upon a surrender of such Security for exchange to the Registrar in accordance with the provisions of this Section 2.13 (accompanied, in the event that such restrictions on transfer have terminated by reason of a transfer in compliance with Rule 144 or any successor provision, by, if requested by the Company or the Registrar, an Opinion of Counsel reasonably acceptable to the Company and the Registrar and addressed to the Company and the Registrar, to the effect that the transfer of such Security has been made in compliance with Rule 144 or such successor provision), be exchanged for a new Security, of like tenor and aggregate principal amount, which shall not bear the restrictive Legend. The Company shall inform the Trustee of the effective date of any registration statement registering the offer and sale of the Securities under the Securities Act. The Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the aforementioned Opinion of Counsel or registration statement.
     As used in Sections 2.13(c) and (d), the term "transfer" encompasses any sale, pledge, transfer, hypothecation or other disposition of any Security.
     (e) The provisions below shall apply only to Global Securities:
     (1) Each Global Security authenticated under this Indenture shall be registered in the name of the Depositary or a nominee thereof and delivered to such Depositary or a nominee thereof or custodian therefor, and each such Global Security shall constitute a single Security for purposes of this Indenture.
     (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Indenture or the Securities, a Global Security shall not be exchanged in whole or in part for a Security registered, and no transfer of a Global Security in whole or in part shall be registered in the name of any Person other than the Depositary or one or more nominees thereof; that a Global Security may be exchanged for Securities registered in the names of any person
provided
 
designated by the Depositary in the event that (A) the Depositary has notified the Company that it is unwilling or unable to continue as Depositary for such Global Security or such Depositary has ceased to be a "clearing agency" registered under the Exchange Act, and in either case a successor Depositary is not appointed by the Company within 90 days after receiving such notice or becoming aware that the Depositary has ceased to be a "clearing agency" or (B) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing with respect to the Securities. Any Global Security exchanged pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be so exchanged as directed by the Depositary. Any Security issued in exchange for a Global Security or any portion thereof shall be a Global Security; , , that any such Security so issued that is registered in the name of a Person other than the Depositary or a nominee thereof shall not be a Global Security.
provided
however
     (3) Securities issued in exchange for a Global Security or any portion thereof that are not issued as a Global Security shall be issued in definitive, fully registered form, without interest coupons, shall have a principal amount equal to that of such Global Security or portion thereof to be so exchanged, shall be registered in such names and be in such authorized denominations as the Depositary shall designate and shall bear the applicable legends provided for herein. Any Global Security to be exchanged in whole shall be surrendered by the Depositary to the Trustee or the Registrar. With regard to any Global Security to be exchanged in part, either such Global Security shall be so surrendered for exchange or, if the Trustee is acting as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee with respect to such Global Security, the principal amount thereof shall be reduced, by an amount equal to the portion thereof to be so exchanged, by means of an appropriate adjustment made on the records of the Trustee. Upon any such surrender or adjustment, the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver the Security issuable on such exchange to or upon the order of the Depositary or an authorized representative thereof.
     (4) Subject to clause (6) of this Section 2.13(e), the registered Holder may grant proxies and otherwise authorize any Person, including Agent Members and Persons that may hold interests through Agent Members, to take any action which a Holder is entitled to take under this Indenture or the Securities.
     (5) In the event of the occurrence of any of the events specified in clause (2) of this Section 2.13(e), the Company will promptly make available to the Trustee a reasonable supply of Certificated Securities in definitive, fully registered form, without interest coupons.
     (6) Neither Agent Members nor any other Persons on whose behalf Agent Members may act shall have any rights under this Indenture with respect to any Global Security registered in the name of the Depositary or any nominee thereof, or under any such Global Security, and the Depositary or such nominee, as the case may be, may be treated by the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee as the absolute owner and holder of such Global Security for all purposes whatsoever. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall prevent the Company, the Trustee or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by the Depositary or such nominee, as the case may be, or impair, as between the Depositary, its
 
Agent Members and any other Person on whose behalf an Agent Member may act, the operation of customary practices of such Persons governing the exercise of the rights of a holder of any Security.
     (7) At such time as all interests in a Global Security have been converted, cancelled or exchanged for Securities in certificated form, such Global Security shall, upon receipt thereof, be cancelled by the Trustee in accordance with standing procedures and instructions existing between the Depositary and the Securities Custodian, subject to Section 2.12 of this Indenture. At any time prior to such cancellation, if any interest in a Global Security is converted, canceled or exchanged for Securities in certificated form, the principal amount of such Global Security shall, in accordance with the standing procedures and instructions existing between the Depositary and the Securities Custodian, be appropriately reduced, and an endorsement shall be made on such Global Security, by the Trustee or the Securities Custodian, at the direction of the Trustee, to reflect such reduction.
     (f) Until the expiration of the holding period applicable to sales thereof under Rule 144(k) under the Securities Act (or any successor provision thereto), any stock certificate representing Common Stock issued upon conversion of any Security shall bear a legend in substantially the following form, unless such Common Stock has been sold pursuant to a registration statement that has been declared effective under the Securities Act (and which continues to be effective at the time of such transfer) or transferred in compliance with Rule 144 under the Securities Act (or any successor provision thereto), or such Common Stock has been issued upon conversion of Securities that have been transferred pursuant to a registration statement that has been declared effective under the Securities Act or pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act (or any successor provision thereto), or unless otherwise agreed by the Company in writing with written notice thereof to the transfer agent:
THE COMMON STOCK EVIDENCED HEREBY HAS NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR ANY STATE SECURITIES LAWS, AND, ACCORDINGLY, MAY NOT BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, REGISTRATION UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT.
BY ITS ACQUISITION HEREOF, THE HOLDER AGREES TO OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER THE COMMON STOCK EVIDENCED HEREBY PRIOR TO THE DATE ON WHICH THE HOLDING PERIOD APPLICABLE TO SALES OF THE COMMON STOCK EVIDENCED HEREBY UNDER RULE 144(k) UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT (OR ANY SUCCESSOR PROVISION) EXPIRES (THE "RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE") ONLY (A) TO THE COMPANY OR ANY SUBSIDIARY THEREOF, (B) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT WHICH HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, OR (C) PURSUANT TO ANY OTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE COMPANY'S AND THE TRANSFER AGENT'S RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH
 
OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSE (C) PRIOR TO THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATIONS AND/OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM, AND IN EACH OF THE FOREGOING CASES, TO REQUIRE THAT A CERTIFICATE OF TRANSFER IN THE FORM APPEARING ON THE OTHER SIDE OF THIS CERTIFICATE IS COMPLETED AND DELIVERED BY THE TRANSFEROR TO THE TRANSFER AGENT. THIS LEGEND WILL BE REMOVED UPON THE REQUEST OF THE HOLDER AFTER THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE.
     Any such Common Stock as to which such restrictions on transfer shall have expired in accordance with their terms or as to which the conditions for removal of the foregoing legend set forth therein have been satisfied may, upon surrender of the certificates representing such shares of Common Stock for exchange in accordance with the procedures of the transfer agent for the Common Stock, be exchanged for a new certificate or certificates for a like number of shares of Common Stock, which shall not bear the restrictive legend required by this section.
     Section 2.14. .
CUSIP Numbers
     The Company in issuing the Securities may use one or more "CUSIP" numbers (if then generally in use), and, if so, the Trustee shall use "CUSIP" numbers in a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice as a convenience to Holders; that any such notice may state that no representation is made as to the correctness of such numbers either as printed on the Securities or as contained in any Fundamental Change Purchase Notice and that reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers printed on the Securities, and any such purchase shall not be affected by any defect in or omission of such numbers. The Company will notify the Trustee in writing of any change in the "CUSIP" numbers.
provided
     Section 2.15. .
Calculations
     Except as otherwise specifically stated herein or in the Securities, all calculations to be made in respect of the Securities shall be the obligation of the Company. All calculations made by the Company or its agent as contemplated pursuant to the terms hereof and of the Securities shall be made in good faith and be final and binding on the Holders absent manifest error. The Company shall provide a schedule of calculations to the Trustee, and the Trustee shall be entitled to rely upon the accuracy of the calculations by the Company without independent verification. The Trustee shall forward calculations made by the Company to any holder of Securities upon request.
     Section 2.16. .
Payment of Interest; Interest Rights Preserved
     Interest on any Security which is payable, and is punctually paid or duly provided for, on the Stated Maturity of such interest shall be paid to the Person in whose name the Security is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest payment.
     Any interest on any Security which is payable, but is not punctually paid or duly provided for, on the Stated Maturity of such interest, and interest on such defaulted interest at the then applicable interest rate borne by the Securities, to the extent lawful (such defaulted interest and
 
interest thereon herein collectively called "Defaulted Interest"), shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on the Regular Record Date; and such Defaulted Interest may be paid by the Company, at its election in each case, as provided in Subsection (a) or (b) below:
     (a) The Company may elect to make payment of any Defaulted Interest to the Persons in whose names the Securities are registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest, which shall be fixed in the following manner. The Company shall notify the Trustee in writing of the amount of Defaulted Interest proposed to be paid on each Security and the date (not less than 20 days after such notice) of the proposed payment (the "Special Payment Date"), and on the date of payment the Company shall deposit with the Trustee an amount of money equal to the aggregate amount proposed to be paid in respect of such Defaulted Interest or shall make arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for such deposit prior to the Special Payment Date, such money when deposited to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such Defaulted Interest as in this subsection provided. Thereupon the Trustee shall fix a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest which shall be not more than 15 days and not less than 10 days prior to the date of the Special Payment Date and not less than 10 days after the receipt by the Trustee of the notice of the proposed payment. The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company in writing of such Special Record Date. Unless the Company issues a press release to the same effect, in the name and at the expense of the Company, the Trustee shall cause notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date therefor to be mailed, first-class postage prepaid, to each Holder at its address as it appears in the Security Register, not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date or notify in such other manner as the Trustee determines, including in accordance with any Applicable Procedures. Notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date and Special Payment Date therefor having been so mailed or otherwise conveyed, such Defaulted Interest shall be paid to the Persons in whose names the Securities are registered on such Special Record Date and shall no longer be payable pursuant to the following paragraph (b).
     (b) The Company may make payment of any Defaulted Interest in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any national securities exchange on which the Securities may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by this Indenture not inconsistent with the requirements of such exchange, if, after written notice given by the Company to the Trustee of the proposed payment pursuant to this subsection, such payment shall be deemed practicable by the Trustee.
     Subject to the foregoing provisions of this Section 2.16, each Security delivered under this Indenture upon registration of transfer of or in exchange for or in lieu of any other Security shall carry the rights to interest accrued and unpaid, and to accrue, which were carried by such other Security.
     Section 2.17. .
Computation of Interest
     Interest on the Securities shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year comprised of twelve 30-day months.
 
     Section 3.01. .
Purchase of Securities by the Company for Cash at Option of the Holder Upon a Fundamental Change
     (a) If a Fundamental Change occurs prior to the Final Maturity Date, each Holder of a Security shall have the right, at the option of the Holder, to require the Company to purchase for cash in whole or in part (in principal amounts of $1,000 and integral multiples thereof) the Securities of such Holder at the Fundamental Change Purchase Price on the date specified by the Company that is not less than 30 days and not more than 45 days after the Fundamental Change Effective Date (the "Fundamental Change Purchase Date").
     (b) Not less than 10 Business Days prior to the date that is anticipated to be the Fundamental Change Effective Date, the Company shall mail a written notice of the Fundamental Change and of the resulting purchase right to the Trustee, Paying Agent and to each Holder of record of Securities (an "Issuer Fundamental Change Notice"). The Issuer Fundamental Change Notice shall include the form of a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice (defined below) to be completed by the Holder and shall state:
     (1) the events causing such Fundamental Change;
     (2) the date (or expected date) of such Fundamental Change;
     (3) the last date by which the Fundamental Change Purchase Notice must be delivered to elect the purchase option pursuant to this Section 3.01;
     (4) the Fundamental Change Purchase Date;
     (5) the Fundamental Change Purchase Price;
     (6) the Holder's right to require the Company to purchase the Securities;
     (7) the name and address of each Paying Agent and Conversion Agent;
     (8) the then effective Conversion Rate and any adjustments to the Conversion Rate resulting from such Fundamental Change;
     (9) the procedures that the Holder must follow to exercise rights under Article 4 of this Indenture and that the Securities as to which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been given may be converted into Common Stock pursuant to Article 4 of this Indenture only to the extent that the Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been withdrawn in accordance with the terms of this Indenture;
     (10) the procedures that the Holder must follow to exercise rights under this Section 3.01;
 
     (11) the procedures for withdrawing a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice;
     (12) that, unless the Company fails to pay such Fundamental Change Purchase Price, Securities covered by any Fundamental Change Purchase Notice will cease to be outstanding and interest will cease to accrue on and after the Fundamental Change Purchase Date; and
     (13) the CUSIP number of the Securities.
     At the Company's written request, the Trustee shall give such Issuer Fundamental Change Notice in the Company's name and at the Company's expense; that, in all cases, the text of such Issuer Fundamental Change Notice shall be prepared by the Company. In connection with the delivery of the Issuer Fundamental Change Notice to the Holders, the Company shall publish a notice containing substantially the same information that is required in the Issuer Fundamental Change Notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the City of New York or publish information on a website of the Company or through such other public medium the Company may use at that time. If any of the Securities is in the form of a Global Security, then the Company shall modify such notice to the extent necessary to accord with the Applicable Procedures relating to the purchase of Global Securities.
provided
     (c) A Holder may exercise its rights specified in Section 3.01(a) upon delivery of a written notice (which shall be in substantially the form set forth in the form of Security attached as Exhibit A under the heading "Fundamental Change Purchase Notice" and which may be delivered by letter, overnight courier, hand delivery, facsimile transmission or in any other written form and, in the case of Global Securities, may be delivered electronically or by other means in accordance with the Depositary's Applicable Procedures) of the exercise of such rights (a "Fundamental Change Purchase Notice") to the Paying Agent at any time prior to the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Fundamental Change Purchase Date, subject to extension to comply with applicable law.
     (1) The Fundamental Change Purchase Notice shall state: (A) if the Securities are in certificated form, the certificate numbers of the Securities which the Holder will deliver to be purchased (or, if the Security is held in global form, any other items required to comply with the Applicable Procedures), (B) the portion of the principal amount of the Securities which the Holder will deliver to be purchased, which portion must be a principal amount of $1,000 or any integral multiple thereof and (C) that such Security shall be purchased as of the Fundamental Change Purchase Date pursuant to the terms and conditions specified in the Securities and in this Indenture.
     (2) The delivery of a Security for which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been timely delivered to any Paying Agent and not validly withdrawn prior to, on or after the Fundamental Change Purchase Date (together with all necessary endorsements) at the office of such Paying Agent shall be a condition to the receipt by the Holder of the Fundamental Change Purchase Price therefor.
     (3) The Company shall only be obliged to purchase, pursuant to this Section 3.01, a portion of a Security if the principal amount of such portion is $1,000 or an
 
integral multiple thereof. Provisions of this Indenture that apply to the purchase of all of a Security also apply to the purchase of such portion of such Security.
     (4) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, any Holder delivering to a Paying Agent the Fundamental Change Purchase Notice contemplated by this Section 3.01(c) shall have the right to withdraw such Fundamental Change Purchase Notice in whole or in a portion thereof that is a principal amount of $1,000 or in an integral multiple thereof at any time prior to the close of business on the Business Day prior to the Fundamental Change Purchase Date by delivery of a written notice of withdrawal to the Paying Agent in accordance with Section 3.02(b).
     (5) A Paying Agent shall promptly notify the Company of the receipt by it of any Fundamental Change Purchase Notice or written withdrawal thereof.
     (6) Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, in the case of Global Securities, any Fundamental Change Purchase Notice may be delivered or withdrawn and such Securities may be surrendered or delivered for purchase in accordance with the Applicable Procedures as in effect from time to time.
     Section 3.02. .
Effect of Fundamental Change Purchase Notice
     (a) Upon receipt by any Paying Agent of a properly completed Fundamental Change Purchase Notice from a Holder, the Holder of the Security in respect of which such Fundamental Change Purchase Notice was given shall (unless such Fundamental Change Purchase Notice is withdrawn as specified in Section 3.02(b)) thereafter be entitled to receive the Fundamental Change Purchase Price with respect to such Security. Such Fundamental Change Purchase Price shall be paid to such Holder promptly following the later of (1) the Fundamental Change Purchase Date (that the conditions in Section 3.01 have been satisfied) and (2) the time of delivery of such Security to a Paying Agent by the Holder thereof in the manner required by Section 3.01(c). Securities in respect of which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been given by the Holder thereof may not be converted in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 on or after the date of the delivery of such Fundamental Change Purchase Notice unless such Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has first been validly withdrawn in accordance with Section 3.02(b) with respect to the Securities to be converted.
provided
     (b) A Fundamental Change Purchase Notice may be withdrawn by means of a written notice (which may be delivered by mail, overnight courier, hand delivery, facsimile transmission or in any other written form and, in the case of Global Securities, may be delivered electronically or by other means in accordance with the Applicable Procedures) of withdrawal delivered by the Holder to a Paying Agent at any time prior to the close of business on the Business Day immediately prior to the Fundamental Change Purchase Date, specifying (1) the principal amount of the Security or portion thereof (which must be a principal amount of $1,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof) with respect to which such notice of withdrawal is being submitted, (2) if the Securities are in certificated form, the certificate numbers of the Security being withdrawn in whole or in part and (3) the portion of the principal amount of the Security that will remain subject to the Fundamental Change Purchase Notice, which portion must be a principal amount of $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof.
 
     Section 3.03. .
Deposit of Fundamental Change Purchase Price
     (a) On or before 10:00 a.m. New York City time on the applicable Fundamental Change Purchase Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with a Paying Agent (or if the Company or an Affiliate of the Company is acting as the Paying Agent, shall segregate and hold in trust as provided in Section 2.04) an amount of money (in immediately available funds if deposited on or after such Fundamental Change Purchase Date), sufficient to pay the aggregate Fundamental Change Purchase Price of all the Securities or portions thereof that are to be purchased as of the Fundamental Change Purchase Date.
     (b) If a Paying Agent or the Trustee holds on the Fundamental Change Purchase Date in accordance with the terms hereof an amount of money sufficient to pay the Fundamental Change Purchase Price of any Security (or portion thereof) for which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been tendered and not withdrawn in accordance with this Indenture then, immediately following the applicable Fundamental Change Purchase Date, whether or not the Security is delivered to the Paying Agent, such Security shall cease to be outstanding, interest, shall cease to accrue, and the rights of the Holder in respect of the Security shall terminate (other than the right to receive the Fundamental Change Purchase Price upon delivery of the Security as aforesaid).
     (c) The Paying Agent will promptly return to the respective Holders thereof any Securities with respect to which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been withdrawn in compliance with this Indenture.
     (d) If a Fundamental Change Purchase Date falls after a Regular Record Date and on or before the related Interest Payment Date, then interest on the Securities payable on such Interest Payment Date will be payable to the Holders in whose names the Securities are registered at the close of business on such Regular Record Date.
     Section 3.04. .
Repayment to the Company
     To the extent that the aggregate amount of cash deposited by the Company pursuant to Section 3.03 exceeds the aggregate Fundamental Change Purchase Price of the Securities or portions thereof that the Company is obligated to purchase, then promptly after the Fundamental Change Purchase Date the Trustee or a Paying Agent, as the case may be, shall return any such excess cash to the Company, or if such money is then held by the Company in trust, it shall be discharged from the trust.
     Section 3.05. .
Securities Purchased In Part
     Any Security that is to be purchased only in part shall be surrendered at the office of a Paying Agent, and promptly after the Fundamental Change Purchase Date, as the case may be, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver to the Holder of such Security, without service charge, a new Security or Securities, of such authorized denomination or denominations as may be requested by such Holder (which must be equal to $1,000 principal amount or any integral multiple thereof), in aggregate principal amount equal to, and in exchange for, the portion of the principal amount of the Security so surrendered that is not purchased.
 
     Section 3.06. .
Compliance With Securities Laws Upon Purchase of Securities
     In connection with any offer to purchase Securities under Section 3.01, the Company shall (a) comply with the provisions of the tender offer rules under the Exchange Act which may then be applicable, (b) file the related Schedule TO (or any successor or similar schedule, form or report) if required under the Exchange Act, and (c) otherwise comply with all federal and state securities laws in connection with such offer to purchase or purchase of Securities, all so as to permit the rights of the Holders and obligations of the Company under Sections 3.01 through 3.04 to be exercised in the time and in the manner specified therein. To the extent that compliance with any such laws, rules and regulations would result in a conflict with any of the terms hereof, this Indenture is hereby modified to the extent required for the Company to comply with such laws, rules and regulations.
     Section 3.07. .
Purchase of Securities In Open Market
     The Company may purchase Securities in the open market or by tender at any price or pursuant to private agreements. The Company shall surrender any Security purchased by the Company pursuant to this Article 3 to the Trustee for cancellation. Any Securities surrendered to the Trustee for cancellation may not be reissued or resold by the Company and will be canceled promptly in accordance with Section 2.12.
     Section 4.01. .
Conversion Privilege and Conversion Rate
     (a) Any Security or portion thereof that is an integral multiple of $1,000 principal amount may be converted by the Holder thereof in accordance with the provisions of this Article 4. Upon conversion, Holders shall be entitled to receive the amount of cash and, if applicable, shares of Common Stock determined in manner provided in Section 4.12. Securities may be converted prior to the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Final Maturity Date at the Conversion Rate in effect at the time of such conversion only under the following circumstances:
     (1) on any Business Day in any fiscal quarter of the Company commencing at any time after March 30, 2007, and only during such fiscal quarter, if, as of the last day of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter, the Closing Price of the Common Stock for at least 20 Trading Days in the period of 30 consecutive Trading Days ending on the last Trading Day of such preceding fiscal quarter was more than 130% of the applicable Conversion Price on the last day of such preceding fiscal quarter;
     (2) on any Business Day during the five Business Day period after any five consecutive Trading Day period in which the Trading Price per $1,000 principal amount of Securities, as determined by the Trustee following a request by a Holder in accordance with the procedures described in Section 4.01(d)(ii), for each Trading Day of that period was less than 98% of the product of the Closing Price of the Common Stock on such day and the then applicable Conversion Rate per $1,000 principal amount of Securities.
 
     (3) if the Company distributes to all holders of Common Stock any rights entitling them to purchase, for a period expiring within 45 days of distribution, Common Stock, or securities convertible into Common Stock, at less than, or having a conversion price per share less than, the Closing Price of the Common Stock on the Trading Day immediately preceding the declaration date for such distribution;
     (4) if the Company distributes to all holders of Common Stock assets, cash, debt securities or rights to purchase the Company's securities, which distribution has a per share value as determined by the Board of Directors exceeding 15% of the Closing Price of the Common Stock on the Trading Day immediately preceding the declaration date for such distribution;
     (5) if a Fundamental Change occurs; or
     (6) at any time during the period beginning on January 15, 2013 and ending at the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Final Maturity Date.
     (b) In the case of a distribution contemplated by clauses (3) and (4) of Section 4.01(a), the Company shall notify Holders and the Trustee at least 35 days prior to the ex-dividend date (defined below) for such distribution (the "Distribution Notice"). Once the Company has given the Distribution Notice, Holders may surrender their Securities for conversion at any time until the earlier of the close of business on the Business Day prior to the ex-dividend date or the Company's announcement that such distribution will not take place. In the event of a distribution contemplated by clauses (3) and (4) of Section 4.01(a), Holders may not convert the Securities if the Holders will otherwise participate in such distribution on an as converted basis (assuming for this purpose that the Securities were convertible solely into a number of shares of Common Stock equal to the then applicable Conversion Rate). The "ex-dividend date" is the first date upon which a sale of the Common Stock does not automatically transfer the right to receive the relevant distribution from the seller of the Common Stock to its buyer. The Company will provide written notice to the Conversion Agent as soon as reasonably practicable of any anticipated or actual event or transaction that will cause or causes the Securities to become convertible pursuant to clauses (3) or (4) of Section 4.01(a).
     (c) In the case of a Fundamental Change, the Company shall provide notice thereof (a "Fundamental Change Conversion Notice") to the Holders of Securities and the Trustee at least 15 days prior to date that is anticipated to be the Fundamental Change Effective Date. Holders may surrender Securities for conversion at any time beginning 15 days before the date that is anticipated to be the Fundamental Change Effective Date until the Trading Day prior to the Fundamental Change Purchase Date.
     (d) (i)For each fiscal quarter of the Company, beginning with the fiscal quarter ending March 31, 2007, the Company, will determine, on the first Business Day following the last Trading Day of such fiscal quarter, whether the Securities are convertible pursuant to clause (1) of Section 4.01(a), and, if so, will notify the Trustee and the Conversion Agent (to the extent the Trustee is not also serving as the Conversion Agent) in writing.
 
     (ii) The Trustee shall have no obligation to determine the Trading Price of the Securities and whether the Securities are convertible pursuant to clause (2) of Section 4.01(a) unless the Company has requested such determination and the Company shall have no obligation to make such request unless a Holder of the Securities provides the Company with reasonable evidence that the Trading Price per $1,000 principal amount of Securities would be less than 98% of the product of the Closing Price of the Common Stock and the then applicable Conversion Rate per $1,000 principal amount of Securities. At such time, the Company shall instruct the Trustee to determine the Trading Price of the Securities beginning on the next Trading Day and on each successive Trading Day until the Trading Price per $1,000 principal amount of the Securities is greater than 98% of the product of the Closing Price of the Common Stock and the then applicable Conversion Rate per $1,000 principal amount of the Securities.
     (e) The conversion rights pursuant to this Article 4 shall commence on the Issue Date of the Securities and expire at the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Final Maturity Date, but shall be exercisable only during the time periods specified with respect to each circumstance pursuant to which the Securities become convertible, subject, in the case of conversion of any Global Security, to any Applicable Procedures.
     (f) Securities in respect of which a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice has been delivered, if otherwise convertible pursuant to this Article 4, may not be surrendered for conversion pursuant to this Article 4 prior to a valid withdrawal of such Fundamental Change Notice, in accordance with the provisions of Article 3.
     (g) Provisions of this Indenture that apply to conversion of all of a Security also apply to conversion of a portion of a Security.
     (h) The Conversion Rate shall be adjusted in certain instances as provided in Section 4.01(i) and Section 4.06.
     (i) If a Fundamental Change occurs prior to the Final Maturity Date as a result of a transaction described in clauses (1), (2) or (4) of the definition of the term "Change of Control" and a Holder elects to convert its Securities "in connection with" such transaction, the Company shall pay a "Make Whole Premium" by increasing the applicable Conversion Rate for the Securities surrendered for conversion by a number of additional shares of Common Stock as provided in this Section 4.01(i) (the "Additional Shares"). A conversion of Securities shall be deemed for these purposes to be "in connection with" such a transaction if the notice of conversion is received by the Conversion Agent from and including the Fundamental Change Effective Date and prior to the close of business on the Business Day prior to the Fundamental Change Purchase Date.
     The number of Additional Shares per $1,000 principal amount of Securities constituting the Make Whole Premium shall be determined by reference to the table below and shall be based on the date on which the Fundamental Change Effective Date occurs and the price (the "Stock Price") paid, or deemed to be paid, per share of Common Stock in such transaction. If holders of Common Stock receive only cash in the Fundamental Change transaction, the Stock Price shall be the cash amount paid per share of Common Stock. Otherwise, the Stock Price shall be the
 
average of the Closing Prices of the Common Stock for each of the ten consecutive Trading Days prior to but excluding the Fundamental Change Effective Date.
     The following table sets forth the Additional Share amounts, if any, by which the applicable Conversion Rate shall be increased for each Stock Price and Fundamental Change Effective Date.
     If the actual Stock Price or Fundamental Change Effective Date is not set forth in the table above, then:
     (i) if the actual Stock Price on the Fundamental Change Effective Date is between two Stock Price amounts in the table or the actual Fundamental Change Effective Date is between two Fundamental Change Effective Dates in the table, the Additional Share amounts will be determined by a straight-line interpolation between the Additional Share amounts set forth for the higher and lower Stock Prices and the two Fundamental Change Effective Dates on the table based on a 365-day year;
     (ii) if the actual Stock Price on the Fundamental Change Effective Date exceeds $110.00 per share of Common Stock, subject to adjustment as set forth herein, no adjustment to the Conversion Rate shall be made; and
     (iii) if the actual Stock Price on the Fundamental Change Effective Date is less than $55.20 per share of Common Stock, subject to adjustment as set forth herein, no adjustment to the Conversion Rate shall be made.
     The Stock Prices set forth in the first column of the table above will be adjusted as of any date on which the Conversion Rate of the Securities is adjusted pursuant to Section 4.06 hereof. The adjusted Stock Prices will equal the Stock Prices applicable immediately prior to such adjustment multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the Conversion Rate immediately prior to the adjustment giving rise to the Stock Price adjustment and the denominator of which is
 
the Conversion Rate as so adjusted. The number of Additional Share amounts set forth in the table above will be adjusted in the same manner as the Conversion Rate as set forth in Section 4.06 hereof.
     Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall the Conversion Rate exceed 28 shares per $1,000 principal amount of Securities, subject to adjustment in the same manner as the Conversion Rate as set forth in subsections (a) through (c) of Section 4.06 hereof.
     Section 4.02. .
Conversion Procedure
     (a) To convert a Security, a Holder must (1) complete and manually sign the conversion notice on the back of the Security (which shall be substantially in the form set forth in the form of Security attached as Exhibit A under the heading "Conversion Notice") and deliver such notice to the Conversion Agent, (2) surrender the Security to the Conversion Agent, (3) furnish appropriate endorsements and transfer documents if required by the Conversion Agent, (4) pay an amount equal to the interest payable on the next Interest Payment Date if and as required by Section 4.02(c) and (5) pay all transfer or similar taxes, if required pursuant to Section 4.04. The date on which the Holder of a Security satisfies all of the foregoing requirements is the "Conversion Date" with respect to such Security. Upon the conversion of a Security, the Company shall deliver the amounts determined in accordance with Section 4.12 which shall be owing upon such conversion as promptly as practicable after the applicable Conversion Reference Period but in any event not later than the third Business Day following the last Trading Day of such Conversion Reference Period. Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, in the case of Global Securities, Securities may be surrendered in accordance with the Applicable Procedures of the Depositary as in effect from time to time.
     (b) A Holder shall not be entitled to any rights of a holder of Common Stock until such holder has converted its Securities and received upon conversion thereof shares of Common Stock. The person in whose name any certificate or certificates for shares of Common Stock shall be issuable upon such conversion, if any, shall become on the date any such certificate or certificates are delivered to such holder in accordance with the provisions of this Article 4, the holder of record of the shares represented thereby. Except as set forth in this Indenture, no payment or adjustment will be made for dividends or distributions declared or made on shares of Common Stock issued upon conversion of a Security prior to the issuance of such shares of Common Stock.
     (c) Holders of Securities surrendered for conversion (in whole or in part) during the period from the close of business on any Regular Record Date to the opening of business on the next succeeding Interest Payment Date will receive the semiannual interest payable on such Securities on the corresponding Interest Payment Date notwithstanding the conversion, and such interest shall be payable on the corresponding Interest Payment Date to the Holder of the Security as of the close of business on the Regular Record Date. Upon surrender of any such Securities for conversion after the close of business on such Regular Record Date, such Securities shall also be accompanied by payment by the Holders of such Securities in funds to the Conversion Agent acceptable to the Company of an amount equal to the interest payable on such corresponding Interest Payment Date; that no such payment need be made: (1) in connection with a conversion following the Regular Record Date preceding the Final Maturity
provided
 
Date; (2) if the Company has specified a Fundamental Change Purchase Date that is after a Regular Record Date and on or prior to the corresponding Interest Payment Date; or (3) to the extent of any overdue interest, if any overdue interest exists at the time of conversion with respect to such Security. Except as otherwise provided in this Section 4.02(c), no payment or adjustment will be made for accrued and unpaid interest on a converted Security. Accrued and unpaid interest shall be deemed paid in full, rather than cancelled, extinguished or forfeited. The Company shall not be required to convert any Securities which are surrendered for conversion without payment of interest as required by this Section 4.02(c).
     (d) In the case of any Security which is converted in part only, upon such conversion the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver to the Holder thereof, without service charge, a new Security or Securities of authorized denominations in an aggregate principal amount equal to, and in exchange for, the unconverted portion of the principal amount of such Security.
     (e) Upon the Company's determination that Holders are or will be entitled to convert their Securities in accordance with the provisions of this Article 4, the Company shall promptly issue a press release or otherwise publicly disclose this information and use its reasonable efforts to post such information on the Company's website.
     Section 4.03. .
Fractional Shares
     The Company will not issue fractional shares of Common Stock upon conversion of Securities. If more than one Security shall be surrendered for conversion at one time by the same Holder, the number of full shares that shall be issuable upon conversion shall be computed on the basis of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities (or specified portions thereof to the extent permitted hereby) so surrendered. In lieu of any fractional shares, the Company shall pay an amount in cash equal to the applicable portion of the arithmetic average of the Volume Weighted Average Price of the Common Stock for each of the 20 consecutive Trading Days of the Conversion Reference Period, rounding to the nearest whole cent.
     Section 4.04. .
Taxes on Conversion
     The issue of stock certificates, if any, on conversion of Securities shall be made without charge to the converting Holder for any documentary, stamp or similar issue or transfer tax in respect of the issue thereof. The Company shall not, however, be required to pay any such tax which may be payable in respect of any transfer involved in the issue and delivery of stock in any name other than that of the Holder of any Security converted, and the Company shall not be required to issue or deliver any such stock certificate unless and until the Person or Persons requesting the issue thereof shall have paid to the Company the amount of such tax or shall have established to the satisfaction of the Company that such tax has been paid.
     Section 4.05. .
Company To Provide Common Stock
     (a) The Company shall, prior to issuance of any Securities hereunder, and from time to time as may be necessary, reserve, out of its authorized but unissued Common Stock, a sufficient number of shares of Common Stock to permit the conversion of all outstanding Securities in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture.
 
     (b) All shares of Common Stock delivered upon conversion of the Securities shall be newly issued shares or treasury shares, shall be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and shall be free from preemptive or similar rights and free of any lien or adverse claim as the result of any action by the Company.
     (c) The Company will endeavor promptly to comply with all federal and state securities laws regulating the offer and delivery of shares of Common Stock upon conversion of Securities, if any, and will list or cause to have listed such shares of Common Stock on the New York Stock Exchange, or each national securities exchange or over the counter market or such other market on which the Common Stock is then listed or quoted.
     Section 4.06. .
Adjustment of Conversion Rate
     The Conversion Rate shall be adjusted from time to time by the Company as follows:
     (a) If the Company issues Common Stock as a dividend or distribution on Common Stock to all holders of Common Stock, or if the Company effects a share split or share combination, the Conversion Rate will be adjusted based on the following formula:
Any adjustment made pursuant to this Section 4.06(a) shall become effective on the date that is immediately after (x) the date fixed for the determination of stockholders entitled to receive such dividend or other distribution or (y) the date on which such split or combination becomes effective, as applicable. If any dividend or distribution described in this clause Section 4.06(a) is declared but not so paid or made, the new Conversion Rate shall be readjusted to the Conversion Rate that would then be in effect if such dividend or distribution had not been declared.
     (b) If the Company issues to all holders of Common Stock any rights, warrants, options or other securities entitling them for a period of not more than 45 days after the date of issuance thereof to subscribe for or purchase Common Stock, or if the Company issues to all holders of Common Stock securities convertible into Common Stock for a period of not more than 45 days after the date of issuance thereof, in either case at an exercise price per share of Common Stock or a conversion price per share of Common Stock less than the Closing Price of
 
the Common Stock on the Business Day immediately preceding the time of announcement of such issuance, the Conversion Rate will be adjusted based on the following formula:
For purposes of this Section 4.06(b), in determining whether any rights, warrants, options, other securities or convertible securities entitle the holders to subscribe for or purchase, or exercise a conversion right for, Common Stock at less than the applicable Closing Price of the Common Stock, and in determining the aggregate exercise or conversion price payable for such Common Stock, there shall be taken into account any consideration received by the Company for such rights, warrants, options, other securities or convertible securities and any amount payable on exercise or conversion thereof, with the value of such consideration, if other than cash, to be determined by the Board of Directors of the Company. Any adjustment made pursuant to this Section 4.06(b) shall become effective on the date that is immediately after the date fixed for the determination of shareholders entitled to receive such rights, warrants, options, other securities or convertible securities. If any right, warrant, option, other security or convertible security described in this Section 4.06(b) is not exercised or converted prior to the expiration of the exercisability or convertibility thereof, the new Conversion Rate shall be readjusted to the Conversion Rate that would then be in effect if such right, warrant, option, other security or convertible security had not been so issued.
     (c) If the Company distributes capital stock, evidences of indebtedness or other assets or property of the Company to all holders of Common Stock, excluding:
     (1) dividends, distributions, rights, warrants, options, other securities or convertible securities referred to in Section 4.06(a) or (b) above,
 
     (2) dividends or distributions paid exclusively in cash, and
     (3) Spin-Offs described below in this Section 4.06(c),
then the Conversion Rate will be adjusted based on the following formula:
An adjustment to the Conversion Rate made pursuant to this paragraph shall be made successively whenever any such distribution is made and shall become effective on the ex-dividend date for such distribution.
     If the Company distributes to all holders of Common Stock capital stock of any class or series, or similar equity interest, of or relating to a subsidiary or other business unit of the Company (a "Spin-Off"), the Conversion Rate in effect immediately before the close of business on the date fixed for determination of holders of Common Stock entitled to receive such distribution will be adjusted based on the following formula:
 
An adjustment to the Conversion Rate made pursuant to this paragraph will occur on the 10th Trading Day from and including the effective date of the Spin-Off.
     If any such dividend or distribution described in this Section 4.06(c) is declared but not paid or made, the new Conversion Rate shall be readjusted to be the Conversion Rate that would then be in effect if such dividend or distribution had not been declared.
     (d) If the Company pays or makes any dividend or distribution consisting exclusively of cash to all holders of Common Stock, the Conversion Rate will be adjusted based on the following formula:
An adjustment to the Conversion Rate made pursuant to this Section 4.06(d) shall become effective on the ex-dividend date for such dividend or distribution. If any dividend or distribution described in this Section 4.06(d) is declared but not so paid or made, the new Conversion Rate shall be readjusted to the Conversion Rate that would then be in effect if such dividend or distribution had not been declared.
     (e) If the Company or any of its subsidiaries makes a payment in respect of a tender offer or exchange offer for Common Stock to the extent that the cash and value of any other consideration included in the payment per share of Common Stock exceeds the Closing Price of the Common Stock on the Trading Day next succeeding the last date on which tenders or exchanges may be made pursuant to such tender or exchange offer (the "Expiration Time"), the Conversion Rate will be adjusted based on the following formula:
 
If the application of the foregoing formula would result in a decrease in the Conversion Rate, no adjustment to the Conversion Rate will be made.
     Any adjustment to the Conversion Rate made pursuant to this Section 4.06(e) shall become effective on the date immediately following the determination of the average of the Closing Prices of Common Stock for purposes of SP1 above. If the Company or one of its subsidiaries is obligated to purchase Common Stock pursuant to any such tender or exchange offer but is permanently prevented by applicable law from effecting any such purchase or all such purchases are rescinded, the new Conversion Rate shall be readjusted to be the Conversion Rate that would be in effect if such tender or exchange offer had not been made.
     (f) Notwithstanding the foregoing subsections (a) through (e) of this Section 4.06, the Conversion Rate shall not exceed 28 shares per $1,000 principal amount of Securities, other than on account of adjustments to the Conversion Rate in the manner set forth in subsections (a) through (c) of this Section 4.06.
     (g) In addition to the adjustments pursuant to clauses (a) through (e) above, the Company may increase the Conversion Rate in order to avoid or diminish any income tax to holders of Common Stock resulting from any dividend or distribution of capital shares (or rights to acquire Common Stock) or from any event treated as such for income tax purposes. The Company may also, from time to time, to the extent permitted by applicable law, increase the Conversion Rate by any amount for any period if the Company has determined that such increase would be in the best interests of the Company. If the Company makes such determination, it will be conclusive and the Company will mail to holders of the Securities a notice of the increased Conversion Rate and the period during which it will be in effect at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date the increased Conversion Rate takes effect in accordance with applicable law.
     (h) If the Company has in effect a rights plan while any Securities remain outstanding, Holders will receive, upon a conversion of Securities in respect of which the Company is required to deliver shares of Common Stock, in addition to such shares of Common Stock, rights under the Company's stockholder rights agreement unless, prior to conversion, the
 
rights have expired, terminated or been redeemed or unless the rights have separated from the Common Stock. If the rights provided for in the rights plan adopted by the Company have separated from the Common Stock in accordance with the provisions of the applicable stockholder rights agreement so that Holders would not be entitled to receive any rights in respect of Common Stock, if any, that the Company is required to deliver upon conversion of Securities, the Conversion Rate will be adjusted at the time of separation as if the Company had distributed to all holders of Common Stock capital stock, evidences of indebtedness or other assets or property pursuant to Section 4.06(c) above, subject to readjustment upon the subsequent expiration, termination or redemption of the rights.
     (i) For purposes of this Section 4.06, the number of shares of Common Stock at any time outstanding shall not include shares held in the treasury of the Company but shall include shares issuable in respect of scrip certificates issued in lieu of fractions of shares of Common Stock.
     Section 4.07. .
No Adjustment
     (a) The Company shall not be required to make any adjustment to the Conversion Rate in accordance with the provisions of Section 4.06 if Holders of the Securities are permitted to participate, on an as-converted basis, in the transactions described in Section 4.06 (assuming for this purpose that each $1,000 principal amount of Securities were convertible solely into a number of shares of Common Stock equal to the Conversion Rate).
     (b) No adjustment in the Conversion Rate shall be required to be made unless the adjustment would require an increase or decrease of at least 1% of the Conversion Price. If the adjustment is not made because the adjustment does not change the Conversion Price by at least 1%, then the adjustment that is not made will be carried forward and taken into account in any future adjustment. All required calculations will be made to the nearest cent or 1/1000th of a share, as the case may be. Notwithstanding the foregoing, all adjustments not previously made shall have effect with respect to any conversion of Securities on or after January 15, 2013.
     (c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, in addition to the other events set forth herein on account of which no adjustment to the Conversion Rate shall be made, the applicable Conversion Rate shall not be adjusted for: (i) the issuance of any Common Stock pursuant to any present or future plan providing for the reinvestment of dividends or interest payable on securities of the Company and the investment of additional optional amounts in Common Stock under any plan; (ii) the issuance of any shares of Common Stock or options or rights to purchase those shares pursuant to any present or future employee, director or consultant benefit plan, employee agreement or arrangement or program of the Company; (iii) the issuance of any shares of Common Stock pursuant to any option, warrant, right, or exercisable, exchangeable or convertible security outstanding as of the date the Securities were first issued; (iv) a change in the par value of the Common Stock; (v) accumulated and unpaid dividends or distributions; and (vi) as a result of a tender offer solely to holders of fewer than 100 shares of Common Stock.
     (d) Notwithstanding anything in this Section 4.06 to the contrary, in no event shall the Conversion Rate be adjusted so that the Conversion Price would be less than $0.01.
 
     Whenever the Conversion Rate is adjusted as herein provided, the Company shall promptly file with the Trustee and any Conversion Agent other than the Trustee, an Officer's Certificate setting forth the Conversion Rate after such adjustment and setting forth a brief statement of the facts requiring such adjustment. Unless and until a Trust Officer of the Trustee shall have received such Officer's Certificate, the Trustee shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any adjustment of the Conversion Rate and may assume that the last Conversion Rate of which it has knowledge is still in effect. Promptly after delivery of such certificate, the Company shall prepare a notice of such adjustment of the Conversion Rate setting forth the adjusted Conversion Rate and the date on which each adjustment becomes effective and shall mail such notice of such adjustment of the Conversion Rate to Holders within 20 Business Days of the effective date of such adjustment. Failure to deliver such notice shall not affect the legality or validity of any such adjustment.
     In the event that the Company takes any action which would require an adjustment to the Conversion Rate, the Company takes any action that requires the execution of a supplemental indenture in accordance with the provisions of Section 4.10 or if there is a dissolution or liquidation of the Company, the Company shall mail to Holders and file with the Trustee a notice stating the proposed record or effective date, as the case may be. The Company shall mail such notice at least 20 days before such proposed effective date. Failure to mail such notice or any defect therein shall not affect the validity of any transaction referred to in this Section 4.09.
     (a) If any of the following events occur (each, a "Business Combination"), namely:
     (1) any recapitalization, reclassification or change of the Common Stock, other than (A) a change in par value, or from par value to no par value, or from no par value to par value, or (B) as a result of a subdivision or combination,
     (2) a consolidation, merger or combination of the Company with another Person, or
     (3) a sale, lease or other transfer to another Person of all or substantially all of the consolidated assets of the Company's and its Subsidiaries, or
     (4) any statutory share exchange of the Company with another person,
in each case as a result of which holders of Common Stock are entitled to receive stock, other securities, other property or assets (including cash or any combination thereof) with respect to or in exchange for Common Stock, the Company or the successor or purchasing corporation, as the case may be, shall execute with the Trustee a supplemental indenture (which shall comply with the TIA as in force at the date of execution of such supplemental indenture if such supplemental indenture is then required to so comply) providing that from and after the effective date of such
 
Business Combination, upon conversion of Securities, the settlement of the Conversion Value in accordance with the provisions of Section 4.12 shall be based on, and each Remaining Share, if any, deliverable in respect of any such settlement shall consist of, the kind and amount of shares of stock, other securities or other property or assets (including cash or any combination thereof) which holders of Common Stock are entitled to receive in respect of each share of Common Stock upon such Business Combination. In the event holders of Common Stock have the opportunity to elect the form of consideration to be received in such Business Combination, the Company shall make adequate provision whereby the Holders of the Securities shall have a reasonable opportunity to determine the form of consideration into which all of the Securities, treated as a single class, shall be convertible from and after the effective date of such Business Combination. Such determination shall be (i) based on the weighted average of elections made by Holders of the Securities who participate in such determination, (ii) subject to any limitations to which all of the holders of the Common Stock are subject, such as pro rata reductions applicable to any portion of the consideration payable in such Business Combination and (iii) conducted in such a manner as to be completed by the date which is the earlier of (a) the deadline for elections to be made by stockholders of the Company, and (b) two Trading Days prior to the anticipated effective date of the Business Combination. The Company shall provide notice of the opportunity to determine the form of such consideration, as well as notice of the determination made by Holders of the Securities (and the weighted average of elections), by issuing a press release or providing other notice deemed appropriate by the Company, and by providing a copy of such notice to the Trustee. In the event the effective date of the Business Combination is delayed more than 10 days beyond the initially anticipated effective date, Holders of the Securities shall be given the opportunity to make subsequent similar determinations in regard to such delayed effective date. Such supplemental indenture shall provide for adjustments of the Conversion Rate and other appropriate numerical thresholds which shall be as nearly equivalent as may be practicable to the adjustments of the Conversion Rate provided for in this Article 4. If, in the case of any such Business Combination, the stock or other securities and assets receivable thereupon by a holder of shares of Common Stock includes shares of stock or other securities and assets of a corporation other than the successor or purchasing corporation, as the case may be, in such Business Combination, then such supplemental indenture shall also be executed by such other corporation and shall contain such additional provisions to protect the interests of the Holders of the Securities as the Board of Directors shall reasonably consider necessary by reason of the foregoing, including to the extent practicable the provisions providing for the repurchase rights set forth in Article 3 hereof. The Company shall not become a party to any Business Combination unless its terms are materially consistent with the provisions of this Section 4.10. The above provisions of this Section 4.10 shall similarly apply to successive Business Combinations. None of the provisions of this Section 4.10 shall affect the right of a Holder of Securities to convert its Securities in accordance with the provisions of this Article 4 prior to the effective date of a Business Combination.
     If this Section 4.10(a) applies to any event or occurrence, Section 4.06 hereof shall not apply.
     (b) In the event the Company shall execute a supplemental indenture pursuant to this Section 4.10, the Company shall promptly file with the Trustee (1) an Officer's Certificate briefly stating the reasons therefore and that all conditions precedent have been complied with and (2) an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that all conditions precedent thereto and hereunder
 
have been complied with and that the execution and delivery of the Supplemental Indenture is authorized or permitted under the Indenture, and shall promptly mail notice of the execution of such supplemental indenture to all Holders. Failure to mail such notice or any defect therein shall not affect the validity of such transaction and such supplemental indenture.
     (a) The Trustee shall have no duty to determine when an adjustment under this Article 4 should be made, how it should be made or what such adjustment should be, but may accept as conclusive evidence of that fact or the correctness of any such adjustment, and shall be protected in relying upon, an Officer's Certificate and Opinion of Counsel, including the Officer's Certificate with respect thereto which the Company is obligated to file with the Trustee pursuant to Section 4.08. The Trustee makes no representation as to the validity or value of any securities or assets issued upon conversion of Securities, and the Trustee shall not be responsible for the Company's failure to comply with any provisions of this Article 4, including, without limitation, whether or not a Supplemental Indenture is required to be executed.
     (b) The Trustee shall not be under any responsibility to determine the correctness of any provisions contained in any supplemental indenture executed pursuant to Section 4.10, but may accept as conclusive evidence of the correctness thereof, and shall be fully protected in relying upon, the Officer's Certificate and Opinion of Counsel, with respect thereto which the Company is obligated to file with the Trustee pursuant to Section 4.10.
     (a) Holders surrendering Securities for conversion shall be entitled to receive, for each $1,000 principal amount of Securities surrendered for conversion: (A) cash in an amount equal to the lesser of (1) $1,000 and (2) the Conversion Value; and (B) if the Conversion Value is greater than $1,000, a number of shares of Common Stock (the "Remaining Shares") equal to the sum of the Daily Share Amounts for each of the 20 consecutive Trading Days in the Conversion Reference Period, appropriately adjusted to reflect events occurring during the Conversion Reference Period that would result in an adjustment to Conversion Rate in accordance with the provisions of Section 4.06, subject to the Company's right to deliver cash in lieu of all or a portion of such Remaining Shares as set forth in Section 4.12(b). The Company will deliver such cash and any shares of Common Stock, together with any cash payable for fractional shares, to such Holder in accordance with Section 4.02(a).
     (b) The Company may elect to pay cash to the Holders of Securities surrendered for conversion in lieu of all or a portion of the Remaining Shares otherwise issuable pursuant to Section 4.12(a). In such event, on any day prior to the first Trading Day of the applicable Conversion Reference Period, the Company may specify a percentage of the Daily Share Amount that will be settled in cash (the "Cash Percentage"). If the Company elects to specify a Cash Percentage, the amount of cash that the Company will deliver in respect of the Daily Share Amount for each Trading Day in the applicable Conversion Reference Period will equal the product of: (1) the Cash Percentage, (2) the Daily Share Amount for such Trading Day and (3) the Volume Weighted Average Price of the Company's Common Stock on such Trading Day. The number of shares that the Company shall deliver in respect of the Daily Share Amount for
 
each Trading Day in the applicable Conversion Reference Period will be a percentage of the Daily Share Amount equal to 100% minus the Cash Percentage. If the Company does not specify a Cash Percentage by the start of the applicable Conversion Reference Period, the Company shall settle 100% of the Daily Share Amount for each Trading Day in the applicable Conversion Reference Period with shares of Common Stock; , , that the Company shall pay cash in lieu of fractional shares otherwise issuable upon conversion of the Securities in accordance with Section 4.03.
provided
however
     (c) For the purposes of Sections 4.12(a) and (b), in the event that any of Conversion Value, Daily Conversion Value, Daily Share Amounts, or Volume Weighted Average Price is not calculable for all portions of the Conversion Reference Period, the Company's Board of Directors shall in good faith determine the values necessary to calculate the Conversion Value, Daily Conversion Value, Daily Share Amounts, and Volume Weighted Average Price (which calculations shall be evidenced by an Officer's Certificate delivered to the Trustee).
     (a) The Company shall promptly make all payments in respect of the Securities on the dates and in the manner provided in the Securities and this Indenture. A payment of principal or interest shall be considered paid on the date it is due if the Paying Agent (other than the Company) (or if the Company is the Paying Agent, the segregated account or separate trust fund maintained by the Company pursuant to Section 2.04) holds by 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on that date money, deposited by or on behalf of the Company sufficient to make the payment. Accrued and unpaid interest on any Security that is payable (whether or not punctually paid or duly provided for) on any Interest Payment Date shall be paid to the Person in whose name that Security is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose. The Company shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, pay interest in immediately available funds on overdue principal and interest at the annual rate borne by the Securities compounded semiannually, which interest shall accrue from the date such overdue amount was originally due to the day preceding the date payment of such amount, including interest thereon, has been made or duly provided for. All such interest shall be payable on demand.
     (b) Payment of the principal of and interest, if any, on the Securities shall be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York (which shall initially be the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee) in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts; , , that at the option of the Company payment of interest on any Certificated Securities having an aggregate principal amount of $5,000,000 or less may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address appears in the Register; that a Holder of a Certificated Security having an aggregate principal amount of more than $5,000,000 will be paid by wire transfer in immediately available funds at the election of such Holder if such Holder has provided wire
provided
however
provided further
 
transfer instructions to the Trustee at least 10 Business Days prior to the payment date. Any wire transfer instructions received by the Trustee will remain in effect until revoked by the Holder. In the case of a permanent Global Security, interest payable on any applicable payment date will be paid to the Depositary, with respect to that portion of such permanent Global Security held for its account by Cede & Co. for the purpose of permitting such party to credit the interest received by it in respect of such permanent Global Security to the accounts of the beneficial owners thereof.
     (a) The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within 15 days after it files them with the SEC, copies of all annual reports, quarterly reports and other documents that the Company files with the SEC pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act; that any such reports and documents filed with the SEC pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system (or EDGAR) shall be deemed to be filed with the Trustee. The Company also shall comply with the provisions of TIA Section 314(a).
provided
     (b) Delivery of such reports and documents to the Trustee is for informational purposes only and the Trustee's receipt of such shall not constitute constructive notice of any information contained therein or determinable from information contained therein, including the Company's compliance with any of its covenants hereunder (as to which the Trustee is entitled to rely exclusively on Officer's Certificates). The Trustee may assume that any reports required to be filed under subsection (a) above have been filed with the SEC and shall have no obligation to verify any such filing.
     The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company (beginning with the fiscal year ending December 28, 2007), an Officer's Certificate as to the signer's knowledge of the Company's compliance with all conditions and covenants on its part contained in this Indenture and stating whether or not the signer knows of any Default or Event of Default. If such signer knows of such a Default or Event of Default, the Officer's Certificate shall describe the Default or Event of Default and the efforts to remedy the same. For the purposes of this Section 5.03, compliance shall be determined without regard to any grace period or requirement of notice provided pursuant to the terms of this Indenture.
     Upon request of the Trustee, the Company will execute and deliver such further instruments and do such further acts as may be reasonably necessary or proper to carry out more effectively the purposes of this Indenture.
     Subject to Article 6, the Company will do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect its corporate existence.
 
     During the period prior to the expiration of the holding period applicable to sales thereof under Rule 144(k) under the Securities Act (or any successor provision), the Company covenants and agrees that it shall, during any period in which it is not subject to Section 13 or 15(d) under the Exchange Act, upon the request of any Holder or beneficial holder of the Securities, make available to such Holder or beneficial holder of Securities or any Common Stock issued upon conversion thereof which continue to be Restricted Securities in connection with any sale thereof and any prospective purchaser of Securities or such Common Stock designated by such Holder or beneficial holder, the information required pursuant to Rule 144A(d)(4) under the Securities Act and it will take such further action as any Holder or beneficial holder of such Securities or such Common Stock may reasonably request, all to the extent required from time to time to enable such Holder or beneficial holder to sell its Securities or Common Stock without registration under the Securities Act within the limitation of the exemption provided by Rule 144A, as such Rule may be amended from time to time. Whether a person is a beneficial holder shall be determined by the Company.
     The Company covenants (to the extent that they may lawfully do so) that it shall not at any time insist upon, plead, or in any manner whatsoever claim or take the benefit or advantage of, any stay, extension or usury law or other law which would prohibit or forgive the Company from paying all or any portion of the principal of or accrued but unpaid interest on the Securities as contemplated herein, wherever enacted, now or at any time hereafter in force, or which may affect the covenants or the performance of this Indenture, and the Company (to the extent it may lawfully do so) hereby expressly waives all benefit or advantage of any such law and covenants that it will not, by resort to any such law, hinder, delay or impede the execution of any power herein granted to the Trustee, but will suffer and permit the execution of every such power as though no such law had been enacted.
     If Additional Interest is payable by the Company pursuant to the Registration Rights Agreement, the Company shall deliver to the Trustee an Officer's Certificate to that effect stating (i) the amount of such Additional Interest that is payable, (ii) the reason why such Additional Interest is payable and (iii) the date on which such Additional Interest is payable. Unless and until a Trust Officer of the Trustee receives such a certificate, the Trustee may assume without inquiry that no such Additional Interest is payable. If the Company has paid Additional Interest directly to the Persons entitled to such Additional Interest, the Company shall deliver to the Trustee a certificate setting forth the particulars of such payment.
     The Company shall maintain an office or agency where Securities may be presented or surrendered for payment. The Company also will maintain an office or agency where Securities may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served. The office of
 
the Trustee, at its Corporate Trust Office, will be such office or agency of the Company, unless the Company shall designate and maintain some other office or agency for one or more of such purposes. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of the location and any change in the location of any such offices or agencies. If at any time the Company shall fail to maintain any such required offices or agencies or shall fail to furnish the Trustee with the address thereof, such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands may be made or served at the office of the Trustee and the Company hereby appoints the Trustee as its agent to receive all such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands.
     The Company may from time to time designate one or more other offices or agencies (in or outside of The City of New York) where the Securities may be presented or surrendered for any or all such purposes, and may from time to time rescind such designation. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any such designation or rescission and any change in the location of any such office or agency.
     (a) The Company shall not consolidate with or merge with or into (whether or not the Company is the surviving Person) any other entity and the Company shall not sell, convey, assign, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the Company's assets to any Person in a single transaction or series of related transactions, unless:
     (1) either (A) the Company shall be the surviving Person or (B) the surviving Person (if other than the Company) shall be a corporation or limited liability company organized and validly existing under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia, and shall, in any such case, expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all the Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of this Indenture to be performed or observed on the part of the Company;
     (2) after giving effect to the transaction, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
     (3) if the Company will not be the resulting or surviving Person, the Company shall have, at or prior to the effective date of such consolidation or merger or sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, lease or other disposition, delivered to the Trustee an Officer's Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such consolidation, merger or transfer complies with this Article 6.01 and, if a supplemental indenture is required in connection with such transaction, such supplemental indenture complies with this Article, and that all conditions precedent herein provided for relating to such transaction have been complied with.
 
     Section 6.02. .
Successor Substituted
     Upon any consolidation of the Company with, or merger of the Company into, any other Person or any sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, lease or other disposition of all or substantially all of the Company's assets in accordance with Section 6.01, the successor Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged or to which such sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, lease or other disposition is made shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under this Indenture with the same effect as if such successor Person had been named as the Company herein, and thereafter, except in the case of a lease, the predecessor Person shall be relieved of all obligations and covenants under this Indenture and the Securities.
     Section 7.01. .
Events of Default
     (a) An "Event of Default" wherever used herein, means any one of the following events (whatever the reason for such Event of Default and whether it shall be voluntary or involuntary or be effected by operation of law or pursuant to any judgment, decree or order of any court or any order, rule or regulation of any administrative or governmental body):
     (1) a default by the Company in the payment of the principal amount or Fundamental Change Purchase Price of any Security when the same becomes due and payable whether at the Final Maturity Date, upon purchase, acceleration or otherwise; or
     (2) a default by the Company in the payment of any interest (including Additional Interest) under the Securities, which default continues for 30 days after the date when due; or
     (3) a default by the Company in the delivery when due of all cash and any shares of Common Stock deliverable upon conversion of the Securities, which default continues for 15 days; or
     (4) failure by the Company to provide an Issuer Fundamental Change Notice within the time required to provide such notice as set forth in Section 3.01(b) hereof; or
     (5) the failure by the Company to perform or observe any other term, covenant or agreement contained in the Securities or this Indenture for a period of 60 days after receipt by the Company of a Notice of Default specifying such failure; or
     (6) default by the Company in the payment of principal by the end of any applicable grace period or resulting in acceleration of other Indebtedness of the Company for borrowed money where the aggregate principal amount with respect to which the default or acceleration has occurred exceeds $25 million and such acceleration has not been rescinded or annulled or such other Indebtedness has not been repaid within a period of 30 days after written notice to the Company by the Trustee or to the Company and the
 
Trustee by the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, provided that if any such default is cured, waived, rescinded or annulled, then the Event of Default by reason thereof would not be deemed to have occurred; or
     (7) a court having jurisdiction in the premises enters (x) a decree or order for relief in respect of the Company or the Operating Company in an involuntary case or proceeding under any applicable Bankruptcy Law or (y) a decree or order adjudging the Company or the Operating Company a bankrupt or insolvent, or approving as properly filed a petition seeking reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition of or in respect of the Company or the Operating Company under any applicable federal or state law, or appointing a custodian, receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, sequestrator or other similar official of the Company or the Operating Company or of any substantial part of its property, or ordering the winding up or liquidation of its affairs, and the continuance of any such decree or order for relief or any such other decree or order unstayed and in effect for a period of 90 consecutive days; or
     (8) (i) the Company or the Operating Company commences a voluntary case or proceeding under any applicable Bankruptcy Law or any other case or proceeding to be adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent; or
     (ii) the Company or the Operating Company consents to the entry of a decree or order for relief in respect of the Company or the Operating Company in an involuntary case or proceeding under any applicable Bankruptcy Law or to the commencement of any bankruptcy or insolvency case or proceeding against the Company or the Operating Company; or
     (iii) the Company or the Operating Company files a petition or answer or consent seeking reorganization or relief under any applicable federal or state law; or
     (iv) the Company or the Operating Company consents to the filing of such petition or to the appointment of or taking possession by a custodian, receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, sequestrator or similar official of the Company or the Operating Company or of any substantial part of their property; or
     (v) the Company or the Operating Company makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors; or
     (vi) the Company or the Operating Company admits in writing its inability to pay its debts generally as they become due; or
     (vii) the Company or the Operating Company takes corporate action in furtherance of any such action described in this Section 7.01(a)(8).
     (b) Notwithstanding Section 7.01(a) no Event of Default under clause (5) of Section 7.01(a) shall occur until the Trustee notifies the Company in writing, or the Holders of at least
 
25% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding notify the Company and the Trustee in writing, of the Default (a "Notice of Default"), and the Company does not cure the Default within the time specified in clause (5) of Section 7.01(a), or obtain a waiver, after receipt of such notice. A notice given pursuant to this Section 7.01 shall be given by registered or certified mail, must specify the Default, demand that it be remedied and state that the notice is a Notice of Default. When any Default under this Section 7.01 is cured, it ceases.
     (c) The Company will deliver to the Trustee, within 30 days after becoming aware of the occurrence of a Default or Event of Default, written notice thereof.
     Section 7.02. .
Acceleration
     If an Event of Default (other than an Event of Default specified in clause (7) or (8) of Section 7.01(a)) shall occur and be continuing with respect to this Indenture, the Trustee or the Holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding may, and the Trustee at the request of such Holders shall, declare all unpaid principal of and accrued interest on all Securities to be due and payable, by a notice in writing to the Company (and to the Trustee if given by the Holders of the Securities). Upon any such declaration, such principal and interest shall become due and payable immediately. If an Event of Default specified in clause (7) or (8) of Section 7.01(a) occurs and is continuing, then all the Securities shall ipso facto become and be due and payable immediately in an amount equal to the principal amount of the Securities, together with accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date the Securities become due and payable, without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holder. Thereupon, the Trustee may, at its discretion, proceed to protect and enforce the rights of the Holders of the Securities by appropriate judicial proceedings.
     After a declaration of acceleration with respect to the Securities, but before a judgment or decree for payment of the money due has been obtained by the Trustee as hereinafter in this Article provided, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities Outstanding, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences if:
     (a) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay
     (1) all sums paid or advanced by the Trustee under this Indenture and the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel,
     (2) all overdue interest on all Outstanding Securities,
     (3) the principal of any Outstanding Securities which have become due otherwise than by such declaration of acceleration and interest thereon at the rate borne by the Securities, and
     (4) to the extent that payment of such interest is lawful, interest upon overdue interest at the rate borne by the Securities;
 
     (b) the rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction; and
     (c) all Events of Default, other than the non-payment of principal of and interest on the Securities which have become due solely by such declaration of acceleration, have been cured or waived as provided in Section 7.13. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
     Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent elected by the Company, the sole remedy for an Event of Default relating to the failure by the Company to comply with the provisions of Section 5.02 of this Indenture shall, for the first 60 days after the occurrence of such an Event of Default, consist exclusively of the right to receive special interest ("Special Interest") on the Securities at an annual rate equal to 0.25% of the principal amount of the Securities. Such Special Interest shall be paid semi-annually in arrears, with the first semi-annual payment due on the first Interest Payment Date following the date on which such Special Interest began to accrue on the Securities. Special Interest shall accrue on all Outstanding Securities from and including the date on which an Event of Default relating to a failure to comply with the provisions of Section 5.02 shall first occur to but not including the 60th day thereafter (or such earlier date on which such Event of Default shall have been cured or waived). On such 60th day (or earlier, if the Event of Default relating to the failure to comply with Section 5.02 is cured or waived prior to such 60th day), such Special Interest shall cease to accrue and, if the Event of Default relating to the failure to comply with Section 5.02 shall not have been cured or waived prior to such 60th day, the Securities shall be subject to acceleration as provided in this Section 7.02. The provisions of this paragraph shall not affect the rights of holders in the event of the occurrence of any other Event of Default. In the event the Company shall not elect to pay Special Interest upon an Event of Default resulting from the failure of the Company to comply with the provisions of Section 5.02, the Securities shall be subject to acceleration as provided above in this Section 7.02.
     If the Company shall elect to pay Special Interest in connection with an Event of Default relating to its failure to comply with the requirements of Section 5.02, (1) the Company shall notify all Holders and the Trustee and Paying Agent of such election on or before the close of business on the date on which such Event of Default shall first occur, and (2) all references herein to interest accrued or payable as of any date shall include any Special Interest accrued or payable as of such date as provided in this Section 7.02.
     Section 7.03. .
Collection of Indebtedness and Suits for Enforcement by Trustee
     The Company covenants that if:
     (a) default is made in the payment of any interest on any Security when such interest becomes due and payable and such default continues for a period of 30 days, or
     (b) default is made in the payment of the principal of any Security at the Stated Maturity thereof,
the Company will, upon demand of the Trustee, pay to it, for the benefit of the Holders of such Securities, the whole amount then due and payable on such Securities for principal and interest,
 
with interest upon the overdue principal and, to the extent that payment of such interest shall be legally enforceable, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate borne by the Securities; and, in addition thereto, such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover the costs and expenses of collection, including the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel.
     If the Company fails to pay such amounts forthwith upon such demand, the Trustee, in its own name and as trustee of an express trust, may institute a judicial proceeding for the collection of the sums so due and unpaid and may prosecute such proceeding to judgment or final decree, and may enforce the same against the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities and collect the moneys adjudged or decreed to be payable in the manner provided by law out of the property of the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities, wherever situated.
     If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may in its discretion proceed to protect and enforce its rights and the rights of the Holders under this Indenture by such appropriate private or judicial proceedings as the Trustee shall deem most effectual to protect and enforce such rights, whether for the specific enforcement of any covenant or agreement in this Indenture or in aid of the exercise of any power granted herein, or to enforce any other proper remedy, subject however to Section 7.12. No recovery of any such judgment upon any property of the Company shall affect or impair any rights, powers or remedies of the Trustee or the Holders.
     Section 7.04. .
Trustee May File Proofs of Claim
     In case of the pendency of any receivership, insolvency, liquidation, bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, composition or other judicial proceeding relative to the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities or the property of the Company or of such other obligor or their creditors, the Trustee (irrespective of whether the principal of the Securities shall then be due and payable as therein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Trustee shall have made any demand on the Company for the payment of overdue principal or interest) shall be entitled and empowered, by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise,
     (a) to file and prove a claim for the whole amount of principal and interest owing and unpaid in respect of the Securities and to file such other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee (including any claim for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel) and of the Holders allowed in such judicial proceeding, and
     (b) to collect and receive any moneys or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same;
and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or similar official in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Holder to make such payments to the Trustee and, in the event that the Trustee shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Holders, to pay the Trustee any amount due it for the reasonable compensation, expenses,
 
disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under Section 8.07.
     Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to authorize the Trustee to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Holder any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition affecting the Securities or the rights of any Holder thereof, or to authorize the Trustee to vote in respect of the claim of any Holder in any such proceeding.
     Section 7.05. .
Trustee May Enforce Claims Without Possession of Securities
     All rights of action and claims under this Indenture or the Securities may be prosecuted and enforced by the Trustee without the possession of any of the Securities or the production thereof in any proceeding relating thereto, and any such proceeding instituted by the Trustee shall be brought in its own name and as trustee of an express trust, and any recovery of judgment shall, after provision for the payment of the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, be for the ratable benefit of the Holders of the Securities in respect of which such judgment has been recovered.
     Section 7.06. .
Application of Money Collected
     Any money collected by the Trustee pursuant to this Article 7 or otherwise on behalf of the Holders or the Trustee pursuant to this Article 7 or through any proceeding or any arrangement or restructuring in anticipation or in lieu of any proceeding contemplated by this Article 7 shall be applied, subject to applicable law, in the following order, at the date or dates fixed by the Trustee and, in case of the distribution of such money on account of principal or interest, upon presentation of the Securities and the notation thereon of the payment if only partially paid and upon surrender thereof if fully paid:
     FIRST: To the payment of all amounts due the Trustee under Section 8.07;
     SECOND: To the payment of the amounts then due and unpaid upon the Securities for principal and interest, in respect of which or for the benefit of which such money has been collected, ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on such Securities for principal and interest; and
     THIRD: The balance, if any, to the Company, provided that all sums due and owing to the Holders and the Trustee have been paid in full as required by this Indenture.
     Section 7.07. .
Limitation on Suits
     No Holder of any Securities shall have any right to institute any proceeding, judicial or otherwise, with respect to this Indenture or the Securities, or for the appointment of a receiver or trustee, or for any other remedy hereunder, unless
     (a) such Holder has previously given written notice to the Trustee of a continuing Event of Default;
 
     (b) the Holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities shall have made written request to the Trustee to institute proceedings in respect of such Event of Default in its own name as trustee hereunder;
     (c) such Holder or Holders have offered to the Trustee an indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against the costs, expenses and liabilities to be incurred in compliance with such request;
     (d) the Trustee for 15 days after its receipt of such notice, request and offer (and if requested, provision) of indemnity has failed to institute any such proceeding; and
     (e) no direction inconsistent with such written request has been given to the Trustee during such 15-day period by the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities;
it being understood and intended that no one or more Holders shall have any right in any manner whatever by virtue of, or by availing of, any provision of this Indenture or any Security to affect, disturb or prejudice the rights of any other Holders, or to obtain or to seek to obtain priority or preference over any other Holders or to enforce any right under this Indenture or any Security, except in the manner provided in this Indenture and for the equal and ratable benefit of all the Holders (it being understood that the Trustee does not have an affirmative duty to ascertain whether or not such actions or forbearances are unduly prejudicial to such Holders).
     Section 7.08. .
Unconditional Right of Holders to Receive Payment and to Convert
     Notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture, the right of any Holder of a Security to receive payment of the principal amount, interest, Fundamental Change Purchase Price, if any, Additional Interest, if any, or Special Interest, if any, in respect of the Securities held by such Holder, on or after the respective due dates expressed in the Securities and this Indenture (whether upon repurchase or otherwise), and to convert such Security in accordance with Article 4, and to bring suit for the enforcement of any such payment on or after such respective due dates or for the right to convert in accordance with Article 4, is absolute and unconditional and shall not be impaired or affected without the consent of the Holder.
     Section 7.09. .
Restoration of Rights and Remedies
     If the Trustee or any Holder has instituted any proceeding to enforce any right or remedy under this Indenture and such proceeding has been discontinued or abandoned for any reason, or has been determined adversely to the Trustee or to such Holder, then and in every such case the Company, any other obligor on the Securities, the Trustee and the Holders shall, subject to any determination in such proceeding, be restored severally and respectively to their former positions hereunder, and thereafter all rights and remedies of the Trustee and the Holders shall continue as though no such proceeding had been instituted.
     Section 7.10. .
Rights and Remedies Cumulative
     No right or remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to the Trustee or to the Holders is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, and every right and remedy shall, to the
 
extent permitted by law, be cumulative and in addition to every other right and remedy given hereunder or now or hereafter existing at law or in equity or otherwise. The assertion or employment of any right or remedy hereunder, or otherwise, shall not prevent the concurrent assertion or employment of any other appropriate right or remedy.
     Section 7.11. .
Delay or Omission Not Waiver
     No delay or omission of the Trustee or of any Holder of any Security to exercise any right or remedy accruing upon any Event of Default shall impair any such right or remedy or constitute a waiver of any such Event of Default or an acquiescence therein. Every right and remedy given by this Article 7 or by law to the Trustee or to the Holders may be exercised from time to time, and as often as may be deemed expedient, by the Trustee or by the Holders, as the case may be.
     Section 7.12. .
Control by Holders
     The Holders of not less than a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities shall have the right to direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for exercising any remedy available to the Trustee, or exercising any trust or power conferred on the Trustee, provided that:
     (a) such direction shall not be in conflict with any rule of law or with this Indenture, expose the Trustee to personal liability, or be unduly prejudicial to Holders not joining therein; and
     (b) subject to the provisions of Section 315 of the TIA, the Trustee may take any other action deemed proper by the Trustee which is not inconsistent with such direction.
     Section 7.13. .
Waiver of Past Defaults
     Subject to Sections 7.08, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then outstanding by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default or Event of Default and its consequences, except an uncured Default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of or any accrued but unpaid interest on any Security, an uncured failure by the Company to convert any Securities into Common Stock and cash, as applicable, or any Default or Event of Default in respect of any provision of this Indenture or the Securities which, under Section 10.02, cannot be modified or amended without the consent of the Holder of each Security affected. When a Default or Event of Default is waived, it is cured and ceases to exist.
     Section 7.14. .
Undertaking for Costs
     All parties to this Indenture agree, and each Holder of any Security by his acceptance thereof shall be deemed to have agreed, that any court may in its discretion require, in any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture, or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken, suffered or omitted by it as Trustee, the filing by any party litigant in such suit of an undertaking to pay the costs of such suit, and that such court may in its discretion assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses, against any party litigant in such suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses
 
made by such party litigant, but the provisions of this Section shall not apply to any suit instituted by the Trustee, to any suit instituted by any Holder, or group of Holders, holding in the aggregate more than 10% in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities, or to any suit instituted by any Holder for the enforcement of the payment of the principal of or interest on, any Security on or after the respective Stated Maturities expressed in such Security (or, in the case of purchase pursuant to Article 3 hereof, on the Fundamental Change Purchase Date).
     Section 7.15. .
Remedies Subject to Applicable Law
     All rights, remedies and powers provided by this Article 7 may be exercised only to the extent that the exercise thereof does not violate any applicable provision of law in the premises, and all the provisions of this Indenture are intended to be subject to all applicable mandatory provisions of law which may be controlling in the premises and to be limited to the extent necessary so that they will not render this Indenture invalid, unenforceable or not entitled to be recorded, registered or filed under the provisions of any applicable law.
     Section 8.01. .
Duties of Trustee
     Subject to the provisions of TIA Sections 315(a) through 315(d):
     (a) if a Default or an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Trustee shall exercise such of the rights and powers vested in it by this Indenture and use the same degree of care and skill in its exercise thereof as a prudent person would exercise or use under the circumstances in the conduct of his own affairs;
     (b) except during the continuance of a Default or an Event of Default:
     (1) the Trustee need perform only those duties as are specifically set forth in this Indenture and no covenants or obligations shall be implied in this Indenture that are adverse to the Trustee; and
     (2) in the absence of bad faith or willful misconduct on its part, the Trustee may conclusively rely, as to the truth of the statements and the correctness of the opinions expressed therein, upon certificates or opinions furnished to the Trustee and conforming to the requirements of this Indenture. However, in the case of certificates or opinions specifically required by any provision hereof to be furnished to it, the Trustee shall examine the certificates and opinions to determine whether or not they conform to the requirements of this Indenture;
     (c) the Trustee may not be relieved from liability for its own negligent action, its own negligent failure to act, or its own willful misconduct, except that:
     (1) this clause (c) does not limit the effect of clause (b) of this Section 8.01;
 
     (2) the Trustee shall not be liable for any error of judgment made in good faith by a Trust Officer, unless it is proved that the Trustee was negligent in ascertaining the pertinent facts; and
     (3) the Trustee shall not be liable with respect to any action it takes or omits to take in good faith, in accordance with a direction of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of Outstanding Securities relating to the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for any remedy available to the Trustee, or exercising any trust or power conferred upon the Trustee under this Indenture;
     (d) no provision of this Indenture shall require the Trustee to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers if it shall have reasonable grounds for believing that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it;
     (e) whether or not therein expressly so provided, every provision of this Indenture that in any way relates to the Trustee is subject to clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) and (f) of this Section 8.01; and
     (f) the Trustee shall not be liable for interest on any money or assets received by it except as the Trustee may agree with the Company. Assets held in trust by the Trustee need not be segregated from other assets except to the extent required by law.
     Section 8.02. .
Notice of Default
     Within 30 days after a Trust Officer of the Trustee receives written notice of the occurrence of any Default, the Trustee shall transmit by mail to all Holders and any other Persons entitled to receive reports pursuant to Section 313(c) of the TIA, as their names and addresses appear in the Security Register, notice of such Default hereunder known to the Trustee, unless such Default shall have been cured or waived; , , that, except in the case of a Default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any Security or the failure to deliver amounts owing upon conversion of a Security in accordance with the provisions of Article 4, the Trustee shall be protected in withholding such notice if and so long as a trust committee of Trust Officers of the Trustee in good faith determines that the withholding of such notice is in the interest of the Holders.
provided
however
     Section 8.03. .
Certain Rights of Trustee
     Subject to the provisions of Section 8.01 hereof and TIA Sections 315(a) through 315(d):
     (a) the Trustee may conclusively rely and shall be fully protected in acting or refraining from acting upon receipt by it of any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond, debenture, note, other evidence of Indebtedness or other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper party or parties;
 
     (b) any request or direction of the Company mentioned herein shall be sufficiently evidenced by a Company Request or Company Order and any resolution of the Board of Directors may be sufficiently evidenced by a Board Resolution;
     (c) the Trustee may consult with counsel of its selection and any advice of such counsel or any Opinion of Counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it hereunder in good faith and in reliance thereon in accordance with such advice or Opinion of Counsel;
     (d) the Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers vested in it by this Indenture at the request or direction of any of the Holders pursuant to this Indenture, unless such Holders shall have offered to the Trustee security or indemnity satisfactory to the Trustee against the costs, expenses and liabilities which might be incurred therein;
     (e) the Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted by it in good faith and believed by it to be authorized or within the discretion, rights or powers conferred upon it by this Indenture other than any liabilities arising out of the negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct of the Trustee;
     (f) the Trustee shall not be bound to make any investigation into the facts or matters stated in any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, approval, appraisal, bond, debenture, note, coupon, security or other paper or document but the Trustee in its discretion may make such further inquiry or investigation into such facts or matters as it may deem fit, and, if the Trustee shall determine to make such further inquiry or investigation, it shall be entitled to examine the books, records and premises of the Company, personally or by agent or attorney at the sole cost of the Company and shall incur no additional liability of any kind by reason of such inquiry or investigation;
     (g) the Trustee may execute any of the trusts or powers hereunder or perform any duties hereunder either directly or by or through agents or attorneys and the Trustee shall not be responsible for any misconduct or negligence on the part of any agent or attorney appointed with due care by it hereunder;
     (h) the Trustee shall not be charged with knowledge of any Default or Event of Default with respect to the Securities unless either (i) a Trust Officer of the Trustee shall have actual knowledge of such Default or Event of Default or (ii) written notice of such Default or Event of Default shall have been given to the Trustee by the Issuer or by any Holder of Securities;
     (i) the rights, privileges, protections, immunities and benefits given to the Trustee, including, without limitation, its right to be indemnified, are extended to, and shall be enforceable by, the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder, and each agent, custodian and other Person employed to act hereunder; and
     (j) the permissive rights of the Trustee enumerated herein shall not be construed as duties of the Trustee.
 
     Section 8.04. .
Trustee Not Responsible for Recitals, Dispositions of Securities or Application of Proceeds Thereof
     The recitals contained herein and in the Securities, except the Trustee's certificates of authentication, shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Indenture or of the Securities, except that the Trustee represents that it is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Indenture, authenticate the Securities and perform its obligations hereunder and that the statements made by it in any Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-1 to be supplied to the Company will be true and accurate subject to the qualifications set forth therein. The Trustee shall not be accountable for the use or application by the Company of Securities or the proceeds thereof.
     Section 8.05. .
Trustee and Agents May Hold Securities; Collections; etc
     The Trustee, any Paying Agent, Security Registrar or any other agent of the Company, in its individual or any other capacity, may become the owner or pledgee of Securities, with the same rights it would have if it were not the Trustee, Paying Agent, Security Registrar or such other agent and, subject to TIA Sections 310 and 311, may otherwise deal with the Company and receive, collect, hold and retain collections from the Company with the same rights it would have if it were not the Trustee, Paying Agent, Security Registrar or such other agent.
     Section 8.06. .
Money Held in Trust
     All moneys received by the Trustee shall, until used or applied as herein provided, be held in trust for the purposes for which they were received, but need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by mandatory provisions of law.
     Section 8.07. .
Compensation and Indemnification of Trustee and Its Prior Claim
     The Company covenants and agrees to pay to the Trustee from time to time, and the Trustee shall be entitled to, such compensation as the parties shall agree in writing from time to time for all services rendered by it hereunder (which compensation shall not be limited by any provision of law in regard to the compensation of a trustee of an express trust) and the Company covenants and agrees to pay or reimburse the Trustee and each predecessor Trustee upon its request for all reasonable expenses, disbursements and advances incurred or made by or on behalf of the Trustee in accordance with any of the provisions of this Indenture (including the reasonable compensation and the expenses and disbursements of its counsel and of all agents and other persons not regularly in its employ) except any such expense, disbursement or advance as shall be determined to have been caused by its own negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct. The Company also covenants and agrees to indemnify the Trustee and each predecessor Trustee for, and to hold it harmless against, any claim, loss, liability, damage, tax, assessment or other governmental charge (other than taxes applicable to the Trustee's compensation hereunder) or expense incurred without negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct on its part, arising out of or in connection with the acceptance or administration of this Indenture or the trusts hereunder and its duties hereunder, including enforcement of this Section 8.07 and also including any liability which the Trustee may incur as a result of failure to withhold, pay or report any tax, assessment
 
or other governmental charge, and the costs and expenses of defending itself against or investigating any claim or liability in connection with the exercise or performance of any of its powers or duties hereunder. The obligations of the Company under this Section 8.07 to compensate and indemnify the Trustee and each predecessor Trustee and to pay or reimburse the Trustee and each predecessor Trustee for reasonable expenses, disbursements and advances shall constitute an additional obligation hereunder and shall survive the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture and the resignation or removal of the Trustee and each predecessor Trustee. To secure the Company's payment obligations in this Section 8.07, the Trustee shall have a prior claim to Holders of Securities on all money or property held or collected by the Trustee other than money or property held in trust for the benefit of the Holders of particular Securities.
     Section 8.08. .
Conflicting Interests
     The Trustee shall comply with the provisions of Section 310(b) of the TIA.
     Section 8.09. .
Trustee Eligibility
     There shall at all times be a Trustee hereunder which shall be eligible to act as trustee under TIA Section 310(a) and which shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $100,000,000, to the extent there is an institution eligible and willing to serve. If the Trustee does not have a Corporate Trust Office in The City of New York, the Trustee may appoint an agent in The City of New York reasonably acceptable to the Company to conduct any activities which the Trustee may be required under this Indenture to conduct in The City of New York. If such Trustee publishes reports of condition at least annually, pursuant to law or to the requirements of federal, state, territorial or District of Columbia supervising or examining authority, then for the purposes of this Section 8.09, the combined capital and surplus of such corporation shall be deemed to be its combined capital and surplus as set forth in its most recent report of condition so published. If at any time the Trustee shall cease to be eligible in accordance with the provisions of this Section 8.09, the Trustee shall resign immediately in the manner and with the effect hereinafter specified in this Article 8.
     Section 8.10. .
Resignation and Removal; Appointment of Successor Trustee
     (a) No resignation or removal of the Trustee and no appointment of a successor trustee pursuant to this Article 8 shall become effective until the acceptance of appointment by the successor trustee under Section 8.11.
     (b) The Trustee, or any trustee or trustees hereafter appointed, may at any time resign by giving written notice thereof to the Company no later than 20 Business Days prior to the proposed date of resignation. Upon receiving such notice of resignation, the Company shall promptly appoint a successor trustee by written instrument executed by authority of the Board of Directors of the Company, a copy of which shall be delivered to the resigning Trustee and a copy to the successor trustee. If an instrument of acceptance by a successor trustee shall not have been delivered to the Trustee within 30 days after the giving of such notice of resignation, the resigning Trustee may, at the expense of the Company, or any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months may, on behalf of himself and all others similarly situated, petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor trustee.
 
Such court may thereupon, after such notice, if any, as it may deem proper, appoint and prescribe a successor trustee.
     (c) The Trustee may be removed at any time for any cause or for no cause by an Act of the Holders of not less than a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities, delivered to the Trustee and to the Company.
     (d) If at any time:
     (1) the Trustee shall fail to comply with the provisions of TIA Section 310(b) after written request therefor by the Company or by any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months,
     (2) the Trustee shall cease to be eligible under Section 8.09 and shall fail to resign after written request therefor by the Company or by any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months, or
     (3) the Trustee shall become incapable of acting or shall be adjudged a bankrupt or insolvent, or a receiver of the Trustee or of its property shall be appointed or any public officer shall take charge or control of the Trustee or of its property or affairs for the purpose of rehabilitation, conservation or liquidation, then, in any case, (i) the Company by a Board Resolution may remove the Trustee, or (ii) subject to Section 7.14, the Holder of any Security who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months may, on behalf of himself and all others similarly situated, petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee and the appointment of a successor trustee. Such court may thereupon, after such notice, if any, as it may deem proper and prescribe, remove the Trustee and appoint a successor trustee.
     (e) If the Trustee shall be removed or become incapable of acting, or if a vacancy shall occur in the office of Trustee for any cause, the Company, by a Board Resolution, shall promptly appoint a successor trustee and shall comply with the applicable requirements of Section 8.11. If, within 60 days after such removal or incapability, or the occurrence of such vacancy, the Company has not appointed a successor Trustee, a successor trustee shall be appointed by the Act of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities delivered to the Company and the retiring Trustee. Such successor trustee so appointed shall forthwith upon its acceptance of such appointment become the successor trustee. If no successor trustee shall have been so appointed by the Company or the Holders of the Securities and accepted appointment in the manner hereinafter provided, the Trustee or the Holder of any Security who has been a bona fide Holder for at least six months may, subject to Section 7.14, on behalf of himself and all others similarly situated, petition at the expense of the Company any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor trustee.
     (f) The Company shall give notice of each resignation and each removal of the Trustee and each appointment of a successor trustee by mailing written notice of such event by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the Holders of Securities as their names and addresses appear in the register of the Registrar. Each notice shall include the name of the successor trustee and the address of its Corporate Trust Office or agent hereunder.
 
     Section 8.11. .
Acceptance of Appointment by Successor
     (a) Every successor trustee appointed hereunder shall execute, acknowledge and deliver to the Company and to the retiring Trustee an instrument accepting such appointment, and thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective and such successor trustee, without any further act, deed or conveyance, shall become vested with all the rights, powers, trusts and duties of the retiring Trustee as if originally named as Trustee hereunder; but, nevertheless, on the written request of the Company or the successor trustee, upon payment of its charges pursuant to Section 8.07 then unpaid, such retiring Trustee shall pay over to the successor trustee all moneys at the time held by it hereunder and shall execute and deliver an instrument transferring to such successor trustee all such rights, powers, duties and obligations. Upon request of any such successor trustee, the Company shall execute any and all instruments for more fully and certainly vesting in and confirming to such successor trustee all such rights and powers.
     (b) No successor trustee with respect to the Securities shall accept appointment as provided in this Section 8.11 unless at the time of such acceptance such successor trustee shall be eligible to act as trustee under the provisions of TIA Section 310(a) and this Article 8 and shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $100,000,000 and have a Corporate Trust Office or an agent selected in accordance with Section 8.09.
     (c) Upon acceptance of appointment by any successor trustee as provided in this Section 8.11, the Company shall give notice thereof to the Holders of the Securities, by mailing such notice to such Holders at their addresses as they shall appear on the Security Register. If the acceptance of appointment is substantially contemporaneous with the appointment, then the notice called for by the preceding sentence may be combined with the notice called for by Section 8.10. If the Company fails to give such notice within 10 days after acceptance of appointment by the successor trustee, the successor trustee shall cause such notice to be given at the expense of the Company.
     Section 8.12. .
Merger, Conversion, Consolidation or Succession to Business
     Any corporation into which the Trustee may be merged or converted or with which it may be consolidated, or any corporation resulting from any merger, conversion or consolidation to which the Trustee shall be a party, or any corporation succeeding to all or substantially all of the corporate trust business of the Trustee (including the trust created by this Indenture) shall be the successor of the Trustee hereunder, that such corporation shall be eligible under TIA Section 310(a) and this Article 8 and shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $100,000,000 and have a Corporate Trust Office or an agent selected in accordance with Section 8.09, without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto.
provided
     In case at the time such successor to the Trustee shall succeed to the trusts created by this Indenture any of the Securities shall have been authenticated but not delivered, any such successor to the Trustee may adopt the certificate of authentication of any predecessor Trustee and deliver such Securities so authenticated; and, in case at that time any of the Securities shall not have been authenticated, any successor to the Trustee may authenticate such Securities either
 
in the name of any predecessor hereunder or in the name of the successor trustee; and in all such cases such certificate shall have the full force which it is anywhere in the Securities or in this Indenture provided that the certificate of the Trustee shall have; provided that the right to adopt the certificate of authentication of any predecessor Trustee or to authenticate Securities in the name of any predecessor Trustee shall apply only to its successor or successors by merger, conversion or consolidation.
     Section 8.13. .
Preferential Collection of Claims Against Company
     If and when the Trustee shall be or become a creditor of the Company (or other obligor under the Securities), the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of the TIA regarding the collection of claims against the Company (or any such other obligor). A Trustee who has resigned or been removed shall be subject to TIA Section 311(a) to the extent indicated therein.
     Section 8.14. .
Reports By Trustee
     (a) Within 60 days after May 15 of each year commencing with the first May 15 after the issuance of Securities, the Trustee, if so required under the TIA, shall transmit by mail to all Holders, in the manner and to the extent provided in TIA Section 313(c), a brief report dated as of such May 15 in accordance with and with respect to the matters required by TIA Section 313(a). The Trustee shall also transmit by mail to all Holders, in the manner and to the extent provided in TIA Section 313(c), a brief report in accordance with and with respect to the matters required by TIA Section 313(b)(2).
     (b) A copy of each report transmitted to Holders pursuant to this Section 8.14 shall, at the time of such transmission, be mailed to the Company and filed with each national securities exchange, if any, upon which the Securities are listed and also with the SEC. The Company will notify the Trustee promptly if the Securities are listed on any national securities exchange.
     Section 9.01. .
Satisfaction and Discharge of Indenture
     This Indenture shall cease to be of further force and effect (except as to any surviving rights of conversion, registration of transfer or exchange of Securities herein expressly provided for and except as further provided below), and the Trustee, on demand of and at the expense of the Company, shall execute proper instruments acknowledging satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture, when either:
     (1) all Securities theretofore authenticated and delivered (other than (i) Securities which have been destroyed, lost or stolen and which have been replaced or paid as provided in Section 2.08 and (ii) Securities for whose payment money has theretofore been deposited in trust and thereafter repaid to the Company as provided in Section 2.04) have been delivered to the Trustee for cancellation; or
 
     (2) all such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation have become due and payable, whether on the Final Maturity Date or a Fundamental Change Purchase Date, upon conversion or otherwise,
     provided, that
     (i) the Company has deposited with the Trustee, a Paying Agent (other than the Company or any of its Affiliates) or a Conversion Agent, if applicable, immediately available funds or immediately available funds and shares of Common Stock, in trust for the purpose of and in an amount sufficient to pay and discharge all indebtedness and obligations related to such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation, for principal and interest (including Additional Interest, if any) to the date of such deposit or for the payment of amounts due upon conversion;
     (ii) the Company has paid or caused to be paid all other sums payable hereunder by the Company; and
     (iii) the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Officer's Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that all conditions precedent herein relating to the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture have been complied with.
     (b) Notwithstanding the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture, the obligations of the Company with respect to the Trustee under Section 8.07 and, if money shall have been deposited with the Trustee pursuant to clause (2) of Section 9.01(a), the provisions of Sections 2.03, 2.04, 2.05, 2.06, 2.07, 2.08, 2.13 and 5.01 and this Article 9 shall survive such satisfaction and discharge until the Securities have been paid in full.
     Section 9.02. .
Application of Trust Money
     Subject to the provisions of the last paragraph of Section 2.04, all United States dollars deposited with the Trustee pursuant to Section 9.01 shall be held in trust and applied by it, in accordance with the provisions of the Securities and this Indenture, to the payment, either directly or through any Paying Agent (including the Company acting as its own Paying Agent) as the Trustee may determine, to the Persons entitled thereto, of the principal of and interest on, the Securities for whose payment such United States dollars have been deposited with the Trustee.
     Section 9.03. .
Reinstatement
     If the Trustee, any Paying Agent or any Conversion Agent is unable to apply any money in accordance with Section 9.02 by reason of any legal proceeding or by reason of any order or judgment of any court or governmental authority enjoining, restraining or otherwise prohibiting such application, then the Company's obligations under this Indenture and the Securities shall be revived and reinstated as though no deposit had occurred pursuant to Section 9.01 until such time as the Trustee, such Paying Agent or such Conversion Agent is permitted to apply all such money in accordance with Section 9.02; , , that if the Company has made any payment of the principal of or interest on any Securities because of the reinstatement of its
provided
however
 
obligations, the Company shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holders of such Securities to receive any such payment from the money held by the Trustee, such Paying Agent or such Conversion Agent.
     Section 10.01. .
Without Consent of Holders
     (a) The Company and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture or the Securities without notice to or consent of any Holder of a Security for the purpose of:
     (1) evidencing a successor to the Company and the assumption by that successor of the Company's obligations under this Indenture and the Securities;
     (2) adding to the Company's covenants for the benefit of the Holders or surrendering any right or power conferred upon the Company;
     (3) securing the Company's obligations in respect of the Securities;
     (4) evidencing and providing for the acceptance of the appointment of a successor trustee in accordance with Article 8;
     (5) complying with the requirements of the SEC in order to effect or maintain the qualification of this Indenture under the TIA, as contemplated by this Indenture or otherwise;
     (6) providing for conversion rights of Holders if any reclassification or change of Common Stock or any consolidation, merger or sale of all or substantially all of the Company's property and assets occurs or otherwise complying with the provisions of this Indenture in the event of a merger, consolidation or transfer of assets (including the provisions of Section 4.10 and Article 6);
     (7) adding guarantees with respect to the Securities;
     (8) increasing the Conversion Rate in accordance with the terms of the Securities;
     (9) curing any ambiguity, omission or inconsistency in this Indenture or correcting or supplementing any defective provision contained in this Indenture;
     (10) making any change that will not adversely affect the interests of the Holders in any material respect.
 
     Section 10.02. .
With Consent of Holders
     (a) The Company and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture and the Securities with the consent of the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities. However, without the written consent of each Holder affected, an amendment or supplement may not:
     (1) alter the manner of calculation or rate of accrual of interest on any Security, reduce the rate of interest on any Security or extend the time of payment of any installment of interest on any Security;
     (2) change the Stated Maturity of the principal of any Security;
     (3) make any of the Securities payable in money or securities other than that stated in the Securities;
     (4) reduce the principal amount or Fundamental Change Purchase Price payable with respect to any of the Securities;
     (5) make any change that adversely affects the rights of a Holder to convert any of the Securities in any material respect;
     (6) make any change that adversely affects the rights of Holders to require the Company to purchase Securities at the option of Holders in any material respect;
     (7) change the provisions in this Indenture that relate to modifying or amending this Indenture or waiving any past Default; or
     (8) impair the right to institute suit for the enforcement of any payment on or with respect to any Security or with respect to the conversion of any Security.
     (b) Without limiting the provisions of Section 10.02(a) hereof, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then outstanding may, on behalf of all the Holders of all Securities, (i) waive compliance by the Company with the restrictive provisions of this Indenture, and (ii) waive any past Default or Event of Default under this Indenture and its consequences, except an uncured failure to pay when due the principal amount, accrued and unpaid interest, or the Fundamental Change Purchase Price, if any and as applicable, or to deliver amounts due upon conversion, with respect to the Securities, or in respect of any provision which under this Indenture cannot be modified or amended without the consent of the Holder of each outstanding Security affected.
     (c) Upon the written request of the Company accompanied by a copy of Board Resolutions authorizing the execution of any such supplemental indenture, and upon the filing with the Trustee of evidence of the consent of Holders as aforesaid, if required, the Trustee shall join with the Company in the execution of such supplemental indenture.
 
     (d) It shall not be necessary for any Act of Holders under this Section 10.02 to approve the particular form of any proposed supplemental indenture but it shall be sufficient if such Act shall approve the substance thereof.
     Section 10.03. .
Execution of Supplemental Indentures and Agreements
     In executing, or accepting the additional trusts created by, any supplemental indenture, agreement, instrument or waiver permitted by this Article 10 or the modifications thereby of the trusts created by this Indenture, the Trustee shall be provided with, in addition to the documents required by Section 11.04, and (subject to TIA Sections 315(a) through 315(d) and Section 8.03(a) hereof) shall be fully protected in relying upon, an Opinion of Counsel and an Officer's Certificate stating that the execution of such supplemental indenture, agreement or instrument is authorized or permitted by this Indenture. The Trustee may, but shall not be obligated to, enter into any such supplemental indenture, agreement or instrument which affects the Trustee's own rights, duties or immunities under this Indenture or otherwise.
     Section 10.04. .
Effect of Supplemental Indentures
     Upon the execution of any supplemental indenture under this Article 10, this Indenture shall be modified in accordance therewith, and such supplemental indenture shall form a part of this Indenture for all purposes; and every Holder of Securities theretofore or thereafter authenticated and delivered hereunder shall be bound thereby.
     Section 10.05. .
Conformity with Trust Indenture Act
     Every supplemental indenture executed pursuant to this Article 10 shall conform to the requirements of the TIA as then in effect.
     Section 10.06. .
Reference in Securities to Supplemental Indentures
     Securities authenticated and delivered after the execution of any supplemental indenture pursuant to this Article 10 may, and shall if required by the Trustee, bear a notation in form approved by the Trustee as to any matter provided for in such supplemental indenture. If the Company shall so determine, new Securities so modified as to conform, in the opinion of the Trustee and the Board of Directors, to any such supplemental indenture may be prepared and executed by the Company and authenticated and delivered by the Trustee in exchange for Outstanding Securities.
     Section 10.07. .
Notice of Supplemental Indentures
     Promptly after the execution by the Company and the Trustee of any supplemental indenture pursuant to the provisions of Section 10.02, the Company shall give notice thereof to the Holders of each Outstanding Security affected, in the manner provided for in Section 11.02, setting forth in general terms the substance of such supplemental indenture. Any failure of the Company to mail such notice, or any defect therein, shall not, however, in any way impair or affect the validity of any such supplemental indenture.
 
     Section 11.01. .
Conflict with Trust Indenture Act
     If any provision hereof limits, qualifies or conflicts with any provision of the TIA or another provision which is required or deemed to be included in this Indenture by any of the provisions of the TIA, the provision or requirement of the TIA shall control. If any provision of this Indenture modifies or excludes any provision of the TIA that may be so modified or excluded, the latter provision shall be deemed to apply to this Indenture as so modified or to be excluded, as the case may be.
     Section 11.02. .
Notices
     Any demand, authorization notice, request, consent or communication shall be given in writing and mailed by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or delivered by recognized overnight courier addressed as follows or transmitted by facsimile transmission (confirmed by delivery in person or mail by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by guaranteed overnight courier) to the following facsimile numbers:
If to the Company, to:
Anixter International Inc. 2301 Patriot Blvd. Glenview, Illinois 60026 Attention: Treasurer Telephone No.: (224) 521-8000 Facsimile No.: (224) 521-8990
or at any other address previously furnished in writing to the Trustee by the Company, with a copy to:
Schiff Hardin LLP 6600 Sears Tower Chicago, IL 60606 Attention: David S. McCarthy Facsimile No.: (312) 258-5600
if to the Trustee, to:
The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A. 2 N. LaSalle Street, Suite 1020 Chicago, IL 60602 Attention: Corporate Trust Administration Facsimile No.: (312) 827-8542
 
or at any other address previously furnished in writing to the Holders or the Company or any other obligor on the Securities by the Trustee.
     Such notices or communications shall be effective when received.
     The Company or the Trustee by notice to the other may designate additional or different addresses for subsequent notices or communications.
     Where this Indenture provides for notice to Holders of any event, such notice shall be sufficiently given (unless otherwise herein expressly provided) if in writing and mailed, first-class postage prepaid, or delivered by recognized overnight courier, to each Holder affected by such event, at its address as it appears in the register kept by the Primary Registrar, not later than the latest date, and not earlier than the earliest date, prescribed for the giving of such notice or by any other manner deemed acceptable to the Trustee. In any case where notice to Holders is given by mail, neither the failure to mail such notice, nor any defect in any notice so mailed, to any particular Holder shall affect the sufficiency of such notice with respect to other Holders. Any notice when mailed to a Holder in the aforesaid manner shall be conclusively deemed to have been received by such Holder whether or not actually received by such Holder. Where this Indenture provides for notice in any manner, such notice may be waived in writing by the Person entitled to receive such notice, either before or after the event, and such waiver shall be the equivalent of such notice. Waivers of notice by Holders shall be filed with the Trustee, but such filing shall not be a condition precedent to the validity of any action taken in reliance upon such waiver.
     In case by reason of the suspension of regular mail service or by reason of any other cause, it shall be impracticable to mail notice of any event as required by any provision of this Indenture, then any method of giving such notice as shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee shall be deemed to be a sufficient giving of such notice.
     If the Company mails any notice to a Holder of a Security, it shall mail a copy to the Trustee and each Registrar, Paying Agent and Conversion Agent.
     Section 11.03. .
Disclosure of Names and Addresses of Holders
     Holders may communicate pursuant to TIA Section 312(b) with other Holders with respect to their rights under this Indenture or the Securities, and the Trustee shall comply with TIA Section 312(b). The Company, the Trustee, the Registrar and any other Person shall have the protection of TIA 312(c). Further, every Holder of Securities, by receiving and holding the same, agrees with the Company and the Trustee that neither the Company nor the Trustee or any agent of either of them shall be held accountable by reason of the disclosure of any information as to the names and addresses of the Holders in accordance with TIA Section 312, regardless of the source from which such information was derived, and that the Trustee shall not be held accountable by reason of mailing any material pursuant to a request made under TIA Section 312.
 
     Section 11.04. .
Compliance Certificates and Opinions
     (a) Upon any application or request by the Company to the Trustee to take any action under any provision of this Indenture and as may be requested by the Trustee, the Company and any other obligor on the Securities (if applicable) shall furnish to the Trustee an Officer's Certificate in a form and substance reasonably acceptable to the Trustee stating that all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture (including any covenant compliance with which constitutes a condition precedent) relating to the proposed action have been complied with, and an Opinion of Counsel in a form and substance reasonably acceptable to the Trustee stating that in the opinion of such counsel all such conditions precedent, if any, have been complied with, except that, in the case of any such application or request as to which the furnishing of such certificates or opinions is specifically required by any provision of this Indenture relating to such particular application or request, no additional certificate or opinion need be furnished.
     (b) Every certificate or Opinion of Counsel with respect to compliance with a condition or covenant provided for in this Indenture shall include:
     (1) a statement that each individual signing such certificate or individual or firm signing such opinion has read and understands such covenant or condition and the definitions herein relating thereto;
     (2) a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinions contained in such certificate or opinion are based;
     (3) a statement that, in the opinion of each such individual or such firm, he or it has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable him or it to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and
     (4) a statement as to whether, in the opinion of each such individual or such firm, such condition or covenant has been complied with.
     Section 11.05. .
Acts of Holders
     (a) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action provided by this Indenture to be given or taken by Holders may be embodied in and evidenced by one or more instruments of substantially similar tenor signed by such Holders in person or by an agent duly appointed in writing; and, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, such action shall become effective when such instrument or instruments are delivered to the Trustee and, where it is hereby expressly required, to the Company. Such instrument or instruments (and the action embodied therein and evidenced thereby) are herein sometimes referred to as the "Act" of the Holders signing such instrument or instruments. Proof of execution of any such instrument or of a writing appointing any such agent shall be sufficient for any purpose of this Indenture and conclusive in favor of the Trustee and the Company, if made in the manner provided in this Section 11.05.
 
     (b) The ownership of Securities shall be proved by the register maintained by the Primary Registrar.
     (c) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act by the Holder of any Security shall bind every future Holder of the same Security and the Holder of every Security issued upon the transfer thereof or in exchange therefor or in lieu thereof, in respect of anything done, suffered or omitted to be done by the Trustee, any Paying Agent or Conversion Agent, or the Company or any other obligor of the Securities in reliance thereon, whether or not notation of such action is made upon such Security.
     (d) The fact and date of the execution by any Person of any such instrument or writing may be proved by the affidavit of a witness of such execution or by a certificate of a notary public or other officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds, certifying that the individual signing such instrument or writing acknowledged to him the execution thereof. Where such execution is by a signer acting in a capacity other than his individual capacity, such certificate or affidavit shall also constitute sufficient proof of his authority. The fact and date of the execution of any such instrument or writing, or the authority of the Person executing the same, may also be proved in any other manner which the Trustee deems sufficient.
     (e) If the Company shall solicit from the Holders any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, the Company may, at its option, by or pursuant to a Board Resolution, fix in advance a record date for the determination of such Holders entitled to give such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, but the Company shall have no obligation to do so. Notwithstanding TIA Section 316(c), any such record date shall be the record date specified in or pursuant to such Board Resolution, which shall be a date not more than 30 days prior to the first solicitation of Holders generally in connection therewith and no later than the date such first solicitation is completed.
     (f) If such a record date is fixed, such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act may be given before or after such record date, but only the Holders of record at the close of business on such record date shall be deemed to be Holders for purposes of determining whether Holders of the requisite proportion of Securities then Outstanding have authorized or agreed or consented to such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, and for this purpose the Securities then Outstanding shall be computed as of such record date; provided that no such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act by the Holders on such record date shall be deemed effective unless it shall become effective pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture not later than six months after such record date.
     (g) For purposes of this Indenture, any action by the Holders which may be taken in writing may be taken by electronic means or as otherwise reasonably acceptable to the Trustee.
     Section 11.06. .
Benefits of Indenture
     Nothing in this Indenture or in the Securities, express or implied, shall give to any Person (other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder, any Paying Agent and the Holders) any benefit or any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Indenture.
 
     Section 11.07. .
Legal Holidays
     In any case where any Interest Payment Date, Fundamental Change Purchase Date or Final Maturity Date of any Security shall not be a Business Day, then (notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture or of the Securities) payment of interest or principal need not be made on such date, but may be made on the next succeeding Business Day with the same force and effect as if made on such Interest Payment Date, Fundamental Change Purchase Date or Final Maturity Date, and no interest shall accrue with respect to such payment for the period from and after such Interest Payment Date, Fundamental Change Purchase Date or Final Maturity Date, as the case may be, to the next succeeding Business Day.
     Section 11.08. .
Governing Law
     THIS INDENTURE AND THE SECURITIES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO THE CONFLICTS OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THEREOF.
     Section 11.09. .
No Adverse Interpretation of Other Agreements
     This Indenture may not be used to interpret another indenture, loan or debt agreement of the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company. Any such indenture, loan or debt agreement may not be used to interpret this Indenture.
     Section 11.10. .
No Personal Liability of Directors, Officers, Employees and Stockholders
     No director, officer, employee, stockholder, incorporator or agent of the Company, as such, will have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Securities, the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of, or by reason of, such obligations or their creation. Each holder of the Securities by accepting a Security waives and releases all such liability.
     Section 11.11. .
Successors and Assigns
     All covenants and agreements in this Indenture by the Company shall bind their respective successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
     Section 11.12. .
Multiple Counterparts
     The parties may sign multiple counterparts of this Indenture. Each signed counterpart shall be deemed an original, but all of them together represent the same agreement.
     Section 11.13. .
Separability Clause
     In case any provision in this Indenture or in the Securities shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
 
     Section 11.14. .
Schedules and Exhibits
     All schedules and exhibits attached hereto are by this reference made a part hereof with the same effect as if herein set forth in full.
     Section 11.15. .
Effect of Headings and Table of Contents
     The Article and Section headings herein and the Table of Contents are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
     Section 11.16.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
     EACH OF THE COMPANY AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE NOTES OR THE TRANSACTION CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
     Section 11.17.
Force Majeure.
     In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder arising out of or caused by, directly or indirectly, forces beyond its control, including, without limitation, strikes, work stoppages, accidents, acts of war or terrorism, civil or military disturbances, nuclear or natural catastrophes or acts of God, and interruptions, loss or malfunctions of utilities, communications or computer (software and hardware) services; it being understood that the Trustee shall use reasonable efforts which are consistent with accepted practices in the banking industry to resume performance as soon as practicable under the circumstances.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have hereunto set their hands as of the date and year first above written.
 
Exhibit A
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY (AND ANY PAYMENT HEREON IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL SINCE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN. THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF. THIS SECURITY IS EXCHANGEABLE FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR ITS NOMINEE ONLY IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE AND, UNLESS AND UNTIL IT IS EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR SECURITIES IN DEFINITIVE FORM, THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT AS A WHOLE BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY SUCH NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY.
1
THIS SECURITY AND THE SHARES OF COMMON STOCK ISSUABLE UPON CONVERSION OF THIS SECURITY HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR ANY STATE SECURITIES LAWS. NEITHER THIS SECURITY, THE SHARES OF COMMON STOCK ISSUABLE UPON CONVERSION OF THIS SECURITY NOR ANY INTEREST OR PARTICIPATION HEREIN OR THEREIN MAY BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, REGISTRATION UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT.
2
BY ITS ACQUISITION HEREOF, THE HOLDER AGREES TO OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER SUCH SECURITY PRIOR TO THE DATE THAT IS TWO YEARS AFTER THE LATER OF THE ORIGINAL ISSUE DATE HEREOF AND THE LAST DATE ON WHICH ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. (THE "COMPANY") OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE COMPANY WAS THE OWNER OF THIS SECURITY (OR ANY PREDECESSOR OF SUCH SECURITY) (THE "RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE") ONLY (A) TO THE COMPANY OR ANY SUBSIDIARY THEREOF, (B)
 
 
PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT WHICH HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (C) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A, TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, OR (D) PURSUANT TO ANY OTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE COMPANY'S AND THE TRUSTEE'S RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSE (D) PRIOR TO THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATIONS AND/OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM, AND IN EACH OF THE FOREGOING CASES, TO REQUIRE THAT A CERTIFICATE OF TRANSFER IN THE FORM APPEARING ON THE OTHER SIDE OF THIS SECURITY IS COMPLETED AND DELIVERED BY THE TRANSFEROR TO THE TRUSTEE. THIS LEGEND WILL BE REMOVED UPON THE REQUEST OF THE HOLDER AFTER THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE.
3
     Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation, promises to pay to Cede & Co. or registered assigns the principal amount of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) on February 15, 2013.
     This Security shall bear interest as specified on the other side of this Security. This Security is convertible as specified on the other side of this Security.
     Additional provisions of this Security are set forth on the other side of this Security.
Dated: February 16, 2007
 
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed.
 
     
1. Interest
     Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company", which term shall include any successor corporation under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Security at the rate of 1% per annum. The Company shall pay interest semiannually on February 15 and August 15 of each year (each an "Interest Payment Date"), commencing August 15, 2007. Interest payable on any Interest Payment Date shall include interest accrued from and including the immediately preceding Interest Payment Date (or if none, from and including February 16, 2007) to but excluding the relevant Interest Payment Date. Cash interest will be computed on the basis of a 360-day year comprised of twelve 30-day months. Any payment required to be made on a day that is not a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day with the same force and effect as if made on such day and without any interest in respect of the delay. The Company shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, pay interest in immediately available funds on overdue principal and interest at the rate of 1% per annum, compounded semiannually, which interest shall accrue from the date such overdue amount was originally due to the day preceding the date payment of such amount, including interest thereon, has been made or duly provided for.
     Any reference herein to interest accrued or payable as of any date shall include any Additional Interest accrued or payable on such date as provided in the Registration Rights Agreement and to any Special Interest that may be payable in accordance with the provisions of Section 7.02.
     
2. Method of Payment
     The Company shall pay interest on this Security (except defaulted interest) to the person who is the Holder of this Security at the close of business on February 1 or August 1, as the case may be (each, a "Regular Record Date") next preceding the related Interest Payment Date. The Holder must surrender this Security to a Paying Agent to collect payment of principal. The Company will pay principal and interest in money of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
     
3. Paying Agent, Registrar and Conversion Agent
     Initially, The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A. (the "Trustee", which term shall include any successor trustee under the Indenture hereinafter referred to) will act as Paying Agent, Registrar and Conversion Agent. The Company may change any Paying Agent, Registrar or Conversion Agent without notice to the Holder. The Company or any of its Affiliates may, subject to certain limitations set forth in the Indenture, act as Paying Agent.
 
     
4. Indenture
     This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of Securities of the Company designated as its 1% Senior Convertible Notes Due 2013 (the "Securities"), issued under an Indenture dated as of February 16, 2007 (together with any supplemental indentures thereto, the "Indenture"), between the Company and the Trustee. The terms of this Security include those stated in the Indenture and those required by or made part of the Indenture by reference to the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "TIA"), as in effect on the date of the Indenture. This Security is subject to all such terms, and the Holder of this Security is referred to the Indenture and the TIA for a statement of them. The Securities are limited to $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount. The Indenture does not limit other debt of the Company, secured or unsecured.
     Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein have the meaning ascribed to such terms in the Indenture.
     
5. Purchase of Securities at Option of Holder Upon a Fundamental Change
     Upon a Fundamental Change, at the option of the Holder and subject to the terms and conditions of the Indenture, the Company shall become obligated to purchase for cash all or any part specified by the Holder (so long as the principal amount of such part is $1,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of the Securities held by such Holder on the date specified by the Company in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 of the Indenture. The purchase price of any Securities so purchased shall equal 100% of the principal amount thereof together with accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, but excluding, the Fundamental Change Purchase Date. If the Fundamental Change Purchase Date falls on a day that is after the Regular Record Date and on or prior to the corresponding Interest Payment Date, interest, accrued and unpaid hereon to, but not including, the applicable Fundamental Change Purchase Date, will be paid to the Holder in whose name such Security is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date immediately preceding the applicable Fundamental Change Purchase Date.
     
6.
Conversion
     Subject to and upon compliance with the provisions of the Indenture and upon the occurrence of the events specified in the Indenture, the Holder may surrender for conversion all or any portion of this Security that is in an integral multiple of $1,000. Upon conversion, the Holder shall be entitled to receive the consideration specified in the Indenture. No fractional share of Common Stock shall be issued upon conversion of a Security. Instead, the Company shall pay a cash adjustment as provided in the Indenture. The initial Conversion Rate of the Securities shall be 15.753 shares of Common Stock per $1,000 principal amount of Securities, subject to adjustment in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 of the Indenture. If a Holder converts all or any portion of this Security in connection with the occurrence of certain Fundamental Change transactions, the Conversion Rate shall be increased in the manner and to the extent described in Section 4.01(i) of the Indenture.
     Securities surrendered for conversion (in whole or in part) during the period from the close of business on any Regular Record Date to the opening of business on the next succeeding Interest Payment Date shall be accompanied by payment by the Holders of such Securities in
 
funds to the Conversion Agent acceptable to the Company of an amount equal to the interest payable on such corresponding Interest Payment Date; that no such payment need be made: (1) in connection with a conversion following the Regular Record Date preceding the Final Maturity Date; (2) if the Company has specified a Fundamental Change Purchase Date that is after a Regular Record Date and on or prior to the corresponding Interest Payment Date; or (3) to the extent of any overdue interest, if any overdue interest exists at the time of conversion with respect to such Security.
provided
     A Security in respect of which a Holder has submitted a Fundamental Change Purchase Notice may be converted only if such Holder validly withdraws such Fundamental Change Purchase Notice in accordance with the terms of the Indenture.
     
7.
Denominations, Transfer, Exchange
     The Securities are in registered form, without coupons, in denominations of $1,000 principal amount and integral multiples of $1,000 principal amount. A Holder may register the transfer of or exchange Securities in accordance with the Indenture. The Registrar may require a Holder, among other things, to furnish appropriate endorsements and transfer documents and to pay any taxes or other governmental charges that may be imposed in relation thereto by law or permitted by the Indenture.
     
8.
Persons Deemed Owners
     The Holder of a Security may be treated as the owner of it for all purposes.
     
9.
Unclaimed Money
     If money for the payment of principal or interest remains unclaimed for two years, the Trustee and any Paying Agent will pay the money back to the Company, subject to the provisions of the Indenture. After that, Holders entitled to money must look to the Company for payment as general creditors.
     
10.
Amendment, Supplement and Waiver
     Subject to certain exceptions, the Indenture or the Securities may be amended or supplemented with the consent of the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then outstanding, and an existing Default or Event of Default and its consequence or compliance with any provision of the Indenture or the Securities may be waived subject to certain exceptions with the consent of the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding. Without the consent of or notice to any Holder, the Company and the Trustee may amend or supplement the Indenture or the Securities to, among other things, (x) cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency or (y) make any other change that does not adversely affect the interests of the Holders in any material respect.
     
11.
Successor Entity
     When a successor corporation assumes all the obligations of its predecessor under the Securities and the Indenture in accordance with the terms and conditions of the Indenture, the
 
predecessor corporation (except in certain circumstances specified in the Indenture) shall be released from those obligations.
     
12.
Defaults and Remedies
     An Event of Default shall occur upon the occurrence of any of the events specified in Section 7.01(a) of the Indenture. Subject to the provisions of the penultimate paragraph of Section 7.02(c) of the Indenture, if an Event of Default shall occur and be continuing with respect to the Securities (other than an Event of Default specified in clause (7) or (8) of Section 7.01(a) of the Indenture), the Trustee or the Holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding may, and the Trustee at the request of such Holders shall, declare all unpaid principal of and accrued interest on all Securities to be due and payable, by a notice in writing to the Company (and to the Trustee if given by the Holders of the Securities). Upon any such declaration, such principal and interest shall become due and payable immediately. If an Event of Default specified in clauses (7) or (8) of Section 7.01(a) of the Indenture occurs and is continuing, then all the Securities shall ipso facto become and be due and payable immediately in an amount equal to the principal amount of the Securities, together with accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date the Securities become due and payable, without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holder.
     The Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities Outstanding, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul an acceleration and its consequences if: (a) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay (1) all sums paid or advanced by the Trustee under the Indenture and the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, (2) all overdue interest on all Outstanding Securities, (3) the principal of any Outstanding Securities which have become due otherwise than by such declaration of acceleration and interest thereon at the rate borne by the Securities, and (4) to the extent that payment of such interest is lawful, interest upon overdue interest at the rate borne by the Securities; (b) the rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction; and (c) all Events of Default, other than the non-payment of principal of and interest on the Securities which have become due solely by such declaration of acceleration, have been cured or waived. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
     Holders may not enforce the Indenture or the Securities except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee may require indemnity satisfactory to it before it enforces the Indenture or the Securities. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then outstanding may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power. The Trustee may, in accordance with the provisions of the Indenture, withhold from Holders notice of any continuing Default (except a Default in payment of principal or interest or to deliver amounts owing upon conversion) if and so long as it determines that withholding notice is in their interests. The Company is required to file periodic certificates with the Trustee as to the Company's compliance with the Indenture and knowledge or status of any Default.
     
13.
Trustee Dealings With the Company
 
     The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., the initial Trustee under the Indenture, or any of its Affiliates, in its individual or any other capacity, may make loans to, accept deposits from and perform services for the Company or an Affiliate of the Company, and may otherwise deal with the Company or an Affiliate of the Company, as if it were not the Trustee.
     
14.
No Recourse Against Others
     No director, officer, employee, stockholder, incorporator or agent of the Company, as such, will have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Securities, the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of, or by reason of, such obligations or their creation. Each holder of the Securities by accepting a Security waives and releases all such liability.
     
15.
Authentication
     This Security shall not be valid until the Trustee or an authenticating agent manually signs the certificate of authentication on the other side of this Security.
     
16.
Abbreviations and Definitions
     Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of the Holder or an assignee, such as: TEN COM (= tenants in common), TEN ENT (= tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (= joint tenants with right of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (= Custodian) and UGMA (= Uniform Gifts to Minors Act).
     All terms defined in the Indenture and used in this Security but not specifically defined herein are defined in the Indenture and are used herein as so defined.
     
17.
Indenture to Control; Governing Law
     In the case of any conflict between the provisions of this Security and the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall control. This Security and the Indenture shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York, without giving effect to the conflicts of laws principles thereof.
     The Company will furnish to any Holder, upon written request and without charge, a copy of the Indenture. Requests may be made to: Anixter International Inc., 2301 Patriot Blvd., Glenview, Illinois 60026, Attention: Treasurer, Facsimile No. (224) 521-8990, Telephone No. (224) 521-8000.
 
     To assign this Security, fill in the form below:
I or we assign and transfer this Security to
and irrevocably appoint
agent to transfer this Security on the books of the Company. The agent may substitute another to act for him or her.
 
* Signature guaranteed by:
 
 
     To convert this Security into Common Stock of the Company, check the box: 
To convert only part of this Security, state the principal amount to be converted (must be $1,000 or a integral multiple of $1,000): $_________.
     If you want the stock certificate made out in another person's name, fill in the form below:
* Signature guaranteed by:
 
 
To: Anixter International Inc.
     The undersigned registered owner of this Security hereby acknowledges receipt of a notice from Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") as to the occurrence of a Fundamental Change with respect to the Company and requests and instructs the Company to purchase the entire principal amount of this Security, or the portion thereof (which is $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof) below designated, in accordance with the terms of the Indenture referred to in this Security at the Fundamental Change Purchase Price, together with accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, but excluding, such date, to the registered Holder hereof.
 
 
Re: 1% Senior Convertible Notes Due 2013 (the "Securities") of Anixter International Inc.
This certificate relates to $________ principal amount of Securities owned in (check applicable box) book-entry or definitive form by _________ (the "Transferor").
     The Transferor has requested a Registrar or the Trustee to exchange or register the transfer of such Securities.
     In connection with such request and in respect of each such Security, the Transferor does hereby certify that the Transferor is familiar with transfer restrictions relating to the Securities as provided in Section 2.13 of the Indenture, dated as of February 16, 2007, between Anixter International Inc. and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as trustee (the "Indenture"), and the transfer of such Security is being made pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") (check applicable box), or the transfer or exchange, as the case may be, of such Security does not require registration under the Securities Act because (check applicable box):
     The Transferor acknowledges and agrees that, if the transferee will hold any such Securities in the form of beneficial interests in a Global Note which is a "restricted security" within the meaning of Rule
 
144 under the Securities Act, then such transfer can only be made pursuant to (i) Rule 144A under the Securities Act and such transferee must be a "qualified institutional buyer" (as defined in Rule 144A) or (ii) Regulation S under the Securities Act.
 
     The following exchanges, purchases or conversions of a part of this Global Security have been made:

 
Exhibit 4.2
 
     This Registration Rights Agreement (this "Agreement") is made and entered into this 16th day of February, 2007, by and between Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("Merrill Lynch") on its own behalf and as representative of the other Initial Purchasers named on Schedule A to the Purchase Agreement (as defined below).
     This Agreement is made pursuant to the Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement"), dated February 12, 2007, between the Company and the Initial Purchasers named therein (the "Initial Purchasers"), for whom Merrill Lynch acts as representative, which provides for the sale by the Company to the Initial Purchasers of $275,000,000 aggregate principal amount ($300,000,000 aggregate principal amount if the Initial Purchasers exercise their over-allotment option in full) of the Company's 1% Senior Convertible Notes due 2013 (the "Notes" and together with the shares of Common Stock (as defined below) into which the Notes are convertible, the "Securities"). In order to induce the Initial Purchasers to enter into the Purchase Agreement, the Company has agreed to provide to the Initial Purchasers and their direct and indirect transferees the registration rights set forth in this Agreement. The execution of this Agreement is a condition to the closing under the Purchase Agreement.
     In consideration of the foregoing, the parties hereto agree as follows:
     1. .
Definitions
     As used in this Agreement, the following capitalized defined terms shall have the following meanings:
     "" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
1933 Act
     "" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of l934, as amended.
1934 Act
     "" shall mean the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
1939 Act
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.4.
Additional Interest
     "" shall mean the Initial Closing Time as defined in the Purchase Agreement.
Closing Date
     "" shall mean any shares of common stock, par value $1.00 per share, of the Company and any other shares of common stock as may constitute "Common Stock" for purposes of the Indenture.
Common Stock
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble and shall also include the Company's successors.
Company
     "" shall mean The Depository Trust Company, or any other depositary appointed by the Company, , that such depositary must have an address in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York.
Depositary
provided, however
 
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(b).
Effectiveness Period
     "" shall mean the Initial Purchasers, for so long as they own any Registrable Securities, and their successors, assigns and direct and indirect transferees who become owners, beneficial or otherwise, of Registrable Securities under the Indenture.
Holder
     "" shall mean the Indenture relating to the Notes, dated as of the date hereof, between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, as the same may be amended, supplemented, waived or otherwise modified from time to time in accordance with the terms thereof.
Indenture
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Initial Purchasers
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(f).
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
     "" shall mean (a) the Holders of a majority of the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Registrable Securities or (b) the Holders of a majority of the aggregate principal amount of the specified Registrable Securities, as the context requires; , for purposes of this definition, (1) a Holder of shares of Common Stock that constitute Registrable Securities which were issued upon conversion of Notes shall be deemed to hold an aggregate principal amount at maturity of Notes (in addition to the principal amount at maturity of any Notes held by such Holder) equal to the principal amount at maturity of Notes which were converted into such shares of Common Stock (excluding the principal amount at maturity of any such Notes that were converted into cash) and (2) such Notes (excluding any such Notes that were converted into cash) which were converted into such shares of Common Stock shall be deemed to be outstanding; , that whenever the consent or approval of Holders of a specified percentage of Registrable Securities is required hereunder, Registrable Securities held by the Company or any Affiliate (as defined in the Indenture) of the Company shall be disregarded in determining whether such consent or approval was given by the Holders of such required percentage amount.
Majority Holders
provided that
provided further
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Merrill Lynch
     "" shall mean the offering memorandum of the Company, dated February 12, 2007, related to the Securities.
Offering Memorandum
     "" shall mean an individual, partnership (general or limited), corporation, limited liability company, trust, unincorporated organization or other entity, or a government or agency or political subdivision thereof.
Person
     "" shall mean the prospectus relating to the Securities included in a Shelf Registration Statement, including any preliminary prospectus, and any such prospectus as amended or supplemented by any prospectus supplement, including any such prospectus supplement with respect to the terms of the offering of any portion of the Registrable Securities covered by a Shelf Registration Statement, and by all other amendments and supplements to a prospectus, including post-effective amendments, and in each case including all materials incorporated by reference therein.
Prospectus
 
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Purchase Agreement
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(d).
Questionnaire
     "" shall mean all or any of the Securities; , that any such Securities shall cease to be Registrable Securities when (i) a Shelf Registration Statement with respect to such Securities shall have become effective under the 1933 Act and such Securities shall have been disposed of pursuant to such Shelf Registration Statement, (ii) such Securities have been sold to the public pursuant to Rule 144 or may be sold or transferred pursuant to Rule l44(k) (or any similar provision then in force, but not Rule 144A) under the 1933 Act, or (iii) such Securities shall have ceased to be outstanding.
Registrable Securities
provided, however
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.4.
Registration Default
     "" shall mean any and all expenses incident to performance of or compliance by the Company with this Agreement, whether or not a Shelf Registration Statement becomes effective, including without limitation: (i) all SEC, stock exchange or National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. (the "") registration and filing fees, including, if applicable, the fees and expenses of any "qualified independent underwriter" (and its counsel) that is required to be retained by any holder of Registrable Securities in accordance with the rules and regulations of the NASD, (ii) all fees and expenses incurred by the Company in connection with compliance with state securities or blue sky laws and compliance with the rules of the NASD (including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for any underwriters or Holders in connection with blue sky qualification of any of the Registrable Securities and any filings with the NASD), (iii) all expenses of the Company in preparing or assisting in preparing, word processing, printing and distributing any Shelf Registration Statement, any Prospectus, any amendments or supplements thereto, any securities sales agreements and other documents relating to the performance of and compliance with this Agreement, (iv) all fees and expenses incurred by the Company in connection with the listing, if any, of any of the Registrable Securities on any securities exchange or exchanges, (v) all rating agency fees incurred by the Company, if any, (vi) the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company and of the independent public accountants of the Company, including the expenses of any special audits or "comfort" letters required by or incident to such performance and compliance, (vii) the reasonable fees and expenses of the Trustee, and any escrow agent or custodian, (viii) if requested by the Majority Holders, the reasonable fees and expenses of a single counsel to the Holders in connection with any Shelf Registration Statement, which counsel shall be a nationally recognized law firm experienced in securities law matters selected by the Company, and (ix) any fees and expenses of any special experts retained by the Company in connection with any Shelf Registration Statement, but excluding any underwriting discounts and commissions and transfer taxes, if any, relating to the sale or disposition of Registrable Securities by a Holder.
Registration Expenses
NASD
     "" shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor agency or government body performing the functions currently performed by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Securities
 
     "" shall mean a registration effected pursuant to Section 2.1.
Shelf Registration
     "" shall mean a "shelf" registration statement of the Company pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.1 which covers all of the Registrable Securities on Form S-3 (including an automatic shelf registration statement filed pursuant to General Instruction I.D. of Form S-3) or, if not then available to the Company, on another appropriate form under Rule 415 under the 1933 Act, or any similar rule that may be adopted by the SEC, and all amendments and supplements to such registration statement, including post-effective amendments, in each case including the Prospectus contained therein, all exhibits thereto and all materials incorporated by reference therein.
Shelf Registration Statement
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.5.
Suspension Period
     "" shall mean the trustee with respect to the Securities under the Indenture.
Trustee
     2. .
Registration Under the 1933 Act
     2.1 .
Shelf Registration
          (a) The Company shall, at its cost, no later than 90 days after the Closing Date, file with the SEC, and thereafter shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause to become effective as promptly as practicable but no later than 180 days after the Closing Date, a Shelf Registration Statement relating to the offer and sale of the Registrable Securities by the Holders that have provided the information pursuant to Section 2.1(d).
          (b) The Company shall, at its cost, use its reasonable best efforts, subject to Section 2.5, to keep the Shelf Registration Statement continuously effective in order to permit the Prospectus forming part thereof to be usable by Holders (i) for a period of two years from the date of the original issuance of the Notes or (ii) for such shorter period that will terminate (A) when all Registrable Securities covered by the Shelf Registration Statement have been sold pursuant to the Shelf Registration Statement, (B) when the Holders, other than "affiliates" (as defined in Rule 144 under the 1933 Act) of the Company, are able to sell or transfer to the public all Registrable Securities immediately without restriction pursuant to Rule 144 (or any similar provision then in force, including Rule 144(k), but not Rule 144A) under the 1933 Act or (C) when all Registrable Securities cease to be outstanding or otherwise cease to be Registrable Securities (the "").
Effectiveness Period
          (c) Notwithstanding any other provisions hereof, the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to provide that (i) any Shelf Registration Statement and any amendment thereto and any Prospectus forming part thereof and any supplement thereto complies in all material respects with the 1933 Act and the rules and regulations thereunder, (ii) any Shelf Registration Statement and any amendment thereto does not, when it becomes effective, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and (iii) any Prospectus forming part of any Shelf Registration Statement, and any supplement to such Prospectus (as amended or supplemented from time to time), does not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
          (d) Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, no Holder of Registrable Securities may include any of its Registrable Securities in a Shelf Registration Statement pursuant to this Agreement unless the Holder furnishes to the Company a fully completed notice and questionnaire in the form attached as Annex A to the Offering Memorandum (the "") and such other information in writing as the Company may reasonably request in writing for use in connection with such Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus included therein and in any application to be filed with or under state securities laws. At least 30 days prior to the filing of a Shelf Registration Statement, the Company will provide notice to the Holders (by press release issued through a reputable national newswire service) of its intention to file such Shelf Registration Statement. In order to be named as a selling securityholder in the Prospectus at the time of effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement, each Holder must, before the filing of such Shelf Registration Statement and no later than the 20th day after the date of the issuance by the Company of a press release announcing the Company's intention to file, furnish the completed Questionnaire and such other information that the Company may reasonably request in writing, if any, to the Company in writing and the Company shall include the information from the completed Questionnaire and such other information, if any, in such Shelf Registration Statement and the Prospectus in a manner so that upon effectiveness of such Shelf Registration Statement the Holder will be permitted to deliver the Prospectus to purchasers of the Holder's Registrable Securities. From and after the date that the Shelf Registration Statement becomes effective, upon receipt of a completed Questionnaire and such other information that the Company may reasonably request in writing, if any, the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to file within 20 business days any amendments or supplements to the Shelf Registration Statement necessary for such Holder to be named as a selling securityholder in the Prospectus contained therein to permit such Holder to deliver the Prospectus to purchasers of the Holder's Securities (subject to the Company's right to suspend any Shelf Registration Statement as described in Section 2.5 below); , that the Company shall not be required to file more than one post-effective amendment in any calendar quarter for all such Holders. If a post-effective amendment is required to be filed, the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to have such post-effective amendment declared effective by the SEC, if necessary, as promptly as practicable after filing thereof, but in any event prior to the end of the Effectiveness Period. Holders that do not deliver a completed written Questionnaire and such other information, as provided for in this Section 2.1(d), will not be named as selling securityholders in the Prospectus. Each Holder named as a selling securityholder in the Prospectus agrees to promptly furnish to the Company all information required to be disclosed in order to make information previously furnished to the Company by the Holder not materially misleading and any other information regarding such Holder and the distribution of such Holder's Registrable Securities as the Company may from time to time reasonably request in writing.
Questionnaire
provided, however
          (e) Each Holder agrees not to sell any Registrable Securities pursuant to a Shelf Registration Statement without delivering, or causing to be delivered, a Prospectus to the purchaser thereof to the extent required by law and, following termination of the Effectiveness Period, to notify the Company, within ten days of a written request by the Company, of the amount of Registrable Securities sold pursuant to such Shelf Registration Statement and, in the absence of a response, the Company may assume that all of such Holder's Registrable Securities have been so sold; provided that the Company shall use reasonable best efforts to confirm that all of such Holder's Registrable Securities have been so sold prior to making such assumption.
 
          (f) The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Majority Holders of the Registrable Securities that are registered under the Shelf Registration Statement at such time or the approval of the counsel for the Holders of such Registrable Securities or the consent of the managing underwriter in connection with any underwritten offering of Registrable Securities, and each Holder represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and any such underwriter, it will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 under the 1933 Act (an ""), or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405 under the 1933 Act, required to be filed with the SEC. The Company represents that any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus will not include any information that conflicts with the information contained in a Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus and that any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, when taken together with the information in the Shelf Registration Statement and the Prospectus, will not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
     The Company will not permit any securities other than Registrable Securities to be included in a Shelf Registration Statement. The Company agrees to supplement or amend a Shelf Registration Statement if required by the rules, regulations or instructions applicable to the registration form used by the Company if required by the 1933 Act, or to the extent the Company does not reasonably object, as reasonably requested in writing by the Initial Purchasers with respect to information relating to the Initial Purchasers or by the Trustee on behalf of the Holders with respect to information relating to the Holders, and to furnish to the Holders of Registrable Securities that are covered under such Shelf Registration Statement copies of any such supplement or amendment promptly after its being used or filed with the SEC in such amounts as they may reasonably request.
     2.2 . The Company shall pay all Registration Expenses in connection with the registration pursuant to Section 2.1. Each Holder shall pay all underwriting discounts and commissions and transfer taxes, if any, relating to the sale or disposition of such Holder's Registrable Securities pursuant to a Shelf Registration Statement.
Expenses
     2.3 . The Company will be deemed not to have used its reasonable best efforts to cause a Shelf Registration Statement to become, or to remain, effective during the requisite period (subject to Section 2.5) if the Company voluntarily takes any action that would, or omits to take any action which omission would, result in any such Shelf Registration Statement not becoming effective or in the Holders of Registrable Securities covered thereby not being able to offer and sell such Registrable Securities during that period as and to the extent contemplated hereby, unless such action is required by applicable law.
Effectiveness
     2.4 . In the event that (a) a Shelf Registration Statement is not filed with the SEC on or before the 90 calendar day following the Closing Date, (b) a Shelf Registration Statement has not become effective on or prior to the 180 calendar day following the Closing Date, (c) after effectiveness, subject to Section 2.5, a Shelf Registration Statement ceases to be effective or fails to be usable by the Holders without being succeeded within seven business days by a post-effective amendment or a report filed with the SEC pursuant to the 1934 Act that cures
Interest
th
th
 
the failure to be effective or usable, or (d) the Prospectus is unusable by the Holders for any reason, and the number of days for which the Shelf Registration Statement shall not be usable exceeds the Suspension Period (as defined in Section 2.5) (each such event being a ""), additional interest ("") will accrue at a rate per annum of one-quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the principal amount of the Securities for the first 90-day period following the Registration Default, and thereafter at a rate per annum of one-half of one percent (0.50%) of the principal amount of the Securities; that in no event shall Additional Interest accrue at a rate per annum exceeding one half of one percent (0.50%) of the issue price of the Securities; that no Additional Interest shall accrue after the second anniversary of the Closing Date. Upon the cure of all Registration Defaults then continuing, the accrual of Additional Interest will automatically cease and the interest rate borne by the Securities will revert to the original interest rate at such time. Additional Interest shall be computed based on the actual number of days elapsed in each 90-day period in which the Shelf Registration Statement or the Prospectus is not effective or is unusable. Holders who have converted Securities into Common Stock will not be entitled to receive any Additional Interest with respect to such Common Stock or the issue price of the Securities converted.
Registration Default
Additional Interest
provided
provided further
     The Company shall notify the Trustee within five business days after each and every date on which an event occurs in respect of which Additional Interest is required to be paid. Additional Interest shall be paid by depositing with the Trustee, in trust, for the benefit of the Holders of Registrable Securities, on or before the applicable semiannual interest payment date, in immediately available funds in sums sufficient to pay the Additional Interest then due. The Additional Interest due shall be payable in arrears on each interest payment date to the record Holder of Registrable Securities entitled to receive the interest payment to be paid on such date as set forth in the Indenture. Each obligation to pay Additional Interest shall be deemed to accrue from and including the day following the Registration Default to but excluding the day on which the Registration Default is cured.
     A Registration Default under clause (a) above shall be cured on the date that a Registration Statement is filed with the SEC. A Registration Default under clause (b) above shall be cured on the date that a Shelf Registration Statement is declared effective by the SEC or deemed to become automatically effective under the 1933 Act. A Registration Default under clauses (c) or (d) above shall be cured on the date an amended Shelf Registration Statement is declared effective by the SEC or deemed to become automatically effective under the 1933 Act, or the Company otherwise declares the Shelf Registration Statement and the Prospectus useable, as applicable. The Company will have no liabilities for monetary damages other than the Additional Interest with respect to any Registration Default.
     The parties hereto agree that the Additional Interest provided for in this Section 2.4 constitutes a reasonable estimate of the damages that may be incurred by Holders of Registrable Securities and does not constitute a penalty.
     2.5 . Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the Company may suspend the use of any Prospectus, without incurring or accruing any obligation to pay Additional Interest pursuant to Section 2.4 or being deemed in violation of any other provision hereof, for a period not to exceed 30 calendar days in any three-month period, or an aggregate of 90 calendar days in any twelve-month period, (each, a "") if the Board of
Suspension
Suspension Period
 
Directors of the Company shall have determined in good faith that because of valid business reasons (not including avoidance of the Company's obligations hereunder), including without limitation proposed or pending corporate developments and similar events or because of filings with the SEC, it is in the best interests of the Company to suspend such use, and prior to suspending such use the Company provides the Holders with written notice of such suspension, which notice need not specify the nature of the event giving rise to such suspension. Each Holder shall keep confidential any communications received by it from the Company regarding the suspension of the use of the Prospectus, except as required by applicable law.
     3. .
Registration Procedures
     In connection with the obligations of the Company with respect to the Shelf Registration, the Company shall, subject to the rights of the Company to invoke and maintain a Suspension Period in accordance with Section 2.5 without being in violation of any of the provisions hereunder:
          (a) prepare and file with the SEC a Shelf Registration Statement, within the relevant time period specified in Section 2, on the appropriate form under the 1933 Act, which form (i) shall be selected by the Company, (ii) shall be available for the sale of the Registrable Securities by the selling Holders thereof, (iii) shall comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the applicable form and include or incorporate by reference all financial statements required by the SEC to be filed therewith or incorporated by reference therein, and (iv) shall comply in all respects with the applicable requirements of Regulation S-T under the 1933 Act, if any, and use reasonable best efforts to cause such Shelf Registration Statement to become effective and remain effective in accordance with Section 2;
          (b) prepare and file with the SEC such amendments and post-effective amendments to a Shelf Registration Statement as may be necessary under applicable law to keep such Shelf Registration Statement effective for the Effectiveness Period, subject to Section 2.5; and cause each Prospectus to be supplemented by any required prospectus supplement, and as so supplemented to be filed pursuant to Rule 424 (or any similar provision then in force) under the 1933 Act and comply during the Effectiveness Period with the provisions of the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations thereunder required to enable the disposition of all Registrable Securities covered by a Shelf Registration Statement in accordance with the intended method or methods of distribution by the selling Holders thereof; , that in no event will such method(s) of distribution take the form of an underwritten offering of the Registrable Securities without the prior agreement of the Company, which may be withheld in its sole discretion;
provided
          (c) (i) notify each Holder of Registrable Securities of the filing of a Shelf Registration Statement with respect to the Registrable Securities; (ii) furnish to each Holder of Registrable Securities that has provided the information required by Section 2.1(d) and to each underwriter of an underwritten offering of Registrable Securities, if any, without charge, as many copies of each Prospectus, including each preliminary Prospectus, and any amendment or supplement thereto and such other documents as such Holder or underwriter may reasonably request in writing, including financial statements and schedules and, if the Holder so requests, all exhibits in order to facilitate the unrestricted sale or other disposition of the Registrable
 
Securities; and (iii) subject to Section 2.5 and to any notice by the Company in accordance with Section 3(e) hereof of the existence of any fact of the kind described in Sections 3(e)(ii), (iii), (iv), (v) and (vi), hereby consent to the use of the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto by each of the selling Holders of Registrable Securities that has provided the information required by Section 2.1(d) in connection with the offering and sale of the Registrable Securities;
          (d) use reasonable best efforts to register or qualify the Registrable Securities under all applicable state securities or "blue sky" laws of such jurisdictions as any Holder of Registrable Securities covered by a Shelf Registration Statement and each underwriter of an underwritten offering of Registrable Securities shall reasonably request, and do any and all other acts and things which may be reasonably necessary or advisable to enable each such Holder and underwriter to consummate the disposition in each such jurisdiction of such Registrable Securities owned by such Holder; , that the Company shall not be required to (i) qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction where it would not otherwise be required to qualify but for this Section 3(d), or (ii) take any action which would subject it to general service of process or taxation in any such jurisdiction where it is not then so subject;
provided, however
          (e) notify promptly each Holder of Registrable Securities under a Shelf Registration Statement that has provided the information required by Section 2.1(d) and, if requested by such Holder, confirm such advice in writing promptly (i) when a Shelf Registration Statement has become effective and when any post-effective amendments thereto have become effective, (ii) of any request by the SEC or any state securities authority for post-effective amendments and supplements to a Shelf Registration Statement and Prospectus or for additional information relating thereto after a Shelf Registration Statement has become effective, (iii) of the issuance by the SEC or any state securities authority of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement or the initiation of any proceedings for that purpose, (iv) of the happening of any event or the discovery of any facts during the period a Shelf Registration Statement is effective which makes any statement made in such Shelf Registration Statement or the related Prospectus untrue in any material respect or which requires the making of any changes in such Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus in order to make the statements therein (in the case of the Prospectus in light of the circumstances under which they were made) not misleading, (v) of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Registrable Securities for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose and (vi) of any determination by the Company that a post-effective amendment to a Shelf Registration Statement would be appropriate, other than a post-effective amendment solely to add selling Holders;
          (f) furnish to each Initial Purchaser on behalf of the Holders of Registrable Securities and to special counsel to the Initial Purchasers (i) copies of any comment letters received from the SEC with respect to a Shelf Registration Statement or any documents incorporated therein and (ii) any other request by the SEC or any state securities authority for amendments or supplements to a Shelf Registration Statement and Prospectus or for additional information with respect to a Shelf Registration Statement and Prospectus;
 
          (g) use reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of any order suspending the effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement at the earliest possible moment and provide prompt notice to each Holder of the withdrawal of such order;
          (h) furnish, upon written request, to each Holder of Registrable Securities that has provided the information required by Section 2.1(d), and each underwriter, if any, without charge, at least one conformed copy of each Shelf Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto, including financial statements and schedules (without documents incorporated therein by reference and all exhibits thereto, unless requested);
          (i) if electronic global certificates for the Registrable Securities are not then available, cooperate with the selling Holders of Registrable Securities to facilitate the timely preparation and delivery of certificates representing Registrable Securities to be sold and not bearing any restrictive legends (other than as required by applicable law); and enable such Registrable Securities to be in such denominations (consistent with the provisions of the Indenture) and registered in such names as the selling Holders or the underwriters, if any, may reasonably request at least three business days prior to the closing of any sale of Registrable Securities;
          (j) upon the occurrence of any event or the discovery of any facts, each as contemplated by Sections 3(e)(ii), (iii), (iv), (v) and (vi) hereof, as promptly as practicable after the occurrence of such an event, use reasonable best efforts to prepare a supplement or post-effective amendment to a Shelf Registration Statement or the related Prospectus or any document incorporated therein by reference or file any other required document so that, as thereafter delivered to the purchasers of the Registrable Securities, such Prospectus will not contain at the time of such delivery any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading or will remain so qualified. At such time as such public disclosure is otherwise made or the Company determines that such disclosure is not necessary, in each case to correct any misstatement of a material fact or to include any omitted material fact, the Company agrees promptly to notify each Holder of Registrable Securities covered by such Shelf Registration Statement of such determination and to furnish each Holder such number of copies of the Prospectus as amended or supplemented, as such Holder may reasonably request;
          (k) no less than three business days prior to the filing of any Shelf Registration Statement, any Prospectus, any amendment to a Shelf Registration Statement or amendment or supplement to a Prospectus (other than amendments and supplements that do nothing more than name Holders and provide information with respect thereto and other than filings by the Company of 1934 Act reports), provide copies of such document to Merrill Lynch on behalf of such Holders, and make representatives of the Company, as shall be reasonably requested by special counsel to the Holders of Registrable Securities or Merrill Lynch on behalf of such Holders, available for discussion of such document;
          (l) obtain CUSIP numbers for all Registrable Securities not later than the effective date of a Shelf Registration Statement and provide the Trustee with printed certificates for the Registrable Securities in a form eligible for deposit with the Depositary;
 
          (m) (i) cause the Indenture to be qualified under the 1939 Act in connection with the registration of the Registrable Securities, (ii) cooperate with the Trustee and the Holders to effect such changes to the Indenture as may be required for the Indenture to be so qualified in accordance with the terms of the 1939 Act, and (iii) execute, and use reasonable best efforts to cause the Trustee to execute, all documents as may be required to effect such changes, and all other forms and documents required to be filed with the SEC to enable the Indenture to be so qualified in a timely manner;
          (n) enter into such customary agreements (including, if requested, an underwriting agreement in customary form) and take all other customary and appropriate actions, if any, in order to expedite or facilitate the disposition of such Registrable Securities, including, but not limited to:
     (i) obtain opinions of counsel to the Company and updates thereof addressed to each selling Holder and the underwriters, if any, covering the matters set forth in the opinions of such counsel delivered at the Closing Date;
     (ii) obtain "comfort" letters and updates thereof from the Company's independent certified public accountants (and, if necessary, any other independent certified public accountants of any subsidiary of the Company or of any business acquired by the Company for which financial statements are, or are required to be, included in a Shelf Registration Statement) addressed to the underwriters, if any, and use reasonable best efforts to have such letter addressed to the selling Holders of Registrable Securities (to the extent consistent with Statement on Auditing Standards No. 72 of the American Institute of Certified Public Accounts), such letters substantially in the form and covering the matters covered in the comfort letter delivered on the Closing Date;
     (iii) if an underwriting agreement is entered into, cause the same to set forth indemnification provisions and procedures substantially equivalent to the indemnification provisions and procedures set forth in Section 4 with respect to the underwriters and all other parties to be indemnified pursuant to said Section or, at the request of any underwriters, in the form customarily provided to such underwriters in similar types of transactions; and
     (iv) deliver such documents and certificates as may be reasonably requested and as are customarily delivered in similar offerings to the Majority Holders of the Registrable Securities being sold and the managing underwriters, if any.
The above shall be done only in connection with any underwritten offering of Registrable Securities using such Shelf Registration Statement pursuant to an underwriting or similar agreement as and to the extent required thereunder, and as reasonably requested by any of the parties thereto;
          (o) at a reasonable time prior to filing a Shelf Registration Statement, any Prospectus forming a part thereof, any amendment to such Shelf Registration Statement or amendment or supplement to such Prospectus (other than amendments and supplements that do nothing more than name Holders and provide information with respect thereto and other than
 
filings by the Company under the 1934 Act), (i) provide copies of such document to the Holders of Registrable Securities that have provided the information required by Section 2.1(d), to the Initial Purchasers, to special counsel for the Holders and to the underwriter or underwriters of an underwritten offering of Registrable Securities, if any, (ii) make such changes in any such document prior to the filing thereof as the Initial Purchasers, the special counsel to the Holders or the underwriter or underwriters reasonably agree should be included therein and provide to the Company in writing for inclusion therein within three business days of delivery of such copies, (iii) if requested by any selling Holder of Registrable Securities that has provided the information required by Section 2.1(d), not file any such document in a form (A) to which the Majority Holders, the Initial Purchasers on behalf of the Holders of Registrable Securities, special counsel for the Holders of Registrable Securities or any underwriter shall not have previously been advised and furnished a copy of or (B) to which the Majority Holders, the Initial Purchasers on behalf of the Holders of Registrable Securities, special counsel to the Holders of Registrable Securities or any underwriter shall reasonably object within three business days of delivery of such copies, and (iv) make the representatives of the Company available for discussion of such document as shall be reasonably requested in writing by the Holders of Registrable Securities, the Initial Purchasers on behalf of such Holders, special counsel for the Holders of Registrable Securities or any underwriter; , , that the foregoing discussion shall be coordinated on behalf of the parties entitled thereto by the special counsel to the Holders;
provided
however
          (p) subject to Section 2.1(d), if requested by any Holder of Registrable Securities that has provided the information required by Section 2.1(d) or the underwriters, if any, incorporate in a Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus, pursuant to a supplement or post-effective amendment if necessary, such information as such selling Holder or underwriter, if any, may reasonable request in writing to have included therein with respect to the name or names of such selling Holder, the number of shares of Common Stock or principal amount of Securities owned by such Holder, the plan of distribution of the Registrable Securities (as required by Item 508 of Regulation S-K), the principal amount of Securities or number of shares of Common Stock being sold, the purchase price being paid therefor, and any other terms of the offering of the Registrable Securities to be sold in such offering;
          (q) use reasonable best efforts to cause all Registrable Securities to be listed on any securities exchange or inter-dealer quotation system on which similar debt securities issued by the Company are then listed if requested by the Majority Holders, or if requested by the underwriter or underwriters of an underwritten offering of Registrable Securities, if any;
          (r) use reasonable best efforts to cause the Registrable Securities to be rated by the appropriate rating agencies if requested by the underwriter or underwriters of an underwritten public offering of Registrable Securities, if any;
          (s) otherwise comply with all applicable rules and regulations of the SEC and make available to its security holders, as soon as reasonably practicable, an earnings statement covering at least 12 months which shall satisfy the provisions of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act and Rule 158 thereunder; and
          (t) cooperate and assist in any filings required to be made with the NASD and in the performance of any due diligence investigation by any underwriter and its counsel
 
(including any "qualified independent underwriter" that is required to be retained in accordance with the rules and regulations of the NASD).
     Without limiting the provisions of Section 2.1(d), the Company may (as a condition to such Holder's participation in the Shelf Registration) require each Holder of Registrable Securities to furnish to the Company such information regarding the Holder and the proposed distribution by such Holder of such Registrable Securities as the Company may from time to time reasonably request in writing.
     Each Holder agrees that, upon receipt of any notice from the Company of the happening of any event or the discovery of any facts, each of the kind described in Section 3(e)(ii), (iii), (iv), (v) or (vi) hereof, such Holder will forthwith discontinue disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to the Prospectus included in the Shelf Registration Statement until such Holder's receipt of the copies of the supplemented or amended Prospectus contemplated by Section 3(j) or written notice from the Company that such Shelf Registration Statement is again effective and no amendment or supplement is needed, and, if so directed by the Company, such Holder will deliver to the Company (at its expense) all copies in such Holder's possession, other than permanent file copies then in such Holder's possession, of the Prospectus covering such Registrable Securities current at the time of receipt of such notice.
     If any of the Registrable Securities covered by any Shelf Registration Statement are to be sold in an underwritten offering, the underwriter or underwriters and manager or managers that will manage such offering will be selected by the Majority Holders of such Registrable Securities included in such offering and shall be acceptable to the Company. No Holder of Registrable Securities may participate in any underwritten registration hereunder unless such Holder (a) agrees to sell such Holder's Registrable Securities on the basis provided in any underwriting arrangements approved by the persons entitled hereunder to approve such arrangements and (b) completes and executes all questionnaires, powers of attorney, indemnities, underwriting agreements and other documents required under the terms of such underwriting arrangements.
     4. .
Indemnification; Contribution
          (a) The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Initial Purchaser, each Holder, each Person who participates as an underwriter, if any (any such Person being an "Underwriter") and each Person, if any, who controls any such Holder or Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
   (i) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Shelf Registration Statement (or any amendment or supplement thereto) pursuant to which Registrable Securities were registered under the 1933 Act, including all documents incorporated therein by reference, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact
 
necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
     (ii) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; , that (subject to Section 4(d) below) any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
provided
     (iii) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by any indemnified party), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under subparagraph (i) or (ii) above;
, that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of any Holder or Underwriter, if any, expressly for use in a Shelf Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), any Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
provided, however
          (b) Each Holder, severally, but not jointly, agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each Initial Purchaser, each Underwriter, if any, and the other selling Holders, and each of their respective directors and officers, and each Person, if any, who controls the Company, any of the Initial Purchasers, any Underwriter or any other selling Holder within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act, against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in Section 4(a), as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in any Shelf Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or any Prospectus included therein (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information with respect to such Holder furnished to the Company by or on behalf of such Holder expressly for use in such Shelf Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or such Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto); , that no such Holder shall be liable for any claims hereunder in excess of the amount of net proceeds received by such Holder from the sale of Registrable Securities pursuant to such Shelf Registration Statement.
provided, however
          (c) Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action or proceeding commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not
 
materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of such action; , that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying party or parties be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 4 (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent (A) includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and (B) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
provided, however
          (d) If at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by Section 4(a)(ii) effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request, (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least 30 days prior to such settlement being entered into and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement.
          (e) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 4 is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Holders and the Initial Purchasers on the other hand in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
     The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Holders and the Initial Purchasers on the other hand shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company, or by the Holders or the Initial Purchasers and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
     The Company, the Holders and the Initial Purchasers agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 4 were determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation (even if the Initial Purchasers were treated as one entity for such purposes) which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this
 
Section 4. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 4 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 4, none of the Initial Purchasers nor any Holder shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities sold by it exceeds the amount of any damages which such Initial Purchaser or such Holder have otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     No Person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any Person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
     For purposes of this Section 4, each Person, if any, who controls any of the Initial Purchasers or any Holder within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Initial Purchaser or Holder, and each director of the Company, and each Person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The obligations of the Company, the Initial Purchasers and the Holders pursuant to this Section 4 shall be in addition to any liability that such party may otherwise have.
     5. .
Miscellaneous
     5.1 . For so long as the Company is subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act, the Company covenants that it will file the reports required to be filed by it under Section 13 of 15(d) of the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations adopted by the SEC thereunder. If the Company ceases to be so required to file such reports, the Company covenants that it will upon the request of any Holder of Registrable Securities (a) make publicly available such information as is necessary to permit sales pursuant to Rule 144 under the 1933 Act, (b) deliver such information to a prospective purchaser as is necessary to permit sales pursuant to Rule 144A under the 1933 Act and it will take such further action as any Holder of Registrable Securities may reasonably request for such purpose, and (c) take such further action that is reasonable in the circumstances, in each case, to the extent required from time to time to enable such Holder to sell its Registrable Securities without registration under the 1933 Act within the limitation of the exemptions provided by (i) Rule 144 under the 1933 Act, as such Rule may be amended from time to time, (ii) Rule 144A under the 1933 Act, as such Rule may be amended from time to time, or (iii) any similar rules or regulations hereafter adopted by the SEC. Upon the request of any Holder of Registrable Securities, the Company will deliver to such Holder a written statement as to whether it has complied with such requirements.
Rule 144 and Rule 144A
 
     5.2 . The Company has not entered into and the Company shall not, after the date of this Agreement, enter into any agreement which is inconsistent with the rights granted to the Holders of Registrable Securities in this Agreement or otherwise conflicts with the provisions hereof. The rights granted to the Holders hereunder do not and will not for the term of this Agreement in any way conflict with the rights granted to the holders of any of the Company's other issued and outstanding securities under any such agreements.
No Inconsistent Agreements
     5.3 . Subject to the rights of the Company to invoke and maintain a Suspension Period, the Company shall not, directly or indirectly, intentionally take any action with respect to the Registrable Securities as a class that would adversely affect the ability of the Holders of Registrable Securities to include such Registrable Securities in a registration undertaken pursuant to this Agreement.
No Adverse Actions Affecting Registration Rights
     5.4 . The provisions of this Agreement, including the provisions of this sentence, may not be amended, modified or supplemented, and waivers or consents to departures from the provisions hereof may not be given unless the Company has obtained the written consent of the Majority Holders of the Registrable Securities affected by such amendment, modification, supplement, waiver or departure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Agreement may be amended by a written agreement between the Company and the Initial Purchasers, without the consent of the Holders of the Registrable Securities, in order to cure any ambiguity or to correct or supplement any provision contained herein, provided that no such amendment shall adversely affect the interest of the Holders of Registrable Securities. Each Holder of Registrable Securities outstanding at the time of any amendment, modification, waiver or consent pursuant to this Section 5.4, shall be bound by such amendment, modification, waiver or consent, whether or not any notice or writing indicating such amendment, modification, waiver or consent is delivered to such Holder.
Amendments and Waivers
     5.5 . All notices and other communications provided for or permitted hereunder shall be made in writing by hand delivery, registered first-class mail, facsimile, or any courier guaranteeing overnight delivery (a) if to a Holder, at the most current address given by such Holder to the Company in a Questionnaire or by means of a notice given in accordance with the provisions of this Section 5.5, which address initially is the address set forth in the Purchase Agreement with respect to the Initial Purchasers; and (b) if to the Company, initially at the Company's address set forth in the Purchase Agreement, and thereafter at such other address of which notice is given in accordance with the provisions of this Section 5.5.
Notices
     All such notices and communications shall be deemed to have been duly given: at the time delivered by hand, if personally delivered; two business days after being deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, if mailed; when receipt is acknowledged, if sent by facsimile; and on the next business day if timely delivered to an overnight courier.
     Copies of all such notices, demands, or other communications shall be concurrently delivered by the person giving the same to the Trustee under the Indenture, at the address specified in the Indenture.
 
     5.6 . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the successors, assigns and transferees of each of the parties, including, without limitation and without the need for an express assignment, subsequent Holders; , that nothing herein shall be deemed to permit any assignment, transfer or other disposition of Registrable Securities in violation of the terms of the Purchase Agreement or the Indenture. If any transferee of any Holder shall acquire Registrable Securities, in any manner, whether by operation of law or otherwise, such Registrable Securities shall be held subject to all of the terms of this Agreement, and by taking and holding such Registrable Securities such person shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to perform all of the terms and provisions of this Agreement, including the restrictions on resale set forth in this Agreement and, if applicable, the Purchase Agreement, and such person shall be entitled to receive the benefits hereof. The Initial Purchasers (in their capacity as Initial Purchasers) shall have no liability or obligation to the Company with respect to any failure by a Holder, other than the Initial Purchasers, to comply with, or breach by any Holder, other than the Initial Purchasers, of, any of the obligations of such Holder under this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns
provided
     5.7 . The Initial Purchasers (even if the Initial Purchasers are not Holders of Registrable Securities) shall be a third party beneficiary to the agreements made hereunder between the Company, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, and shall have the right to enforce such agreements directly to the extent it deems such enforcement necessary or advisable to protect its rights or the rights of Holders hereunder. Each Holder of Registrable Securities shall be a third party beneficiary to the agreements made hereunder between the Company, on the one hand, and the Initial Purchaser, on the other hand, and shall have the right to enforce such agreements directly to the extent it deems such enforcement necessary or advisable to protect its rights hereunder.
Third Party Beneficiaries
     5.8 . Without limiting the remedies available to the Initial Purchasers and the Holders, the Company acknowledges that any failure by the Company to comply with its obligations under Section 2.1 may result in material irreparable injury to the Initial Purchasers or the Holders for which there is no adequate remedy at law, that it may not be possible to measure damages for such injuries precisely and that, in the event of any such failure, the Initial Purchasers or any Holder may seek such relief as may be required to specifically enforce the Company's obligations under Section 2.1 hereof.
Specific Enforcement
     5.9 . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by the parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
     5.10 . The headings in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not limit or otherwise affect the meaning hereof.
Headings
     5.11
GOVERNING LAW
. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
     5.12 . In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained herein, or the application thereof in any circumstance, is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of any such provision in every other respect and of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not be affected or impaired thereby.
Severability
     5.13 . This Agreement is intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement and intended to be a complete and exclusive statement of the agreement and understanding of the parties hereto in respect of the subject matter contained herein. There are no restrictions, promises, warranties or undertakings, other than those set forth or referred to herein with respect to the registration rights granted by the Company with respect to the Registrable Securities. This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between the parties with respect to such subject matter.
Entire Agreement
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.

 
Exhibit 10.1
 
 
Dated: February 12, 2007
 
 
 
February 12, 2007
MERRILL LYNCH & CO. Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith                 Incorporated Banc of America Securities LLC J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. Wachovia Capital Markets, LLC c/o Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith                Incorporated 4 World Financial Center New York, New York 10080
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), confirms its agreement with Merrill Lynch & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("Merrill Lynch") and each of the other Initial Purchasers named in Schedule A hereto (collectively, the "Initial Purchasers," which term shall also include any initial purchaser substituted as provided in Section 11 hereof), for whom Merrill Lynch is acting as representative, with respect to (i) the issue and sale by the Company and the purchase by the Initial Purchasers, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective principal amounts set forth in said Schedule A of $275,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Senior Convertible Notes due 2013 (the "Initial Securities") and (ii) the grant by the Company to the Initial Purchasers of the option described in Section 2(b) hereof to purchase all or any part of an additional $25,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Senior Convertible Notes due 2013 to cover overallotments, if any (the "Option Securities" and, together with the Initial Securities, the "Securities"). The Securities are to be issued pursuant to an indenture to be dated as of February 16, 2007 (the "Indenture") between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as trustee (the "Trustee").
     The Securities are convertible, subject to certain conditions as described in the Final Offering Memorandum (as described below), prior to maturity (unless previously redeemed or otherwise purchased) into cash and shares of common stock, par value $1.00 per share, of the Company (the "Common Stock") in accordance with the terms of the Securities and the Indenture, at the initial conversion rate of 15.7530 shares of Common Stock per $1,000 principal amount of Securities. Securities issued in book-entry form will be issued to Cede & Co. as nominee of The Depository Trust Company ("DTC").
 
     The Company understands that the Initial Purchasers propose to make an offering of the Securities on the terms and in the manner set forth herein and agrees that the Initial Purchasers may resell, subject to the conditions set forth herein, all or a portion of the Securities to purchasers ("Subsequent Purchasers") at any time after this Agreement has been executed and delivered. The Securities are to be offered and resold through the Initial Purchasers without being registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "1933 Act"), in reliance upon exemptions therefrom. Pursuant to the terms of the Securities and the Indenture, investors that acquire Securities and any shares of Common Stock acquired in connection with any conversion of Securities (solely for purposes of this paragraph, "Securities") may only resell or otherwise transfer such Securities if such Securities are hereafter registered under the 1933 Act or if an exemption from the registration requirements of the 1933 Act is available (including the exemption afforded by Rule 144A ("Rule 144A") of the rules and regulations promulgated under the 1933 Act by the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission"). On or prior to the Initial Closing Time, the Company will enter into a registration rights agreement with the Initial Purchasers (the "Registration Rights Agreement") pursuant to which the Company will be required to file and use reasonable best efforts to cause to become effective a registration statement under the 1933 Act to register resales of the Securities.
     The Company has (a) prepared and delivered to each Initial Purchaser copies of (i) a preliminary offering memorandum dated February 12, 2007 and (ii) a pricing term sheet dated February 12, 2007, attached hereto as Schedule B, which includes the pricing terms and other information with respect to the Securities and other matters not included in the Preliminary Offering Memorandum (as defined below) (the "Pricing Term Sheet") and (b) has prepared and will deliver to each Initial Purchaser, as promptly as practicable prior to the Initial Closing Time, copies of a final offering memorandum dated February 12, 2007 (the "Final Offering Memorandum"), each for use by such Initial Purchaser in connection with its solicitation of purchases of, or offering of, the Securities. "Offering Memorandum" means, with respect to any date or time referred to in this Agreement, the most recent offering memorandum (whether the Preliminary Offering Memorandum or the Final Offering Memorandum, or any amendment or supplement to either such document), including exhibits thereto and any documents incorporated therein by reference, which has been prepared and delivered by the Company to the Initial Purchasers in connection with their solicitation of purchases of, or offering of, the Securities.
     All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included," "stated" or described in the Offering Memorandum (or other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which are incorporated by reference in the Offering Memorandum; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Offering Memorandum shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), that is incorporated by reference in the Offering Memorandum.
     The preliminary offering memorandum dated February 12, 2007, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time (as defined below), including any documents filed under the 1934 Act prior to the Applicable Time and incorporated by reference therein, is referred to herein as the "Preliminary Offering Memorandum," and the Preliminary Offering Memorandum together with the Pricing Term Sheet are collectively referred to herein as the "Disclosure Package." "Applicable Time" means 5:00 P.M. (Eastern Time) on February 12, 2007 or such other time as agreed by the Company and Merrill Lynch.
 
     SECTION 1. .
Representations and Warranties by the Company
     (a) . The Company represents and warrants to each Initial Purchaser as of the Applicable Time and as of the Closing Time referred to in Section 2(c) hereof, and agrees with each Initial Purchaser, as follows:
Representations and Warranties
     (i) . As of the Applicable Time, neither (x) the Disclosure Package nor (y) any individual Supplemental Offering Materials (as defined below), when considered together with the Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Disclosure Package and Final Offering Memorandum
     "Supplemental Offering Materials" means any "written communication" (within the meaning of the 1933 Act Regulations (as defined below)) prepared by or on behalf of the Company, or used or referred to by the Company, that constitutes an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the Securities other than the Offering Memorandum or amendments or supplements thereto (including the Pricing Term Sheet), including, without limitation, any road show materials relating to the Securities that constitutes such a written communication.
     As of its issue date and as of the Closing Time, the Final Offering Memorandum will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
     The representation and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to statements in or omissions from the Disclosure Package or the Final Offering Memorandum made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Initial Purchaser through Merrill Lynch expressly for use therein. The Company has not distributed, and the Company will not distribute, prior to the later of the Closing Time and the completion of the Initial Purchasers' distribution of the Securities, which shall be deemed to be no later than the Closing Time unless the Company otherwise receives notice from Merrill Lynch, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Securities other than the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum.
     (ii) . The Offering Memorandum as delivered from time to time shall incorporate by reference the most recent Annual Report of the Company on Form 10-K filed with the Commission and each Quarterly Report of the Company on Form 10-Q and each Current Report of the Company on Form 8-K filed with the Commission since the end of the fiscal year to which such Annual Report relates. The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Offering Memorandum at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "1934 Act Regulations"), and, when read together, at the Applicable Time with the other information in the Disclosure Package, and at the Closing Time with the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum, did not and will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
Incorporated Documents
     (iii) . The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum are independent registered public accountants with respect to the Company and its
Independent Accountants
 
subsidiaries within the meaning of the 1933 Act and the rules and regulations thereunder (the "1933 Act Regulations").
     (iv) . The financial statements, together with the related schedules and notes, included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum present fairly the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries at the dates indicated and the statement of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries for the periods specified; said financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved, except as stated therein. The supporting schedules included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum present fairly in accordance with GAAP the information required to be stated therein. The selected financial data and any summary financial information included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum present fairly the information shown therein and have been compiled on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum.
Financial Statements
     (v) . Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum, except as otherwise stated therein, (A) there has been no material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business (a "Material Adverse Effect"), (B) there have been no transactions entered into by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, other than those in the ordinary course of business, which are material with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, and (C) there has been no dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made by the Company on any class of its capital stock.
No Material Adverse Change in Business
     (vi) . The Company has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum and to enter into and perform its obligations under, or as contemplated by, this Agreement. The Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each other jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure so to qualify or to be in good standing would not result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Good Standing of the Company
     (vii) . Each "significant subsidiary" of the Company (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X) (each a "Designated Subsidiary" and, collectively, the "Designated Subsidiaries") has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure so to qualify or to be in good standing would not result in a Material Adverse Effect; except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum, all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Designated Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable and is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any
Good Standing of Subsidiaries
 
security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity; none of the outstanding shares of capital stock of any Designated Subsidiary was issued in violation of any preemptive or similar rights of any securityholder of such Designated Subsidiary. The other subsidiaries of the Company other than Designated Subsidiaries, considered in the aggregate as a single subsidiary, do not constitute a "significant subsidiary" as defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X.
     (viii) . The authorized, issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company is as set forth in the financial statements, including the schedules and notes, included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum (except for subsequent issuances, if any, pursuant to this Agreement, pursuant to reservations, agreements, employee benefit plans referred to in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum or pursuant to the exercise of convertible securities or options referred to in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum). The             shares of issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; none of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company was issued in violation of the preemptive or other similar rights of any securityholder of the Company.
Capitalization
     (ix) . The Company has full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, the Securities, the Indenture, the Registration Rights Agreement, the OTC Convertible Note Hedge and the OTC Warrant Transaction (collectively, the "Transaction Documents") and to perform its obligations hereunder and thereunder; and all action required to be taken for the due and proper authorization, execution and delivery of each of the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby has been duly and validly taken.
Corporate Power
     (x) . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
Authorization of Agreement
     (xi) . The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and, when executed and delivered by the Company and the Trustee, will constitute a valid and binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law). The Indenture will conform in all material respects to the statements relating thereto contained in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum.
Authorization and Description of the Indenture
     (xii) . The Registration Rights Agreement has been duly authorized by the Company and, when duly executed and delivered by the Company and the Initial Purchasers, will constitute a valid and binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally, by general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law) and by public policy limitations affecting the enforceability of indemnification or contribution rights in connection with securities transactions, to the extent applicable. The Registration Rights Agreement will conform in all material respects to the statements relating thereto contained in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum.
Authorization and Description of the Registration Rights Agreement
 
     (xiii) . The Securities have been duly authorized and, at the Closing Time, will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor as provided in this Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers) reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), and will be in the form contemplated by, and entitled to the benefits of, the Indenture. The Securities will conform in all material respects to the statements relating thereto contained in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum.
Authorization and Description of the Securities
     (xiv) . The Common Stock conforms to all statements relating thereto included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum and such description conforms to the rights set forth in the instruments defining the same. Upon issuance and delivery of the Securities in accordance with this Agreement and the Indenture, the Securities will be convertible at the option of the holder thereof and the Company will have the option to pay a portion of the conversion value in shares of Common Stock in accordance with the terms of the Securities and the Indenture; the shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Securities have been duly authorized and reserved for issuance upon such conversion by all necessary corporate action and such shares, when issued upon such conversion, will be validly issued and will be fully paid and non-assessable; no holder of such shares will be subject to personal liability by reason of being such a holder; and the issuance of such shares upon such conversion will not be subject to the preemptive or other similar rights of any securityholder of the Company.
Authorization and Description of Common Stock
     (xv) . Neither the Company nor any of the Designated Subsidiaries is in violation of its charter or by-laws or in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan or credit agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of its Designated Subsidiaries is subject (collectively, "Agreements and Instruments") except for such defaults that would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect; and the execution, delivery and performance of the Transaction Documents and any other agreement or instrument entered into or issued or to be entered into or issued by the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby or in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum (including the issuance and sale of the Securities and the use of the proceeds from the sale of the Securities as described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum under the caption "Use of Proceeds" and the issuance of the shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Securities) and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder do not and will not, whether with or without the giving of notice or passage of time or both, conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default or Repayment Event (as defined below) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Designated Subsidiaries pursuant to, the Agreements and Instruments (except for such conflicts, breaches or defaults or liens, charges or encumbrances that would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect), nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions
Absence of Defaults and Conflicts
 
of the charter or by-laws of the Company or any of the Designated Subsidiaries or any applicable law, statute, rule, regulation, judgment, order, writ or decree of any government, government instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of their assets, properties or operations. As used herein, a "Repayment Event" means any event or condition which gives the holder of any note, debenture or other evidence of indebtedness (or any person acting on such holder's behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a portion of such indebtedness by the Company or any of the Designated Subsidiaries.
     (xvi) . No labor dispute with the employees of the Company or any of its subsidiaries exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent.
Absence of Labor Dispute
     (xvii) . There is no action, suit, proceeding, inquiry or investigation before or brought by any court or governmental agency or body, domestic or foreign, now pending, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, against or affecting the Company or any of its subsidiaries which is required to be disclosed in the Disclosure Package or the Final Offering Memorandum (other than as disclosed therein), or which might reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, or which might reasonably be expected to materially and adversely affect the properties or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder. The aggregate of all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or of which any of their respective property or assets is the subject which are not described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Absence of Proceedings
     (xviii) . All of the descriptions of contracts or other documents included in the Disclosure Package or the Final Offering Memorandum are accurate and complete descriptions of such contracts or other documents. There are no contracts or documents which are required to be described in the documents incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package or Final Offering Memorandum or to be filed as exhibits thereto which have not been so described and filed as required.
Accuracy of Exhibits
     (xix) . The Company and its subsidiaries own or possess, or can acquire on reasonable terms, adequate patents, patent rights, licenses, inventions, copyrights, know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), trademarks, service marks, trade names or other intellectual property (collectively, "Intellectual Property") necessary to carry on the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any Intellectual Property or of any facts or circumstances which would render any Intellectual Property invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Company or any of its subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Possession of Intellectual Property
     (xx) . No filing with, or authorization, approval, consent, license, order, registration, qualification or decree of, any court or governmental authority or agency is necessary or required for the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Transaction Documents, in connection with the offering, issuance or sale of the Securities hereunder, the issuance of shares of Common Stock upon conversion of Securities
Absence of Further Requirements
 
or the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents or for the due execution, delivery or performance of the Transaction Documents by the Company, except (A) such as have been already obtained, (B) as may be required under 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations in connection with the transactions contemplated by the Registration Rights Agreement or state securities laws and (C) for the qualification of the Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "1939 Act").
     (xxi) . The Company and the Designated Subsidiaries possess such permits, licenses, approvals, consents and other authorizations (collectively, "Governmental Licenses") issued by the appropriate federal, state, local or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them; the Company and the Designated Subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms and conditions of all such Governmental Licenses, except where the failure so to comply would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect; all of the Governmental Licenses are valid and in full force and effect, except where the invalidity of such Governmental Licenses or the failure of such Governmental Licenses to be in full force and effect would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and neither the Company nor any of the Designated Subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such Governmental Licenses which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Possession of Licenses and Permits
     (xxii) . The Company and its subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real property owned by the Company and its subsidiaries and good title to all other properties owned by them, in each case, free and clear of all mortgages, pledges, liens, security interests, claims, restrictions or encumbrances of any kind except such as (a) are described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum or (b) do not, singly or in the aggregate, materially affect the value of such property and do not interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Company or any of its subsidiaries; and all of the leases and subleases of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, and under which the Company or any of its subsidiaries holds properties described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum, are in full force and effect, and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has any notice of any claim of any sort that has been asserted by anyone adverse to the rights of the Company or any of its subsidiaries under any of the leases or subleases mentioned above, or affecting or questioning the rights of the Company or any such subsidiary to the continued possession of the leased or subleased premises under any such lease or sublease, except where the failure of a lease or sublease to be in full force and effect or the existence of any such claim would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Title to Property
     (xxiii) . Except as described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum and except such matters as would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Effect, (A) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law or any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof, including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, hazardous substances, petroleum or petroleum products (collectively, "Hazardous Materials") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, "Environmental Laws"), (B) the Company and its subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations
Environmental Laws
 
and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (C) there are no pending or threatened administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Company or any of its subsidiaries and (D) there are no events or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to form the basis of an order for clean-up or remediation, or an action, suit or proceeding by any private party or governmental body or agency, against or affecting the Company or any of its subsidiaries relating to Hazardous Materials or Environmental Laws or the violation of any Environmental Laws.
     (xxiv) . The Company and each of its subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain accountability for assets; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Except as described in the Disclosure Package and Final Offering Memorandum, since the end of the Company's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (1) no material weakness in the Company's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (2) no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting. The Company and its consolidated subsidiaries employ disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the 1934 Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, and is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer or officers and principal financial officer or officers, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding disclosure.
Accounting Controls and Disclosure Controls
     (xxv) There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply in all material respects with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act"), including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
     (xxvi) . Any statistical and market-related data included in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum are based on or derived from sources that the Company believes to be reliable and accurate in all material respects or represent the Company's good faith estimates that are made on the basis of data derived from such sources.
Statistical and Market-Related Data
     (xxvii) . The Company is not required, and upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated and the application of the net proceeds therefrom as described in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum will not be required, to register as an "investment company" under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "1940 Act").
Investment Company Act
     (xxviii) . Neither the Company nor any of its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the 1933 Act (each, an "Affiliate"), has, directly or indirectly,
Similar Offerings
 
solicited any offer to buy, sold or offered to sell or otherwise negotiated in respect of, or will solicit any offer to buy, sell or offer to sell or otherwise negotiate in respect of, in the United States or to any United States citizen or resident, any security which is or would be integrated with the sale of the Securities in a manner that would require the offered Securities to be registered under the 1933 Act.
     (xxix) . The Securities are eligible for resale pursuant to Rule 144A and will not be, at the Closing Time, of the same class as securities listed on a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the 1934 Act, or quoted in a U.S. automated interdealer quotation system.
Rule 144A Eligibility
     (xxx) . None of the Company, its Affiliates or any person acting on its or any of their behalf (other than the Initial Purchasers and their Affiliates, as to whom the Company makes no representation) has engaged or will engage, in connection with the offering of the Securities, in any form of general solicitation or general advertising within the meaning of Rule 502(c) under the 1933 Act.
No General Solicitation
     (xxxi) . Subject to compliance by the Initial Purchasers with their representations and warranties set forth in Section 6 hereof and the procedures set forth in Section 6 hereof, the compliance of the Initial Purchasers with the offering and transfer procedures and restrictions described in the Disclosure Package and Final Offering Memorandum and the accuracy of the representations and warranties made in accordance with this Agreement and the Final Offering Memorandum by purchasers to whom the Initial Purchasers initially resell Securities, it is not necessary in connection with the offer, sale and delivery of the Securities to the Initial Purchasers and to each Subsequent Purchaser in the manner contemplated by this Agreement and the Final Offering Memorandum to register the Securities under the 1933 Act or to qualify the Indenture under the 1939 Act.
No Registration Required
     (xxxii) . Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, Affiliate or other person acting on behalf of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is aware of or has taken any action, directly or indirectly, that would result in a violation by such persons of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (the "FCPA"), including, without limitation, making use of the mails or any means or instrumentality of interstate commerce corruptly in furtherance of an offer, payment, promise to pay or authorization of the payment of any money, or other property, gift, promise to give, or authorization of the giving of anything of value to any "foreign official" (as such term is defined in the FCPA) or any foreign political party or official thereof or any candidate for foreign political office, in contravention of the FCPA and the Company and, to the knowledge of the Company, its Affiliates have conducted their businesses in compliance with the FCPA and have instituted and maintain policies and procedures designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance therewith.
Foreign Corrupt Practices Act
     (xxxiii) . The operations of the Company are and have been conducted at all times materially in compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency (collectively, the "Money Laundering Laws") and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator
Money Laundering Laws
 
involving the Company with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, threatened.
     (xxxiv) . Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, Affiliate or person acting on behalf of the Company is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Treasury Department ("OFAC"); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
OFAC
     (b) . Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company or any of its subsidiaries delivered to Merrill Lynch or to counsel for the Initial Purchasers shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Initial Purchaser as to the matters covered thereby.
Officer's Certificates
     SECTION 2. .
Sale and Delivery to Initial Purchasers; Closing
     (a) . On the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to each Initial Purchaser, severally and not jointly, and each Initial Purchaser, severally and not jointly, agrees to purchase from the Company, the aggregate principal amount of Initial Securities set forth in Schedule A hereto opposite the name of such Initial Purchaser, at a price of 97.75% of the principal amount thereof, plus any additional principal amount of Securities which such Initial Purchaser may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 11 hereof.
Initial Securities
     (b) In addition, on the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company hereby grants an option to the Initial Purchasers to purchase up to an additional $25,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Option Securities at the same purchase price as the Initial Purchasers paid for the Initial Securities, plus accrued and unpaid interest from the Initial Closing Time to, but excluding, the Option Closing Time. The option hereby granted will expire 13 days after the Initial Closing Time and may be exercised at any time, in whole or in part, for the purpose of covering overallotments, if any, made in connection with the offering and distribution of the Initial Securities upon notice by Merrill Lynch to the Company setting forth the number of Option Securities as to which the Initial Purchasers are then exercising the option and the time and date of payment and delivery for such Option Securities. Any such time and date of delivery (the "Option Closing Time") shall be determined by the Company and Merrill Lynch, but shall not be later than seven full business days after the exercise of said option, nor in any event prior to the Initial Closing Time, as hereinafter defined.
Option Securities.
     (c) . Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, the Initial Securities shall be made at the offices of Sidley Austin LLP, One South Dearborn Street, Chicago, Illinois 60603, or at such other place as shall be agreed upon by Merrill Lynch and the Company, at 9:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the third (fourth, if the pricing occurs after 4:30 P.M. (Eastern time) on any given day) business day after the date hereof (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 11), or such other time not later than ten business days after such date as shall be agreed upon by Merrill Lynch and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called "Initial Closing Time" and the Initial Closing Time and the Option Closing Time each being the applicable "Closing Time").
Payment
     In addition, in the event that any or all of the Option Securities are purchased by the Initial Purchasers, payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, such Option Securities shall be made at the above-mentioned offices, or at such other place as shall be agreed upon by Merrill
 
Lynch and the Company, on the Option Closing Time as specified in the notice from Merrill Lynch to the Company.
     Payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds to a bank account designated by the Company, against delivery to Merrill Lynch for the respective accounts of the Initial Purchasers of certificates for the Securities to be purchased by them. It is understood that each Initial Purchaser has authorized Merrill Lynch, for its account, to accept delivery of, receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Securities which it has agreed to purchase. Merrill Lynch, individually and not as representative of the Initial Purchasers, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment of the purchase price for the Securities to be purchased by any Initial Purchaser whose funds have not been received by the Closing Time, but such payment shall not relieve such Initial Purchaser from its obligations hereunder.
     (d) . Certificates for the Securities shall be in such denominations ($1,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof) and registered in such names as Merrill Lynch may request in writing at least one full business day before Closing Time. The certificates representing the Securities shall be made available for examination and packaging by the Initial Purchasers in The City of New York not later than 10:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the last business day prior to Closing Time.
Denominations; Registration
     SECTION 3. . The Company covenants with each Initial Purchaser as follows:
Covenants of the Company
     (a) . The Company, as promptly as possible, will furnish to each Initial Purchaser, without charge, such number of copies of the Offering Memorandum and any amendments and supplements thereto and documents incorporated by reference therein as such Initial Purchaser may reasonably request.
Delivery of Offering Memorandum
     (b) . The Company will immediately notify each Initial Purchaser, and confirm such notice in writing, of (x) any filing made by the Company of information relating to the offering of the Securities with any securities exchange or any other regulatory body in the United States or any other jurisdiction, and (y) prior to the completion of the placement of the Securities by the Initial Purchasers as evidenced by a notice from the Initial Purchasers to the Company, any material changes in or affecting the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, which (i) make any statement in the Disclosure Package, any Offering Memorandum or any Supplemental Offering Material false or misleading in any material respect or (ii) if not disclosed in the Disclosure Package or the Offering Memorandum, would constitute a material omission therefrom. In such event or if during such time any event shall occur as a result of which it is necessary, in the reasonable opinion of any of the Company, its counsel, the Initial Purchasers or counsel for the Initial Purchasers, to amend or supplement the Offering Memorandum in order that the Offering Memorandum not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances then existing, the Company will forthwith amend or supplement the Offering Memorandum by preparing and furnishing to each Initial Purchaser an amendment or amendments of, or a supplement or supplements to, the Offering Memorandum (in form and substance satisfactory in the reasonable opinion of counsel for the Initial Purchasers) so that, as so amended or supplemented, the Offering Memorandum will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a Subsequent Purchaser, not misleading.
Notice and Effect of Material Events
     (c) . The Company will advise each Initial Purchaser promptly
Amendment and Supplements to the Offering Memorandum; Preparation of Pricing Supplement; Supplemental Offering Materials
 
of any proposal to amend or supplement the Offering Memorandum, will furnish each Initial Purchaser with copies of such amendment or supplement a reasonable amount of time prior thereto and will not effect such amendment or supplement to which the Initial Purchasers shall reasonably object. Neither the consent of the Initial Purchasers, nor the Initial Purchasers' delivery of any such amendment or supplement, shall constitute a waiver of any of the conditions set forth in Section 5 hereof. The Company will prepare the Pricing Term Sheet, in form and substance satisfactory to Merrill Lynch, and shall furnish as soon as practicable but no later than 4 hours prior to the Applicable Time to each Initial Purchaser, without charge, as many copies of the Pricing Term Sheet as such Initial Purchaser may reasonably request. The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of Merrill Lynch, and each Initial Purchaser agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of the Company and Merrill Lynch, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities by means of any Supplemental Offering Materials; , , that prior to the preparation of the Pricing Term Sheet, the Initial Purchasers are authorized to use the information with respect to the final terms of the Securities in communications conveying information relating to the offering to investors.
provided
however
     (d) . The Company will use its best efforts, in cooperation with the Initial Purchasers, to qualify the Securities and the shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states as the Initial Purchasers may designate; , , that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. In each jurisdiction in which the Securities or such shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Securities have been so qualified, the Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of such jurisdiction to continue such qualification in effect for so long as may be required in connection with the distribution of the Securities.
Qualification of Securities for Offer and Sale
provided
however
     (e) The Company will use its best efforts to cause all shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Securities to be listed on the New York Stock Exchange.
Listing of Common Stock.
     (f) . The Company will cooperate with the Initial Purchasers and use its best efforts to permit the offered Securities to be eligible for clearance and settlement through the facilities of DTC.
DTC
     (g) . The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities in the manner specified in the Offering Memorandum under "Use of Proceeds".
Use of Proceeds
     (h) . Except as otherwise contemplated by the Offering Memorandum or the Transaction Documents, during a period of 90 days from the date of the Final Offering Memorandum (the "Lock-up Period"), the Company will not, without the prior written consent of Merrill Lynch, (i) offer, pledge, sell, announce the intention to sell, contract to sell, sell any option or contract to purchase, purchase any option or contract to sell, grant any option, right or warrant for the sale of, lend or otherwise transfer or dispose of any shares of Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for or repayable with Common Stock, or file any registration statement under the 1933 Act with respect to any of the foregoing or (ii) enter into any swap or other agreement or any transaction that transfers, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the economic consequences of ownership of the Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for or repayable with Common Stock, whether any such swap or transaction described in clause (i) above or this clause (ii) is to be settled by delivery of Common Stock or such other securities, in cash or otherwise. The foregoing sentence shall not apply to (A) shares of Common Stock to be issued upon conversion of the Securities, (B) shares of Common Stock to be issued upon conversion of the Company's outstanding zero coupon convertible notes due 2033, (C) the OTC Convertible Note Hedge and the OTC Warrant
Restriction on Sale of Securities
 
Transaction and any transactions in the Company's securities contemplated thereby, (D) the Company's issuance of stock options and stock units to the Company's directors and employees pursuant to any existing employee benefit plans or director compensation plans of the Company, (E) the Company's issuance of shares of Common Stock to directors and employees of the Company upon the exercise of options outstanding on the date hereof or the conversion of stock units outstanding on the date hereof under existing employee benefit plans or director compensation plans of the Company, (F) securities issued or to be issued by the Company in connection with a merger, acquisition or other business combination, provided that the recipients of such securities shall enter into lock-up agreements for the balance of the Lock-up Period, (G) the filing of a registration statement on Form S-8 to register shares of Common Stock to be issued under any existing employee benefit plans or director compensation plans of the Company or (H) the filing of a registration statement on From S-4 to register shares of Common Stock.
     (i) . The Company will use its best efforts to permit the Securities to be designated PORTAL securities in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. ("NASD") relating to trading in the PORTAL Market.
PORTAL Designation
     (j) . Until the offering of the Securities is complete, the Company will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
Reporting Requirements
     (k) . The Company shall reserve and keep available at all times, free of preemptive rights, shares of Common Stock for the purpose of enabling the Company to satisfy any obligations to issue shares of Common Stock upon conversion of the Securities.
Reservation of Shares of Common Stock
     (l) The Company agrees that it will comply with all the terms and conditions of the Registration Rights Agreement and at the time of any registration of the Securities pursuant to the Registration Rights Agreement it will cause the Indenture to be qualified under the 1939 Act.
Trust Indenture Act.
     SECTION 4. .
Payment of Expenses
     (a) . The Company will pay all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (i) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Initial Purchasers of the Disclosure Package or any Offering Memorandum (including financial statements and any schedules or exhibits and any document incorporated therein by reference) and of each amendment or supplement thereto or of any Supplemental Offering Material, (ii) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Initial Purchasers of this Agreement, any Agreement among the Initial Purchasers, the Indenture and such other documents as may be required in connection with the offering, purchase, sale, issuance or delivery of the Securities, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the certificates for the Securities to the Initial Purchasers, including any transfer taxes, any stamp or other duties payable upon the sale, issuance and delivery of the Securities to the Initial Purchasers and any charges of DTC in connection therewith, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel, accountants and other advisors, (v) the qualification of the Securities and the shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Securities under securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(d) hereof, including filing fees and the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Initial Purchasers in connection therewith and in connection with the preparation of the Blue Sky Survey, (vi) the fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee in connection with the Indenture and the Securities, (vii) the costs and expenses of the Company relating to investor presentations on any "road show" undertaken in connection with the marketing of the Securities, if any, including, without limitation, expenses associated with the production of road show slides and graphics, fees and expenses of any consultants engaged in
Expenses
 
connection with the road show presentations and travel and lodging expenses of the representatives and officers of the Company and any such consultants, (viii) any fees payable in connection with the rating of the Securities and any fees and expenses payable in connection with the initial and continued designation of the Securities as PORTAL securities under the PORTAL Market Rules pursuant to NASD Rule 5322, (ix) any fees of the NASD and (x) any fees and expenses payable in connection with the initial and continued listing of the Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Securities on the New York Stock Exchange.
     (b) . If this Agreement is terminated by Merrill Lynch in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or Section 10(a)(i) hereof, the Company shall reimburse the Initial Purchasers for all of their out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Initial Purchasers.
Termination of Agreement
     SECTION 5. . The obligations of the several Initial Purchasers hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof or in certificates of any officer of the Company or any of its subsidiaries delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its covenants and other obligations hereunder, and to the following further conditions:
Conditions of Initial Purchasers' Obligations
     (a) . At the Closing Time, Merrill Lynch shall have received the favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of (i) Schiff Hardin LLP, counsel for the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Initial Purchasers, to the effect set forth in Exhibit A-1 hereto and to such further effect as counsel to the Initial Purchasers may reasonably request, and (ii) John A. Dul, Vice President  General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Initial Purchasers, to the effect set forth in Exhibit A-2 hereto and to such further effect as counsel to the Initial Purchasers may reasonably request.
Opinion of Counsel for Company
     (b) . At the Closing Time, Merrill Lynch shall have received the favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Initial Purchasers. In giving such opinion such counsel may rely, as to all matters governed by the laws of jurisdictions other than the law of the State of New York, the federal law of the United States and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, upon the opinions of counsel satisfactory to Merrill Lynch. Such counsel may also state that, insofar as such opinion involves factual matters, they have relied, to the extent they deem proper, upon certificates of officers of the Company and its subsidiaries and certificates of public officials.
Opinion of Counsel for Initial Purchasers
     (c) . At the Closing Time, there shall not have been, since the date hereof or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Disclosure Package or the Final Offering Memorandum (exclusive of any amendments or supplements thereto subsequent to the date of this Agreement), any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, and Merrill Lynch shall have received a certificate of the President or a Vice President of the Company and of the chief financial or chief accounting officer of the Company, dated as of the Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such material adverse change, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1(a) hereof are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of the Closing Time, and (iii) the Company has complied, in all material respects, with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to Closing Time.
Officers' Certificate
     (d) . At the time of the execution of this Agreement, Merrill Lynch shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP a letter dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory
Accountants' Comfort Letter
 
to the Initial Purchasers, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to the Initial Purchasers with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Disclosure Package and the Final Offering Memorandum.
     (e) . At the Closing Time, Merrill Lynch shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP a letter, dated as of the Closing Time, to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished pursuant to subsection (d) of this Section, except that the specified date referred to shall be a date not more than three business days prior to the Closing Time.
Bring-down Comfort Letter
     (f) . At the Closing Time, the Securities shall have been designated for trading on PORTAL.
PORTAL
     (g) On or prior to the date of this Agreement, Merrill Lynch shall received an agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit C hereto signed by the persons listed in Schedule C hereto.
Lock-up Agreements.
     (h) . At or prior to the Initial Closing Time, each of the Company and the Trustee shall have executed and delivered the Indenture, and the Company and Merrill Lynch shall have executed and delivered the Registration Rights Agreement.
Indenture and Registration Rights Agreement
     (i) . At or prior to the Initial Closing Time, the OTC Convertible Note Hedge and the OTC Warrant Transaction, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Initial Purchasers, shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and be in full force and effect.
Bond Hedge and Warrant Documents
     (j) . In the event that the Initial Purchasers exercise their option provided in Section 2(b) hereof to purchase all or any portion of the Option Securities, the obligation of the Initial Purchasers to purchase such Option Securities is subject to the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein and the statements in any certificates furnished by the Company hereunder being true and correct as of the Option Closing Time and that, at the Option Closing Time, the Initial Purchasers shall have received:
Conditions to Purchase of Option Securities
(i) A certificate, dated the Option Closing Time, of the President or a Vice President of the Company and of the chief financial officer or chief accounting officer of the Company confirming that the certificate delivered at the Initial Closing Time pursuant to Section 5(c) hereof remains true and correct as of the Option Closing Time;
Officers' Certificate
.
(ii) . The favorable opinion of (A) Schiff Hardin LLP, counsel for the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Initial Purchasers, dated as of the Option Closing Time, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on such Option Closing Time and otherwise to the same effect as the opinion required by Section 5(a) hereof and (B) John A. Dul, Vice President  General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Initial Purchasers, dated as of such Option Closing Time, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on such Option Closing Time and otherwise to the same effect as the opinion required by Section 5(a) hereof.
Opinions of Counsel for Company
(iii) . The favorable opinion of Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Initial Purchasers, dated as of the Option Closing Time, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on the Option Closing Time and otherwise to the same effect as the opinion required by Section 5(b) hereof;
Opinion of Counsel for Initial Purchasers
 
(iv) . A letter from Ernst & Young LLP, in form and substance satisfactory to the Initial Purchasers and dated as of the Option Closing Time, substantially in the same form and substance as the letter furnished to Merrill Lynch pursuant to Section 5(d) hereof, except that the "specified date" in the letter furnished pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a date not more than three days prior to the Option Closing Time.
Bring-down Comfort Letter
     (k) . At the Closing Time, counsel for the Initial Purchasers shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions, herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to Merrill Lynch and counsel for the Initial Purchasers.
Additional Documents
     (l) . If any condition specified in this Section shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, this Agreement or, in the case of any condition to the purchase of Option Securities, on an Option Closing Time which is after the Initial Closing Time, the obligations of the Initial Purchasers to purchase the relevant Option Securities, may be terminated by Merrill Lynch by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to Initial Closing Time or Option Closing Time, as the case may be, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that Sections 1, 7, 8 and 9 shall survive any such termination and remain in full force and effect.
Termination of Agreement
     SECTION 6. .
Subsequent Offers and Resales of the Securities
     (a) . Each of the Initial Purchasers and the Company, as the case may be, hereby establish and agree to observe the following procedures in connection with the offer and sale of the Securities:
Offer and Sale Procedures
     (i) . Offers and sales of the Securities shall be made to such persons and in such manner as is contemplated by the Offering Memorandum.
Offers and Sales
     (ii) . No general solicitation or general advertising (within the meaning of Rule 502(c) under the 1933 Act) will be used in the United States in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities.
No General Solicitation
     (iii) . In the case of a non-bank Subsequent Purchaser of a Security acting as a fiduciary for one or more third parties, each third party shall, in the judgment of the applicable Initial Purchaser, be a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of Rule 144A under the 1933 Act (a "Qualified Institutional Buyer").
Purchases by Non-Bank Fiduciaries
     (iv) . Each Initial Purchaser will take reasonable steps to inform, and cause each of its U.S. Affiliates to take reasonable steps to inform, persons acquiring Securities from such Initial Purchaser or its Affiliate, as the case may be, in the United States that the Securities (A) have not been and will not be registered under the 1933 Act, (B) are being sold to them without registration under the 1933 Act in reliance on Rule 144A or in accordance with another exemption from registration under the 1933 Act, as the case may be, and (C) may not be offered, sold or otherwise transferred except (1) to the Company, (2) outside the United States in accordance with Regulation S, or (3) inside the United States in accordance with (x) Rule 144A to a person whom the seller reasonably believes is a Qualified Institutional Buyer
Subsequent Purchaser Notification
 
that is purchasing such Securities for its own account or for the account of a Qualified Institutional Buyer to whom notice is given that the offer, sale or transfer is being made in reliance on Rule 144A or (y) pursuant to another available exemption from registration under the 1933 Act.
     (v) . No sale of the Securities to any one Subsequent Purchaser will be for less than U.S. $1,000 principal amount and no Security will be issued in a smaller principal amount. If the Subsequent Purchaser is a non-bank fiduciary acting on behalf of others, each person for whom it is acting must purchase at least U.S. $1,000 principal amount of the Securities.
Minimum Principal Amount
     (vi) . The transfer restrictions and the other provisions set forth in the Offering Memorandum under the caption "Transfer Restrictions," including the legend required thereby, shall apply to the Securities except as otherwise agreed by the Company and Merrill Lynch. Following the sale of the Securities by the Initial Purchasers to each Subsequent Purchaser pursuant to the terms hereof, the Initial Purchasers shall not be liable or responsible to the Company for any losses, damages or liabilities suffered or incurred by the Company, including any losses, damages or liabilities under the 1933 Act, arising from or relating to any subsequent resale or transfer of any Security.
Transfer Restriction
     (b) . The Company covenants with each Initial Purchaser as follows:
Covenants of the Company
     (i) . The Company agrees that it will not and will cause its Affiliates not to, directly or indirectly, solicit any offer to buy, sell or make any offer or sale of, or otherwise negotiate in respect of, securities of the Company of any class if, as a result of the doctrine of "integration" referred to in Rule 502 under the 1933 Act, such offer or sale would render invalid (for the purpose of (i) the sale of the Securities by the Company to the Initial Purchasers, (ii) the resale of the Securities by the Initial Purchasers to Subsequent Purchasers or (iii) the resale of the Securities by such Subsequent Purchasers to others) the exemption from the registration requirements of the 1933 Act provided by Section 4(2) thereof or by Rule 144A thereunder or otherwise.
Integration
     (ii) . The Company agrees that, in order to render the Securities eligible for resale pursuant to Rule 144A under the 1933 Act, while any of the Securities remain outstanding, it will make available, upon request, to any holder of Securities or prospective purchasers of Securities the information specified in Rule 144A(d)(4), unless the Company furnishes information to the Commission pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act.
Rule 144A Information
     (iii) . Until the expiration of two years after the original issuance of the Securities, the Company will not, and will use its reasonable efforts to cause its Affiliates not to, resell any offered Securities which are "restricted securities" (as such term is defined under Rule 144(a)(3) under the 1933 Act), whether as beneficial owner or otherwise (except as agent acting as a securities broker on behalf of and for the account of customers in the ordinary course of business in unsolicited broker's transactions) that have been reacquired by any of them and shall immediately upon any purchase of any Securities submit such Securities to the Trustee for cancellation.
Restriction on Repurchases
     (iv) . In connection with the original distribution of the Securities, the Company agrees that, prior to any offer or resale of the Securities by the Initial Purchasers, the Initial Purchasers and counsel for the Initial Purchasers shall have the right
Reasonable Inquiries; Information
 
to make reasonable inquiries into the business of the Company and its subsidiaries. The Company also agrees to provide answers to each prospective Subsequent Purchaser of Securities who so requests concerning the Company and its subsidiaries (to the extent such information is available or can be acquired and made available to prospective Subsequent Purchasers without unreasonable effort or expense and to the extent the provision thereof is not prohibited by applicable law) and the terms and conditions of the offering of the Securities, as provided in the Offering Memorandum.
     (c) Each Initial Purchaser severally and not jointly represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the Company that:
Qualification of Initial Purchasers.
     (i) it is a Qualified Institutional Buyer and an "accredited investor" within the meaning of Rule 501(a) under the 1933 Act (an "Accredited Investor") with such knowledge in financial and business matters as are necessary in order to evaluate the merits and risks of an investment in the Securities; and
     (ii) neither it, nor any of its Affiliates, nor any person acting on its behalf, has engaged or will engage, in connection with the offering of the Securities, in any form of general solicitation or general advertising within the meaning of Rule 502(c) under the 1933 Act.
     The Initial Purchasers understand that the Company, and for purposes of the opinions to be delivered to the Initial Purchasers pursuant to Section 5 hereof, counsel to the Company and counsel to the Initial Purchasers will rely upon the accuracy and truth of the foregoing representations, and the Initial Purchasers hereby consent to such reliance.
     SECTION 7. .
Indemnification
     (a) . The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Initial Purchaser, its Affiliates, its selling agents and each person, if any, who controls any Initial Purchaser within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
Indemnification of Initial Purchasers
     (i) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Disclosure Package, the Final Offering Memorandum (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any Supplemental Offering Materials (when taken together with the Disclosure Package), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
     (ii) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; provided that (subject to Section 7(d) below) any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
     (iii) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by Merrill Lynch), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon
 
any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (i) or (ii) above;
     , , that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Initial Purchaser through Merrill Lynch expressly for use in the Disclosure Package, the Final Offering Memorandum (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or in any Supplemental Offering Materials.
provided
however
     (b) . Each Initial Purchaser severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors, its officers and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in subsection (a) of this Section 7, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Disclosure Package, the Final Offering Memorandum or any Supplemental Offering Materials in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Initial Purchaser through Merrill Lynch expressly for use therein.
Indemnification of Company, Directors and Officers
     (c) . Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by Merrill Lynch, and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Company. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action; , , that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section or Section 8 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent (i) includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
Actions against Parties; Notification
provided
however
     (d) . If at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by Section 7(a)(ii) effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request, (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least 30 days prior to such settlement being entered into and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement.
Settlement without Consent if Failure to Reimburse
 
     SECTION 8. . If the indemnification provided for in Section 7 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Initial Purchasers on the other hand from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and of the Initial Purchasers on the other hand in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
Contribution
     The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Initial Purchasers on the other hand in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Initial Purchasers bear to the aggregate initial offering price of the Securities.
     The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Initial Purchasers on the other hand shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Initial Purchasers and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
     The Company and the Initial Purchasers agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Initial Purchasers were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 8. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 8 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 8, no Initial Purchaser shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities purchased and sold by it hereunder exceeds the amount of any damages which such Initial Purchaser has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
     For purposes of this Section 8, each person, if any, who controls an Initial Purchaser within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act and each Initial Purchaser's Affiliates shall have the same rights to contribution as such Initial Purchaser, and each director of the Company, each officer of the Company, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The Initial Purchasers' respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this
 
Section 8 are several in proportion to the principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their respective names in Schedule A hereto and not joint.
     SECTION 9. . All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement or in certificates of officers of the Company or any of its subsidiaries submitted pursuant hereto shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of any Initial Purchaser or its Affiliates or selling agents, any person controlling any Initial Purchaser, its officers or directors or any person controlling the Company and (ii) delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Representations, Warranties and Agreements to Survive
     SECTION 10. .
Termination of Agreement
     (a) . Merrill Lynch may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to Closing Time (i) if there has been, since the time of execution of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Preliminary Offering Memorandum, the Disclosure Package or the Final Offering Memorandum (exclusive of any amendments or supplements thereto subsequent to the date of this Agreement), any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, or (ii) if there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States, any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of Merrill Lynch, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended or materially limited by the Commission or the New York Stock Exchange or if trading generally on the American Stock Exchange or the New York Stock Exchange or in the NASDAQ System has been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by any of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, the NASD or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States or (v) if a banking moratorium has been declared by either Federal or New York authorities.
Termination; General
     (b) . If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section 10, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 hereof, and provided further that Sections 1, 7, 8 and 9 shall survive such termination and remain in full force and effect.
Liabilities
     SECTION 11. . If one or more of the Initial Purchasers shall fail at the Closing Time to purchase the Securities which it or they are obligated to purchase under this Agreement (the "Defaulted Securities"), Merrill Lynch shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Initial Purchasers, or any other initial purchasers, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if, however, Merrill Lynch shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
Default by One or More of the Initial Purchasers
     (a) if the number of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, each of the non-defaulting Initial Purchasers shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations hereunder bear to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Initial Purchasers, or
 
     (b) if the number of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, this Agreement shall terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Initial Purchaser.
     No action taken pursuant to this Section 11 shall relieve any defaulting Initial Purchaser from liability in respect of its default.
     In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of this Agreement, either Merrill Lynch or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Closing Time for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Offering Memorandum or in any other documents or arrangements. As used herein, the term "Initial Purchaser" includes any person substituted for an Initial Purchaser under this Section 11.
     SECTION 12. . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, immediately upon commencement of discussions with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby, the Company (and each employee, representative or other agent of the Company) may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to the Company relating to such tax treatment and tax structure. For purposes of the foregoing, the term "tax treatment" is the purported or claimed federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated hereby, and the term "tax structure" includes any fact that may be relevant to understanding the purported or claimed federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated hereby.
Tax Disclosure
     SECTION 13. . All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Initial Purchasers shall be directed to Merrill Lynch at 4 World Financial Center, New York, New York 10080, attention of Global Origination Counsel Group, facsimile (212) 449-3207; and notices to the Company shall be directed to it at 2301 Patriot Blvd., Glenview, Illinois 60026, attention General Counsel, facsimile (224) 521-8604.
Notices
     SECTION 14. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Initial Purchasers, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Initial Purchaser is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, or its stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) no Initial Purchaser has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Initial Purchaser has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and the Initial Purchaser has any obligation to the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Initial Purchasers and their Affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, and (e) no Initial Purchaser has provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
     SECTION 15. . This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company and the Initial Purchasers, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Integration
 
     SECTION 16. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Initial Purchasers and the Company and their respective successors. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Initial Purchasers and the Company and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 7 and 8 and their heirs and legal representatives, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. This Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Initial Purchasers and the Company and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representatives, and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of Securities from any Initial Purchaser shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties
     SECTION 17. . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
GOVERNING LAW
     SECTION 18. . TIME SHALL BE OF THE ESSENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SET FORTH HEREIN, SPECIFIED TIMES OF DAY REFER TO NEW YORK CITY TIME.
TIME
     SECTION 19. . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same Agreement.
Counterparts
     SECTION 20. . The Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Effect of Headings
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to the Company a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts, will become a binding agreement between the Initial Purchasers and the Company in accordance with its terms.
CONFIRMED AND ACCEPTED,     as of the date first above written:
MERRILL LYNCH & CO. MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED BANC OF AMERICA SECURITIES LLC J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC. WACHOVIA CAPITAL MARKETS, LLC
By: MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED
 

 
Exhibit 10.2
Confirmation of OTC Convertible Note Hedge
MLI Reference: 0781830
Dear Sir / Madam:
     The purpose of this letter agreement (this "") is to confirm the terms and conditions of the above-referenced transaction entered into among Counterparty, MLI and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated (the "" or "") on the Trade Date specified below (the ""). This Confirmation constitutes a "Confirmation" as referred to in the Agreement specified below.
Confirmation
Agent
MLPFS
Transaction
     The definitions and provisions contained in the 2000 ISDA Definitions (the "") and the 2002 ISDA Equity Derivatives Definitions (the "" and, together with the Swap Definitions, the ""), in each case as published by the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc., are incorporated into this Confirmation. In the event of any inconsistency between the Swap Definitions and the Equity Definitions, the Equity Definitions will govern, and in the event of any inconsistency between the Definitions and this Confirmation, this Confirmation will govern. References herein to a "Transaction" shall be deemed to be references to a "Share Option Transaction" for purposes of the Equity Definitions and a "Swap Transaction" for the purposes of the Swap Definitions.
Swap Definitions
Equity Definitions
Definitions
     This Confirmation evidences a complete binding agreement between you and us as to the terms of the Transaction to which this Confirmation relates. This Confirmation (notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein), shall be subject to an agreement in the 1992 form of the ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency Cross Border) (the "" or "") as if we had executed an agreement in such form (but without any Schedule and with elections specified in the "ISDA Master Agreement" Section of this Confirmation) on the Trade Date. In the event of any inconsistency between the provisions of that agreement and this Confirmation, this Confirmation will prevail for the purpose of this Transaction. The parties hereby agree that the Transaction evidenced by this Confirmation shall be the only Transaction subject to and governed by the Agreement.
Master Agreement
Agreement
     The terms of the particular Transaction to which this Confirmation relates are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Additional Agreements, Representations and Covenants of Buyer, Etc.:
 
Additional Termination Events:
The occurrence of any of the following shall be an Additional Termination Event for purposes of this Transaction:
 
 
Staggered Settlement:
If Seller determines reasonably and in good faith that the number of Shares required to be delivered to Buyer hereunder on any Settlement Date would exceed 8.0% of all outstanding Shares, then Seller may, by notice to Buyer on or prior to such Settlement Date (a ""), elect to deliver the Shares comprising the related Net Share Settlement Amount on two or more dates (each, a "") or at two or more times on the Nominal Settlement Date as follows:
Nominal Settlement Date
Staggered Settlement Date
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, solely in connection with a Staggered Settlement Date, Seller shall be entitled to deliver Shares to Buyer from time to time prior to the date on which Seller would be obligated to deliver them to Buyer pursuant to Net Share Settlement terms set forth above, and Buyer agrees to credit all such early deliveries against Seller's obligations hereunder in the direct order in which such obligations arise. No such early delivery of Shares will accelerate or otherwise affect any of Buyer's obligations to Seller hereunder.
Disposition of Hedge Shares:
Seller intends to conduct its hedging activities in connection with the Transaction in a manner that it believes, based on its reasonable judgment, will not require Counterparty to register under the Securities Act or any state securities laws the Shares (the "") acquired by Seller for the purpose of hedging its obligations pursuant to the Transaction. In addition, Counterparty hereby agrees that if, in the reasonable judgment of Seller based on advice of counsel, the Hedge Shares cannot be sold in the U.S. public market by Seller without registration under the Securities Act, Counterparty shall, at its election: (i) in order to allow Seller to sell the Hedge Shares in a registered offering, make available to Seller an effective registration statement under the Securities Act to cover the resale of such Hedge Shares and (a) enter into an agreement, in form and substance satisfactory to Seller, substantially in the form of an underwriting agreement for a registered offering, (b) provide accountant's "comfort" letters in customary form for registered offerings of equity securities, (c) provide disclosure opinions of nationally recognized outside counsel to Counterparty reasonably acceptable to Seller, (d) provide other customary opinions, certificates and closing documents customary in form for registered offerings of equity securities and (e) afford Seller a reasonable opportunity to conduct a "due diligence" investigation with respect to Counterparty customary in scope for underwritten offerings of equity securities; , that if Seller, in its sole reasonable discretion, is not satisfied with access to due diligence materials, the results of its due diligence investigation, or the procedures and documentation for the registered offering referred to above, then clause (ii) or clause (iii) of this Section shall apply at the election of Counterparty; (ii) in order to allow Seller to sell the Hedge Shares in a private placement, enter into a private placement agreement substantially similar to private placement purchase agreements customary for private placements of equity securities, in form and substance satisfactory to Seller, including customary representations, covenants, blue sky and other governmental filings and/or registrations, indemnities to Seller, due diligence rights (for Seller or any designated buyer of the Hedge Shares from Seller), opinions and certificates and such other documentation as is customary for private placements agreements, all reasonably acceptable to Seller (in which case, the Calculation Agent shall make any adjustments to the terms of the Transaction that are necessary, by commercially reasonable means, to compensate Seller for any discount from the public market price of the Shares incurred on the sale of Hedge Shares in a private placement); or (iii) purchase the Hedge Shares from Seller at the VWAP Price on such Exchange Business Days, and in the amounts, requested by Seller. "" means, on any Exchange Business Day, the per Share volume-weighted average price as displayed under the heading
Hedge Shares
provided, however
VWAP Price
 
"Bloomberg VWAP" on Bloomberg page AXE.N <equity> VAP (or any successor thereto) in respect of the period from 9:45 a.m. to 3:45 p.m. (New York City time) on such Exchange Business Day (or if such volume-weighted average price is unavailable, the market value of one Share on such Exchange Business Day, as determined by the Calculation Agent using a volume-weighted method).
Repurchase Notices:
Counterparty shall, on any day on which Counterparty effects any repurchase of Shares, promptly give Seller a written notice of such repurchase (a "") on such day if following such repurchase, the Notice Percentage as determined on such day is (i) greater than 6% and (ii) greater by 0.5% than the Notice Percentage included in the immediately preceding Repurchase Notice (or, in the case of the first such Repurchase Notice, greater than the Notice Percentage as of the date hereof). In the event that Counterparty fails to provide Seller with a Repurchase Notice on the day and in the manner specified in this section, then Counterparty agrees to indemnify and hold harmless Seller, its affiliates and their respective directors, officers, employees, agents and controlling persons (Seller and each such person being an "") from and against any and all losses, claims, damages and liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), joint or several, to which such Indemnified Party may become subject under applicable securities laws, including without limitation, Section 16 of the Exchange Act, relating to or arising out of such failure. If for any reason the foregoing indemnification is unavailable to any Indemnified Party or insufficient to hold harmless any Indemnified Party, then Counterparty shall contribute, to the maximum extent permitted by law, to the amount paid or payable by the Indemnified Party as a result of such loss, claim, damage or liability. In addition, Counterparty will reimburse any Indemnified Party for all reasonable and documented expenses (including reasonable counsel fees and expenses) as they are incurred (after notice to Counterparty) in connection with the investigation of, preparation for or defense or settlement of any pending or threatened claim or any action, suit or proceeding arising therefrom, whether or not such Indemnified Party is a party thereto and whether or not such claim, action, suit or proceeding is initiated or brought by or on behalf of Counterparty. This indemnity shall survive the completion of the Transaction contemplated by this Confirmation and any assignment and delegation of the Transaction made pursuant to this Confirmation or the Agreement shall inure to the benefit of any permitted assignee of Seller. Counterparty will not be liable under this Indemnity provision to the extent that any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense is found in a final judgment by a court to have resulted from MLI's gross negligence or willful misconduct. The "" as of any day is the fraction, expressed as a percentage, (i) the numerator of which is the product of the number of outstanding Reference Notes and the number of Shares per Reference Note equal to the Conversion Rate (as defined in the Note Indenture) and (ii) the denominator of which is the number of Shares outstanding on such day.
Repurchase Notice
Indemnified Party
Notice Percentage
 
Matters Relating to Agent:
 
ISDA Master Agreement:
With respect to the Agreement, Seller and Counterparty each agree as follows:
"" means in relation to Seller and in relation to Counterparty for purposes of this Transaction: Not applicable.
Specified Entity
The definition of "" in Section 14 of this Agreement is hereby amended by adding the text "commodity transaction, credit derivative transaction, repurchase or reverse purchase transaction, securities lending transaction, futures transaction, prime brokerage or margin lending transaction" after the words "foreign exchange transaction" in the sixth line thereof and by replacing the words "any other similar transaction" in the eighth line thereof with the text "any other transaction between the parties". "Specified Transaction" shall exclude any default under a Specified Transaction if caused solely by the general unavailability of the currency in which payments under such Specified Transaction are denominated due to exchange controls or other governmental action. "Specified Transaction" shall also exclude equity transactions in which Shares represent the underlying equity.
Specified Transaction
The "" provisions of of the Agreement will not apply to Seller and will not apply to Counterparty.
Cross Default
Section 5(a)(vi)
The "" provisions of of the Agreement will not apply to Seller and Counterparty.
Credit Event Upon Merger
Section 5(b)(iv)
The "" provision of of the Agreement will not apply to Seller or to Counterparty.
Automatic Early Termination
Section 6(a)
For the purpose of of the Agreement: (i) Loss shall apply; and (ii) the Second Method shall apply.
Payments on Early Termination.
Section 6(e)
"" means USD.
Termination Currency
Tax Representations.
 
For the purpose of and of the Agreement, each party agrees to deliver the following documents:
Delivery Requirements.
Sections 4(a)(i)
(ii)
Counterparty hereby agrees to promptly deliver to Seller a copy of all notices and other communications required or permitted to be given to the holders of any Reference Notes pursuant to the terms of the Note Indenture on the dates so required or permitted in the Note Indenture and all other notices given and other communications made by Counterparty in respect of the Reference Notes to holders of any Reference Notes. Counterparty further covenants to Seller that it shall promptly notify Seller of each Conversion Date, Amendment Event (including in such notice a detailed description of any such amendment) and Repayment Event (identifying in such notice the nature of such Repayment Event and the principal amount at maturity of Reference Notes being paid).
Additional Notice Requirements.
For the purpose of of the Agreement:
Addresses for Notices.
Section 12(a)
Address for notices or communications to Seller for all purposes:
 
Additionally, a copy of all notices pursuant to , , and as well as any changes to Counterparty's address, telephone number or facsimile number should be sent to:
Sections 5
6
7
Address for notices or communications to Counterparty for all purposes:
For the purpose of Section 13(c) of the Agreement, Seller appoints as its Process Agent:
Process Agent.
     Counterparty does not appoint a Process Agent.
For the purpose of of the Agreement: Neither Seller nor Counterparty is a Multibranch Party.
Multibranch Party.
Section 10(c)
The Calculation Agent is Seller, whose judgments, determinations and calculations in this Transaction and any related hedging transaction between the parties shall be made in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner. The Calculation Agent shall, no later than the 5th Business Day following any calculation, adjustment or other determination made by it hereunder, provide the parties with a statement showing, in reasonable detail, the computations (including any relevant quotations) by which it has determined any amount payable or deliverable under, or any adjustment to the terms of, this Transaction.
Calculation Agent.
Credit Support Document.
Seller: Guarantee of ML & Co. in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A.
Counterparty: Not Applicable
Credit Support Provider.
With respect to Seller: ML & Co.
With respect to Counterparty: Not Applicable.
 
This Confirmation will be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law.
Each party waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any right it may have to a trial by jury in respect of any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Transaction. Each party (i) certifies that no representative, agent or attorney of the other party has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such other party would not, in the event of such a suit, action or proceeding, seek to enforce the foregoing waiver and (ii) acknowledges that it and the other party have been induced to enter into this Transaction, as applicable, by, among other things, the mutual waivers and certifications provided herein.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
The provisions of of the Agreement shall not be applicable to this Transaction.
Netting of Payments.
Section 2(c)
of the Agreement is hereby amended by the deletion of "and" at the end of ; the substitution of a semicolon for the period at the end of and the addition of , as follows:
Basic Representations.
Section 3(a)
Section 3(a)(iv)
Section 3(a)(v)
Sections 3(a)(vi)
Each party agrees and represents that it is an "eligible contract participant" as defined in Section 1a(12) of the U.S. Commodity Exchange Act, as amended (""), this Agreement and the Transaction thereunder are subject to individual negotiation by the parties and have not been executed or traded on a "trading facility" as defined in Section 1a(33) of the CEA, and it has entered into this Confirmation and this Transaction in connection with its business or a line of business (including financial intermediation), or the financing of its business.
Eligible Contract Participant; Line of Business.
CEA
Acknowledgements:
of the Agreement is modified by deleting the words "on the day" in the second line thereof and substituting therefore "on the day that is three Local Business Days after the day." is further modified by deleting the words "two Local Business Days" in the fourth line thereof and substituting therefore "three Local Business Days."
Amendment of
Section 
6(d)(ii)
.
Section 6(d)(ii)
Section 6(d)(ii)
The definition of "Reference Market-Makers" in is hereby amended by adding in clause (a) after the word "credit" and before the word "and" the words "or to enter into transactions similar in nature to Transactions."
Amendment of Definition of Reference Market-Makers.
Section 14
Each party consents to the recording of the telephone conversations of trading and marketing personnel of the parties and their Affiliates in connection with this Confirmation. To the extent that one party records telephone conversations (the "") and the other party does not (the ""), the Recording Party shall in the event of any dispute, make a complete and unedited copy of such party's
Consent to Recording.
Recording Party
Non-Recording Party
 
tape of the entire day's conversations with the Non-Recording Party's personnel available to the Non-Recording Party. The Recording Party's tapes may be used by either party in any forum in which a dispute is sought to be resolved and the Recording Party will retain tapes for a consistent period of time in accordance with the Recording Party's policy unless one party notifies the other that a particular transaction is under review and warrants further retention.
Each party hereby acknowledges and agrees that Seller has authorized Counterparty to disclose this Transaction and any related hedging transaction between the parties if and to the extent that Counterparty reasonably determines (after consultation with Seller) that such disclosure is required by law or by the rules of the New York Stock Exchange.
Disclosure.
If any term, provision, covenant or condition of this Confirmation, or the application thereof to any party or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid or unenforceable in whole or in part for any reason, the remaining terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions hereof shall continue in full force and effect as if this Confirmation had been executed with the invalid or unenforceable provision eliminated, so long as this Confirmation as so modified continues to express, without material change, the original intentions of the parties as to the subject matter of this Confirmation and the deletion of such portion of this Confirmation will not substantially impair the respective benefits or expectations of parties to this Agreement; , , that this severability provision shall not be applicable if any provision of , , or of the Agreement (or any definition or provision in to the extent that it relates to, or is used in or in connection with any such Section) shall be so held to be invalid or unenforceable.
Severability.
provided
however
Section 2
5
6
13
Section 14
For purposes of of the Agreement, each party shall be deemed to be an Affected Party in connection with Illegality and any Tax Event.
Affected Parties.
Section 6(e)
 
Please confirm that the foregoing correctly sets forth the terms of our agreement by executing the copy of this Confirmation enclosed for that purpose and returning it to us.
Confirmed as of the date first above written:
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Acknowledged and agreed as to matters to the Agent:
Solely in its capacity as Agent hereunder
MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED,
 
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, MERRILL LYNCH & CO., INC., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware ("ML & Co."), hereby unconditionally guarantees to Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"), the due and punctual payment of any and all amounts payable by Merrill Lynch International, a company organized under the laws of England and Wales ("ML"), under the terms of the Confirmation of OTC Convertible Note Hedge between the Company and ML (ML as Seller), dated as of February 12, 2007 (the "Confirmation"), including, in case of default, interest on any amount due, when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether on the scheduled payment dates, at maturity, upon declaration of termination or otherwise, according to the terms thereof. In case of the failure of ML punctually to make any such payment, ML & Co. hereby agrees to make such payment, or cause such payment to be made, promptly upon demand made by the Company to ML & Co.; provided, however that delay by the Company in giving such demand shall in no event affect ML & Co.'s obligations under this Guarantee. This Guarantee shall remain in full force and effect or shall be reinstated (as the case may be) if at any time any payment guaranteed hereunder, in whole or in part, is rescinded or must otherwise be returned by the Company upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of ML or otherwise, all as though such payment had not been made.
     This Guarantee shall be one of payment and not collection. ML & Co. hereby agrees that its obligations hereunder shall be unconditional, irrespective of the validity, regularity or enforceability of the Confirmation; the absence of any action to enforce the same; any waiver or consent by the Company concerning any provisions thereof; the rendering of any judgment against ML or any action to enforce the same; or any other circumstances that might otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge of a guarantor or a defense of a guarantor. ML covenants that this guarantee will not be discharged except by complete payment of the amounts payable under the Confirmation. This Guarantee shall continue to be effective if ML merges or consolidates with or into another entity, loses its separate legal identity or ceases to exist.
     ML & Co. hereby waives diligence; presentment; protest; notice of protest, acceleration, and dishonor; filing of claims with a court in the event of insolvency or bankruptcy of ML; all demands whatsoever, except as noted in the first paragraph hereof; and any right to require a proceeding first against ML.
     ML & Co. hereby certifies and warrants that this Guarantee constitutes the valid obligation of ML & Co. and complies with all applicable laws.
     ML & Co. shall not exercise any rights that it may acquire by way of subrogation as a result of a payment by it under this Guarantee at any time when any of the obligations of ML guaranteed hereunder shall have become due and remain unpaid. Any amount paid to ML & Co. in violation of the preceding sentence shall be held for the benefit of the Company and shall forthwith be paid to the Company to be credited and applied to such obligations of ML then due and unpaid. Subject to the foregoing, upon payment of all such obligations of ML, ML & Co. shall be subrogated to the rights of the Company against ML, and the Company agrees to take at ML & Co.'s expense such steps as ML &Co. may reasonably request to implement such subrogation.
     This Guarantee shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
     This Guarantee becomes effective concurrent with the effectiveness of the Confirmation, according to its terms.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ML & Co. has caused this Guarantee to be executed in its corporate name by its duly authorized representative.

 
Exhibit 10.3
Confirmation of OTC Warrant Transaction
Dear Sir / Madam:
     The purpose of this letter agreement (this "") is to confirm the terms and conditions of the above-referenced transaction entered into among Counterparty, MLI and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated (the "" or "") on the Trade Date specified below (the ""). This Confirmation constitutes a "Confirmation" as referred to in the Agreement specified below.
Confirmation
Agent
MLPFS
Transaction
     The definitions and provisions contained in the 2000 ISDA Definitions (the "") and the 2002 ISDA Equity Derivatives Definitions (the "" and, together with the Swap Definitions, the ""), in each case as published by the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc., are incorporated into this Confirmation. In the event of any inconsistency between the Swap Definitions and the Equity Definitions, the Equity Definitions will govern, and in the event of any inconsistency between the Definitions and this Confirmation, this Confirmation will govern. References herein to a "Transaction" shall be deemed to be references to a "Share Option Transaction" for the purposes of the Equity Definitions and to a "Swap Transaction" for the purposes of the Swap Definitions. For purposes of this Transaction, "Warrant Style", "Warrant Type", "Number of Warrants" and "Warrant Entitlement" (each as defined below) shall be used herein as if such terms were referred to as "Option Style", "Option Type", "Number of Options" and "Option Entitlement", respectively, in the Definitions.
Swap Definitions
Equity Definitions
Definitions
     This Confirmation evidences a complete binding agreement between you and us as to the terms of the Transaction to which this Confirmation relates. This Confirmation (notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein), shall be subject to an agreement in the 1992 form of the ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency Cross Border) (the "" or "") as if we had executed an agreement in such form (but without any Schedule and with elections specified in the "ISDA Master Agreement" Section of this Confirmation) on the Trade Date. In the event of any inconsistency between the provisions of that Agreement and this Confirmation, this Confirmation will prevail for the purpose of this Transaction. The parties hereby agree that the Transaction evidenced by this Confirmation shall be the only Transaction subject to and governed by the Agreement.
Master Agreement
Agreement
     The terms of the particular Transaction to which this Confirmation relates are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Additional Agreements, Representations and Covenants of Counterparty, Etc.:
 
Matters Relating to Agent:
ISDA Master Agreement:
With respect to the Agreement, MLI and Counterparty each agree as follows:
"" means in relation to Seller and in relation to Counterparty for purposes of this Transaction: Not applicable.
Specified Entity
The definition of "" in of this Agreement is hereby amended by adding the text "commodity transaction, credit derivative transaction, repurchase or reverse purchase transaction, securities lending transaction, futures transaction, prime brokerage or margin lending transaction" after the words "foreign exchange transaction" in the sixth line thereof and by replacing the words "any other similar transaction" in the eighth line
Specified Transaction
Section 14
 
thereof with the text "any other transaction between the parties". "Specified Transaction" shall exclude any default under a Specified Transaction if caused solely by the general unavailability of the currency in which payments under such Specified Transaction are denominated due to exchange controls or other governmental action. "Specified Transaction" shall also exclude equity transactions in which Shares represent the underlying equity.
The "" provisions of of the Agreement will not apply to Seller and will not apply to Counterparty.
Cross Default
Section 5(a)(vi)
The "" provisions of of the Agreement will not apply to MLI and Counterparty.
Credit Event Upon Merger
Section 5(b)(iv)
The "" provision of of the Agreement will not apply to MLI or to Counterparty.
Automatic Early Termination
Section 6(a)
. For the purpose of of the Agreement: (i) Loss shall apply; and (ii) the Second Method shall apply.
Payments on Early Termination
Section 6(e)
"" means USD.
Termination Currency
Tax Representations.
For the purpose of and of the Agreement, each party agrees to deliver the following documents:
Delivery Requirements.
Sections 4(a)(i)
(ii)
 
For the purpose of of the Agreement:
Addresses for Notices:
Section 12(a)
Address for notices or communications to MLI for all purposes:
Address for notices or communications to Counterparty for all purposes:
: For the purpose of Section 13(c) of the Agreement, MLI appoints as its process agent:
Process Agent
. For the purpose of of the Agreement: Neither MLI nor Counterparty is a Multibranch Party.
Multibranch Party
Section 10(c)
 
The Calculation Agent is MLI. The Calculation Agent shall, no later than the 5th Business Day following any calculation, adjustment or other determination made by it hereunder, provide the parties with a statement showing, in reasonable detail, the computations (including any relevant quotations) by which it has determined any amount payable or deliverable under, or any adjustment to the terms of, this Transaction.
Calculation Agent.
Credit Support Document.
MLI: Guarantee of ML & Co. in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A.
Counterparty: Not Applicable
Credit Support Provider.
With respect to MLI: ML & Co.
With respect to Counterparty: Not Applicable.
This Confirmation will be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law.
Each party waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any right it may have to a trial by jury in respect of any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Transaction. Each party (i) certifies that no representative, agent or attorney of the other party has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such other party would not, in the event of such a suit, action or proceeding, seek to enforce the foregoing waiver and (ii) acknowledges that it and the other party have been induced to enter into this Transaction, as applicable, by, among other things, the mutual waivers and certifications provided herein.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
The provisions of of the Agreement shall not be applicable to this Transaction.
Netting of Payments
.
Section 2(c)
of the Agreement is hereby amended by the deletion of "and" at the end of ; the substitution of a semicolon for the period at the end of and the addition of , as follows:
Basic Representations.
Section 3(a)
Section 3(a)(iv)
Section 3(a)(v)
Sections 3(a)(vi)
Each party agrees and represents that it is an "eligible contract participant" as defined in Section 1a(12) of the U.S. Commodity Exchange Act, as amended (""), this Agreement and the Transaction thereunder are subject to individual negotiation by the parties and have not been executed or traded on a "trading facility" as defined in Section 1a(33) of the CEA, and it has entered into this Confirmation and this Transaction in connection with its business or a line of business (including financial intermediation), or the financing of its business.
Eligible Contract Participant; Line of Business.
CEA
Section 3(a)(iii) of the Agreement is modified to read as follows:
Amendment of Section 3(a)(iii).
. Such execution, delivery and performance do not materially violate or conflict with any law known by it to be applicable to it, any provision of its constitutional documents, any order or judgment of any court or agency of government applicable to it or any of its assets or any material contractual restriction relating to Specified Indebtedness binding on or affecting it or any of its assets.
No Violation or Conflict
Section 3(a)(iv) of the Agreement is modified by inserting the following at the beginning thereof:
Amendment of
Section 3(a)(iv)
.
     "To such party's best knowledge,"
Acknowledgements:
 
of the Agreement is modified by deleting the words "on the day" in the second line thereof and substituting therefor "on the day that is three Local Business Days after the day". is further modified by deleting the words "two Local Business Days" in the fourth line thereof and substituting therefor "three Local Business Days."
Amendment of
Section 6(d)(ii
)
.
Section 6(d)(ii)
Section 6(d)(ii)
. The definition of "Reference Market-Makers" in is hereby amended by adding in clause (a) after the word "credit" and before the word "and" the words "or to enter into transactions similar in nature to the Transactions."
Amendment of Definition of Reference Market-Makers
Section 14
Each party consents to the recording of the telephone conversations of trading and marketing personnel of the parties and their Affiliates in connection with this Confirmation. To the extent that one party records telephone conversations (the "Recording Party") and the other party does not (the "Non-Recording Party"), the Recording Party shall in the event of any dispute, make a complete and unedited copy of such party's tape of the entire day's conversations with the Non-Recording Party's personnel available to the Non-Recording Party. The Recording Party's tapes may be used by either party in any forum in which a dispute is sought to be resolved and the Recording Party will retain tapes for a consistent period of time in accordance with the Recording Party's policy unless one party notifies the other that a particular transaction is under review and warrants further retention.
Consent to Recording.
Each party hereby acknowledges and agrees that MLI has authorized Counterparty to disclose this Transaction and any related hedging transaction between the parties if and to the extent that Counterparty reasonably determines (after consultation with MLI) that such disclosure is required by law or by the rules of the New York Stock Exchange.
Disclosure.
. If any term, provision, covenant or condition of this Confirmation, or the application thereof to any party or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid or unenforceable in whole or in part for any reason, the remaining terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions hereof shall continue in full force and effect as if this Confirmation had been executed with the invalid or unenforceable provision eliminated, so long as this Confirmation as so modified continues to express, without material change, the original intentions of the parties as to the subject matter of this Confirmation and the deletion of such portion of this Confirmation will not substantially impair the respective benefits or expectations of parties to this Agreement; , , that this severability provision shall not be applicable if any provision of , , or of the Agreement (or any definition or provision in to the extent that it relates to, or is used in or in connection with any such Section) shall be so held to be invalid or unenforceable.
Severability
provided
however
Section 2
5
6
13
Section 14
. For purposes of of the Agreement, each party shall be deemed to be an Affected Party in connection with Illegality and any Tax Event.
Affected Parties
Section 6(e)
 
     Please confirm that the foregoing correctly sets forth the terms of our agreement by executing the copy of this Confirmation enclosed for that purpose and returning it to us.
Confirmed as of the date first above written:
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Acknowledged and agreed as to matters to the Agent: Solely in its capacity as Agent hereunder
MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED,
 
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, MERRILL LYNCH & CO., INC., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware ("ML & Co."), hereby unconditionally guarantees to Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"), the due and punctual payment of any and all amounts payable by Merrill Lynch International, a company organized under the laws of England and Wales ("ML"), under the terms of the Confirmation of OTC Warrant Transaction between the Company and ML (ML as Buyer), dated as of February 12, 2007 (the "Confirmation"), including, in case of default, interest on any amount due, when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether on the scheduled payment dates, at maturity, upon declaration of termination or otherwise, according to the terms thereof. In case of the failure of ML punctually to make any such payment, ML & Co. hereby agrees to make such payment, or cause such payment to be made, promptly upon demand made by the Company to ML & Co.; provided, however that delay by the Company in giving such demand shall in no event affect ML & Co.'s obligations under this Guarantee. This Guarantee shall remain in full force and effect or shall be reinstated (as the case may be) if at any time any payment guaranteed hereunder, in whole or in part, is rescinded or must otherwise be returned by the Company upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of ML or otherwise, all as though such payment had not been made.
     This Guarantee shall be one of payment and not collection. ML & Co. hereby agrees that its obligations hereunder shall be unconditional, irrespective of the validity, regularity or enforceability of the Confirmation; the absence of any action to enforce the same; any waiver or consent by the Company concerning any provisions thereof; the rendering of any judgment against ML or any action to enforce the same; or any other circumstances that might otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge of a guarantor or a defense of a guarantor. ML covenants that this guarantee will not be discharged except by complete payment of the amounts payable under the Confirmation. This Guarantee shall continue to be effective if ML merges or consolidates with or into another entity, loses its separate legal identity or ceases to exist.
     ML & Co. hereby waives diligence; presentment; protest; notice of protest, acceleration, and dishonor; filing of claims with a court in the event of insolvency or bankruptcy of ML; all demands whatsoever, except as noted in the first paragraph hereof; and any right to require a proceeding first against ML.
     ML & Co. hereby certifies and warrants that this Guarantee constitutes the valid obligation of ML & Co. and complies with all applicable laws.
     ML & Co. shall not exercise any rights that it may acquire by way of subrogation as a result of a payment by it under this Guarantee at any time when any of the obligations of ML guaranteed hereunder shall have become due and remain unpaid. Any amount paid to ML & Co. in violation of the preceding sentence shall be held for the benefit of the Company and shall forthwith be paid to the Company to be credited and applied to such obligations of ML then due and unpaid. Subject to the foregoing, upon payment of all such obligations of ML, ML & Co. shall be subrogated to the rights of the Company against ML, and the Company agrees to take at ML & Co.'s expense such steps as ML &Co. may reasonably request to implement such subrogation.
     This Guarantee shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
     This Guarantee becomes effective concurrent with the effectiveness of the Confirmation, according to its terms.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ML & Co. has caused this Guarantee to be executed in its corporate name by its duly authorized representative.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070423103049.txt.gz
TIME:20070423103049
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
     On April 20, 2007, Anixter International Inc.'s (the "Company") primary operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., entered into a senior unsecured amended and restated revolving credit agreement. As amended and restated, the revolving credit agreement will allow for borrowings of up to $350 million (or the equivalent in Euros) for a 5-year period ending April 2012. The key changes to the terms and conditions of the agreement include the elimination of limitations on foreign acquisitions, elimination of the minimum net worth requirements and elimination of the restriction of the amount of dividends that Anixter Inc. can pay to the Company. The pricing for borrowings under the agreement has been reduced to LIBOR plus 60 basis points while the facility fee payable on the full amount of the agreement has been reduced to 15 basis points. The agreement, which is guaranteed by the Company, contains financial covenants that restrict the amount of leverage and set a minimum fixed charge coverage ratio similar to the prior agreement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
EXHIBIT 10.1
EXECUTION COPY
Deal Published CUSIP Number: 03528CAA8 Revolving Published CUSIP Number: 03528CAB6
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     This AMENDED AND RESTATED FIVE-YEAR REVOLVING CREDIT AGREEMENT ("") is entered into as of April 20, 2007, among ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), the BORROWING SUBSIDIARIES (as defined herein), each lender from time to time party hereto (collectively, the "" and individually, a ""), BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Swing Line Lender and L/C Issuer, WELLS FARGO BANK, N.A., as Syndication Agent, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., THE BANK OF NOVA SCOTIA and WACHOVIA BANK N.A., as Co-Documentation Agents.
Agreement
Anixter
Lenders
Lender
     Anixter, certain of the Borrowing Subsidiaries, certain of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent are parties to that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of June 18, 2004, as heretofore amended (the ""), pursuant to which such Lenders have made loans to Anixter and certain of the Borrowing Subsidiaries and have issued or participated in letters of credit issued for the account of Anixter.
Existing Credit Agreement
     The Borrowers, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent have agreed to amend and restate the Existing Credit Agreement in the form of this Agreement on the terms and conditions stated herein.
     In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained, the parties hereto covenant and agree as follows:
     As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below:
1.01 Defined Terms.
     "", as applied to any Person, means any contractual obligation, contingent or otherwise, of that Person with respect to any Indebtedness or other obligation or liability of another, including, without limitation, any such Indebtedness, obligation or liability directly or indirectly guaranteed, supported by letter of credit, endorsed (otherwise than for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business), co-made or discounted or sold with recourse by that Person, or in respect of which that Person is otherwise directly or indirectly liable, including Contractual Obligations (contingent or otherwise) arising through any agreement to purchase, repurchase, or otherwise acquire such Indebtedness, obligation or liability or any security therefor, or to provide funds for the payment or discharge thereof (whether in the form of loans, advances, stock purchases, capital contributions or otherwise), or to maintain solvency, assets, level of income, or other financial condition, or to make payment other than for value received. For purposes of interpreting any provision of this Agreement which refers to the amount of Accommodation Obligations of any Person, such provision shall be deemed to mean the maximum amount of such Accommodation Obligations or, in the case of an Accommodation Obligation to maintain solvency, assets, level of income or other financial
Accommodation Obligation
 
condition, the amount of Indebtedness to which such Accommodation Obligation relates, or if less, the stated maximum, if any, in the documents evidencing such Accommodation Obligation. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the term "Accommodation Obligation" shall not be interpreted to include any letter of credit Obligations or any other Obligations hereunder guaranteed by Anixter or any other Guarantor.
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Additional Commitment Lender
Section 2.20
     "" means Bank of America in its capacity as administrative agent under any of the Loan Documents, or any successor administrative agent.
Administrative Agent
     "" means, with respect to any currency, the Administrative Agent's address and, as appropriate, account as set forth on with respect to such currency, or such other address or account with respect to such currency as the Administrative Agent may from time to time notify to Anixter and the Lenders.
Administrative Agent's Office
Schedule 10.02
     "" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
     "" means, as to any Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under direct or indirect common control with, such Person. A Person shall be deemed to be "controlled by" any other Person if such other Person possesses, directly or indirectly, power (a) to vote 33% or more (or, in the case of an Affiliate of a Lender, 20% or more) of the securities (on a fully diluted basis) having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or managing general partners; or (b) to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person whether by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Agent/Arranger Fee Letters
Section 2.10(b)
     "" means US$100,000,000, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement. The Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments are part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments. The aggregate amount of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments
     "" means US$25,000,000, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement. The Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments are part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments. The aggregate amount of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments
     "" means US$350,000,000, as such amount may be reduced, increased or adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
Aggregate Commitments
     "" means this Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
Agreement
     "" means GAAP as of the date of this Agreement together with any changes in GAAP after the date hereof which are not "Material Accounting
Agreement Accounting Principles
 
Changes" (as defined below). If any changes in GAAP are hereafter required or permitted and are adopted by AXE or Anixter with the agreement of its independent certified public accountants and such changes result in a material change in the method of calculation of any of the financial covenants, restrictions or standards herein or in the related definitions or terms used therein (""), the parties hereto agree to enter into negotiations, in good faith, in order to amend such provisions in a credit neutral manner so as to reflect equitably such changes with the desired result that the criteria for evaluating Anixter's consolidated financial condition shall be the same after such changes as if such changes had not been made; , , that no Material Accounting Change shall be given effect in such calculations until such provisions are amended in a manner reasonably satisfactory to the Required Lenders. If such amendment is entered into, all references in this Agreement to Agreement Accounting Principles shall mean GAAP as of the date of such amendment together with any changes in GAAP after the date of such amendment which are not Material Accounting Changes.
Material Accounting Changes
provided
however
     "" has the meaning assigned to that term in the preamble hereto.
Anixter
     "" means, with respect to any Loan or other Obligation, the currency in which such Loan or other Obligation is denominated.
Applicable Currency
     "" means the following percentages per annum, based upon the Debt Rating:
Applicable Margin
     "" means, as of any date of determination, the rating as determined by either S&P, Moody's or Fitch (provided that Anixter shall have at least two such ratings and at least one of such ratings shall be from S&P or Moody's) (collectively, the "") of Anixter's non-credit-enhanced, senior unsecured long-term debt; that if the existing Debt Ratings are not the same level, then (i) if there are two Debt Ratings, the higher of such Debt Ratings shall apply (with Pricing Level 1 being the highest and Pricing Level 6 being the lowest), unless there is more than one Pricing Level between the higher Debt Rating and the lower Debt Rating, in which case, the Pricing Level that is one Pricing Level below the Pricing Level corresponding to the higher Debt Rating shall apply, and (ii) if there are three Debt Ratings not at the same level, the higher of such Debt Ratings shall apply, unless there is more than one Pricing Level
Debt Rating
Debt Ratings
provided
 
between the highest Debt Rating and the lowest Debt Rating, in which case, (x) if two Debt Ratings are at the same Pricing Level and the third Debt Rating is at a lower Pricing Level, the higher Pricing Level shall apply, and (y) for all other split Debt Ratings, the Pricing Level that is one Pricing Level below the Pricing Level corresponding to the highest Debt Rating shall apply. If there are no Debt Ratings Pricing Level 6 shall apply.
     Initially, the Applicable Margin shall be determined based upon the Debt Rating specified in the certificate delivered pursuant to . Thereafter, each change in the Applicable Margin resulting from a publicly announced change in the Debt Rating shall be effective, in the case of an upgrade, during the period commencing on the date of delivery by Anixter to the Administrative Agent of notice thereof pursuant to and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change and, in the case of a downgrade, during the period commencing on the date of the public announcement thereof and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change.
Section 4.01(a)(vii)
Section 6.01(k)
     "" means, with respect to any borrowings and payments in any Foreign Currency, the local time in the place of settlement for such Foreign Currency as may be determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, to be necessary for timely settlement on the relevant date in accordance with normal banking procedures in the place of payment.
Applicable Time
     "" means any Fund that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
     "" means Banc of America Securities LLC, in its capacity as sole lead arranger and book manager.
Arranger
     "" means an Assignment and Assumption substantially in the form of .
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit F
     "" means and includes all reasonable fees and disbursements of any law firm or other external counsel.
Attorney Costs
     "" means, on any date, (a) in respect of any Capital Lease of any Person, the capitalized amount thereof that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP, and (b) in respect of any Synthetic Lease Obligation, the capitalized amount of the remaining lease payments under the relevant lease that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP if such lease were accounted for as a Capital Lease.
Attributable Indebtedness
     "" means the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Consolidated Group for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2006, and the related consolidated statements of income and cash flows for such fiscal year of the Consolidated Group.
Audited Financial Statements
     "" means the period from and including the Closing Date to the earliest of (a) the Maturity Date, (b) the date of termination of the Aggregate Commitments pursuant to , and (c) the date of termination of the commitment of each Lender to
Availability Period
Section 2.08
 
make Loans and of the obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions pursuant to .
Section 8.02
     "" means (i) U.S. Dollars, (ii) Euro and (iii) any other currency (other than US Dollars) which shall be requested by Anixter and approved by each Lender.
Available Currency
     "" means Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation.
AXE
     "" means Bank of America, N.A. and its successors.
Bank of America
     "" means for any day a fluctuating rate per annum equal to the higher of (a) the Federal Funds Rate plus / of 1% and (b) the rate of interest in effect for such day as publicly announced from time to time by Bank of America as its "prime rate." The "prime rate" is a rate set by Bank of America based upon various factors including Bank of America's costs and desired return, general economic conditions and other factors, and is used as a reference point for pricing some loans, which may be priced at, above, or below such announced rate. Any change in such rate announced by Bank of America shall take effect at the opening of business on the day specified in the public announcement of such change.
Base Rate
1
2
     "" means a Committed Loan that is a Base Rate Loan.
Base Rate Committed Loan
     "" means a Loan that bears interest based on the Base Rate. All Base Rate Loans shall be denominated in US Dollars.
Base Rate Loan
     "" means a defined benefit plan as defined in Section 3(35) of ERISA (other than a Multiemployer Plan) in respect of which Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate is, or within the immediately preceding six (6) years was, an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Benefit Plan
     "" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
     "" means Anixter and each Borrowing Subsidiary.
Borrower
     "" means a Committed Borrowing, a Swing Line Borrowing, a British Pound Sterling Borrowing or a Canadian Dollar Borrowing, as the context may require.
Borrowing
     "" means any Foreign Subsidiary of Anixter named as such on the signature pages hereto or designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary by Anixter pursuant to .
Borrowing Subsidiary
Section 2.16
     "" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit C-1
     "" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit C-2
     "" means the lawful currency of the United Kingdom.
British Pounds Sterling
 
     "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous British Pound Sterling Loans from the British Pound Sterling Lenders pursuant to .
British Pound Sterling Borrowing
Section 2.04
     "" means a notice of (a) a British Pound Sterling Borrowing, or (b) a continuation of British Pound Sterling Loans for a new Interest Period, pursuant to , which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice
Section 2.04
Exhibit A-2
     "" means, as to each British Pound Sterling Lender, its obligation to make British Pound Sterling Loans to the Borrowing Subsidiaries pursuant to , in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount of such Lender's British Pound Sterling Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto or in the designation by Anixter accepted by such British Pound Sterling Lender, as applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
British Pound Sterling Commitment
Section 2.04
Schedule 2.01
     "" means any Lender that may from time to time accept a designation by Anixter as a British Pound Sterling Lender hereunder with the approval of the Administrative Agent (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld).
British Pound Sterling Lender
     "" has the meaning specified in .
British Pound Sterling Loan
Section 2.04
     "" means a promissory note made by a Borrowing Subsidiary in favor of a British Pound Sterling Lender evidencing British Pound Sterling Loans made by such British Pound Sterling Lender, substantially in the form of .
British Pound Sterling Loan Note
Exhibit D-3
     "" means a written notice from a British Pound Sterling Lender informing the Administrative Agent that an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and directing the Administrative Agent to notify all Lenders to fund their participations in the British Pound Sterling Loans as provided in .
British Pound Sterling Participation Funding Notice
Section 2.04
     "" means, with respect to each British Pound Sterling Lender, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such British Pound Sterling Lender's British Pound Sterling Commitment comprise of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments at such time.
British Pound Sterling Pro Rata Share
     "" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks are authorized to close under the Laws of, or are in fact closed in, the state where the Administrative Agent's Office with respect to Obligations denominated in US Dollars is located and:
Business Day
     (a) if such day relates to any interest rate settings as to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan denominated in US Dollars, any fundings, disbursements, settlements and payments in US Dollars in respect of any such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, or any other dealings in US Dollars to be carried out pursuant to this Agreement in respect of any such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, means any such day on which dealings in deposits in US Dollars are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank eurodollar market;
 
     (b) if such day relates to any interest rate settings as to a Loan denominated in Euro, any fundings, disbursements, settlements and payments in Euro in respect of any such Loan, or any other dealings in Euro to be carried out pursuant to this Agreement in respect of any such Loan, means a TARGET Day;
     (c) if such day relates to any interest rate settings as to a Loan denominated in a currency other than US Dollars or Euro, means any such day on which dealings in deposits in the relevant currency are conducted by and between banks in the London or other applicable offshore interbank market for such currency; and
     (d) if such day relates to any fundings, disbursements, settlements and payments in a currency other than US Dollars or Euro in respect of a Loan denominated in a currency other than US Dollars or Euro, or any other dealings in any currency other than US Dollars or Euro to be carried out pursuant to this Agreement in respect of any such Loan (other than any interest rate settings), means any such day on which banks are open for foreign exchange business in the principal financial center of the country of such currency.
     "" means, in respect of any Canadian Banker's Acceptance, an amount calculated on the applicable funding date which is (rounded to the nearest full cent, with one half of one cent being rounded up) equal to the face amount of such Canadian Banker's Acceptance multiplied by the price, where the price is calculated by dividing one by the sum of one plus the product of (a) the Canadian BA Discount Rate applicable thereto expressed as a decimal fraction multiplied by (b) a fraction, the numerator of which is the term of such Canadian Banker's Acceptance and the denominator of which is 365, rounded to the nearest multiple of 0.001%.
Canadian BA Discount Proceeds
     "" means (a) with respect to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance accepted by a Canadian Dollar Lender named on Schedule I to the Bank Act (Canada), the rate determined by such Canadian Dollar Lender as being the CDOR Rate on the applicable funding date, and (b) with respect to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance accepted by any other Canadian Dollar Lender, the lesser of (i) the rate advised by such Canadian Dollar Lender to the Administrative Agent as being the discount rate of such Canadian Dollar Lender, calculated on the basis of a year of 365 days and determined in accordance with normal market practice, for Canadian Banker's Acceptances of such Canadian Dollar Lender having a comparable face amount and identical maturity date to the face amount and maturity date of such Canadian Banker's Acceptance, and (ii) the rate determined by such Canadian Dollar Lender in accordance with (a) above plus 0.10% per annum.
Canadian BA Discount Rate
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Canadian BA Equivalent Loan
Schedule 2.05
     "" means a depository bill as defined in the Depository Bills and Notes Act (Canada) in Canadian Dollars that is in the form of an order signed by Anixter Canada Inc. and accepted by a Canadian Dollar Lender pursuant to this Agreement or, for Canadian Dollar Lenders not participating in clearing services contemplated in that Act, a draft or bill of exchange in Canadian Dollars that is drawn by Anixter Canada Inc. and accepted by a Canadian Dollar Lender pursuant to this Agreement. Orders or drafts that become
Canadian Banker's Acceptance
 
depository bills, drafts and bills of exchange are sometimes collectively referred to in this Agreement as "orders".
     "" means, with respect to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance, the amount calculated by multiplying the face amount of the Canadian Banker's Acceptance by the then Applicable Margin applicable to Eurocurrency Rate Loans, and then multiplying the result by a fraction, the numerator of which is the duration of its term on the basis of the actual number of days to elapse from and including the date of acceptance of the Canadian Banker's Acceptance by the related Canadian Dollar Lender up to but excluding the maturity date of the Canadian Banker's Acceptance and the denominator of which is the number of days in the calendar year in question.
Canadian Banker's Acceptance Fee
     "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Canadian Dollar Loans from the Canadian Dollar Lenders pursuant to (or, in the case of Canadian Banker's Acceptances, a funding thereof by the Canadian Dollar Lenders pursuant to and ).
Canadian Dollar Borrowing
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
Schedule 2.05
     "" means a notice of (a) a Canadian Dollar Borrowing, or (b) a continuation of Canadian Dollar Loans for a new Interest Period, pursuant to , which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice
Section 2.05
Exhibit A-3
     "" means, as to each Canadian Dollar Lender, its obligation to make Canadian Dollar Loans to Anixter Canada Inc. and to accept Canadian Banker's Acceptances pursuant to and in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount of such Lender's Canadian Dollar Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto or in the designation by Anixter accepted by such Canadian Dollar Lender, as applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement..
Canadian Dollar Commitment
Section 2.05
Schedule 2.05
Schedule 2.01
     "" means any Lender that may from time to time accept a designation by Anixter as a Canadian Dollar Lender hereunder with the approval of the Administrative Agent (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld).
Canadian Dollar Lender
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Canadian Dollar Loan
Section 2.05
     "" means a promissory note made by Anixter Canada Inc. in favor of a Canadian Dollar Lender evidencing Canadian Dollar Loans made by such Canadian Dollar Lender, substantially in the form of .
Canadian Dollar Loan Note
Exhibit D-4
     "" means a written notice from a Canadian Dollar Lender informing the Administrative Agent that an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and directing the Administrative Agent to notify all Lenders to fund their participations in the Canadian Dollar Loans as provided in .
Canadian Dollar Participation Funding Notice
Section 2.05
     "" means, with respect to each Canadian Dollar Lender at any time, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such Canadian Dollar
Canadian Dollar Pro Rata Share
 
Lender's Canadian Dollar Commitment comprise of the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments at such time.
     "" means lawful currency of Canada.
Canadian Dollars
     "" means, on any day, with respect to any Loan in Canadian Dollars by a Canadian Dollar Lender, the greater of:
Canadian Prime Rate
     (a) the annual rate of interest expressed as a percentage per annum on the basis of a 365 or 366 day year, as the case may be, announced by such Canadian Dollar Lender on that day as its reference rate for commercial loans made by it in Canada in Canadian Dollars; and
     (b) the CDOR Rate for one month Canadian Dollar banker's acceptances on that day plus 0.75% per annum.
     "" as applied to any Person, means any lease of any property (whether real, personal, or mixed) by that Person as lessee which, in conformity with Agreement Accounting Principles, is or should be accounted for as a capital lease on the balance sheet of that Person.
Capital Lease
     "", with respect to L/C Obligations, has the meaning specified in and, with respect to Canadian Banker's Acceptances, has the meaning specified in .
Cash Collateralize
Section 2.06(g)
Schedule 2.05
     "" means (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States Government or issued by an agency thereof and backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America, in each case maturing within ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof; (ii) money market funds consisting primarily of marketable direct obligations issued by any state or local government of the United States of America maturing within ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof and, at the time of acquisition, having one of the two highest ratings obtainable from either S&P or Moody's (or, if at any time neither S&P nor Moody's shall be rating such obligations, then from such other nationally recognized rating services acceptable to the Administrative Agent) and not listed in Credit Watch published by S&P (or a similar publication of S&P or another nationally recognized rating service); (iii) commercial paper (other than commercial paper issued by AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or any of their Affiliates), domestic and Eurodollar certificates of deposit, time deposits or bankers' acceptances, in any such case maturing no more than ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof and, at the time of the acquisition thereof, the issuer's rating on its commercial paper is at least A-1 or P-1 from either S&P or Moody's (or, if at any time neither S&P nor Moody's shall be rating such obligations, then the highest rating from other nationally recognized rating services acceptable to the Administrative Agent); and (iv) commercial paper (other than commercial paper issued by AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or any of their Affiliates), domestic and Eurodollar certificates of deposit, time deposits or bankers' acceptances, in any such case maturing no more than ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof and, at the time of the acquisition thereof, the issuer is a Lender and has a rating on its commercial paper of at least A-2 or P-2 from either S&P or Moody's (or, if at any time neither S&P nor Moody's shall be rating such obligations, then the
Cash Equivalents
 
equivalent rating from other nationally recognized rating services acceptable to the Administrative Agent), provided the amount of Cash Equivalents under this shall not at any time exceed US$5,000,000.
clause (iv)
     "" means, on any date, with respect to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance and the related Canadian Dollar Lender, the simple average of the rates shown on the display referred to as the "CDOR Page" (or any display substituted therefor) on Reuters Domestic Money Service (or any successor source from time to time) with respect to the banks and other financial institutions named in such display at or about 10:00 a.m. (Toronto time) on such date for banker's acceptances having an identical maturity date to the maturity date of such Canadian Banker's Acceptance, as determined by such Canadian Dollar Lender, or if such day is not a Business Day, then on the immediately preceding Business Day; provided, however, that if such rates are not available, then the CDOR Rate for any day shall be calculated as the average of the bid rates (rounded upwards to the nearest 1/16th of 1%) quoted by such Canadian Dollar Lender for its own bankers' acceptances for the applicable period as of 10:00 a.m. (Toronto time) on such day, as determined by such Canadian Dollar Lender, or if such day is not a Business Day, then on the immediately preceding Business Day.
CDOR Rate
     "" shall occur if:
Change of Control
     (a) any "person," as such term is defined in Section 13(d)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act, other than the Samuel Zell Group, is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of 33% or more of the combined voting power of AXE's or Anixter's outstanding securities ordinarily having the right to vote at elections of directors, and such person at such time owns more of such combined voting power than the Samuel Zell Group; or
     (b) individuals who, at the beginning of any period of 24 consecutive months, constitute AXE's board of directors (together with any new directors whose election by AXE's board of directors or whose nomination for election by AXE's shareholders was approved by a vote of at least a majority of the directors then still in office who either were directors at the beginning of such period or whose election or nomination was previously so approved) cease for any reason (other than death or disability) to constitute a majority of AXE's board of directors then in office.
     "" means the character of certain Loans as Committed Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans or Canadian Dollar Loans.
Class
     "" means the first date all the conditions precedent in are satisfied or waived in accordance with (or, in the case of , waived by the Person entitled to receive the applicable payment).
Closing Date
Section 4.01
Section 4.01
Section 4.01(b)
     "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
     "" means the Securities and Exchange Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
Commission
 
     "" means, as to each Lender, its obligation to (a) make Committed Loans to the Borrowers pursuant to , (b) purchase participations in L/C Obligations, (c) purchase participations in Swing Line Loans, (d) purchase participations in British Pound Sterling Loans and (e) purchase participations in Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances, and in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the US Dollar amount of such Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
Commitment
Section 2.01
Schedule 2.01
     "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Committed Loans of the same Type and, if applicable, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Lenders pursuant to .
Committed Borrowing
Section 2.01
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Committed Loan
Section 2.01
     "" means a promissory note made by Anixter in favor of a Lender evidencing Committed Loans made by such Lender, substantially in the form of .
Committed Loan Note
Exhibit D-1
     "" means a notice of (a) a Committed Borrowing, (b) a conversion of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, or (c) a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type, pursuant to , which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Committed Loan Notice
Section 2.02(a)
Exhibit A-1
     "" means a certificate substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit E
     "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, (i) Consolidated Net Income for such period taken as a single accounting period, (ii) the provision for depreciation and amortization expense of the Consolidated Group for such period, (iii) income taxes of the Consolidated Group for such period, and (iv) net interest expense of the Consolidated Group for such period; that there shall be excluded from Consolidated EBITDA any non-cash, non-operating gains or losses (including, without limitation, extraordinary or unusual gains or losses, gains or losses arising from the sale of capital assets or the sale of owned buildings and properties and other non-recurring gains or losses) during such period.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
plus
plus
provided
     "" means, for any period, the ratio of (a) the sum of Consolidated EBITDA and Rental Expense for such period to (b) the amount of Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense of the Consolidated Group for such period.
Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
     "" means, for any period, the net interest expense of the Consolidated Group (including the interest component of Capital Leases, the interest component of Synthetic Lease Obligations, facility fees, and fees for standby letters of credit, excluding amortization of deferred financing fees) plus consolidated yield or discount accrued on the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction (regardless of the accounting treatment of such Receivables Securitization Transaction) and Rental Expense of the
Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense
 
Consolidated Group for such period calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
     "" means, as of any date of determination, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations and liabilities, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including Obligations hereunder), (b) that portion of obligations with respect to capital leases that are capitalized in the consolidated balance sheet of the Consolidated Group, (c) the principal portion of Synthetic Lease Obligations, (d) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables under Receivables Securitization Transactions, and (e) without duplication, all Accommodation Obligations with respect to Indebtedness of the type specified in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) above of Persons other than any Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Consolidated Funded Indebtedness
     "" means Anixter and each of its Subsidiaries.
Consolidated Group
     "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the net income of the Consolidated Group for that period, determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Net Income
     "" means any pollutant, hazardous substance, hazardous chemical, toxic substance, hazardous waste or special waste, as those terms are defined in federal, state or local laws and regulations, radioactive material, petroleum, including crude oil or any petroleum-derived substance, or breakdown or decomposition product thereof, or any constituent of any such substance or waste, including but not limited to polychlorinated biphenyls and asbestos.
Contaminant
     "" means, as to any Person, any provision of any security issued by such Person or of any agreement, instrument or other undertaking to which such Person is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound.
Contractual Obligation
     "" means each of the following: a Committed Borrowing, a Swing Line Loan, a British Pound Sterling Borrowing, a Canadian Dollar Borrowing and an L/C Credit Extension.
Credit Extension
     "" means:
Customary Permitted Liens
     (a) Liens (other than Environmental Liens, Liens imposed under ERISA or Enforceable Judgments) for claims, taxes, assessments or charges of any Governmental Authority not yet due or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which adequate reserves or other appropriate provisions are being maintained in accordance with GAAP;
     (b) statutory Liens of landlords, bankers, carriers, warehousemen, mechanics, materialmen and other Liens (other than Environmental Liens, Liens imposed under ERISA or Enforceable Judgments) imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and for amounts which (A) are not yet due, (B) are not more than thirty (30) days past due as long as no notice of default has been given or other action taken to enforce such Liens, or (C) (1) are not more than thirty (30) days past due and a notice of
 
default has been given or other action taken to enforce such Liens, or (2) are more than thirty (30) days past due, and, in the case of or , are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which are sufficient to prevent imminent foreclosure of such Liens and with respect to which adequate reserves or other appropriate provisions are being maintained in accordance with GAAP;
clause (1)
(2)
     (c) Liens (other than Environmental Liens, Liens imposed under ERISA or Enforceable Judgments) incurred or deposits made in the ordinary course of business (including, without limitation, surety bonds and appeal bonds) in connection with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other types of employment benefits or to secure the performance of tenders, bids, leases, contracts (other than for the repayment of Indebtedness), statutory obligations and other similar obligations or arising as a result of progress payments under government contracts;
     (d) easements (including, without limitation, reciprocal easement agreements and utility agreements), rights-of-way, covenants, consents, rights of landlords, reservations, encroachments, variations and other restrictions, charges or encumbrances (whether or not recorded) affecting the use of real property, which do not materially interfere with the ordinary conduct of the business of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter;
     (e) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities arising as a matter of law to secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods; and
     (f) precautionary filings of financing statements in connection with assets that are not owned by Anixter or its Subsidiaries (including in connection with Operating Leases entered into in the ordinary course of business).
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Applicable Margin."
Debt Rating
     "" means the Bankruptcy Code of the United States of America, and all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar debtor relief Laws of the United States of America or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect and affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Debtor Relief Laws
     "" means any Event of Default or any event that, with the giving of any notice, the passage of time, or both, would be an Event of Default.
Default
     "" means (a) when used with respect to Obligations other than Letter of Credit Fees, an interest rate equal to (i) the Base Rate (ii) the Applicable Margin, if any, applicable to Base Rate Loans (iii) 2% per annum; , , that (A) with respect to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the Default Rate shall be an interest rate equal to the interest rate (including any Applicable Margin) otherwise applicable to such Loan plus 2% per annum, in each case to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Laws, and (B) with respect to a Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan or a British Pound Sterling Loan following the end of the relevant Interest Period therefor, the Default Rate shall be an interest rate equal to (i) the applicable Overnight Rate (ii) 2% per annum and (C) with respect to a Canadian Dollar Loan, the
Default Rate
plus
plus
provided
however
plus
 
Default Rate shall be an interest rate equal to (i) the applicable Canadian Prime Rate plus (ii) 2% per annum, and (b) when used with respect to Letter of Credit Fees, a rate equal to (i) the Applicable Margin (ii) 2% per annum.
plus
     "" means any Lender that (a) has failed to fund any portion of the Committed Loans, participations in L/C Obligations, participations in Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans or Canadian Banker's Acceptances required to be funded by it hereunder within one Business Day of the date required to be funded by it hereunder, (b) has otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within one Business Day of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute, or (c) has been deemed insolvent or become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding.
Defaulting Lender
     "" or "" means the sale, transfer, license or other disposition (including any sale and leaseback transaction) of any property by any Person, including any sale, assignment, transfer or other disposal, with or without recourse, of any notes or accounts receivable or any rights and claims associated therewith.
Disposition
Dispose
     "" means, with respect to a specified amount of any currency, the amount of US Dollars into which such amount of such currency would be converted, as determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer based on the applicable Spot Rate.
Dollar Equivalent
     "" means Anixter-Real Estate, Inc., an Illinois corporation, Anixter Information Systems Corporation, an Illinois corporation, Anixter Financial Inc., a Delaware corporation and Anixter Procurement Corporation, an Illinois corporation.
Domestic Subsidiaries
     "" means Anixter Eurinvest B.V. and any other Borrowing Subsidiary established under the laws of or resident in the Netherlands.
Dutch Borrower
     "" means (a) a Lender; (b) an Affiliate of a Lender; (c) an Approved Fund; and (d) any other Person (other than a natural person) approved by (i) the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender, and (ii) unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, Anixter (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); that notwithstanding the foregoing, "Eligible Assignee" shall not include Anixter or any of Anixter's Affiliates or Subsidiaries; and , that so long as a Dutch Borrower is party hereto, each Eligible Assignee shall be a PMP.
Eligible Assignee
provided
provided
,
further
     "" means the economic and monetary union in accordance with the Treaty of Rome 1957, as amended by the Single European Act 1986, the Maastricht Treaty of 1992 and the Amsterdam Treaty of 1998.
EMU
     "" means the legislative measures of the European Council for the introduction of, changeover to or operation of a single or unified European currency.
EMU Legislation
     "" means a judgment or order as to which (a) Anixter has not demonstrated to the reasonable satisfaction of the Required Lenders that the Borrowers are covered by third-party insurance (other than retro-premium insurance) therefor and (b) the period, if any, during which the enforcement of such judgment or order is stayed shall have
Enforceable Judgment
 
expired, it being understood that a judgment or order which is under appeal or as to which the time in which to perfect an appeal has not expired shall not be deemed an "" so long as enforcement thereof is effectively stayed pending the outcome of such appeal or the expiration of such period, as the case may be; that if enforcement of a judgment or order has been stayed on condition that a bond or collateral equal to or greater than US$20,000,000 be posted or provided, such judgment or order shall immediately be an "."
Enforceable Judgment
provided
Enforceable Judgment
     "" means all Laws relating to environmental, health, safety and land use matters applicable to any property.
Environmental Laws
     "" means a Lien in favor of any Governmental Authority for (i) any liability of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter under federal or state environmental laws or regulations, or (ii) damages from, or costs incurred by such Governmental Authority in response to, a Release or threatened Release of a Contaminant into the environment.
Environmental Lien
     "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and any regulations issued pursuant thereto.
ERISA
     "" means any (i) corporation which is a member of the same controlled group of corporations (within the meaning of Section 414(b) of the Code) as Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries, (ii) partnership or other trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control (within the meaning of Section 414(c) of the Code) with Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries, and (iii) member of the same affiliated service group (within the meaning of Section 414(m) of the Code) as Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries, any corporation described in clause (i) above or any partnership or trade or business described in clause (ii) above.
ERISA Affiliate
     "" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived), with respect to a Plan; (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by Anixter or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) any Termination Event; or (f) the receipt by Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
     "" and "" mean the lawful currency of the Participating Member States introduced in accordance with the EMU Legislation.
Euro
EUR
     "" means for any Interest Period with respect to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan the rate per annum equal to the British Bankers Association LIBOR Rate (""), as published by Reuters (or other commercially available source providing quotations of BBA LIBOR as designated by the Administrative Agent from time to time) at approximately
Eurocurrency Rate
BBA LIBOR
 
11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, for deposits in the relevant currency (for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period) with a term equivalent to such Interest Period. If such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "Eurocurrency Rate" for such Interest Period shall be the rate per annum determined by the Administrative Agent to be the rate at which deposits in the relevant currency for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period in Same Day Funds in the approximate amount of the Eurocurrency Rate Loan being made, continued or converted by Bank of America and with a term equivalent to such Interest Period would be offered by Bank of America's London Branch (or other Bank of America branch or Affiliate) to major banks in the London or other offshore interbank market for such currency at their request at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
     "" means a Committed Loan that bears interest at a rate based on the Eurocurrency Rate.
Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan
     "" means a Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan or a Loan in a Foreign Currency that bears interest at a rate based on the Eurocurrency Rate.
Eurocurrency Rate Loan
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Event of Default
Section 8.01
     "" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of any Borrower hereunder, (a) taxes imposed on or measured by its overall net income (however denominated), and franchise taxes imposed on it (in lieu of net income taxes), by the jurisdiction (or any political subdivision thereof) under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable Lending Office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which such Borrower is located and (c) except as provided in the following sentence, in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by Anixter under ), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party hereto (or designates a new Lending Office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure or inability (other than as a result of a Change in Law) to comply with , except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new Lending Office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the applicable Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this definition, "Excluded Taxes" shall not include any withholding tax imposed at any time on payments made by or on behalf of a Foreign Obligor to any Lender hereunder or under any other Loan Document, that such Lender shall have complied with the last paragraph of .
Excluded Taxes
Section 10.14
Section 3.01(e)
Section 3.01(a)
provided
Section 3.01(e)
     "" has the meaning specified in the recitals hereto.
Existing Credit Agreement
     "" means the Indebtedness of Anixter and any of its Subsidiaries reflected on , but in any event excluding the Indebtedness evidenced by the Revolving Subordinated Note.
Existing Indebtedness
Schedule 7.01(ii)
 
     "" means the standby letters of credit issued by the L/C Issuer under the Existing Credit Agreement and listed on .
Existing Letters of Credit
Schedule 2.06
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Extending Lender
Section 2.20
     "" means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Business Day next succeeding such day; that (a) if such day is not a Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day, and (b) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate (rounded upward, if necessary, to a whole multiple of 1/100 of 1%) charged to Bank of America on such day on such transactions as determined by the Administrative Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
provided
     "" means, with respect to any Person, any of the chief financial officer, controller or treasurer of such Person and, with respect to Anixter shall include its Vice President-Finance and the Assistant Treasurer.
Financial Officer
     "" means a 13-week accounting period of the Borrowers ending on or about March 31, June 30, September 30 or December 31 of any Fiscal Year.
Fiscal Quarter
     "" means the fiscal year of the Borrowers, which shall be the annual accounting period of the Borrowers ending on the Friday closest to December 31 of each year.
Fiscal Year
     "" means Fitch Ratings and any successor thereto.
Fitch
     "" means a currency other than US Dollars.
Foreign Currency
     "" means, at any time, with respect to any amount denominated in US Dollars, the equivalent amount thereof in the applicable Foreign Currency as determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, at such time on the basis of the Spot Rate (determined in respect of the most recent Revaluation Date) for the purchase of such Foreign Currency with US Dollars.
Foreign Currency Equivalent
     "" means a Swing Line Loan made in British Pound Sterling, Canadian Dollars or an Available Currency other than US Dollars.
Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan
     "" means any plan, program, policy, agreement or contract maintained or contributed to or for the benefit of employees or Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate which is governed by the laws of a jurisdiction outside the United States of America.
Foreign Employee Benefit Plan
     "" means, with respect to any Borrower, any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which such Borrower is resident for tax purposes. For purposes of this definition, the United States, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed, collectively, to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
 
     "" means a Loan Party that is a Foreign Subsidiary.
Foreign Obligor
     "" means any pension plan or other deferred compensation plan, program or arrangement maintained or contributed to or for the benefit of employees of Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate, which, under the applicable local law, is required to be funded through a trust or other funding vehicle and which is governed by the laws of a jurisdiction outside the United States of America.
Foreign Pension Plan
     "" means Anixter Puerto Rico, Inc., Anixter Venezuela Inc., Anixter Thailand Inc., Anixter Philippines Inc. and any of Anixter's Subsidiaries which are incorporated in any jurisdiction outside of the United States, and their respective successors and assigns.
Foreign Subsidiaries
     "" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is (or will be) engaged in making, purchasing, holding or otherwise investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business.
Fund
     "" means generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or such other principles as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, that are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
GAAP
     "" means any nation or government, any state or other political subdivision thereof, any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, administrative tribunal, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government, and any corporation or other entity owned or controlled, through stock or capital ownership or otherwise, by any of the foregoing.
Governmental Authority
     "" means (a) Anixter, AXE and each Domestic Subsidiary, and (b) each Subsidiary that becomes a Guarantor as provided in .
Guarantors
Section 6.11
     "" means the Guaranty made by the Guarantors in favor of the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Lenders, substantially in the form of .
Guaranty
Exhibit G
     "" means interest rate, foreign currency or commodity exchange, swap, collar, cap, option, forward, futures or similar agreements entered into by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to which Anixter or such Subsidiary has hedged its interest rate, foreign currency or commodity exposure.
Hedging Contracts
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Honor Date
Section 2.06(c)(i)
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Increase Effective Date
Section 2.18(c)
 
     "" means, as to any Person at a particular time, all of the following (without duplication):
Indebtedness
     (i) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money and all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, loan agreements or other similar instruments;
     (ii) any direct or contingent obligations of such Person arising under letters of credit (including standby and commercial), banker's acceptances, bank guaranties, surety bonds and similar instruments;
     (iii) net obligations under any Hedging Contract in an amount equal to (i) if such Hedging Contract has been closed out, the termination value thereof, or (ii) if such Hedging Contract has not been closed out, the mark-to-market value thereof determined on the basis of readily available quotations provided by any recognized dealer in such Hedging Contract;
     (iv) whether or not so included as liabilities in accordance with GAAP, all obligations of such Person to pay the deferred purchase price of property or services, and indebtedness (excluding prepaid interest thereon) secured by a Lien on property owned or being purchased by such Person (including indebtedness arising under conditional sales or other title retention agreements), whether or not such indebtedness shall have been assumed by such Person or is limited in recourse;
     (v) Capital Leases and Synthetic Lease Obligations;
     (vi) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of such Person in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction; and
     (vii) all Accommodation Obligations of such Person in respect of any of the foregoing.
     For all purposes hereof, the Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any partnership or joint venture in which such Person is a general partner or a joint venturer, unless such Indebtedness is expressly made non-recourse to such Person except for customary exceptions acceptable to the Required Lenders. The amount of any Capital Lease or Synthetic Lease Obligation as of any date shall be deemed to be the amount of Attributable Indebtedness in respect thereof as of such date.
     "" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Indemnitees
Section 10.04(b)
     "" means, (a) as to any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable to such Loan; , , that if any Interest Period for a Eurocurrency Rate Loan exceeds three months, the respective dates that fall every three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be Interest Payment Dates; and
Interest Payment Date
provided
however
 
(b) as to any Base Rate Loan, the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December and the Maturity Date.
     "" means as to each Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the period commencing on the date such Eurocurrency Rate Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a Eurocurrency Rate Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, as selected by the related Borrower in its Committed Loan Notice, British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice or Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice, as the case may be; that:
Interest Period
provided
     (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day;
     (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and
     (c) no Interest Period shall extend beyond the scheduled Maturity Date.
     "" has the meaning assigned to that term in .
Investment
Section 7.03
     "" means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
     "" means, with respect to any Letter of Credit, the "International Standby Practices 1998" published by the Institute of International Banking Law & Practice (or such later version thereof as may be in effect at the time of issuance).
ISP
     "" means with respect to any Letter of Credit, the Letter of Credit Application and any other document, agreement and instrument entered into by the L/C Issuer and Anixter (or any Subsidiary) or in favor the L/C Issuer and relating to any such Letter of Credit.
Issuer Documents
     "" means, collectively, all international, foreign, Federal, state and local statutes, treaties, rules, guidelines, regulations, ordinances, codes and administrative or judicial precedents or authorities, including the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority charged with the enforcement, interpretation or administration thereof, and all applicable administrative orders, directed duties, requests, licenses, authorizations and permits of, and agreements with, any Governmental Authority, in each case whether or not having the force of law.
Laws
     "" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's funding of its participation in any L/C Borrowing in accordance with its Pro Rata Share.
L/C Advance
     "" means an extension of credit resulting from a drawing under any Letter of Credit which has not been reimbursed on the date when made or refinanced as a Committed Borrowing.
L/C Borrowing
 
     "" means, with respect to any Letter of Credit, the issuance thereof or extension of the expiry date thereof, or the increase of the amount thereof.
L/C Credit Extension
     "" means Bank of America in its capacity as issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, or any successor issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder.
L/C Issuer
     "" means, as at any date of determination, the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit the aggregate of all Unreimbursed Amounts, including all L/C Borrowings. For all purposes of this Agreement, if on any date of determination a Letter of Credit has expired by its terms but any amount may still be drawn thereunder by reason of the operation of Rule 3.14 of the ISP, such Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be "outstanding" in the amount so remaining available to be drawn.
L/C Obligations
plus
     "" has the meaning specified in the introductory paragraph hereto and, as the context requires, includes the Swing Line Lender.
Lender
     "" means, as to any Lender, the office or offices of such Lender described as such on , or such other office or offices as a Lender may from time to time notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent.
Lending Office
Schedule 10.02
     "" means any standby letter of credit issued hereunder and any Existing Letter of Credit. Letters of Credit may be issued in an Available Currency.
Letter of Credit
     "" means an application and agreement for the issuance or amendment of a Letter of Credit in the form from time to time in use by the L/C Issuer.
Letter of Credit Application
     "" means the day that is seven days prior to the Maturity Date then in effect (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day).
Letter of Credit Expiration Date
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Letter of Credit Fee
Section 2.05(i)
     "" means an amount equal to US$20,000,000. The Letter of Credit Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
Letter of Credit Sublimit
     "" means, as of any date of determination, for Anixter and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of (a) Consolidated Funded Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of the four Fiscal Quarters ending on such date, that, for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated on a pro forma basis (in accordance with Article 11 of Regulation S-X of the Securities and Exchange Commission) to the extent necessary to give effect to (a) any acquisition made by Anixter or any Subsidiary during such period (without giving effect to any increase in Consolidated EBITDA reflecting projected synergies resulting from such acquisition) so long as, and to the extent that, (i) Anixter delivers to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly deliver to each Lender) a summary in reasonable detail of the assumptions underlying, and the calculations made, in computing Consolidated EBITDA on a pro forma basis and (ii) the Required Lenders do not object to such assumptions and/or calculations within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof; and (b) any divestiture of a Subsidiary, division or other operating unit made during such period.
Leverage Ratio
provided
 
     "" means all liabilities, claims, obligations, responsibilities, losses, damages, punitive damages, consequential damages, treble damages, charges, costs and expenses (including, without limitation, attorneys', experts' and consulting fees and costs of investigation and feasibility studies), fines, penalties and monetary sanctions, interest, direct or indirect, known or unknown, absolute or contingent, past, present or future.
Liabilities and Costs
     "" means any mortgage, pledge, hypothecation, assignment, deposit arrangement, encumbrance, lien (statutory or other), Environmental Lien, Enforceable Judgment, charge, or preference, priority or other security interest or preferential arrangement of any kind or nature whatsoever (including any conditional sale or other title retention agreement, the interest of a lessor under a Capital Lease, any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing, and the filing of any financing statement under the Uniform Commercial Code or comparable Laws of any jurisdiction), including the interest of a purchaser of accounts receivable.
Lien
     "" means an extension of credit by a Lender to a Borrower under in the form of a Committed Loan, Swing Line Loan, British Pound Sterling Loan or Canadian Dollar Loan.
Loan
Article II
     "" means this Agreement, each Note, the Guaranty, the Agent/Arranger Fee Letters, each Request for Credit Extension, each Issuer Document, each Canadian Banker's Acceptance and each Compliance Certificate.
Loan Documents
     "" means, collectively, the Borrowers and the Guarantors.
Loan Parties
     "" means, with respect to any period, the percentage rate per annum determined in accordance with .
Mandatory Cost
Schedule 1.01
     "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Regulation U.
Margin Stock
     "" means (a) a material adverse change in, or a material adverse effect upon, the operations, assets, liabilities (actual or contingent), business, properties, financial condition or prospects of AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole; (b) a material impairment of the ability of the Loan Parties (taken as a whole) to perform the obligations of all Loan Parties under any Loan Document to which it is a party; or (c) a material adverse effect upon the legality, validity, binding effect or enforceability against any Loan Party of any Loan Document to which it is a party or the rights and remedies of the Lenders under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
     "" means any sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance or other disposition of (i) assets of any member of the Consolidated Group or (ii) capital stock of any member of the Consolidated Group which, when combined with all such other sales, assignments, transfers, conveyances or other dispositions in the immediately preceding twelve-month period represents the disposition of an amount which is greater than ten percent (10.0%) of the Consolidated Group's (x) assets or (y) revenues.
Material Transaction
     "" means the earlier of (a) the Scheduled Maturity Date, or (b) such earlier date upon which the Commitments may be terminated in accordance with the terms hereof.
Maturity Date
 
     "" means (a) in the case of US Dollars, US$5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of US$1,000,000; and (b) in the case of any other Available Currency, an amount equal to US$5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of 1,000,000 units of such currency.
Minimum Tranche
     "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and any successor thereto.
Moody's
     "" means a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA which is, or within the immediately preceding six (6) years was, contributed to by Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate.
Multiemployer Plan
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Non-Extending Lender
Section 2.20
     "" means, collectively, the Committed Loan Notes, the Swing Line Loan Note, the British Pound Sterling Loan Notes and the Canadian Dollar Loan Notes.
Notes
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Notice Date
Section 2.20
     "" means all advances to, and debts, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of, any Loan Party arising under any Loan Document or otherwise with respect to any Loan, Canadian Banker's Acceptance or Letter of Credit, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest that accrues after the commencement by or against any Loan Party or any Affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Laws naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding.
Obligations
     "" means, as to any corporation, a certificate executed on behalf of such corporation by a Financial Officer of such corporation.
Officers' Certificate
     "" means, as applied to any Person, any lease of any Property by that Person as lessee which is not a Capital Lease.
Operating Lease
     "" means, (a) with respect to any corporation, the certificate or articles of incorporation and the bylaws (or equivalent or comparable constitutive documents with respect to any non-U.S. jurisdiction); (b) with respect to any limited liability company, the certificate or articles of formation or organization and operating agreement; and (c) with respect to any partnership, joint venture, trust or other form of business entity, the partnership, joint venture or other applicable agreement of formation or organization and any agreement, instrument, filing or notice with respect thereto filed in connection with its formation or organization with the applicable Governmental Authority in the jurisdiction of its formation or organization and, if applicable, any certificate or articles of formation or organization of such entity, in each case as amended from time to time.
Organization Documents
     "" means all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or under any other Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement or any other Loan Document, but excluding in any event any Excluded Taxes.
Other Taxes
 
     "" means (a) with respect to Committed Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans and Canadian Dollar Loans on any date, the aggregate outstanding principal Dollar Equivalent amount thereof after giving effect to any borrowings and prepayments or repayments of Committed Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans and Canadian Dollar Loans, as the case may be, occurring on such date, (b) with respect to any L/C Obligations on any date, the Dollar Equivalent amount of the aggregate outstanding amount of such L/C Obligations on such date after giving effect to any L/C Credit Extension occurring on such date and any other changes in the aggregate amount of the L/C Obligations as of such date, including as a result of any reimbursements by Anixter of Unreimbursed Amounts, and (c) with respect to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance, the Dollar Equivalent amount of the unpaid portion of the face amount thereof.
Outstanding Amount
     "" means, for any day, (a) with respect to any amount denominated in US Dollars, the greater of (i) the Federal Funds Rate and (ii) an overnight rate determined by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender, as the case may be, in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation, and (b) with respect to any amount denominated in a Foreign Currency, the rate of interest per annum at which overnight deposits in the applicable Foreign Currency, in an amount approximately equal to the amount with respect to which such rate is being determined, would be offered for such day by a branch or Affiliate of Bank of America in the applicable offshore interbank market for such currency to major banks in such interbank market.
Overnight Rate
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Participant
Section 10.07(d)
     "" means each state so described in any EMU Legislation.
Participating Member State
     "" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.
PBGC
     "" means any "employee pension benefit plan" (as such term is defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), other than a Multiemployer Plan, that is subject to Title IV of ERISA and is sponsored or maintained by Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate or to which Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate contributes or has an obligation to contribute, or in the case of a multiple employer plan (as described in Section 4064(a) of ERISA) has made contributions at any time during the immediately preceding five plan years.
Pension Plan
     "" means any permit, approval, consent, authorization, license, variance, or permission required from a Governmental Authority under an applicable Requirement of Law.
Permits
     "" means the Liens on any property of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter, in each case reflected on .
Permitted Existing Liens
Schedule 7.02(b)
     "" means any individual, trustee, corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated organization, bank, business association, firm, joint venture, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
     "" means an employee benefit plan defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA in respect of which either Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate is, or within the immediately preceding six (6) years was, an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
 
     "" means, with respect to each Lender, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such Lender's Commitment comprises of the Aggregate Commitments, as such share may be adjusted as contemplated herein.
Pro Rata Share
     "" or "" means a professional market party as defined in the Dutch Financial Supervision Act ("").
Professional Market Party
PMP
Wet op het financieel toezicht
     "" means with respect to any Person, any real or personal property, plant, building, facility, structure, equipment or unit, or other asset (tangible or intangible) owned, leased or operated by such Person.
Property
     "" means a special purpose entity that is a Subsidiary established for a Receivables Securitization Transaction.
Receivables Securitization SPV
     "" means any sale, assignment or other transfer by Anixter or any Subsidiary of accounts receivable, lease receivables or other payment obligations owing to Anixter or such Subsidiary or any interest in any of the foregoing, together in each case with any collections and other proceeds thereof, any collection or deposit accounts related thereto, and any collateral, guaranties or other property or claims in favor of Anixter or such Subsidiary supporting or securing payment by the obligor thereon of, or otherwise related to, any such receivables.
Receivables Securitization Transaction
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Register
Section 10.06(c)
     "" means, with respect to any Person, such Person's Affiliates and the partners, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and of such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
     "" means any release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, injection, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration from any Property into the indoor or outdoor environment, including the movement of Contaminants through or in the air, soil, surface water, groundwater or Property.
Release
     "" means any action required to (i) clean up, remove, treat or in any other way address Contaminants in the indoor or outdoor environment; (ii) prevent a Release or threat of Release or minimize the further Release of Contaminants so they do not migrate or endanger or threaten to endanger public health or welfare or the indoor or outdoor environment; or (iii) perform pre-remedial studies and investigations or post-remedial monitoring and care.
Remedial Action
     "" means, for any period, the total rental expense for Operating Leases of the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Rental Expense
     "" means any of the events set forth in Section 4043 of ERISA.
Reportable Event
     "" means (a) with respect to a Borrowing, conversion or continuation of Committed Loans, a Committed Loan Notice, (b) with respect to a Swing Line Loan, a Swing Line Loan Notice, (c) with respect to a Borrowing or continuation of British
Request for Credit Extension
 
Pound Sterling Loans, a British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice, (d) with respect to a Credit Extension under the Canadian Dollar Commitments, a Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice, and (e) with respect to an L/C Credit Extension, a Letter of Credit Application.
     "" means, as of any date of determination, Lenders whose Voting Percentages aggregate more than 50%.
Required Lenders
     "" means, as to any Person, the Organization Documents or other organizational or governing documents of such Person, and any law, rule or regulation, Permit, or determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to or binding upon such Person or any of its Property or to which such Person or any of its property is subject, including, without limitation, the Securities Act, the Securities Exchange Act, Regulation T, Regulation U and Regulation X, and any certificate of occupancy, zoning ordinance, building, environmental or land use, law, rule, regulation, ordinance or Permit or occupational safety or health law, rule or regulation.
Requirements of Law
     "" means the president, chief financial officer, treasurer or assistant treasurer of a Loan Party or such other person designated as such by any of the foregoing officers of such Loan Party. Any document delivered hereunder that is signed by a Responsible Officer of a Loan Party shall be conclusively presumed to have been authorized by all necessary corporate, partnership and/or other action on the part of such Loan Party and such Responsible Officer shall be conclusively presumed to have acted on behalf of such Loan Party.
Responsible Officer
     "" means (a) with respect to any Loan, each of the following: (i) each date of a Borrowing of a Loan denominated in a Foreign Currency, (ii) each date of a continuation of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan denominated in a Foreign Currency pursuant to , and (iii) such additional dates as the Administrative Agent shall determine or the Required Lenders shall require; (b) with respect to any Letter of Credit, each of the following: (i) each date of issuance of a Letter of Credit denominated in a Foreign Currency, (ii) each date of an amendment of any such Letter of Credit having the effect of increasing the amount thereof (solely with respect to the increased amount), (iii) each date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under any Letter of Credit denominated in a Foreign Currency, and (iv) such additional dates as the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer shall determine or the Required Lenders shall require; and (c) with respect to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance, each of the following: (i) each date of the funding of such Canadian Banker's Acceptance and (ii) such additional dates as the Administrative Agent shall determine or the related Canadian Dollar Lender shall require.
Revaluation Date
Section 2.02
     "" means the demand promissory note from Anixter to AXE dated October 6, 2000, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented.
Revolving Subordinated Note
     "" means (i) with respect to disbursements and payments in US Dollars, immediately available funds, and (ii) with respect to disbursements and payments in any other currency, same day or other funds as may be determined by the Administrative Agent to be customary in the place of disbursement or payment for the settlement of international banking transactions in such currency.
Same Day Funds
 
     "" means Samuel Zell or any of his affiliates (as such term is defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act) or associates (as such term is defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act), and his heirs and beneficiaries.
Samuel Zell Group
     "" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. and any successor thereto.
S&P
     "" means April 20, 2012, or, if extended pursuant to , April 20, 2013.
Scheduled Maturity Date
Section 2.20
     "" means the Securities Act of 1933.
Securities Act
     "" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Securities Exchange Act
     "" means, when used with respect to any Person, that at the time of determination:
Solvent
     (i) the fair value of its assets (both at fair valuation and at present fair saleable value) is equal to or in excess of the total amount of its liabilities, including, without limitation, contingent liabilities; and
     (ii) it is then able and expected to be able to pay its debts as they mature; and
     (iii) it has capital sufficient to carry on its business as conducted and as proposed to be conducted.
With respect to contingent liabilities (such as litigation, guarantees and pension plan liabilities), such liabilities shall be computed at the amount which, in light of all the facts and circumstances existing at the time, represent the amount which can reasonably be expected to become an actual or matured liability.
     "" for a currency means the rate determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as applicable, to be the rate quoted by the Person acting in such capacity as the spot rate for the purchase by such Person of such currency with another currency through its principal foreign exchange trading office at approximately 11:00 a.m. on the date two Business Days prior to the date as of which the foreign exchange computation is made; that the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer may obtain such spot rate from another financial institution designated by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer if the Person acting in such capacity does not have as of the date of determination a spot buying rate for any such currency; and that the L/C Issuer may use such spot rate quoted on the date as of which the foreign exchange computation is made in the case of any Letter of Credit denominated in a Foreign Currency.
Spot Rate
provided
provided
further
     "" of a Person means a corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other business entity of which a majority of the shares of securities or other interests having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body (other than securities or interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency) are at the time beneficially directly or indirectly owned by such Person. Unless otherwise specified,
Subsidiary
 
all references herein to a "Subsidiary" or to "Subsidiaries" shall refer to a Subsidiary or Subsidiaries of Anixter.
     "" means the revolving credit facility made available by the Swing Line Lender pursuant to .
Swing Line
Section 2.03
     "" means a borrowing of a Swing Line Loan pursuant to .
Swing Line Borrowing
Section 2.03
     "" means Bank of America in its capacity as provider of Swing Line Loans, or any successor swing line lender hereunder.
Swing Line Lender
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Swing Line Loan
Section 2.03(a)
     "" means a notice of a Swing Line Borrowing pursuant to , which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Swing Line Loan Notice
Section 2.03(b)
Exhibit B
     "" means an amount equal to US$15,000,000. The Swing Line Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
Swing Line Sublimit
     "" means the monetary obligation of a Person under (a) a so-called synthetic, off-balance sheet or tax retention lease, or (b) an agreement for the use or possession of property creating obligations that do not appear on the balance sheet of such Person but which, upon the insolvency or bankruptcy of such Person, would be characterized as the indebtedness of such Person (without regard to accounting treatment).
Synthetic Lease Obligation
     "" means any day on which the Trans-European Automated Real-time Gross Settlement Express Transfer (TARGET) payment system (or, if such payment system ceases to be operative, such other payment system (if any) determined by the Administrative Agent to be a suitable replacement) is open for the settlement of payments in Euro.
TARGET Day
     "" means all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, withholdings, assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
     "" means a (i) Reportable Event with respect to any Benefit Plan; (ii) the withdrawal of Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate from a Benefit Plan during a plan year in which Anixter or such ERISA Affiliate was a "substantial employer" as defined in Section 4001(a)(2) of ERISA; (iii) the imposition of an obligation of Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate under Section 4041 of ERISA to provide affected parties written notice of intent to terminate a Benefit Plan in a distress termination described in Section 4041(c) of ERISA; (iv) the institution by the PBGC or any similar foreign governmental authority of proceedings to terminate a Benefit Plan or a Foreign Pension Plan, (v) any event or condition which might constitute grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Benefit Plan; (vi) a foreign governmental authority shall appoint or institute proceedings to appoint a trustee to administer any Foreign Pension Plan; or (vii) the partial or complete withdrawal of Anixter of any ERISA Affiliate from a Multiemployer Plan or a Foreign Pension Plan.
Termination Event
 
     "" means at any time the aggregate principal amount (or Dollar Equivalent principal amount, as applicable) of all Loans and all L/C Obligations and the Dollar Equivalent amount of the unpaid portion of the face amount of all Canadian Banker's Acceptances.
Total Outstandings
     "" means the reasonable fees, costs and expenses payable by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant hereto or in connection herewith or in respect hereof or of the other Loan Documents.
Transaction Costs
     "" means the Loan Documents, and the Revolving Subordinated Note.
Transaction Documents
     "" means (a) with respect to a Committed Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a Eurocurrency Rate Loan, and as a Loan in US Dollars, Euros or another Available Currency, (b) with respect to a Swing Line Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan and (c) with respect to a British Pound Sterling Loan or a Canadian Dollar Loan, its character as a Loan in a particular currency bearing interest at a rate based on the Eurocurrency Rate, the Canadian Prime Rate, the applicable Overnight Rate or other interest rate.
Type
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Unreimbursed Amount
Section 2.06(c)(i)
     "" means Committed Loans which are Eurocurrency Rate Loans and are denominated in US Dollars.
US Dollar Eurocurrency Rate Loans
     "" or "" means dollars constituting legal tender for the payment of public and private debts in the United States of America.
US Dollars
US$
     "" means, as to any Lender, (a) at any time when the Commitments are in effect, such Lender's Pro Rata Share and (b) at any time after the termination of the Commitments, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) which (i) the sum of (A) the Outstanding Amount of such Lender's Committed Loans, (B) such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations, then constitutes of (ii) the Total Outstandings; , , that if any Lender has failed to fund any portion of the Committed Loans, or participations in Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances or L/C Obligations required to be funded by it hereunder, such Lender's Voting Percentage shall be deemed to be 0-, and the respective Pro Rata Shares and Voting Percentages of the other Lenders shall be recomputed for purposes of this definition and the definition of "Required Lenders" without regard to such Lender's Commitment or the outstanding amount of its Committed Loans, as the case may be.
Voting Percentage
plus
provided
however
 
     
1.02 Other Interpretive Provisions.
     With reference to this Agreement and each other Loan Document, unless otherwise specified herein or in such other Loan Document:
     (a) The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "," "" and "" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation." The word "" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "." Unless the context requires otherwise, (i) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document (including any Organization Document) shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein or in any other Loan Document), (ii) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (iii) the words "," "" and "," and words of similar import when used in any Loan Document, shall be construed to refer to such Loan Document in its entirety and not to any particular provision thereof, (iv) all references in a Loan Document to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, the Loan Document in which such references appear, (v) any reference to any law shall include all statutory and regulatory provisions consolidating, amending replacing or interpreting such law and any reference to any law or regulation shall, unless otherwise specified, refer to such law or regulation as amended, modified or supplemented from time to time, and (vi) the words "" and "" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
include
includes
including
will
shall
herein
hereof
hereunder
asset
property
     (b) The term "" includes any and all instruments, documents, agreements, certificates, notices, reports, financial statements and other writings, however evidenced.
documents
     (c) In the computation of periods of time from a specified date to a later specified date, the word "" means ""; the words "" and "" each mean ""; and the word "" means "."
from
from and including
to
until
to but excluding
through
to and including
     (d) Section headings herein and the other Loan Documents are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document.
     All accounting terms not specifically or completely defined herein shall be construed in conformity with, and all financial data including financial ratios and other financial calculations required to be submitted pursuant to this Agreement shall be prepared in conformity with, GAAP applied on a consistent basis, as in effect from time to time, applied in a manner consistent with that used in preparing the Audited Financial Statements, except as otherwise specifically prescribed herein.
1.03 Accounting Terms.
 
     (a) The Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as applicable, shall determine the Spot Rates as of each Revaluation Date to be used for calculating Dollar Equivalent amounts of Credit Extensions and Outstanding Amounts denominated in Available Foreign Currencies. Such Spot Rates shall become effective as of such Revaluation Date and shall be the Spot Rates employed in converting any amounts between the applicable currencies until the next Revaluation Date to occur. Except for purposes of financial statements delivered by Loan Parties hereunder or calculating financial covenants hereunder or except as otherwise provided herein, the applicable amount of any currency (other than US Dollars) for purposes of the Loan Documents shall be such Dollar Equivalent amount as so determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as applicable.
1.04 Exchange Rates; Currency Equivalents.
     (b) Wherever in this Agreement in connection with a Committed Borrowing, conversion, continuation or prepayment of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan or the issuance, amendment or extension of a Letter of Credit, an amount, such as a required minimum or multiple amount, is expressed in US Dollars, but such Committed Borrowing, Eurocurrency Rate Loan or Letter of Credit is denominated in an Available Foreign Currency, such amount shall be the relevant Available Foreign Currency Equivalent of such Dollar amount (rounded to the nearest unit of such Available Foreign Currency, with 0.5 of a unit being rounded upward), as determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be.
     (a) Each obligation of the Borrowers to make a payment denominated in the national currency unit of any member state of the European Union that adopts the Euro as its lawful currency after the date hereof shall be redenominated into Euro at the time of such adoption (in accordance with the EMU Legislation). If, in relation to the currency of any such member state, the basis of accrual of interest expressed in this Agreement in respect of that currency shall be inconsistent with any convention or practice in the London interbank market for the basis of accrual of interest in respect of the Euro, such expressed basis shall be replaced by such convention or practice with effect from the date on which such member state adopts the Euro as its lawful currency; provided that if any Eurocurrency Rate Loan in the currency of such member state is outstanding immediately prior to such date, such replacement shall take effect, with respect to such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, at the end of the then current Interest Period.
1.05 Change of Currency.
     (b) Each provision of this Agreement shall be subject to such reasonable changes of construction as the Administrative Agent may from time to time specify to be appropriate to reflect the adoption of the Euro by any member state of the European Union and any relevant market conventions or practices relating to the Euro.
     (c) Each provision of this Agreement also shall be subject to such reasonable changes of construction as the Administrative Agent may from time to time specify to be appropriate to reflect a change in currency of any other country and any relevant market conventions or practices relating to the change in currency.
     Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to times of day shall be references to Eastern time (daylight or standard, as applicable).
1.06 Times of Day.
 
     Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to the amount of a Letter of Credit at any time shall be deemed to mean the Dollar Equivalent of the maximum face amount of such Letter of Credit after giving effect to all increases thereof contemplated by such Letter of Credit or the Issuer Documents related thereto, whether or not such maximum face amount is in effect at such time.
1.07 Letter of Credit Amounts.
     Any financial ratios required to be maintained by the Borrowers pursuant to this Agreement shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number (with a rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
1.08 Rounding.
     
2.01 Committed Loans.
     Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender severally agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") in Available Currencies to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date to the Maturity Date, in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of such Lender's Commitment; , , that after giving effect to any Committed Borrowing, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments and (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations, shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment. Within the limits of each Lender's Commitment, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this , prepay under , and reborrow under this . Committed Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
Committed Loan
provided
however
plus
Section 2.01
Section 2.07
Section 2.01
     
2.02 Borrowings, Conversions and Continuations of Committed Loans.
     (a) Each Committed Borrowing, each conversion of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, and each continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type shall be made upon the applicable Borrower's irrevocable notice to the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., (i) three Business Days prior to the requested date of any Committed Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans or of any conversion of US Dollar Eurocurrency Rate Loans to Base Rate Loans, and (ii) on the requested date of any Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans. Each such telephonic notice must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a written Committed Loan Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of such Borrower. Each Committed Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans shall be in a principal Dollar Equivalent amount of US$5,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$1,000,000 in excess thereof. Each Committed Borrowing of or conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$500,000 or a whole multiple of US$100,000 in excess thereof. Each Committed Loan
 
Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify (i) whether a Borrower is requesting a Committed Borrowing, a conversion of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, or a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type, (ii) the requested date of the Borrowing, conversion or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day), (iii) the principal amount of Committed Loans to be borrowed, converted or continued, (iv) the Type (including currency) of Committed Loans to be borrowed or to which existing Committed Loans are to be converted, and (v) if applicable, the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto. If a Borrower fails to specify a Type of Committed Loan in a Committed Loan Notice or if a Borrower fails to give a timely notice requesting a conversion or continuation, then the applicable Committed Loans, if in US Dollars, shall be made or continued as, or converted to, Base Rate Loans. Any such automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be effective as of the last day of the Interest Period then in effect with respect to the applicable Eurocurrency Rate Loans. If a Borrower requests a Borrowing of, conversion to, or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans in any such Committed Loan Notice, but fails to specify an Interest Period, it will be deemed to have specified an Interest Period of one month.
     (b) Following receipt of a Committed Loan Notice, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of its Pro Rata Share of the applicable Committed Loans, and if no timely notice of a conversion or continuation is provided by a Borrower the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details of any automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans described in the preceding subsection. In the case of a Committed Borrowing, each Lender shall make the amount of its Committed Loan available to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the applicable currency at the Administrative Agent's Office not later than 1:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified in the applicable Committed Loan Notice. Upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in (and, if such Borrowing is the initial Credit Extension, ), the Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received available to the applicable Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by (i) crediting the account of such Borrower on the books of Bank of America with the amount of such funds or (ii) wire transfer of such funds, in each case in accordance with instructions provided to the Administrative Agent by such Borrower.
Section 4.02
Section 4.01
     (c) Except as otherwise provided herein, a Eurocurrency Rate Loan may be continued or converted only on the last day of the Interest Period for such Eurocurrency Rate Loan. During the existence of a Default or Event of Default, no Committed Loans in US Dollars may be requested as, converted to or continued as Eurocurrency Rate Loans without the consent of the Required Lenders, and the Required Lenders may demand that any or all of the then outstanding US Dollar Eurocurrency Rate Loans be converted immediately to Base Rate Loans.
     (d) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify Anixter and the Lenders of the interest rate applicable to any Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan upon determination of such interest rate. The determination of the Eurocurrency Rate by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error. The Administrative Agent shall notify Anixter and the Lenders of any change in Bank of America's prime rate used in determining the Base Rate promptly following the public announcement of such change.
 
     (e) After giving effect to all Committed Borrowings, all conversions of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Committed Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than ten Interest Periods in effect with respect to Committed Loans.
     
2.03 Swing Line Loans.
     (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swing Line Lender agrees, in reliance upon the agreements of the other Lenders set forth in this , to make loans in US Dollars or, in the case of any borrowing at the request of a Borrower if the Swing Line Lender, in its sole discretion, approves, in Available Currencies, British Pound Sterling or Canadian Dollars (each such loan, a "") to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period in an aggregate Dollar Equivalent amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of the Swing Line Sublimit, notwithstanding the fact that such Swing Line Loans, when aggregated with the Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of Committed Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations of the Lender acting as Swing Line Lender, may exceed the amount of such Lender's Commitment; , , that after giving effect to any Swing Line Loan, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, and (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances, L/C Obligations and Swing Line Loans shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment. Within the foregoing limits, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this , prepay under , and reborrow under this . Each Swing Line Loan in US Dollars shall be a Base Rate Loan. Immediately upon the making of a Swing Line Loan, each Lender shall be deemed to, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees to, purchase from the Swing Line Lender a risk participation in such Swing Line Loan in an amount equal to the product of such Lender's Pro Rata Share times the amount of such Swing Line Loan.
The Swing Line
Section 2.03
Swing Line Loan
provided
however
plus
Section 2.03
Section 2.06
Section 2.03
     (b) . Each Swing Line Borrowing shall be made upon the applicable Borrower's irrevocable notice to the Swing Line Lender and the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Swing Line Lender and the Administrative Agent not later than 1:00 p.m. on the requested borrowing date, and shall specify (i) the amount to be borrowed, which shall be a minimum of US$500,000, and (ii) the requested borrowing date, which shall be a Business Day. Each such telephonic notice must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Swing Line Lender and the Administrative Agent of a written Swing Line Loan Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of the applicable Borrower. Promptly after receipt by the Swing Line Lender of any telephonic Swing Line Loan Notice, the Swing Line Lender will confirm with the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) that the Administrative Agent has also received such Swing Line Loan Notice and, if not, the Swing Line Lender will notify the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) of the contents thereof. Unless the Swing Line Lender has received notice (by telephone or in writing) from the Administrative Agent (including at the request of any Lender) prior to 2:00 p.m. on the date of the proposed Swing Line Borrowing (A) directing the Swing Line Lender not to make such Swing Line Loan as a result of the limitations set forth in the proviso to the first sentence of , or (B) that one or more of the applicable
Borrowing Procedures
Section 2.03(a)
 
conditions specified in is not then satisfied, then, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the Swing Line Lender will, not later than 3:00 p.m. on the borrowing date specified in such Swing Line Loan Notice, make the amount of its Swing Line Loan available to the applicable Borrower at its office by crediting the account of the applicable Borrower on the books of the Swing Line Lender in Same Day Funds (or in such other manner as the Swing Line Lender may direct, in the case of a Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan).
Article IV
     (c) .
Refinancing of Swing Line Loans
     (i) The Swing Line Lender at any time in its sole and absolute discretion may request, on behalf of the applicable Borrower (which hereby irrevocably authorizes the Swing Line Lender to so request on its behalf), that each Lender make a Base Rate Committed Loan in an amount equal to such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the amount of Swing Line Loans then outstanding. Such request shall be made in writing (which written request shall be deemed to be a Committed Loan Notice for purposes hereof) and in accordance with the requirements of , without regard to the minimum and multiples specified therein for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the unutilized portion of the Aggregate Commitments and the conditions set forth in . The Swing Line Lender shall furnish the applicable Borrower with a copy of the applicable Committed Loan Notice promptly after delivering such notice to the Administrative Agent. Each Lender shall make an amount equal to its Pro Rata Share of the amount specified in such Committed Loan Notice available to the Administrative Agent in Same Day Funds for the account of the Swing Line Lender at the Administrative Agent's Office for US Dollar-denominated payments not later than 1:00 p.m. on the day specified in such Committed Loan Notice, whereupon, subject to , each Lender that so makes funds available shall be deemed to have made a Base Rate Committed Loan to the applicable Borrower in such amount. The Administrative Agent shall remit the funds so received to the Swing Line Lender.
Section 2.02
Section 4.02
Section 2.03(c)(ii)
     (ii) If for any reason any Swing Line Loan cannot be refinanced by such a Committed Borrowing in accordance with , the request for Base Rate Committed Loans submitted by the Swing Line Lender as set forth herein shall be deemed to be a request by the Swing Line Lender that each of the Lenders fund its risk participation in the relevant Swing Line Loan and each Lender's payment to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swing Line Lender pursuant to shall be deemed payment in respect of such participation.
Section 2.03(c)(i)
Section 2.03(c)(i)
     (iii) If any Lender fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swing Line Lender any amount required to be paid by such Lender pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this by the time specified in , the Swing Line Lender shall be entitled to recover from such Lender (acting through the Administrative Agent), on demand, such amount with interest thereon for the period from the date such payment is required to the date on which such payment is immediately available to the Swing Line Lender at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect. A certificate of the Swing Line Lender submitted to any Lender (through the Administrative Agent) with respect to any amounts owing under this clause (iii) shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Section 2.03(c)
Section 2.03(c)(i)
 
     (iv) Each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans or to purchase and fund risk participations in Swing Line Loans pursuant to this shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance, including (A) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against the Swing Line Lender, the applicable Borrower or any other Person for any reason whatsoever, (B) the occurrence or continuance of a Default, or (C) any other occurrence, event or condition, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing; , , that each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans pursuant to this is subject to the conditions set forth in . No such funding of risk participations shall relieve or otherwise impair the obligation of the applicable Borrower to repay Swing Line Loans, together with interest as provided herein.
Section 2.03(c)
provided
however
Section 2.03(c)
Section 4.02
(d) .
Repayment of Participations
     (i) At any time after any Lender has purchased and funded a risk participation in a Swing Line Loan, if the Swing Line Lender receives any payment on account of such Swing Line Loan, the Swing Line Lender will distribute to such Lender its Pro Rata Share of such payment (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's risk participation was funded) in the same funds as those received by the Swing Line Lender.
     (ii) If any payment received by the Swing Line Lender in respect of principal or interest on any Swing Line Loan is required to be returned by the Swing Line Lender under any of the circumstances described in (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the Swing Line Lender in its discretion), each Lender shall pay to the Swing Line Lender its Pro Rata Share thereof on demand of the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such amount is returned, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate. The Administrative Agent will make such demand upon the request of the Swing Line Lender. The obligations of the Lenders under this clause shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 10.05
     (e) . The Swing Line Lender shall be responsible for invoicing the applicable Borrower for interest on the Swing Line Loans. Until each Lender funds its Base Rate Committed Loan or risk participation pursuant to this to refinance such Lender's Pro Rata Share of any Swing Line Loan, interest in respect of such Pro Rata Share shall be solely for the account of the Swing Line Lender.
Interest for Account of Swing Line Lender
Section 2.03
     (f) . The applicable Borrower shall make all payments of principal and interest in respect of the Swing Line Loans directly to the Swing Line Lender.
Payments Directly to Swing Line Lender
     
2.04 British Pound Sterling Commitment.
     (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, each British Pound Sterling Lender severally agrees to make loans (each a "" and collectively the "") in British Pounds
British Pound Sterling Borrowings
British Pound Sterling Loan
British Pound Sterling Loans
 
Sterling to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date to the Maturity Date in an aggregate Dollar Equivalent amount at any time outstanding not to exceed such British Pound Sterling Lender's British Pound Sterling Commitment; that after giving effect to any British Pound Sterling Borrowing, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not at any time exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans of any British Pound Sterling Lender shall not at any time exceed the British Pound Sterling Commitment of such British Pound Sterling Lender, (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans, all Canadian Dollar Loans and all Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall not at the time of any British Pound Sterling Borrowing exceed US$125,000,000, (iv) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans shall not at any time exceed the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitment, and (v) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, plus such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment. Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, each Borrower may borrow under this , prepay under and reborrow under this from time to time.
provided
Section 2.04
Section 2.06
Section 2.04
     (b) .
Procedure for British Pound Sterling Borrowings
     (i) Each British Pound Sterling Borrowing and each continuation of British Pound Sterling Loans for a new Interest Period shall be made upon the applicable Borrower's irrevocable notice to the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., four Business Days prior to the requested date of any British Pound Sterling Borrowing or any continuation of British Pound Sterling Loans. Each such telephonic notice must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a written British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of such Borrower. Each British Pound Sterling Borrowing or continuation of British Pound Sterling Loans shall be in a principal amount of the applicable Minimum Tranche. Each British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify (A) whether such Borrower is requesting a British Pound Sterling Borrowing or a continuation of British Pound Sterling Loans for a new Interest Period, (B) the requested date of the British Pound Sterling Borrowing or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day), (C) the principal amount of British Pound Sterling Loans to be borrowed or continued, and (D) the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto. If such Borrower fails to specify a new Interest Period in a British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice, then the applicable British Pound Sterling Loans shall be continued for a new Interest Period of one month's duration.
     (ii) Following receipt of a British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each British Pound Sterling Lender of its British Pound Sterling Pro Rata Share of the applicable British Pound Sterling Loans. In the case of a British Pound Sterling Borrowing, upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in , each British Pound Sterling Lender shall make the amount of its British Pound Sterling Loan available (x) to the Administrative Agent in
Section 4.02
 
immediately available funds at the applicable office of the Administrative Agent specified for such currency on not later than 1:00 p.m., local time of such office, on the Business Day specified in the applicable British Pound Sterling Borrowing Notice or (y) directly to the applicable Borrower, with notice to the Administrative Agent, in accordance with other funding procedures that may be agreed to from time to time among Anixter, the Administrative Agent and the British Pound Sterling Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received by the Administrative Agent available to the applicable Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by (A) crediting the account of such Borrower on the books of Bank of America with the amount of such funds or (B) wire transfer of such funds, in each case in accordance with instructions provided to the Administrative Agent by such Borrower.
Schedule 10.02
     (iii) During the existence of a Default, the Required Lenders may demand that any or all of the then outstanding British Pound Sterling Loans be converted immediately to Loans bearing interest at the applicable Overnight Rate.
     (iv) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify Anixter and the Lenders of the interest rate applicable to any British Pound Sterling Loan upon determination of such interest rate. The determination of the Eurocurrency Rate and Overnight Rate by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
     (v) After giving effect to all British Pound Sterling Borrowings, and all continuations of British Pound Sterling Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than seven (7) Interest Periods in effect with respect to British Pound Sterling Loans.
(c) .
Participations in British Pound Sterling Loans
     (i) Each Lender agrees that it shall at all times have a participation in, and acknowledges that it is irrevocably and unconditionally obligated, upon receipt of notice that the Administrative Agent has received a British Pound Sterling Participation Funding Notice, to fund (or to cause an Affiliate to fund) its participation in, each outstanding British Pound Sterling Loan in an amount equal to its Pro Rata Share of the amount of such British Pound Sterling Loan.
     (ii) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of a British Pound Sterling Participation Funding Notice. Promptly (and in any event within three Business Days) upon receipt of such Notice, each Lender shall (or shall cause an Affiliate to) make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the British Pound Sterling Lenders an amount in the applicable currencies and in Same Day Funds equal to its Pro Rata Share of all outstanding British Pound Sterling Loans. If any Lender so notified fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the British Pound Sterling Lenders the full amount of such Lender's participations in all British Pound Sterling Loans by the date which is three Business Days after its receipt of such notice from the Administrative Agent, then interest shall accrue on such Lender's obligations to fund such participations, from such date to the date such Lender pays such obligations in full, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate in effect from time to time during such period.
 
     (iii) From and after the date on which a British Pound Sterling Lender has delivered to the Administrative Agent a British Pound Sterling Participation Funding Notice, all funds received by the British Pound Sterling Lenders in payment of the British Pound Sterling Loans, interest accrued thereon and other amounts payable in respect thereof shall be delivered by each British Pound Sterling Lender to the Administrative Agent, in the same funds as those received by such British Pound Sterling Lender, to be distributed to all Lenders in accordance with their Pro Rata Shares (i.e., giving effect to the funding of participations pursuant to this ), except that (A) the Pro Rata Share of such funds of any Lender that has not funded its participations as provided herein shall be retained by such British Pound Sterling Lender, and (B) interest accrued on any portion of any British Pound Sterling Loan prior to the Lenders' funding of their respective participations therein shall be retained by such British Pound Sterling Lender.
Section 2.04
     (iv) If the Administrative Agent or any British Pound Sterling Lender is required at any time to return to a Loan Party, or to a trustee, receiver, liquidator or custodian, or any official in any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, any portion of any payment made by such Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or such British Pound Sterling Lender in respect of any British Pound Sterling Loan or any interest or fee thereon, each Lender shall, on demand of the Administrative Agent, forthwith return to the Administrative Agent for the account of such British Pound Sterling Lender the amount of its Pro Rata Share of the amount so returned by the Administrative Agent or such British Pound Sterling Lender plus interest thereon from the date such demand is made to the date such amount is returned by such Lender to the Administrative Agent, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect.
     (v) The Required Lenders, the British Pound Sterling Lenders and the Administrative Agent may agree on any other reasonable method (such as making assignments of British Pound Sterling Loans) for sharing the risks of British Pound Sterling Loans ratably among all Lenders according to their Pro Rata Shares so long as such method does not materially disadvantage any Lender.
     (d) Each Lender's obligation to purchase participation interests in British Pound Sterling Loans pursuant to this shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including (i) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against any other Lender, any Borrower or any other Person for any reason whatsoever; (ii) the occurrence or continuance of an Event of Default, a Default or a Material Adverse Effect; (iii) any breach of this Agreement by any Borrower or any other Lender; (iv) any inability of any Borrower to satisfy the conditions precedent to borrowing set forth in this Agreement on the date upon which any British Pound Sterling Loan is to be refunded or any participation interest in any Loan is to be purchased; or (v) any other circumstance, happening or event whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing.
Section 2.04
     (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of above, no Lender shall be required to purchase a participation interest in a British Pound Sterling Loan pursuant to this if, at least two Business Days prior to the making of such British Pound Sterling Loan, the Administrative Agent and the British Pound Sterling Lenders received written notice
subsection (d)
Section 2.04
 
from such Lender specifying that such Lender believed in good faith that one or more of the conditions precedent to the making of such Loan were not satisfied (and detailing its basis for such good faith belief) and, in fact, such conditions precedent to the making of such Loan were not satisfied at the time of the making of such Loan; that the obligation of such Lender to make such Loan and/or to purchase such participation interest shall be reinstated upon the earlier of (i) the date on which such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent that its prior notice has been withdrawn or (ii) the date on which all conditions precedent to the making of such British Pound Sterling Loan have been satisfied (or waived by the Required Lenders or all Lenders, as applicable).
provided
     (f) If at any time that the Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans at such time exceeds an amount equal to 105% of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments then in effect, the Administrative Agent may (or, at the request of a British Pound Sterling Lender, shall) notify Anixter of such excess and, then, within two Business Days after receipt of such notice, the Borrowers shall prepay British Pound Sterling Loans in an aggregate amount sufficient to reduce such Outstanding Amount as of such date of payment to an amount not to exceed 100% of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments then in effect.
     
2.05 Canadian Dollar Commitment.
     (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, each Canadian Dollar Lender severally agrees to make loans (each a "" and collectively the "") in Canadian Dollars to Anixter Canada Inc. and to make available Canadian Banker's Acceptances for Anixter Canada Inc. in accordance with the terms of , from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date to the Maturity Date in an aggregate Dollar Equivalent amount at any time outstanding not to exceed such Canadian Dollar Lender's Canadian Dollar Commitment; that after giving effect to any Canadian Dollar Borrowing, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not at any time exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans of any Canadian Dollar Lender (and, in the case of Canadian Dollars, Canadian Banker's Acceptances) shall not at any time exceed the Canadian Dollar Commitment of such Canadian Dollar Lender, (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans, all Canadian Dollar Loans and all Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall not at the time of any Canadian Dollar Borrowing exceed US$125,000,000, (iv) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall not at any time exceed the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitment, and (v) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, plus such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment. Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, Anixter Canada Inc. may borrow under this , prepay under and reborrow under this from time to time.
Canadian Dollar Borrowings
Canadian Dollar Loan
Canadian Dollar Loans
Schedule 2.05
provided
Section 2.05
Section 2.07
Section 2.05
     (b) .
Procedure for Canadian Dollar Borrowings
     (i) Each Canadian Dollar Borrowing and each continuation of Canadian Dollar Loans for a new Interest Period shall be made upon the applicable Borrower's
 
irrevocable notice to the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., four Business Days prior to the requested date of any Canadian Dollar Borrowing or any continuation of Canadian Dollar Loans. Each such telephonic notice must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a written Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of such Borrower. Each Canadian Dollar Borrowing or continuation of Canadian Dollar Loans shall be in a principal amount of the applicable Minimum Tranche. Each Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify (A) whether such Borrower is requesting a Canadian Dollar Borrowing or a continuation of Canadian Dollar Loans for a new Interest Period, (B) the requested date of the Canadian Dollar Borrowing or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day), (C) the principal amount of Canadian Dollar Loans to be borrowed or continued or the aggregate face amount of Canadian Banker's Acceptances to be accepted, as the case may be, and (D) the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto or the maturity of the Canadian Banker's Acceptances, as the case may be. If such Borrower fails to specify a new Interest Period in a Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice, then the applicable Canadian Dollar Loans shall be continued for a new Interest Period of one month's duration.
     (ii) Following receipt of a Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Canadian Dollar Lender of its Canadian Dollar Pro Rata Share of the applicable Canadian Dollar Loans or Canadian Banker's Acceptance. In the case of a Canadian Dollar Borrowing, upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in , each Canadian Dollar Lender shall make the amount of its Canadian Dollar Loan or Canadian BA Discount Proceeds available (x) to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds at the applicable office of the Administrative Agent specified for such currency on not later than 1:00 p.m., local time of such office, on the Business Day specified in the applicable Canadian Dollar Borrowing Notice or (y) directly to Anixter Canada Inc., with notice to the Administrative Agent, in accordance with other funding procedures that may be agreed to from time to time among Anixter, the Administrative Agent and the Canadian Dollar Lenders or (z) in the case of Canadian Banker's Acceptances, to Anixter Canada Inc. in accordance with . The Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received by the Administrative Agent available to the applicable Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by (A) crediting the account of Anixter Canada Inc. on the books of Bank of America with the amount of such funds or (B) wire transfer of such funds, in each case in accordance with instructions provided to the Administrative Agent by Anixter Canada Inc.
Section 4.02
Schedule 10.02
Schedule 2.05
     (iii) During the existence of a Default, the Required Lenders may demand that any or all of the then outstanding Canadian Dollar Loans be converted immediately to Loans bearing interest at the applicable Overnight Rate.
     (iv) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify Anixter and the Lenders of the interest rate applicable to any Canadian Dollar Loan upon determination of such interest rate. The determination of the Eurocurrency Rate, the Canadian Prime Rate and
 
Overnight Rate by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
     (v) After giving effect to all Canadian Dollar Borrowings, and all continuations of Canadian Dollar Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than three (3) Interest Periods in effect with respect to Canadian Dollar Loans.
     (c) .
Participations in Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances
     (i) Each Lender agrees that it shall at all times have a participation in, and acknowledges that it is irrevocably and unconditionally obligated, upon receipt of notice that the Administrative Agent has received a Canadian Dollar Participation Funding Notice, to fund (or to cause an Affiliate to fund) its participation in, each outstanding Canadian Dollar Loan and Canadian Banker's Acceptance in an amount equal to its Pro Rata Share of the amount of such Canadian Dollar Loan or its Pro Rata Share of the Canadian BA Discount Proceeds in respect of such Canadian Banker's Acceptance, as the case may be.
     (ii) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of a Canadian Dollar Participation Funding Notice. Promptly (and in any event within three Business Days) upon receipt of such Notice, each Lender shall (or shall cause an Affiliate to) make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Canadian Dollar Lenders an amount in the applicable currencies and in Same Day Funds equal to its Pro Rata Share of all outstanding Canadian Dollar Loans (and, with respect to participations in Canadian Banker's Acceptances, its Pro Rata Share of the Canadian BA Discount Proceeds of all outstanding Canadian Banker's Acceptances). If any Lender so notified fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Canadian Dollar Lenders the full amount of such Lender's participations in all Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances by the date which is three Business Days after its receipt of such notice from the Administrative Agent, then interest shall accrue on such Lender's obligations to fund such participations, from such date to the date such Lender pays such obligations in full, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate in effect from time to time during such period.
     (iii) From and after the date on which a Canadian Dollar Lender has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Canadian Dollar Participation Funding Notice, all funds received by the Canadian Dollar Lenders in payment of the Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances, interest accrued thereon and other amounts payable in respect thereof shall be delivered by each Canadian Dollar Lender to the Administrative Agent, in the same funds as those received by such Canadian Dollar Lender, to be distributed to all Lenders in accordance with their Pro Rata Shares (i.e., giving effect to the funding of participations pursuant to this ), except that (A) the Pro Rata Share of such funds of any Lender that has not funded its participations as provided herein shall be retained by such Canadian Dollar Lender, and (B) interest accrued on any portion of any Canadian Dollar Loan prior to the Lenders' funding of their respective participations therein shall be retained by such Canadian Dollar Lender.
Section 2.05
 
     (iv) If the Administrative Agent or any Canadian Dollar Lender is required at any time to return to a Loan Party, or to a trustee, receiver, liquidator or custodian, or any official in any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, any portion of any payment made by such Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or such Canadian Dollar Lender in respect of any Canadian Dollar Loan, any Canadian Banker's Acceptance or any interest or fee thereon, each Lender shall, on demand of the Administrative Agent, forthwith return to the Administrative Agent for the account of such Canadian Dollar Lender the amount of its Pro Rata Share of the amount so returned by the Administrative Agent or such Canadian Dollar Lender plus interest thereon from the date such demand is made to the date such amount is returned by such Lender to the Administrative Agent, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect.
     (v) The Required Lenders, the Canadian Dollar Lenders and the Administrative Agent may agree on any other reasonable method (such as making assignments of Canadian Dollar Loans or Canadian Banker's Acceptances) for sharing the risks of Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances ratably among all Lenders according to their Pro Rata Shares so long as such method does not materially disadvantage any Lender.
     (vi) References to participations in Canadian Dollar Loans in this Agreement (including in the definitions of "Commitment", "Defaulting Lender", "Canadian Dollar Participation Funding Notice" and "Voting Percentage", , , and ) shall be deemed to include participations in Canadian Banker's Acceptances.
subsection 2.13(b)
subsection 2.14(f)
Section 2.15
Section 10.06
     (d) Each Lender's obligation to purchase participation interests in Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances pursuant to this shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including (i) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against any other Lender, any Borrower or any other Person for any reason whatsoever; (ii) the occurrence or continuance of an Event of Default, a Default or a Material Adverse Effect; (iii) any breach of this Agreement by any Borrower or any other Lender; (iv) any inability of any Borrower to satisfy the conditions precedent to borrowing set forth in this Agreement on the date upon which any Canadian Dollar Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance is to be refunded or any participation interest in any Loan is to be purchased; or (v) any other circumstance, happening or event whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing.
Section 2.05
     (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of above, no Lender shall be required to purchase a participation interest in a Canadian Dollar Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance pursuant to this if, at least two Business Days prior to the making of such Canadian Dollar Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance, the Administrative Agent and the Canadian Dollar Lenders received written notice from such Lender specifying that such Lender believed in good faith that one or more of the conditions precedent to the making of such Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance were not satisfied (and detailing its basis for such good faith belief) and, in fact, such conditions precedent to the making of such Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance were not satisfied at the time of the making of such Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance; that the obligation of such Lender to make such Loan or Canadian
subsection (d)
Section 2.05
provided
 
Banker's Acceptance and/or to purchase such participation interest shall be reinstated upon the earlier of (i) the date on which such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent that its prior notice has been withdrawn or (ii) the date on which all conditions precedent to the making of such Canadian Dollar Loan or Canadian Banker's Acceptance have been satisfied (or waived by the Required Lenders or all Lenders, as applicable).
     (f) If at any time that the Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances denominated at such time exceeds an amount equal to 105% of the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments then in effect, the Administrative Agent may (or, at the request of a Canadian Dollar Lender, shall) notify Anixter of such excess and, then, within two Business Days after receipt of such notice, Anixter Canada Inc. shall prepay Canadian Dollar Loans and/or Cash Collateralize Canadian Banker's Acceptances in an aggregate amount sufficient to reduce such Outstanding Amount as of such date of payment to an amount not to exceed 100% of the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments then in effect.
     (g) . For the purposes of the Interest Act (Canada), (i) whenever a rate of interest or fee rate hereunder is calculated on the basis of a year (the "deemed year") that contains fewer days than the actual number of days in the calendar year of calculation, such rate of interest or fee rate shall be expressed as a yearly rate by multiplying such rate of interest or fee rate by the actual number of days in the calendar year of calculation and dividing it by the number of days in the deemed year, (ii) the principle of deemed reinvestment of interest shall not apply to any interest calculation hereunder and (iii) the rates of interest stipulated herein are intended to be nominal rates and not effective rates or yields.
Interest Act (Canada)
     
2.06 Letters of Credit.
     (a) .
The Letter of Credit Commitment
     (i) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, (A) the L/C Issuer agrees, in reliance upon the agreements of the Lenders set forth in this , (1) from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date until the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, to issue Letters of Credit denominated in U.S. Dollars or in one or more other Available Currencies for the account of Anixter or its Subsidiaries, and to amend or extend Letters of Credit previously issued by it, in accordance with subsection (b) below, and (2) to honor drawings under the Letters of Credit; and (B) the Lenders severally agree to participate in Letters of Credit issued for the account of Anixter or its Subsidiaries and any drawings thereunder; that after giving effect to any L/C Credit Extension with respect to any Letter of Credit, (x) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (y) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, plus such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment, and (z) the Outstanding Amount of the L/C Obligations shall not exceed the Letter of Credit Sublimit. Each request by Anixter for the issuance or amendment of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a representation by Anixter that the L/C Credit Extension so requested complies with the conditions set forth in the proviso to the preceding sentence. Within the foregoing limits, and subject to the
Section 2.06
provided
 
terms and conditions hereof, Anixter's ability to obtain Letters of Credit shall be fully revolving, and accordingly Anixter may, during the foregoing period, obtain Letters of Credit to replace Letters of Credit that have expired or that have been drawn upon and reimbursed.
     (ii) The L/C Issuer shall not issue any Letter of Credit, if:
     (A) subject to), the expiry date of such requested Letter of Credit would occur more than twelve months after the date of issuance or last extension, unless the Required Lenders have approved such expiry date; or
Section 2.06(b)(iii
     (B) the expiry date of such requested Letter of Credit would occur after the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, unless all the Lenders have approved such expiry date.
     (iii) The L/C Issuer shall not be under any obligation to issue any Letter of Credit if:
     (A) any order, judgment or decree of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator shall by its terms purport to enjoin or restrain the L/C Issuer from issuing such Letter of Credit, or any Law applicable to the L/C Issuer or any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) from any Governmental Authority with jurisdiction over the L/C Issuer shall prohibit, or request that the L/C Issuer refrain from, the issuance of letters of credit generally or such Letter of Credit in particular or shall impose upon the L/C Issuer with respect to such Letter of Credit any restriction, reserve or capital requirement (for which the L/C Issuer is not otherwise compensated hereunder) not in effect on the Closing Date, or shall impose upon the L/C Issuer any unreimbursed loss, cost or expense which was not applicable on the Closing Date and which the L/C Issuer in good faith deems material to it;
     (B) the issuance of such Letter of Credit would violate one or more policies of the L/C Issuer;
     (C) except as otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, such Letter of Credit is in an initial face amount less than $100,000;
     (D) except as otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, such Letter of Credit is to be denominated in a currency other than US Dollars or another Available Currency;
     (E) the L/C Issuer does not as of the issuance date of such requested Letter of Credit issue Letters of Credit in the requested currency; or
     (F) a default of any Lender's obligations to fund under exists or any Lender is at such time a Defaulting Lender hereunder, unless the L/C Issuer has entered into satisfactory arrangements with Anixter or such Lender to eliminate the L/C Issuer's risk with respect to such Lender.
Section 2.06(c)
 
     (iv) The L/C Issuer shall not amend any Letter of Credit if the L/C Issuer would not be permitted at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its amended form under the terms hereof.
     (v) The L/C Issuer shall be under no obligation to amend any Letter of Credit if (A) the L/C Issuer would have no obligation at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its amended form under the terms hereof, or (B) the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit does not accept the proposed amendment to such Letter of Credit.
     (vi) The L/C Issuer shall act on behalf of the Lenders with respect to any Letters of Credit issued by it and the documents associated therewith, and the L/C Issuer shall have all of the benefits and immunities (A) provided to the Administrative Agent in with respect to any acts taken or omissions suffered by the L/C Issuer in connection with Letters of Credit issued by it or proposed to be issued by it and Issuer Documents pertaining to such Letters of Credit as fully as if the term "Administrative Agent" as used in included the L/C Issuer with respect to such acts or omissions, and (B) as additionally provided herein with respect to the L/C Issuer.
Article IX
Article IX
     (b) .
Procedures for Issuance and Amendment of Letters of Credit; Auto-Extension Letters of Credit
     (i) Each Letter of Credit shall be issued or amended, as the case may be, upon the request of Anixter delivered to the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) in the form of a Letter of Credit Application, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of Anixter. Such Letter of Credit Application must be received by the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent (A) not later than 11:00 a.m. at least two Business Days prior to the proposed issuance date or date of amendment, as the case may be, of any Letter of Credit denominated in US Dollars, and (B) not later than 11:00 a.m. at least ten Business Days prior to the proposed issuance date or date of amendment, as the case may be, of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Available Foreign Currency; or in each case such later date and time as the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer may agree in a particular instance in their sole discretion. In the case of a request for an initial issuance of a Letter of Credit, such Letter of Credit Application shall specify in form and detail satisfactory to the L/C Issuer: (A) the proposed issuance date of the requested Letter of Credit (which shall be a Business Day); (B) the amount and currency thereof; (C) the expiry date thereof; (D) the name and address of the beneficiary thereof; (E) the documents to be presented by such beneficiary in case of any drawing thereunder; (F) the full text of any certificate to be presented by such beneficiary in case of any drawing thereunder; and (G) such other matters as the L/C Issuer may require. In the case of a request for an amendment of any outstanding Letter of Credit, such Letter of Credit Application shall specify in form and detail satisfactory to the L/C Issuer (A) the Letter of Credit to be amended; (B) the proposed date of amendment thereof (which shall be a Business Day); (C) the nature of the proposed amendment; and (D) such other matters as the L/C Issuer may require. Additionally, Anixter shall furnish to the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent such other documents and information pertaining to such requested Letter of Credit issuance or amendment, including any Issuer Documents, as the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent may require.
 
     (ii) Promptly after receipt of any Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer will confirm with the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) that the Administrative Agent has received a copy of such Letter of Credit Application from Anixter and, if not, the L/C Issuer will provide the Administrative Agent with a copy thereof. Unless the L/C Issuer has received written notice from any Lender, the Administrative Agent or any Loan Party, at least one Business Day prior to the requested date of issuance or amendment of the applicable Letter of Credit, that one or more applicable conditions contained in shall not then be satisfied, then, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the L/C Issuer shall, on the requested date, issue a Letter of Credit for the account of Anixter (or the applicable Subsidiary) or enter into the applicable amendment, as the case may be, in each case in accordance with the L/C Issuer's usual and customary business practices. Immediately upon the issuance of each Letter of Credit, each Lender shall be deemed to, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees to, purchase from the L/C Issuer a risk participation in such Letter of Credit in an amount equal to the product of such Lender's Pro Rata Share times the amount of such Letter of Credit.
Article IV
     (iii) If Anixter so requests in any applicable Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer may, in its sole and absolute discretion, agree to issue a Letter of Credit that has automatic extension provisions (each, an ""); that any such Auto-Extension Letter of Credit must permit the L/C Issuer to prevent any such extension at least once in each twelve-month period (commencing with the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit) by giving prior notice to the beneficiary thereof not later than a day (the "") in each such twelve-month period to be agreed upon at the time such Letter of Credit is issued. Unless otherwise directed by the L/C Issuer, Anixter shall not be required to make a specific request to the L/C Issuer for any such extension. Once an Auto-Extension Letter of Credit has been issued, the Lenders shall be deemed to have authorized (but may not require) the L/C Issuer to permit the extension of such Letter of Credit at any time to an expiry date not later than the Letter of Credit Expiration Date; , , that the L/C Issuer shall not permit any such extension if (A) the L/C Issuer has determined that it would not be permitted, or would have no obligation, at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its revised form (as extended) under the terms hereof (by reason of the provisions of clause (ii) or (iii) of or otherwise), or (B) it has received notice (which may be by telephone or in writing) on or before the day that is five Business Days before the Non-Extension Notice Date (1) from the Administrative Agent that the Required Lenders have elected not to permit such extension or (2) from the Administrative Agent, any Lender or Anixter that one or more of the applicable conditions specified in is not then satisfied, and in each such case directing the L/C Issuer not to permit such extension.
Auto-Extension Letter of Credit
provided
Non-Extension Notice Date
provided
however
Section 2.05(a)
Section 4.02
     (iv) If Anixter so requests in any applicable Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer may, in its sole and absolute discretion, agree to issue a Letter of Credit that permits the automatic reinstatement of all or a portion of the stated amount thereof after any drawing thereunder (each, an ""). Unless otherwise directed by the L/C Issuer, Anixter shall not be required to make a specific request to the L/C Issuer to permit such reinstatement. Once an Auto-Reinstatement
Auto-Reinstatement Letter of Credit
 
Letter of Credit has been issued, except as provided in the following sentence, the Lenders shall be deemed to have authorized (but may not require) the L/C Issuer to reinstate all or a portion of the stated amount thereof in accordance with the provisions of such Letter of Credit. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if such Auto-Reinstatement Letter of Credit permits the L/C Issuer to decline to reinstate all or any portion of the stated amount thereof after a drawing thereunder by giving notice of such non-reinstatement within a specified number of days after such drawing (the ""), the L/C Issuer shall not permit such reinstatement if it has received a notice (which may be by telephone or in writing) on or before the day that is five Business Days before the Non-Reinstatement Deadline (A) from the Administrative Agent that the Required Lenders have elected not to permit such reinstatement or (B) from the Administrative Agent, any Lender or Anixter that one or more of the applicable conditions specified in is not then satisfied (treating such reinstatement as an L/C Credit Extension for purposes of this clause) and, in each case, directing the L/C Issuer not to permit such reinstatement.
Non-Reinstatement Deadline
Section 4.02
     (v) Promptly after its delivery of any Letter of Credit or any amendment to a Letter of Credit to an advising bank with respect thereto or to the beneficiary thereof, the L/C Issuer will also deliver to Anixter and the Administrative Agent a true and complete copy of such Letter of Credit or amendment.
     (c) .
Drawings and Reimbursements; Funding of Participations
     (i) Upon receipt from the beneficiary of any Letter of Credit of any notice of a drawing under such Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent thereof. In the case of a Letter of Credit denominated in an Available Currency other than US Dollars, Anixter shall reimburse the L/C Issuer in such Available Currency, unless (A) the L/C Issuer (at its option) shall have specified in such notice that it will require reimbursement in US Dollars, or (B) in the absence of any such requirement for reimbursement in US Dollars, Anixter shall have notified the L/C Issuer promptly following receipt of the notice of drawing that Anixter will reimburse the L/C Issuer in US Dollars. In the case of any such reimbursement in US Dollars of a drawing under a Letter of Credit denominated in another Available Currency, the L/C Issuer shall notify Anixter of the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of the drawing promptly following the determination thereof. Not later than 11:00 a.m. on the date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under a Letter of Credit to be reimbursed in US Dollars, or the Applicable Time on the date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under a Letter of Credit to be reimbursed in a Foreign Currency (each such date, an ""), Anixter shall reimburse the L/C Issuer through the Administrative Agent in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing and in the applicable currency. If Anixter fails to so reimburse the L/C Issuer by such time, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the Honor Date, the amount of the unreimbursed drawing (expressed in US Dollars in the amount of the Dollar Equivalent thereof in the case of a Letter of Credit denominated in a Foreign Currency) (the ""), and the amount of such Lender's Pro Rata Share thereof. In such event, Anixter shall be deemed to have requested a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans to be disbursed on the Honor Date in an amount equal to the Unreimbursed Amount, without regard to the minimum and
Honor Date
Unreimbursed Amount
 
multiples specified in for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the amount of the unutilized portion of the Aggregate Commitments and the conditions set forth in (other than the delivery of a Committed Loan Notice). Any notice given by the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent pursuant to this may be given by telephone if immediately confirmed in writing; that the lack of such an immediate confirmation shall not affect the conclusiveness or binding effect of such notice.
Section 2.02
Section 4.02
Section 2.06(c)(i)
provided
     (ii) Each Lender shall upon any notice pursuant to make funds available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer, in US Dollars, at the Administrative Agent's Office for Dollar-denominated payments in an amount equal to its Pro Rata Share of the Unreimbursed Amount not later than 1:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified in such notice by the Administrative Agent, whereupon, subject to the provisions of , each Lender that so makes funds available shall be deemed to have made a Base Rate Committed Loan to Anixter in such amount. The Administrative Agent shall remit the funds so received to the L/C Issuer in US Dollars, or if requested by the L/C Issuer, the equivalent amount thereof in another Available Currency as determined by the Administrative Agent at such time on the basis of the Spot Rate (determined as of such funding date) for the purchase of such Available Currency with US Dollars.
Section 2.06(c)(i)
Section 2.06(c)(iii)
     (iii) With respect to any Unreimbursed Amount that is not fully refinanced by a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans because the conditions set forth in cannot be satisfied or for any other reason, Anixter shall be deemed to have incurred from the L/C Issuer an L/C Borrowing in the amount of the Unreimbursed Amount that is not so refinanced, which L/C Borrowing shall be due and payable on demand (together with interest) and shall bear interest at the Default Rate. In such event, each Lender's payment to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer pursuant to shall be deemed payment in respect of its participation in such L/C Borrowing and shall constitute an L/C Advance from such Lender in satisfaction of its participation obligation under this .
Section 4.02
Section 2.06(c)(ii)
Section 2.06
     (iv) Until each Lender funds its Committed Loan or L/C Advance pursuant to this to reimburse the L/C Issuer for any amount drawn under any Letter of Credit, interest in respect of such Lender's Pro Rata Share of such amount shall be solely for the account of the L/C Issuer.
Section 2.06(c)
     (v) Each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans or L/C Advances to reimburse the L/C Issuer for amounts drawn under Letters of Credit, as contemplated by this , shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance, including (A) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against the L/C Issuer, Anixter, any Subsidiary or any other Person for any reason whatsoever; (B) the occurrence or continuance of a Default, or (C) any other occurrence, event or condition, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing; , , that each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans pursuant to this is subject to the conditions set forth in (other than delivery by Anixter of a Committed Loan Notice). No such making of an L/C Advance
Section 2.06(c)
provided
however
Section 2.06(c)
Section 4.02
 
shall relieve or otherwise impair the obligation of Anixter to reimburse the L/C Issuer for the amount of any payment made by the L/C Issuer under any Letter of Credit, together with interest as provided herein.
     (vi) If any Lender fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer any amount required to be paid by such Lender pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this by the time specified in , the L/C Issuer shall be entitled to recover from such Lender (acting through the Administrative Agent), on demand, such amount with interest thereon for the period from the date such payment is required to the date on which such payment is immediately available to the L/C Issuer at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect. A certificate of the L/C Issuer submitted to any Lender (through the Administrative Agent) with respect to any amounts owing under this clause (vi) shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Section 2.06(c)
Section 2.06(c)(ii)
     (d) .
Repayment of Participations
     (i) At any time after the L/C Issuer has made a payment under any Letter of Credit and has received from any Lender such Lender's L/C Advance in respect of such payment in accordance with , if the Administrative Agent receives for the account of the L/C Issuer any payment in respect of the related Unreimbursed Amount or interest thereon (whether directly from Anixter or otherwise, including proceeds of Cash Collateral applied thereto by the Administrative Agent), the Administrative Agent will distribute to such Lender its Pro Rata Share thereof (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's L/C Advance was outstanding) in Dollars and in the same funds as those received by the Administrative Agent.
Section 2.06(c)
     (ii) If any payment received by the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer pursuant to is required to be returned under any of the circumstances described in (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the L/C Issuer in its discretion), each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer its Pro Rata Share thereof on demand of the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such amount is returned by such Lender, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect. The obligations of the Lenders under this clause shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 2.06(c)(i)
Section 10.05
     (e) . The obligation of Anixter to reimburse the L/C Issuer for each drawing under each Letter of Credit and to repay each L/C Borrowing shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under all circumstances, including the following:
Obligations Absolute
     (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of such Letter of Credit, this Agreement, or any other Loan Document;
 
     (ii) the existence of any claim, counterclaim, set-off, defense or other right that Anixter or any Subsidiary may have at any time against any beneficiary or any transferee of such Letter of Credit (or any Person for whom any such beneficiary or any such transferee may be acting), the L/C Issuer or any other Person, whether in connection with this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby or by such Letter of Credit or any agreement or instrument relating thereto, or any unrelated transaction;
     (iii) any draft, demand, certificate or other document presented under such Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, invalid or insufficient in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect; or any loss or delay in the transmission or otherwise of any document required in order to make a drawing under such Letter of Credit;
     (iv) any payment by the L/C Issuer under such Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or certificate that does not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit; or any payment made by the L/C Issuer under such Letter of Credit to any Person purporting to be a trustee in bankruptcy, debtor-in-possession, assignee for the benefit of creditors, liquidator, receiver or other representative of or successor to any beneficiary or any transferee of such Letter of Credit, including any arising in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law;
     (v) any adverse change in the relevant exchange rates or in the availability of the relevant Available Foreign Currency to Anixter or any Subsidiary or in the relevant currency markets generally; or
     (vi) any other circumstance or happening whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, including any other circumstance that might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, Anixter or any Subsidiary.
     Anixter shall promptly examine a copy of each Letter of Credit and each amendment thereto that is delivered to it and, in the event of any claim of noncompliance with Anixter's instructions or other irregularity, Anixter will immediately notify the L/C Issuer. Anixter shall be conclusively deemed to have waived any such claim against the L/C Issuer and its correspondents unless such notice is given as aforesaid.
     (f) . Each Lender and Anixter agree that, in paying any drawing under a Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall not have any responsibility to obtain any document (other than any sight draft, certificates and documents expressly required by the Letter of Credit) or to ascertain or inquire as to the validity or accuracy of any such document or the authority of the Person executing or delivering any such document. None of the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, any of their respective Related Parties nor any correspondent, participant or assignee of the L/C Issuer shall be liable to any Lender for (i) any action taken or omitted in connection herewith at the request or with the approval of the Lenders or the Required Lenders, as applicable; (ii) any action taken or omitted in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct; or (iii) the due execution, effectiveness, validity or enforceability of any document or instrument related to any Letter of Credit or Issuer Document. Anixter hereby assumes all risks of the acts or omissions of any beneficiary or transferee with respect to its use of any Letter
Role of L/C Issuer
 
of Credit; , , that this assumption is not intended to, and shall not, preclude Anixter's pursuing such rights and remedies as it may have against the beneficiary or transferee at law or under any other agreement. None of the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, any of their respective Related Parties nor any correspondent, participant or assignee of the L/C Issuer shall be liable or responsible for any of the matters described in clauses (i) through (v) of ; , , that anything in such clauses to the contrary notwithstanding, Anixter may have a claim against the L/C Issuer, and the L/C Issuer may be liable to Anixter, to the extent, but only to the extent, of any direct, as opposed to consequential or exemplary, damages suffered by Anixter which Anixter proves were caused by the L/C Issuer's willful misconduct or gross negligence or the L/C Issuer's willful failure to pay under any Letter of Credit after the presentation to it by the beneficiary of a sight draft and certificate(s) strictly complying with the terms and conditions of a Letter of Credit. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, the L/C Issuer may accept documents that appear on their face to be in order, without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, and the L/C Issuer shall not be responsible for the validity or sufficiency of any instrument transferring or assigning or purporting to transfer or assign a Letter of Credit or the rights or benefits thereunder or proceeds thereof, in whole or in part, which may prove to be invalid or ineffective for any reason.
provided
however
Section 2.06(e)
provided
however
     (g) .
Cash Collateral
     (i) Upon the request of the Administrative Agent, (A) if the L/C Issuer has honored any full or partial drawing request under any Letter of Credit and such drawing has resulted in an L/C Borrowing, or (B) if, as of the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, any L/C Obligation for any reason remains outstanding, Anixter shall, in each case, immediately Cash Collateralize the then Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations.
     (ii) In addition, if the Administrative Agent notifies Anixter at any time that the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations at such time exceeds 105% of the Letter of Credit Sublimit then in effect, then, within two Business Days after receipt of such notice, Anixter shall Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations in an amount equal to the amount by which the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations exceeds the Letter of Credit Sublimit.
     (iii) The Administrative Agent may, at any time and from time to time after the initial deposit of Cash Collateral, request that additional Cash Collateral be provided in order to protect against the results of exchange rate fluctuations.
     (iv) sets forth certain additional requirements to deliver Cash Collateral hereunder. For purposes of this and , "Cash Collateralize" means to pledge and deposit with or deliver to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the L/C Issuer and the Lenders, as collateral for the L/C Obligations, cash or deposit account balances pursuant to documentation in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer (which documents are hereby consented to by the Lenders). Derivatives of such term have corresponding meanings. Anixter hereby grants to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the L/C Issuer and the Lenders, a security interest in all such cash, deposit accounts and all balances therein
Section 8.02(c)
Section 2.06
Section 8.02(c)
 
and all proceeds of the foregoing. Cash Collateral shall be maintained in blocked, non-interest bearing deposit accounts at Bank of America.
     (h) . Unless otherwise expressly agreed by the L/C Issuer and Anixter when a Letter of Credit is issued, the rules of the ISP shall apply to each Letter of Credit.
Applicability of ISP
     (i) . Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender in accordance with its Pro Rata Share, in US Dollars, a Letter of Credit fee (the "") for each Letter of Credit equal to the Applicable Margin the Dollar Equivalent of the actual daily maximum amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit (whether or not such maximum amount is then in effect under such Letter of Credit). Letter of Credit Fees shall be (i) computed on a quarterly basis in arrears and (ii) due and payable on the first Business Day after the end of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the issuance of such Letter of Credit, on the Letter of Credit Expiration Date and thereafter on demand. If there is any change in the Applicable Margin during any quarter, the daily maximum amount of each Letter of Credit shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Margin separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Margin was in effect. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, upon the request of the Required Lenders, while any Event of Default exists, all Letter of Credit Fees shall accrue at the Default Rate.
Letter of Credit Fees
Letter of Credit Fee
times
     (j) . Anixter shall pay directly to the L/C Issuer for its own account, in US Dollars, a fronting fee with respect to each Letter of Credit, at the rate per annum specified in a written agreement between Anixter and the L/C Issuer, computed on the Dollar Equivalent of the actual daily maximum amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit (whether or not such maximum amount is then in effect under such Letter of Credit) and on a quarterly basis in arrears, and due and payable on the first Business Day after the end of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the issuance of such Letter of Credit, on the Letter of Credit Expiration Date and thereafter on demand. In addition, Anixter shall pay directly to the L/C Issuer for its own account, in Dollars, the customary issuance, presentation, amendment and other processing fees, and other standard costs and charges, of the L/C Issuer relating to letters of credit as from time to time in effect. Such customary fees and standard costs and charges are due and payable on demand and are nonrefundable.
Fronting Fee and Documentary and Processing Charges Payable to L/C Issuer
     (k) . In the event of any conflict between the terms hereof and the terms of any Issuer Document, the terms hereof shall control.
Conflict with Issuer Documents
     (l) . Notwithstanding that a Letter of Credit issued or outstanding hereunder is in support of any obligations of, or is for the account of, a Subsidiary, Anixter shall be obligated to reimburse the L/C Issuer hereunder for any and all drawings under such Letter of Credit. Anixter hereby acknowledges that the issuance of Letters of Credit for the account of Subsidiaries inures to the benefit of Anixter, and that Anixter's business derives substantial benefits from the businesses of such Subsidiaries.
Letters of Credit Issued for Subsidiaries
 
     
2.07 Prepayments.
     (a) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Committed Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty; that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., (A) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans, and (B) on the date of prepayment of Base Rate Committed Loans; (ii) any prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans shall be in a Dollar Equivalent principal amount of US$5,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$1,000,000 in excess thereof; and (iii) any prepayment of Base Rate Committed Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$1,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Type(s) of Committed Loans to be prepaid. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of each such notice, and of such Lender's Pro Rata Share of such prepayment. If such notice is given by the Borrowers, the Borrowers shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest thereon, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to . Each such prepayment shall be applied to the Committed Loans of the Lenders in accordance with their respective Pro Rata Shares.
provided
Section 3.05
     (b) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent and the Swing Line Lender, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Swing Line Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty; that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent and the Swing Line Lender not later than 11:00 a.m., on the date of prepayment of Swing Line Loans; and (ii) any prepayment of Swing Line Loans shall be in a Dollar Equivalent principal amount of at least US$500,000.
provided
     (c) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay British Pound Sterling Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty; that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. four Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of British Pound Sterling Loans; and (ii) any prepayment of British Pound Sterling Loans shall be in a principal amount of the applicable Minimum Tranche. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the British Pound Sterling Loans to be prepaid. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each British Pound Sterling Lender of its receipt of each such notice, and of such British Pound Sterling Lender's British Pound Sterling Pro Rata Share of such prepayment. If such notice is given by the Borrowers, the Borrowers shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a British Pound Sterling Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest thereon, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to . Each such prepayment shall be applied to the British Pound Sterling Loans of the British Pound Sterling Lenders in accordance with their respective British Pound Sterling Pro Rata Shares.
provided
Section 3.05
     (d) Anixter Canada Inc. may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Canadian Dollar Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty; that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later
provided
 
than 11:00 a.m. four Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Canadian Dollar Loans; and (ii) any prepayment of Canadian Dollar Loans shall be in a principal amount of the applicable Minimum Tranche. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Canadian Dollar Loans to be prepaid. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each Canadian Dollar Lender of its receipt of each such notice, and of such Canadian Dollar Lender's Canadian Dollar Pro Rata Share of such prepayment. If such notice is given by Anixter Canada Inc., Anixter Canada Inc. shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Canadian Dollar Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest thereon, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to . Each such prepayment shall be applied to the Canadian Dollar Loans of the Canadian Dollar Lenders in accordance with their respective Canadian Dollar Pro Rata Shares.
Section 3.05
     (e) If for any reason the Total Outstandings at any time exceeds the Aggregate Commitments then in effect, the Borrowers shall immediately prepay Loans in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
     Anixter may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, terminate the Aggregate Commitments, or permanently reduce the Aggregate Commitments to an amount not less than the then Total Outstandings; that (i) any such notice shall be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., five Business Days prior to the date of termination or reduction, and (ii) any such partial reduction shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of any such notice of reduction or termination of the Aggregate Commitments. Once reduced in accordance with this Section, the Commitments may not be increased. Any reduction of the Aggregate Commitments shall be applied to the Commitment of each Lender according to its Pro Rata Share. All facility fees accrued until the effective date of any termination of the Aggregate Commitments shall be paid on the effective date of such termination.
2.08 Reduction or Termination of Commitments.
provided
     
2.09 Repayment of Loans.
     (a) The applicable Borrower shall repay to the Lenders on the Maturity Date the aggregate principal amount of each Committed Loan of such Borrower outstanding on such date.
     (b) The applicable Borrower shall repay each Base Rate Swing Line Loan within 10 days after such Swing Line Loan is made. The applicable Borrower shall repay each Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan within 30 days after such Swing Line Loan is made (or at such later date, not later than the Maturity Date as the Swing Line Lender may in its discretion otherwise agree).
     (c) The applicable Borrower shall repay to the British Pound Sterling Lenders on the Maturity Date the aggregate principal amount of British Pound Sterling Loans of such Borrower outstanding on such date.
 
     (d) Anixter Canada Inc. shall repay to the Canadian Dollar Lenders on the Maturity Date the aggregate principal amount of Canadian Dollar Loans of such Borrower outstanding on such date.
     
2.10 Interest.
     (a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) below, (i) each Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to the Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period the Applicable Margin; (ii) each Base Rate Committed Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Margin; (iii) each Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof at a rate per annum specified by the Swing Line Lender at the time of borrowing for such Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan; (iv) each Base Rate Swing Line Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Margin; and (v) each British Pound Sterling Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to the sum of (A) the Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period plus (B) the Applicable Margin, and (vi) each Canadian Dollar Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Canadian Prime Rate.
plus
plus
plus
     (b) While any Event of Default exists or after acceleration, the Borrowers shall pay interest on the principal amount of all outstanding Obligations at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law. Accrued and unpaid interest on past due amounts (including interest on past due interest) shall be due and payable upon demand.
     (c) Interest on each Loan shall be due and payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date applicable thereto and at such other times as may be specified herein. Interest hereunder shall be due and payable in accordance with the terms hereof before and after judgment, and before and after the commencement of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law.
     
2.11 Fees.
     (a) . Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender in accordance with its Pro Rata Share, a facility fee equal to the Applicable Margin the actual daily amount of the Aggregate Commitments, regardless of usage. The facility fee shall accrue at all times from the Closing Date until the Maturity Date and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the Maturity Date. The facility fee shall be calculated quarterly in arrears, and if there is any change in the Applicable Margin during any quarter, the actual daily amount shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Margin separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Margin was in effect. The facility fee shall accrue at all times, including at any time during which one or more of the conditions in is not met.
Facility Fee
times
Article IV
 
     (b) . Anixter shall pay arrangement fees to the Arranger for its own account, and shall pay an agency fee to the Administrative Agent for the Administrative Agent's own account, in the amounts and at the times specified in written agreements (the ""), among Anixter and the respective fee recipients. Such fees shall be fully earned when paid and shall be nonrefundable for any reason whatsoever.
Arrangement and Agency Fees
Agent/Arranger Fee Letters
     (c) . Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender on the Closing Date an upfront fee as provided in the Agent/Arranger Fee Letters. Such fee shall be fully earned when paid and shall be nonrefundable for any reason whatsoever.
Upfront Fee
     Computation of interest on Base Rate Loans computed based on Bank of America's "prime rate" shall be calculated on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and the actual number of days elapsed. Computation of interest on Loans in British Pounds Sterling shall be calculated on the basis of a year of 365 days, and the actual number of days elapsed. Computation of all other types of interest and all fees shall be calculated on the basis of a year of 360 days and the actual number of days elapsed, which results in a higher yield to the payee thereof than a method based on a year of 365 or 366 days. Interest shall accrue on each Loan for the day on which the Loan is made, and shall not accrue on a Loan, or any portion thereof, for the day on which the Loan or such portion is paid, that any Loan that is repaid on the same day on which it is made shall bear interest for one day.
2.12 Computation of Interest and Fees.
provided
     (a) The Credit Extensions made by each Lender shall be evidenced by one or more accounts or records maintained by such Lender and by the Administrative Agent in the ordinary course of business. The accounts or records maintained by the Administrative Agent and each Lender shall be conclusive absent manifest error of the amount of the Credit Extensions made by the Lenders to the Borrowers and the interest and payments thereon. Any failure so to record or any error in doing so shall not, however, limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Borrowers hereunder to pay any amount owing with respect to the Loans. In the event of any conflict between the accounts and records maintained by any Lender and the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent in respect of such matters, the accounts and records of such Lender shall control. Upon the request of any Lender made through the Administrative Agent, such Lender's Loans may be evidenced by a Committed Loan Note in addition to such accounts or records. Each Lender may attach schedules to its Note(s) and endorse thereon the date, Type (if applicable), amount and maturity of the applicable Loans and payments with respect thereto.
2.13 Evidence of Debt.
     (b) In addition to the accounts and records referred to in subsection (a), each Lender and the Administrative Agent shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice accounts or records evidencing the purchases and sales by such Lender of participations in Letters of Credit, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans and Canadian Dollar Loans. In the event of any conflict between the accounts and records maintained by the Administrative Agent and the accounts and records of any Lender in respect of such matters, the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent shall control in the absence of manifest error.
 
     
2.14 Payments Generally.
     (a) All payments to be made by the Borrowers shall be made without condition or deduction for any counterclaim, defense, recoupment or set-off. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by the Borrowers hereunder shall be made to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the respective Lenders to which such payment is owed, at the Administrative Agent's Office in U.S. Dollars and in immediately available funds not later than 12:00 noon, on the date specified herein. The Administrative Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its Pro Rata Share (or other applicable share as provided herein) of such payment in like funds as received by wire transfer to such Lender's Lending Office. All payments received by the Administrative Agent after 12:00 noon shall be deemed received on the next succeeding Business Day and any applicable interest or fee shall continue to accrue.
     (b) Subject to the definition of "Interest Period," if any payment to be made by a Borrower shall come due on a day other than a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next following Business Day, and such extension of time shall be reflected in computing interest or fees, as the case may be.
     (c) If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) , toward costs and expenses (including Attorney Costs and amounts payable under ) incurred by the Administrative Agent and each Lender, (ii) , toward repayment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (iii) , toward repayment of principal then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal then due to such parties.
first
Article III
second
third
     (d) Unless any Borrower or any Lender has notified the Administrative Agent prior to the date any payment is required to be made by it to the Administrative Agent hereunder, that such Borrower or such Lender, as the case may be, will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Borrower or such Lender, as the case may be, has timely made such payment and may (but shall not be so required to), in reliance thereon, make available a corresponding amount to the Person entitled thereto. If and to the extent that such payment was not in fact made to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds, then:
     (i) if such Borrower failed to make such payment, each Lender shall forthwith on demand repay to the Administrative Agent the portion of such assumed payment that was made available to such Lender in immediately available funds, together with interest thereon in respect of each day from the date such amount was made available by the Administrative Agent to such Lender to the date such amount is repaid to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds, at the Overnight Rate from time to time in effect; and
     (ii) if any Lender failed to make such payment, such Lender shall forthwith on demand pay to the Administrative Agent the amount thereof in immediately available funds, together with interest thereon for the period from the date such amount was made available by the Administrative Agent to the applicable Borrower to the date such amount
 
is recovered by the Administrative Agent (the "") at a rate per annum equal to the Overnight Rate from time to time in effect. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Committed Loan, British Pound Sterling Loan or Canadian Dollar Loan, as the case may be, included in the applicable Borrowing. If such Lender does not pay such amount forthwith upon the Administrative Agent's demand therefor, the Administrative Agent may make a demand therefor upon such Borrower, and such Borrower shall pay such amount to the Administrative Agent, together with interest thereon for the Compensation Period at a rate per annum equal to the rate of interest applicable to the applicable Borrowing. Nothing herein shall be deemed to relieve any Lender from its obligation to fulfill its Commitment or to prejudice any rights which the Administrative Agent or any Borrower may have against any Lender as a result of any default by such Lender hereunder.
Compensation Period
     A notice of the Administrative Agent to any Lender with respect to any amount owing under this subsection (d) shall be conclusive, absent manifest error.
     Upon any Lender failing to make such payment required to be made by such Lender under this Agreement, Anixter may remove or replace such Lender in accordance with .
Section 10.14
     (e) If any Lender makes available to the Administrative Agent funds for any Loan to be made by such Lender as provided in the foregoing provisions of this , and the conditions to the applicable Credit Extension set forth in are not satisfied or waived in accordance with the terms hereof, the Administrative Agent shall promptly return such funds (in like funds as received from such Lender) to such Lender, without interest.
Article II
Article IV
     (f) The obligations of the Lenders hereunder to make Committed Loans and to fund participations in Swing Line Loans, Letters of Credit, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances are several and not joint. The failure of any Lender to make any Committed Loan or to fund any such participation on any date required hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender of its corresponding obligation to do so on such date, and no Lender shall be responsible for the failure of any other Lender to so make its Committed Loan or purchase its participation.
     (g) Nothing herein shall be deemed to obligate any Lender to obtain the funds for any Loan in any particular place or manner or to constitute a representation by any Lender that it has obtained or will obtain the funds for any Loan in any particular place or manner.
     If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of the Committed Loans made by it, or the participations in L/C Obligations, in British Pound Sterling Loans, in Canadian Dollar Loans, in Canadian Banker's Acceptances or in Swing Line Loans held by it resulting in such Lender's receiving payment of a proportion of the aggregate amount of such Committed Loans or participations and accrued interest thereon greater than its pro rata share thereof as provided herein, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall (a) notify the Administrative Agent of such fact, and (b) purchase (for cash at
2.15 Sharing of Payments by Lenders.
 
face value) participations in the Committed Loans and subparticipations in L/C Obligations, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and Swing Line Loans of the other Lenders, or make such other adjustments as shall be equitable, so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Committed Loans and other amounts owing them, that:
provided
     (i) if any such participations or subparticipations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations or subparticipations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest; and
     (ii) the provisions of this Section shall not be construed to apply to (x) any payment made by a Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or (y) any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Committed Loans or subparticipations in L/C Obligations, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances or Swing Line Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to Anixter or any Subsidiary thereof (as to which the provisions of this Section shall apply).
     Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
     (a) Anixter may designate any Foreign Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary with the consent of the Administrative Agent. Upon the receipt and execution by the Administrative Agent of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement in the form of executed by such Subsidiary and Anixter, such Subsidiary shall be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement.
2.16 Borrowing Subsidiaries.
Exhibit C-1
     (b) The obligation of any Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of the first Borrowing from such Lender by a Borrowing Subsidiary is subject to the satisfaction of the condition that the Administrative Agent shall have received the following:
     (i) a Note in the applicable form payable to such Lender signed by such Borrowing Subsidiary, if required by such Lender;
     (ii) all documents as shall reasonably demonstrate the existence of such Borrowing Subsidiary, the corporate power and authority of such Borrowing Subsidiary to enter into and the validity with respect to such Borrowing Subsidiary of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and any other matters relevant hereto (including an opinion of counsel), all in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and
 
     (iii) any governmental and third party approvals necessary or advisable in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by such Borrowing Subsidiary.
     (c) Any Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder at such time as no Credit Extensions shall be outstanding to such Subsidiary and such Subsidiary and Anixter shall have executed and delivered to the Administrative Agent a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination in the form of . Upon a Borrowing Subsidiary's liquidation, dissolution or disposal of to a person other than Anixter or any Subsidiary, all Credit Extensions outstanding to any Borrowing Subsidiary shall be due and payable and such Subsidiary shall no longer be entitled to obtain any Credit Extensions hereunder.
Exhibit C-2
     If on any Revaluation Date the Administrative Agent shall have determined that the then outstanding Dollar Equivalent principal amount of the Total Outstandings exceeds the Aggregate Commitments due to a change in applicable rates of exchange between US Dollars, on the one hand, and any Applicable Currency, on the other hand by an amount equal to or in excess of US$1,000,000, the Administrative Agent may (or, at the request of the Required Lenders, shall) give notice to Anixter that a prepayment is required under this Section, and the Borrowers agree thereupon to make prepayments of Loans such that, after giving effect to such prepayment, the Total Outstandings will not exceed the Aggregate Commitments.
2.17 Currency Exchange Fluctuations.
then
     
2.18 Increase in Commitments.
     (a) . Provided there exists no Default, upon notice to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly notify the Lenders), Anixter may from time to time, request an increase in the Aggregate Commitments by an amount (for all such requests) not exceeding US$100,000,000; that (i) any such request for an increase shall be in a minimum amount of US$15,000,000, and (ii) Anixter may make a maximum of two such requests in any calendar year.
Request for Increase
provided
     (b) . To achieve the full amount of a requested increase and subject to the approval of the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer (which approvals shall not be unreasonably withheld), Anixter may invite existing Lenders to increase their respective Commitments and/or additional Eligible Assignees to become Lenders pursuant to a joinder agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel. Any Commitment of an Eligible Assignee becoming a new Lender under this shall be in an amount of at least US$15,000,000.
Lenders
Section 2.18
     (c) . If the Aggregate Commitments are increased in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent and Anixter shall determine the effective date (the "") and the final allocation of such increase. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify Anixter and the Lenders of the final allocation of such increase and the Increase Effective Date.
Effective Date and Allocations
Increase Effective Date
     (d) . As a condition precedent to such increase, Anixter shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of each Loan Party dated
Conditions to Effectiveness of Increase
 
as of the Increase Effective Date (in sufficient copies for each Lender) signed by a Responsible Officer of such Loan Party (i) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such increase, and (ii) in the case of Anixter, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such increase, (A) the representations and warranties contained in and the other Loan Documents are true and correct on and as of the Increase Effective Date, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and except that for purposes of this , the representations and warranties contained in subsections (a) and (b) of shall be deemed to refer to the most recent statements furnished pursuant to clauses (a) and (b), respectively, of , and (B) no Default exists. The Borrowers shall prepay any Committed Loans outstanding on the Increase Effective Date (and pay any additional amounts required pursuant to ) to the extent necessary to keep the outstanding Committed Loans ratable with any revised Pro Rata Shares arising from any nonratable increase in the Commitments under this Section.
Article V
Section 2.18
Section 5.07
Section 6.01
Section 3.05
     (e) . This Section shall supersede any provisions in or to the contrary.
Conflicting Provisions
Sections 2.15
10.01
     
2.19 Designation of British Pound Sterling Lenders and Canadian Dollar Lenders; Increases, Reduction or Termination of British Pound Sterling Commitments and Canadian Dollar Commitments.
     (a) Anixter may, from time to time, with the acceptance of the related Lender and the approval of the Administrative Agent (such approval by the Administrative Agent not to be unreasonably withheld), designate a Lender as a British Pound Sterling Lender with a British Pound Sterling Commitment or as a Canadian Dollar Lender with a Canadian Dollar Commitment, that (i) the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000, and (ii) any such new British Pound Sterling Commitment shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof.
provided
     (b) Anixter may, from time to time, with the acceptance of the related British Pound Sterling Lender or Canadian Dollar Lender and the approval of the Administrative Agent (such approval by the Administrative Agent not to be unreasonably withheld), increase the British Pound Sterling Commitment of a British Pound Sterling Lender or the Canadian Dollar Commitment of a Canadian Dollar Lender, that (i) the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000,, and (ii) any such increase in a British Pound Sterling Commitment shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof.
provided
     (c) Upon the effectiveness of any new British Pound Sterling Commitment or any new Canadian Dollar Commitment or any increase in a British Pound Sterling Commitment or Canadian Dollar Commitment, the Borrowers shall make such borrowings and prepayments of British Pound Sterling Loans and/or Canadian Dollar Loans (and pay any additional amounts pursuant to (and in the case of Canadian Dollar Lenders, the Canadian Dollar Lenders shall sell and purchase participations in outstanding Canadian Banker's Acceptances) to the extent necessary to keep the outstanding British Pound Sterling Loans and the outstanding
Section 3.05
 
Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances ratable with any revised British Pound Sterling Pro Rata Shares and/or Canadian Dollar Pro Rata Shares arising from any nonratable increase in British Pound Sterling Commitments or Canadian Dollar Commitments under this Section.
     (d) Anixter may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, terminate the British Pound Sterling Commitment of any British Pound Sterling Lender, terminate the Canadian Dollar Commitment of any Canadian Dollar Lender, or reduce any British Pound Sterling Commitment to an amount not less than the then Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans of such British Pound Sterling Lender or reduce any Canadian Dollar Commitment to an amount not less than the then Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans of such Canadian Dollar Lender (and, if applicable, its Canadian Banker's Acceptances); that (i) any such notice shall be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., five Business Days prior to the date of termination or reduction, and (ii) any such partial reduction shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof.
provided
     (e) In connection with any new British Pound Sterling Commitment, any new Canadian Dollar Commitment and any increase or decrease or termination of any British Pound Sterling Commitment or Canadian Dollar Commitment, Anixter may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, increase or decrease the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments, that the sum of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
provided
     (f) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of any designation of a British Pound Sterling Lender, of any increase in any British Pound Sterling Commitment, of any notice of reduction or termination of British Pound Sterling Commitments, of any designation of a Canadian Dollar Lender, of any increase in any Canadian Dollar Commitment, and of any notice of reduction or termination of Canadian Dollar Commitments.
     (g) Without the consent of the Administrative Agent, Anixter may not effect more than three adjustments of British Pound Sterling Commitments, Canadian Dollar Commitments, the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments in any twelve month period pursuant to this Section (it being understood that a single adjustment may involve the concurrent addition, termination, increase or decrease of more than one commitment.)
     
2.20 Extension of Maturity Date.
     (a) . Anixter may, by notice to the Administrative Agent (who shall promptly notify the Lenders) not earlier than 90 days and not later than 35 days prior to the second anniversary of the Closing Date (the ""), request that each Lender extend such Lender's Scheduled Maturity Date for an additional one year from April 20, 2012 to April 20, 2013.
Requests for Extension
Notification Date
 
     (b) . Each Lender, acting in its sole and individual discretion, shall, by notice to the Administrative Agent given not earlier than 30 days prior to the Notification Date and not later than the date (the "") that is 20 days prior to the Notification Date, advise the Administrative Agent whether or not such Lender agrees to such extension (and each Lender that determines not to so extend its Scheduled Maturity Date (a "") shall notify the Administrative Agent of such fact promptly after such determination (but in any event no later than the Notice Date) and any Lender that does not so advise the Administrative Agent on or before the Notice Date shall be deemed to be a Non-Extending Lender. The election of any Lender to agree to such extension shall not obligate any other Lender to so agree.
Lender Elections to Extend
Notice Date
Non-Extending Lender
     (c) . The Administrative Agent shall notify Anixter of each Lender's determination under this Section no later than the date 15 days prior to the Notification Date (or, if such date is not a Business Day, on the next preceding Business Day).
Notification by Administrative Agent
     (d) . Anixter shall have the right to replace each Non-Extending Lender with, and add as "Lenders" under this Agreement in place thereof, one or more Eligible Assignees (each, an "") as provided in ; that each of such Additional Commitment Lenders shall enter into an Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Additional Commitment Lender shall, effective as of the Notification Date, undertake a Commitment (and, if any such Additional Commitment Lender is already a Lender, its Commitment shall be in addition to such Lender's Commitment hereunder on such date).
Additional Commitment Lenders
Additional Commitment Lender
Section 10.14
provided
     (e) . If (and only if) the total of the Commitments of the Lenders that have agreed so to extend their Scheduled Maturity Date (each, an "") and the additional Commitments of the Additional Commitment Lenders shall be more than 50% of the aggregate amount of the Commitments in effect immediately prior to the Notification Date, then, effective as of the Notification Date, the Scheduled Maturity Date of each Extending Lender and of each Additional Commitment Lender shall be extended to April 20, 2013 (except that, if such date is not a Business Day, such Scheduled Maturity Date as so extended shall be the next preceding Business Day) and each Additional Commitment Lender shall thereupon become a "Lender" for all purposes of this Agreement.
Minimum Extension Requirement
Extending Lender
     (f) . As a condition precedent to such extension, Anixter shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of each Loan Party dated as of the Notification Date (in sufficient copies for each Extending Lender and each Additional Commitment Lender) signed by a Responsible Officer of such Loan Party (i) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such extension and (ii) in the case of Anixter, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such extension, (A) the representations and warranties contained in Article V and the other Loan Documents are true and correct on and as of the Notification Date, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and except that for purposes of this , the representations and warranties contained in subsections (a) and (b) of shall be deemed to refer to the most recent statements furnished pursuant to subsections (a) and (b),
Conditions to Effectiveness of Extensions
Section 2.20
Section 5.07
 
respectively, of , and (B) no Default exists. In addition, on the Scheduled Maturity Date of each Non-Extending Lender, the Borrowers shall prepay any Committed Loans outstanding on such date (and pay any additional amounts required pursuant to ) to the extent necessary to keep outstanding Committed Loans ratable with any revised Pro Rata Shares of the respective Lenders effective as of such date.
Section 6.01
Section 3.05
     (g) . This Section shall supersede any provisions in or to the contrary.
Conflicting Provisions
Section 2.15
10.01
     
3.01 Taxes.
     (a) . Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the respective Borrowers hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without reduction or withholding for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes, that if the applicable Borrower shall be required by applicable law to deduct any Indemnified Taxes (including any Other Taxes) from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or L/C Issuer, as the case may be, receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) such Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) such Borrower shall timely pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payments Free of Taxes
provided
     (b) . Without limiting the provisions of subsection (a) above, each Borrower shall timely pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Borrowers
     (c) . Each Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the L/C Issuer, within 30 days after demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to a Borrower by a Lender or the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the L/C Issuer, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification by the Borrowers
     (d) . As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by any Borrower to a Governmental Authority, such Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payments
 
     (e) . Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the law of the jurisdiction in which a Borrower is resident for tax purposes, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall deliver to Anixter (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Lender, if requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent as will enable Anixter or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements.
Status of Lenders
     Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, in the event that a Borrower is resident for tax purposes in the United States, any Foreign Lender shall deliver to Anixter and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the request of Anixter or the Administrative Agent, but only if such Foreign Lender is legally entitled to do so), whichever of the following is applicable:
     (i) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN claiming eligibility for benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party,
     (ii) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8ECI,
     (iii) in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate to the effect that such Foreign Lender is not (A) a "bank" within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (B) a "10 percent shareholder" of the applicable Borrower within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or (C) a "controlled foreign corporation" described in section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code and (y) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN, or
     (iv) any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in United States Federal withholding tax duly completed together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit Anixter to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made.
     Without limiting the obligations of the Lenders set forth above regarding delivery of certain forms and documents to establish each Lender's status for U.S. withholding tax purposes, each Lender agrees promptly to deliver to the Administrative Agent or Anixter, as the Administrative Agent or Anixter shall reasonably request, on or prior to the Closing Date, and in a timely fashion thereafter, such other documents and forms required by any relevant taxing authorities under the Laws of any other jurisdiction, duly executed and completed by such Lender, as are required under such Laws to confirm such Lender's entitlement to any available exemption from, or reduction of, applicable withholding taxes in respect of all payments to be
 
made to such Lender outside of the U.S. by the Borrowers pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise to establish such Lender's status for withholding tax purposes in such other jurisdiction. Each Lender shall promptly (i) notify the Administrative Agent of any change in circumstances which would modify or render invalid any such claimed exemption or reduction, and (ii) take such steps as shall not be materially disadvantageous to it, in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, and as may be reasonably necessary (including the re-designation of its Lending Office) to avoid any requirement of applicable Laws of any such jurisdiction that any Borrower make any deduction or withholding for taxes from amounts payable to such Lender. Additionally, each of the Borrowers shall promptly deliver to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, as the Administrative Agent or such Lender shall reasonably request, on or prior to the Closing Date, and in a timely fashion thereafter, such documents and forms required by any relevant taxing authorities under the Laws of any jurisdiction, duly executed and completed by such Borrower, as are required to be furnished by such Lender or the Administrative Agent under such Laws in connection with any payment by the Administrative Agent or any Lender of Taxes or Other Taxes, or otherwise in connection with the Loan Documents, with respect to such jurisdiction.
     (f) . If the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by any Borrower or with respect to which any Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section, it shall pay to such Borrower an amount equal to such refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by such Borrower under this Section with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund), that each Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, agrees to repay the amount paid over to such Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This subsection shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes that it deems confidential) to any Borrower or any other Person.
Treatment of Certain Refunds
provided
     If any Lender determines that any Law has made it unlawful, or that any Governmental Authority has asserted that it is unlawful, for any Lender or its applicable Lending Office to make, maintain or fund Eurocurrency Rate Loans (whether denominated in US Dollars or another Available Currency), or materially restricts the authority of such Lender to purchase or sell, or to take deposits of, US Dollars or any other Available Currency in the applicable interbank market, or to determine or charge interest rates based upon the Eurocurrency Rate, then, on notice thereof by such Lender to Anixter through the Administrative Agent, any obligation of such Lender to make or continue Eurocurrency Rate Loans or to convert Base Rate Committed Loans to Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans shall be suspended until such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and Anixter that the circumstances giving rise to such determination no longer exist. Upon receipt of such notice, the Borrowers shall, upon demand from such Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), prepay or, if applicable and such Loans are denominated in US Dollars, convert all Eurocurrency Rate Loans of such
3.02 Illegality.
 
Lender to Base Rate Loans, either on the last day of the Interest Period thereof, if such Lender may lawfully continue to maintain such Eurocurrency Rate Loans to such day, or immediately, if such Lender may not lawfully continue to maintain such Eurocurrency Rate Loans. Upon any such prepayment or conversion, the Borrowers shall also pay interest on the amount so prepaid or converted. Each Lender agrees to designate a different Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for such notice and will not, in the good faith judgment of such Lender, otherwise be materially disadvantageous to such Lender.
     If the Administrative Agent determines (or in the case of clause (c) below, the Required Lenders determine) in connection with any request for a Eurocurrency Rate Loan or a conversion to or continuation thereof that (a) deposits in the applicable currency are not being offered to banks in the applicable interbank market for the applicable amount and Interest Period of such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, (b) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for determining the Eurocurrency Rate for such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, or (c) the Eurocurrency Rate for such Eurocurrency Rate Loan does not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to the Required Lenders of funding such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the Administrative Agent will promptly notify Anixter and all Lenders. Thereafter, the obligation of the Lenders to make or maintain Eurocurrency Rate Loans in the affected currency or currencies shall be suspended until the Administrative Agent revokes such notice. Upon receipt of such notice, any Borrower may revoke any pending request for a Committed Borrowing, conversion or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans or, failing that, will be deemed to have converted such request into a request for a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans in the amount specified therein.
3.03 Inability to Determine Rates.
     
3.04 Increased Costs and Reduced Return; Capital Adequacy; Reserves on Eurocurrency Rate Loans.
     (a) . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs Generally
     (i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, any Lender (except (A) any reserve requirement contemplated by and (B) the requirements of the Bank of England and the Financial Services Authority or the European Central Bank reflected in the Mandatory Cost, other than as set forth below) or the L/C Issuer;
Section 3.04(e)
     (ii) subject any Lender or the L/C Issuer to any tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement, any Letter of Credit, any participation in a Letter of Credit or any Eurodollar Loan made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to such Lender or the L/C Issuer in respect thereof (except for Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of, any Excluded Tax payable by such Lender or the L/C Issuer);
Section 3.01
     (iii) result in the Mandatory Cost, as calculated hereunder, not representing the cost to any Lender of complying with the requirements of the Bank of England and/or the Financial Services Authority or the European Central Bank in relation to its making, funding or maintaining Eurocurrency Rate Loans; or
 
     (iv) impose on any Lender or the L/C Issuer or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan), or to increase the cost to such Lender or the L/C Issuer of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit (or of maintaining its obligation to participate in or to issue any Letter of Credit), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the L/C Issuer hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, upon request of such Lender or the L/C Issuer, Anixter will pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
     (b) . If any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines that any Change in Law affecting such Lender or the L/C Issuer or any Lending Office of such Lender or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company, if any, regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the L/C Issuer, to a level below that which such Lender or the L/C Issuer or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time Anixter will pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
     (c) . A certificate of a Lender or the L/C Issuer setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in subsection (a) or (b) of this Section and delivered to Anixter shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Anixter shall pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Certificates for Reimbursement
     (d) . Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the L/C Issuer to demand compensation pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's right to demand such compensation, provided that no Borrower shall be required to compensate a Lender or the L/C Issuer pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section for any increased costs incurred or reductions suffered more than nine months prior to the date that such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, notifies Anixter of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's intention to claim compensation therefor (except that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the nine-month period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Delay in Requests
 
     (e) . Anixter shall pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) to each Lender, as long as such Lender shall be required to maintain reserves with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency funds or deposits (currently known as "Eurocurrency liabilities"), additional interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Eurocurrency Rate Loan equal to the actual costs of such reserves allocated to such Loan by such Lender (as determined by such Lender in good faith, which determination shall be conclusive), which shall be due and payable on each date on which interest is payable on such Loan, Anixter shall have received at least 10 days' prior notice (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) of such additional interest from such Lender. If a Lender fails to give notice 10 days prior to the relevant Interest Payment Date, such additional interest shall be due and payable 10 days from receipt of such notice.
Reserves on Eurocurrency Rate Loans
provided
     Upon written demand of any Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) from time to time, each Borrower shall promptly compensate such Lender for and hold such Lender harmless from any loss, cost or expense incurred by it as a result of:
3.05 Funding Losses.
     (a) any continuation, conversion, payment or prepayment of any Loan of such Borrower other than a Base Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan (whether voluntary, mandatory, automatic, by reason of acceleration, or otherwise);
     (b) any failure by such Borrower (for a reason other than the failure of such Lender to make a Loan) to prepay, borrow, continue or convert any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on the date or in the amount notified by such Borrower;
     (c) any failure by any Borrower to make payment of any Loan or drawing under any Letter of Credit (or interest due thereon) denominated in a Foreign Currency on its scheduled due date or any payment thereof in a different currency; or
     (d) any assignment of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period therefor as a result of a request by such Borrower pursuant to ;
Section 10.16
including any loss of anticipated profits, any foreign exchange losses and any loss or expense arising from the liquidation or reemployment of funds obtained by it to maintain such Loan, from fees payable to terminate the deposits from which such funds were obtained or from the performance of any foreign exchange contract. Anixter shall also pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) any customary administrative fees charged by such Lender in connection with the foregoing.
The Borrowers shall pay each Lender the amount shown as due on any certificate delivered by such Lender claiming such compensation within ten (10) Business Days after the Borrowers' receipt of the same. Such Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by such Lender in connection with the foregoing. The Borrowers shall pay each Lender the amount shown as due on any certificate delivered by such Lender claiming such compensation within ten (10) Business Days after the Borrowers' receipt of the same. Such Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by such Lender in connection with the foregoing.
For purposes of calculating amounts payable by any Borrower to the Lenders under this , each Lender shall be deemed to have funded each Eurocurrency Rate Loan made
Section 3.05
 
by it at the Eurocurrency Rate for such Loan by a matching deposit or other borrowing in the applicable interbank market for such currency for a comparable amount and for a comparable period, whether or not such Eurocurrency Rate Loan was in fact so funded.
     
3.06 Matters Applicable to all Requests for Compensation.
     (a) A certificate of the Administrative Agent or any Lender claiming compensation under this and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error. Such certificate shall provide in reasonable detail the amount payable and the calculations used to determine such amount. In determining such amount, the Administrative Agent or such Lender may use any reasonable averaging and attribution methods.
Article III
     (b) Upon any Lender's making a claim for compensation under or , Anixter may remove or replace such Lender in accordance with .
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 10.14
     (c) Any Lender claiming any additional amounts payable pursuant to or , or exercising its rights under , shall use reasonable efforts (consistent with legal and regulatory restrictions) to file any certificate or document reasonably requested by Anixter or to change the jurisdiction of its Lending Office if the making of such a filing or change would avoid the need for or reduce the amount of any such additional amounts which may thereafter accrue or avoid the circumstances giving rise to such exercise and would not, in the sole determination of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 3.02
     (d) If any Lender fails to notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent within 120 days of its actual knowledge of any such additional amount payable by a Borrower pursuant to or or (the ""), the Borrowers shall not be obligated to pay such additional amounts accruing during the period from the Notice Date until the date of delivery of such notice, , , that the failure to give such notice shall not affect any Borrower's obligation to pay such additional amounts accrued prior to the Notice Date or after delivery of such notice.
Section 3.01
3.04(a)
(b)
Notice Date
provided
further
     All of the Borrowers' obligations under this shall survive termination of the Commitments and payment in full of all the other Obligations.
3.07 Survival.
Article III
     The effectiveness of this Agreement as an amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement and the obligation of each Lender to make its initial Credit Extension hereunder are subject to satisfaction of the following conditions precedent:
4.01 Conditions of Amendment and Restatement and Initial Credit Extension.
     (a) Unless waived by all the Lenders, the Administrative Agent's receipt of the following, each of which shall be originals or facsimiles (followed promptly by originals) unless otherwise specified, each properly executed by a Responsible Officer of the signing Loan Party, each dated the Closing Date (or, in the case of certificates of governmental officials, a recent date
 
before the Closing Date) and each in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its legal counsel:
     (i) executed counterparts of this Agreement, sufficient in number for distribution to the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Borrowers;
     (ii) Committed Loan Notes executed by the Borrowers in favor of each Lender requesting such a Note, each in a principal amount equal to such Lender's Commitment;
     (iii) Swing Line Loan Notes executed by the Borrowers in favor of the Swing Line Lender in the principal amount of the Swing Line Loan Commitment;
     (iv) British Pound Sterling Loan Notes executed by the Borrowing Subsidiaries in favor of each British Pound Sterling Lender requesting such a Note, each in the principal amount of such British Pound Sterling Lender's British Pound Sterling Commitment;
     (v) Canadian Dollar Loan Notes executed by the Borrowing Subsidiaries in favor of each Canadian Dollar Lender requesting such a Note, each in the principal amount of such Canadian Dollar Lender's Canadian Dollar Commitment;
     (vi) such certificates of resolutions or other action, incumbency certificates and/or other certificates of Responsible Officers of each Loan Party as the Administrative Agent may require to establish the identities of and verify the authority and capacity of each Responsible Officer thereof authorized to act as a Responsible Officer in connection with the Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party and authorizing the execution, delivery and performance by such Loan Party of the Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party;
     (vii) such evidence as the Administrative Agent may reasonably require to verify that each Loan Party is duly organized or formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation (to the extent applicable in such jurisdiction), including certified copies of each Loan Party's Organization Documents and certificate of good standing (if applicable) and tax clearance certificates;
     (viii) a certificate signed by a Responsible Officer of each Borrower certifying (A) that the conditions specified in and have been satisfied, (B) that there has been no event or circumstance since the date of the Audited Financial Statements which has or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and (C) the current Debt Ratings;
Sections 4.02(a)
(b)
     (ix) an opinion of counsel to each Loan Party substantially in the form of ; and
Exhibit H
     (x) such other assurances, certificates, documents, consents or opinions as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders reasonably may require.
 
     (b) Any fees required to be paid on or before the Closing Date shall have been paid.
     Without limiting the generality of the provisions or the last paragraph of , for purposes of determining compliance with the conditions specified in this , each Lender that has signed this Agreement shall be deemed to have consented to, approved or accepted or to be satisfied with, each document or other matter required thereunder to be consented to or approved by or acceptable or satisfactory to a Lender unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from such Lender prior to the proposed Closing Date specifying its objection thereto.
Section 9.03
Section 4.01
     The obligation of each Lender to honor any Request for Credit Extension (other than a Committed Loan Notice requesting only a conversion of Committed Loans to the other Type, or a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type) is subject to the following conditions precedent:
4.02 Conditions to all Credit Extensions.
     (a) The representations and warranties of the Borrowers contained in , or which are contained in any document furnished at any time under or in connection herewith, shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Credit Extension, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
Article V
     (b) No Default shall exist, or would result (including in respect of or as of the next succeeding end of a Fiscal Quarter) from, such proposed Credit Extension.
Section 7.16
7.17
     (c) The Administrative Agent shall have received a Request for Credit Extension in accordance with the requirements hereof.
     (d) The Administrative Agent shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to it, such other assurances, certificates, documents or consents related to the foregoing as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders reasonably may require.
     Each Request for Credit Extension (other than a Committed Loan Notice requesting only a conversion of Committed Loans to the other Type or a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type) submitted by a Borrower shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty that the conditions specified in and have been satisfied on and as of the date of the applicable Credit Extension.
Sections 4.02(a)
(b)
     Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that:
     AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter (i) is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, (ii) is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction in which it owns or leases real property or in which the nature of its business requires it to be so qualified, except those jurisdictions where the failure to be in good standing or to so qualify has not had or could not
5.01 Organization; Corporate Powers.
 
reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and (iii) has all requisite corporate power and authority to own, operate and encumber its property and assets and to conduct its business as presently conducted and as proposed to be conducted in connection with and following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents.
     
5.02 Authority.
     (a) AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter party to any of the Transaction Documents has the requisite corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under each of the Transaction Documents executed by it, or to be executed by it.
     (b) The execution, delivery and performance (or filing or recording, as the case may be) of each of the Transaction Documents to which its party and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter party thereto and no other corporate proceedings on the part of any such Person are necessary to consummate such transactions.
     (c) Each of the Transaction Documents to which it is a party has been duly executed and delivered (or filed or recorded, as the case may be) by AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter party thereto, constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligations, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms (except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by general equitable principles), and is in full force and effect (unless terminated in accordance with the terms thereof).
     Anixter has no Subsidiaries other than those described in and those, if any, which are permitted by to be created after the Closing Date.
5.03 Subsidiaries.
Schedule 5.03
Section 7.03
     The execution, delivery and performance of each Transaction Document to which it is party by AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter and each of the transactions contemplated thereby, do not and will not (i) conflict with any Contractual Obligation of any such Person, any liability resulting from which would have or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (ii) conflict with or violate such Person's certificate or articles of incorporation or by-laws or similar charter and constituting documents, or (iii) except as set forth on , conflict with, result in a breach of or constitute (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) a default under any Requirement of Law or Contractual Obligation of any such Person, or require termination of any Contractual Obligation of any such Person, or (iv) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien whatsoever upon any of the properties or assets of any such Person (other than Liens permitted pursuant to , or (v) require any approval of stockholders of any such Person, unless such approval has been obtained.
5.04 No Conflict.
Schedule 5.04
Section 7.02(b))
     The execution, delivery and performance of each Transaction Document to which it is a party by AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter, and the transactions contemplated thereby do not and will not require any registration with, consent or approval of, or notice to, or other action with or by, any Governmental Authority,
5.05 Governmental Consents.
 
except filings, consents or notices which have been made, obtained or given and are in full force and effect.
     Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any of Anixter's Subsidiaries is subject to regulation under the Public Utility Holdings Company Act of 1935, the Federal Power Act, the Interstate Commerce Act, the Investment Company Act of 1940 or any other statute or regulation of any Governmental Authority such that its ability to incur indebtedness is limited or its ability to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby or by the other Transaction Documents is materially impaired.
5.06 Governmental Regulation.
     
5.07 Financial Position.
     (a) As of the Closing Date, all quarterly and annual financial statements of Anixter or of Anixter and any of its Subsidiaries delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders (including the Audited Financial Statements) were prepared in conformity with GAAP (except as otherwise noted therein) and fairly present the financial position of Anixter or the consolidated financial position of Anixter and such Subsidiaries, as the case may be, as at the respective dates thereof and the results of operations and changes in cash flows for each of the periods covered thereby, subject, in the case of any unaudited interim financial statements to changes resulting from audit and normal year-end adjustments.
     (b) All quarterly and annual financial statements of Anixter or of Anixter and any of its Subsidiaries delivered to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date this representation is made or deemed made were prepared in conformity with GAAP (except as otherwise noted there) and fairly present the financial position of Anixter or the consolidated financial position of Anixter and such Subsidiaries, as the case may be as at the respective dates thereof and the results of operations and changes in cash flows for each of the periods covered thereby, subject, in the case of any unaudited interim financial statements, to changes resulting from audit and normal year-end adjustments.
     
5.08 Litigation; Adverse Effects.
     (a) Except as set forth in there is no action, suit, proceeding, investigation of any Governmental Authority or arbitration at law or in equity, or before or by any Governmental Authority, pending, or, to the best knowledge of such Borrower, threatened against AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or any Property of any of them, which could be reasonably expected to result in any Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.08
     (b) Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter is (A) in violation of any applicable law which violation has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (B) subject to or in default with respect to any final judgment, writ, injunction, decree, order, rule or regulation of any court or Governmental Authority which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no action, suit, proceeding or investigation pending or, to the knowledge of such Borrower, threatened against or affecting AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter which challenges the validity or the enforceability of any of the Transaction Documents.
 
     With respect to each of AXE, Anixter and Anixter and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, there has occurred no event since December 29, 2006 which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
5.09 No Material Adverse Change.
     All United States Federal income and other material tax returns and reports of each Borrower and each Borrower's Subsidiaries required to be filed (including extensions) have been timely filed and all taxes, assessments, fees and other charges of Governmental Authorities thereupon and upon their respective properties, assets, income and franchises which are shown on such returns as being due and payable, have been paid when due and payable, except (i) taxes being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and that are reserved against in accordance with GAAP, (ii) taxes which are not yet delinquent, (iii) taxes which are payable in installments so long as paid before any penalty accrues with respect thereto and (iv) other taxes, assessments, fees and other charges or Governmental Authorities which do not exceed US$250,000 in the aggregate. Except as set forth in through above, such Borrower has no knowledge of any proposed tax assessment against Anixter or any of Anixter's Subsidiaries which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
5.10 Payment of Taxes.
clauses (i)
(iv)
     Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter is in default in the performance, observance or fulfillment of any of the obligations, covenants or conditions contained in any Contractual Obligation applicable to it the effect of which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and no condition exists which, with the giving of notice or the lapse of time or both, would constitute a default under such Contractual Obligation, except where the consequences, direct or indirect, of such default or defaults, if any, would not have and could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
5.11 Performance.
     Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any of Anixter's Subsidiaries is engaged in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any Margin Stock and none will use, directly or indirectly, the proceeds of any Loan to purchase or carry Margin Stock.
5.12 Securities Activities.
     Subject to changes in facts or conditions which are required or permitted under this Agreement, the representations and warranties of AXE, each Borrower and each Subsidiary of each Borrower contained in the Transaction Documents, and all certificates and other documents delivered to the Administrative Agent in connection therewith, taken as a whole, do not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained herein or therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
5.13 Disclosure.
     Each of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter is in compliance with all Requirements of Law (including, without limitation, the Securities Act and the Securities Exchange Act, the applicable rules and regulations thereunder, and state securities laws) applicable to it and its business, where the failure to so comply would have or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
5.14 Requirements of Law.
     Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter owns, is licensed or otherwise has the lawful right to use, or has all permits and other approvals
5.15 Patents, Trademarks, Permits, Etc.
 
of Governmental Authorities, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes used in or necessary for the conduct of its business as currently conducted which are material to its financial condition, business, operations, assets and prospects, individually or taken as a whole. The use of such permits and other approvals of Governmental Authorities, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes by each Borrower or any such Subsidiary does not infringe on the rights of any Person, subject to such claims and infringements the existence of which do not have or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not impair the ownership of or rights under (or the license or other right to use, as the case may be) any permits and governmental approvals, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, technology, know-how or processes by Anixter or any such Subsidiary in any manner which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
     Except as disclosed in and except to the extent that a failure of any of the following representations to be true could not be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, (i) each of the operations of AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries comply in all respects with all applicable environmental, health and safety Requirements of Law; (ii) each of AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries has obtained all environmental, health and safety Permits necessary for its operations, all such Permits are in good standing and AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with all terms and conditions of such Permits; and (iii) (A) neither AXE, Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter, nor any of their present Property or operations and (B) none of AXE's, Anixter's or its Subsidiaries' previously-owned Property or past operations is subject to any Remedial Action or other Liabilities and Costs arising from the Release or threatened Release of a Contaminant into the environment.
5.16 Environmental Matters.
Schedule 5.16
     No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. As of each date that this representation is made or deemed made, the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Pension Plans (based on the assumptions used by the Plans to determine benefit obligations on an ongoing basis) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than US$25,000,000 the fair market value of all of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
5.17 Employee Benefit Matters.
     Each Loan Party is Solvent after giving effect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and the payment and accrual of all Transaction Costs with respect to any of the foregoing.
5.18 Solvency.
     AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter (other than the Receivables Securitization SPV) has good title to all of the assets (tangible and intangible) owned by it, except for imperfections of title (including Liens to the extent permitted under ) which in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and all such assets are free and clear of all Liens, except as otherwise specifically permitted by the terms and provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. Substantially all of the assets and properties owned by, leased to or used by each
5.19 Assets and Properties.
Section 7.02(b)
 
Borrower or any Domestic Subsidiary of Anixter are in good repair, working order and condition, excepting ordinary wear and tear and are free and clear of any known defects except such defects as do not substantially interfere with the continued use thereof in the conduct of normal operations.
     Except as set forth in or as otherwise permitted in this Agreement, neither AXE nor Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter is engaged in any material partnership or material joint venture with any other Person.
5.20 Joint Venture; Partnership.
Schedule 5.20
     No Default exists.
5.21 No Default.
     On or after the Closing Date, neither Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter has directly or indirectly declared, ordered, paid or made or set apart any sum or property for any payment, distribution or contribution to or investment in AXE (whether in cash or otherwise) or agreed to do so, except to the extent permitted pursuant to .
5.22 Restricted Payments to AXE.
Section 7.05
     To induce each Lender and the Administrative Agent to enter into this Agreement and to make the Loans, each Borrower represents and warrants to each Lender and the Administrative Agent that the statements set forth in the preceding Sections of this Article V (except to the extent that such statements expressly are made only as of the Closing Date), are true, correct and complete in all material respects on and as of the date of each Borrowing after the Closing Date, except that the representations and warranties need not be true and correct to the extent that changes in the facts and conditions on which such representations and warranties are based are expressly required or permitted under this Agreement.
5.23 Subsequent Funding Representations and Warranties.
     So long as any Lender shall have any Commitment hereunder or any Loan or other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied,
     Each Borrower shall, and shall cause each of its material Subsidiaries to, maintain or cause to be maintained a system of accounting established and administered in accordance with sound business practices and consistent with past practice to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and, if required by the terms of this Agreement, in conformity with Agreement Accounting Principles, and each of the financial statements described below shall be prepared from such system and records. Anixter shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
6.01 Financial Statements.
     (a) . As soon as practicable, and in any event within five (5) days after the date normally required to be filed with the Commission, after the end of each of Anixter's Fiscal Quarters, on a consolidated basis for the Consolidated Group, each of the following:
Quarterly Reports
     (i) a balance sheet as of the end of such Fiscal Quarter and as of the end of the previous Fiscal Year; and
 
     (ii) an income statement and a cash flow statement of such Fiscal Quarter and for the period from the beginning of the current Fiscal Year to the end of such Fiscal Quarter, setting forth in each case in comparative form and in reasonable detail the figures for the corresponding periods of the previous Fiscal Year;
all prepared by Anixter, together with a certification by one of Anixter's Financial Officers that they fairly represent the financial condition of the Persons covered thereby as at the dates indicated in accordance with GAAP, subject to changes resulting from audit and normal year-end adjustments and the absence of footnotes.
     (b) . As soon as practicable, and in any event within ninety (90) days after the end of each Fiscal Year on a consolidated basis for the Consolidated Group, annual financial statements consisting of a balance sheet, income statement and cash flow statement, setting forth in comparative form in each case the consolidated figures for the previous Fiscal Year all in reasonable detail, and accompanied by an opinion (unqualified as to scope or going concern and which is not adverse) thereon of Ernst & Young LLP or other firm of independent certified public accountants of recognized national standing regularly retained by Anixter and acceptable to the Administrative Agent, which report shall state that such financial statements present fairly the financial position of the Persons covered thereby as at the dates indicated and the results of their operations and cash flow for the periods indicated in conformity with GAAP applied on a basis consistent with prior years (or, in the event of a change in accounting principles, such accountants' concurrence with such change) and that such firm's audit has been conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards.
Annual Reports
     (c) . Promptly upon completion, but in any event not later than seventy-five (75) days after the end of each Fiscal Year, on a consolidated basis for the Consolidated Group, a copy of the operating budget and projections by Anixter of the income statement, balance sheet and cash flow of the Consolidated Group, taken as a whole, for the next succeeding Fiscal Year of Anixter, all in form customarily prepared by Anixter's management, such operating budget and projected financial statements to be accompanied by a certificate of one of Anixter's Financial Officers to the effect that such operating budget and projected financial statements have been prepared on the basis believed by Anixter to be reasonable.
Budget and Business Plan
     (d) . Together with each delivery of the financial statements pursuant to and above, (i) an Officers' Certificate of Anixter stating that the signers have reviewed the terms of this Agreement and the Loan Documents, and have made, or caused to be made under their supervision, a review in reasonable detail of the transactions and condition of Anixter and its Subsidiaries, during the accounting period covered by such financial statements, and that such review has not disclosed the existence during or at the end of such accounting period, and that the signers do not have knowledge of the existence, as at the date of the Officers' Certificate, of any condition or event which constitutes a Default, or, if any such condition or event existed or exists, specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action Anixter has taken, is taking and proposes to take with respect thereto; (ii) a Compliance Certificate (A) demonstrating in reasonable detail compliance during and at the end of such accounting periods with the provisions set forth in through and (B) reporting the Debt Ratings and based upon its calculations the Applicable Margin; and (iii) a written discussion and analysis by the management of Anixter of such financial statements.
Compliance Certificate; MD&A
subsections (a)
(b)
Sections
7.16
7.17
 
     (e) . Simultaneously with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in above, a statement of the firm of independent certified public accountants which reported on such financial statements whether anything has come to their attention to cause them to believe that there existed on the date of such statements any Default.
Accountant's Compliance Certificate
subsection (b)
     (f) . Promptly upon Anixter obtaining knowledge (A) of any condition or event which constitutes a Default, or (B) of any condition or event which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, an Officers' Certificate specifying the nature and period of existence of any such condition or event and what action Anixter has taken, is taking and proposes to take with respect thereto.
Report of Material Events
     (g) . (i) Promptly after learning thereof, notice of the institution of, or threat of, any action, suit, proceeding, governmental investigation or arbitration against or affecting Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter involving claims in excess of US$25,000,000 except where the same is fully covered (other than any applicable co-insurance or deductible) by insurance (other than insurance in the nature of retro-premium insurance or other self insurance programs); and (ii) promptly upon learning thereof, notice of any investigation or proceeding before or by any Governmental Authority, the effect of which might limit, prohibit or restrict materially the manner in which Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter currently conducts its business or to declare any substance contained in the products manufactured or distributed by it to be dangerous, if such investigation or proceeding has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Notice of Claims and Proceedings
     (h) . Prompt written notice of the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, such written notice to describe such ERISA Event or Events and the action, if any, which Anixter or such ERISA Affiliate has taken, is taking and proposes to take with respect thereto.
ERISA Matters
     (i) . On a timely basis, copies of all financial statements, reports and notices, if any, sent or made available generally by AXE or Anixter to the holders of its publicly-held securities, if any, or filed with the Commission, concerning developments in the business of AXE, Anixter or any of Anixter's Subsidiaries that individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Publicly Distributed Information
     (j) . Promptly after learning thereof, (i) notice of the initial establishment of any of the Debt Ratings for Anixter and thereafter any change therein and (ii) a copy of each notice or other written communication received by Anixter from S&P, Moody's, Fitch or any other nationally recognized rating agency relating to any of the Debt Ratings.
Debt Ratings
     (k) . Such other information respecting the financial condition of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter, or their respective business, operations, assets, performance or prospects, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender through the Administrative Agent may from time to time reasonably request, including, without limitation, financial projections, business plans and any information such Person's accountants may have prepared with respect to such Person's financial condition, its business, operations, assets, performance
Other Information
 
and prospects. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall treat any non-public information so obtained as confidential in accordance with hereof.
Section 10.07
     Each Borrower hereby acknowledges that (a) the Administrative Agent and/or the Arranger will make available to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer materials and/or information provided by or on behalf of such Borrower hereunder (collectively, "") by posting the Borrower Materials on IntraLinks or another similar electronic system (the "") and (b) certain of the Lenders (each, a "") may have personnel who do not wish to receive material non-public information with respect to any of the Borrowers or their respective Affiliates, or the respective securities of any of the foregoing, and who may be engaged in investment and other market-related activities with respect to such Persons' securities. Each Borrower hereby agrees that (w) all Borrower Materials that are to be made available to Public Lenders shall be clearly and conspicuously marked "PUBLIC" which, at a minimum, shall mean the word "PUBLIC" shall appear prominently on the first page thereof; (x) by marking Borrower Materials "PUBLIC," the Borrowers shall be deemed to have authorized the Administrative Agent, the Arranger, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders to treat such Borrower Materials as not containing any material non-public information with respect to the Borrowers or their respective securities for purposes of United States Federal and state securities laws (, , that to the extent such Borrower Materials constitute Information, they shall be treated as set forth in the ); (y) all Borrower Materials marked "PUBLIC" are permitted to be made available through a portion of the Platform designated "Public Investor;" and (z) the Administrative Agent and the Arranger shall be entitled to treat any Borrower Materials that are not marked "PUBLIC" as being suitable only for posting on a portion of the Platform not designated "Public Investor."
Borrower Materials
Platform
Public Lender
provided
however
Section 10.07
     Anixter shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender in writing, promptly upon Anixter's learning thereof, of any of the following which, in each case or together, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect:
6.02 Environmental Notices.
     (a) notice that any Property of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter is subject to an Environmental Lien; or
     (b) notice to Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or awareness by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter of a condition which could reasonably be expected to result in (1) a notice of violation of any environmental health or safety Requirement of Law or (2) any Liabilities and Costs with respect to any Release or threatened Release of any Contaminant into the environment.
     Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, at all times, maintain its corporate existence and preserve and keep in full force and effect its rights and franchises, except as otherwise expressly permitted in and except with respect to any Subsidiary which has no material assets or liabilities. Anixter shall promptly provide the Administrative Agent and each of the Lenders with a complete list of its Subsidiaries upon the occurrence of any change in the list set forth on hereto with respect to Subsidiaries having assets in excess of US$1,000,000 individually or US$5,000,000 in the aggregate.
6.03 Corporate Existence, Etc.
Section 7.08
Schedule 5.03
 
     Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, qualify and remain qualified to do business in each jurisdiction in which the nature of its business requires it to be so qualified, except in those jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify does not have or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
6.04 Corporate Powers, Etc.
     Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Requirements of Law, and all material contractual obligations affecting it or its business, properties, assets or operations, except where the failure so to comply does not have or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
6.05 Compliance with Laws.
     Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay (a) all material taxes, assessments and other governmental charges imposed upon it or on any of its properties or assets or in respect of any of its franchises, business, income or property before any penalty or interest accrues thereon, and (b) all material claims (including, without limitation, claims for labor, services, materials and supplies) for sums which have become due and payable and which by law have or may become a Lien (other than a Customary Permitted Lien) upon any of its properties or assets, prior to the time when any penalty or fine shall be incurred with respect thereto; provided that no such taxes, assessments and governmental charges referred to in above or claims referred to in above need to be paid if being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and if such reserve or other appropriate provision, if any, as shall be required in conformity with GAAP shall have been made therefor.
6.06 Payment of Taxes and Claims.
clause (a)
clause (b)
     Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain or cause to be maintained in good repair, working order and condition, excepting ordinary wear and tear and damage, due to casualty or condemnation, all Property material to its operations and will make or cause to be made all appropriate repairs, renewals and replacements thereof. Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain with financially sound insurance companies, the insurance policies and programs, including, self-insurance retention levels, listed on hereto (or substantially similar programs or policies and amounts or other programs, policies and amounts acceptable to the Required Lenders) insuring all Property and other assets material to the operations of Anixter and its Subsidiaries against loss or damage by fire, theft, burglary, pilferage and loss in transit and business interruption, together with such other hazards as are reasonably consistent with prudent industry practice, and maintain product and other liability insurance consistent with prudent industry practice with financially sound insurance companies licensed to do business in the states where such Property is located. Not later than sixty (60) days after the renewal, replacement or material modification of any policy or program, Anixter shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent (in sufficient quantity for each of the Lenders, which the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to each Lender) a detailed schedule setting forth for each such policy or program: (a) the amount of such policy, (b) the risks insured against by such policy, (c) the name of the insurer and each insured party under such policy, and (d) the policy number of such policy.
6.07 Maintenance of Properties; Insurance.
Schedule 6.07
     Each Borrower shall permit, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to permit, any authorized
6.08 Inspection of Property; Books and Records; Discussions.
 
representative(s) designated by any Lender or the Administrative Agent to visit and inspect any of its properties, including financial and accounting records, and to make copies and take extracts therefrom, and to discuss its affairs, finances and accounts with its officers, employees, representatives, agents or independent certified public accountants, all upon reasonable notice and at such reasonable time and as often as may be reasonably requested. Each such visitation and inspection made by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent shall be at the Borrowers' expense. Any visitation and inspection made by or on behalf any Lender shall be at such Lender's expense.
     Each Borrower shall obtain and maintain, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to obtain and maintain, in full force and effect all licenses, franchises, Permits or other rights necessary for the operation of its business, except where the failure to obtain or maintain such licenses, franchises, Permits or rights does not have and could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
6.09 Maintenance of Permits.
     Each Borrower shall establish, maintain and operate, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to establish, maintain and operate, all Plans in all material respects in compliance with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Code and all other applicable laws, and the regulations and interpretations thereunder, and the respective requirements of the governing documents for such Plans. Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries and other ERISA Affiliates to, establish, maintain and operate all Foreign Employee Benefit Plans to comply in all material respects with all laws, regulations and rules applicable thereto and the respective requirements of the governing documents for such Foreign Employee Benefit Plans.
6.10 Employee Benefit Matters.
     Upon the request of the Administrative Agent and/or the Required Lenders, Anixter will promptly cause each material Subsidiary that shall not then be a Guarantor under the Guaranty (other than (a) any Foreign Subsidiary (except as provided below), (b) any Receivables Securitization SPV or (c) any Subsidiary with no significant assets or operations) to execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent: an instrument satisfactory in form and substance to the Administrative Agent under which it shall undertake the obligations of a Guarantor, together with such evidence as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request as to the corporate power and authority of such Subsidiary to execute the foregoing instrument and perform its obligations thereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if at any time the Administrative Agent, in its reasonable judgment, determines that the assets or operations of Anixter Puerto Rico, Inc., Anixter Philippines Inc., Anixter Thailand Inc. or Anixter Venezuela Inc. have become material, such Subsidiary shall execute and deliver the aforementioned documents to the Administrative Agent.
6.11 Additional Guarantors.
     The proceeds of the Loans may be used for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and other corporate purposes and to refinance Indebtedness under the Existing Credit Agreement.
6.12 Use of Proceeds.
 
     So long as any Lender shall have any Commitment hereunder, any Loan or other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied:
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any member of the Consolidated Group to, directly or indirectly create, incur, assume or otherwise become or remain directly or indirectly liable with respect to any Indebtedness, except:
7.01 Indebtedness.
     (i) the Obligations;
     (ii) the Existing Indebtedness;
     (iii) Indebtedness in respect of Accommodation Obligations permitted by ;
Section 7.04
     (iv) Indebtedness of any Subsidiary to Anixter or any other Subsidiary;
     (v) Indebtedness of Anixter to any Subsidiary;
     (vi) other unsecured Indebtedness of Anixter or subordinated in right of payment with the Obligations;
pari passu
     (vii) other unsecured Indebtedness of the Borrower's Subsidiaries that are Guarantors or subordinated in right of payment with the Obligations
pari passu
     (viii) unsecured Indebtedness of the Borrower's Subsidiaries that are not Guarantors, the principal amount of which does not exceed in the aggregate US$175,000,000 at any one time outstanding.
     (ix) Indebtedness arising under Receivables Securitization Transactions in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding US$350,000,000; and
     (x) Indebtedness under Hedging Contracts permitted under ;
Section 7.14
that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of all Subsidiaries that are not Guarantors owing to Persons other than to Anixter or another Subsidiary at any time (other than Indebtedness (A) in respect of the Obligations or (B) arising under Receivables Securitization Transactions) shall not exceed US$175,000,000.
provided
     
7.02 Sales of Assets; Liens.
     (a) . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly sell, assign, transfer, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of any properties or assets, including, without limitation, any capital stock of any Subsidiary, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, or any income or profits therefrom, except for:
Limitation on Sales
 
     (i) sales of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
     (ii) the disposition of obsolete equipment in the ordinary course of business;
     (iii) sales by Anixter of stock of a Subsidiary held by it, in any transaction or series of related transactions not constituting a Material Transaction, individually or taken together;
     (iv) sales, assignments, transfers, leases, conveyances or other dispositions of other assets, other than the stock of any Subsidiary, for cash consideration and for not less than fair market value which do not constitute a Material Transaction individually or in the aggregate (together with all sales of stock of any Subsidiary under above);
clause (iii)
     (v) sales, assignments, transfers, leases, conveyances or other dispositions of assets to Anixter or a Subsidiary;
     (vi) transfers of assets to any Affiliate for less than fair market value to the extent such transfer constitutes a permitted Investment pursuant to ; and
Section 7.03
     (vii) Receivables Securitization Transactions as to which the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held at any time by all purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables and other rights to payment in all Receivables Securitization Transactions shall not at any time exceed in the aggregate US$350,000,000.
     (b) . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on or with respect to any of its Property (including all capital stock of any Subsidiary of Anixter) except:
Liens
     (i) Customary Permitted Liens;
     (ii) Permitted Existing Liens;
     (iii) Liens on assets of any joint venture described in ;
Section 7.03(vi)
     (iv) (A) Liens on Property existing at the time of acquisition thereof by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries and not created in contemplation of such acquisition; and (B) Liens securing purchase money Indebtedness for Property to the extent the aggregate outstanding principal amount of such Indebtedness does not exceed US$20,000,000, is permitted under and the value of the Property securing such Indebtedness approximates the amount of such Indebtedness;
Section 7.01
     (v) Liens with respect to judgments or attachments which do not result in an Event of Default or Default hereunder;
 
     (vi) Liens on the assets of Foreign Subsidiaries which are not Borrowers; , the aggregate amount of Indebtedness secured by such Liens shall not exceed the Dollar Equivalent of US$50,000,000; and
provided
     (vii) Liens arising in connection with Receivables Securitization Transactions; that the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held at any time by all purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables and other rights to payment in all Receivables Securitization Transactions shall not at any time exceed in the aggregate US$350,000,000.
provided
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly make or commit to make any advance, loan, extension of credit or capital contribution, or purchase of any stock, bonds, notes, debentures or other securities or evidences of indebtedness of, or make any other investment in, any Person, including, without limitation, any Affiliate of Anixter (all such transactions being referred to as "") except:
7.03 Investments.
Investments
     (i) Investments by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries in Cash Equivalents;
     (ii) Investments made prior to the date hereof and set forth on ;
Schedule 7.03
     (iii) Investments arising from sales in the ordinary course of business on customary trade terms;
     (iv) Investments constituting loans by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter to its employees not in excess of an aggregate amount of US$10,000,000 outstanding at any one time;
     (v) Investments in connection with the acquisition by Anixter or any Subsidiary of substantially all of the assets or all of the capital stock of any Person so long as no Default exists or would result therefrom;
     (vi) [RESERVED];
     (vii) Investments in any joint ventures and Investments in connection with the purchase of any other Person's interest in any such joint ventures, which do not exceed US$25,000,000 in the aggregate outstanding at any one time;
     (viii) Investments (other than those set forth on ) in notes receivable received in connection with transactions permitted pursuant to ; , the aggregate amount of such Investments at any one time outstanding shall not exceed US$275,000,000;
Schedule 7.03
Section 7.02(a)(vii)
provided
     (ix) Investments by Anixter in any Subsidiary of Anixter;
     (x) Investments by any Subsidiary of Anixter in Anixter or in any other Subsidiary of Anixter;
 
     (xi) Investments constituting loans permitted by or Accommodation Obligations permitted under ; and
Section 7.01(vi)
Section 7.04
     (xii) other Investments not to exceed US$25,000,000 in the aggregate outstanding at any time.
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly, create or become or be liable with respect to any Accommodation Obligation involving Indebtedness of AXE or any Affiliate of AXE which is not a Subsidiary of Anixter. In addition, no Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, create or become or be liable with respect to any Accommodation Obligation except:
7.04 Accommodation Obligations.
     (i) guaranties resulting from endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business;
     (ii) Accommodation Obligations arising in connection with the Transaction Documents;
     (iii) Accommodation Obligations by Anixter with respect to lessees' obligations to third-party lessors under leases of Property purchased from Anixter and its Subsidiaries, in an aggregate amount not to exceed US$5,000,000;
     (iv) Accommodation Obligations of Anixter and its Subsidiaries arising in connection with Hedging Contracts entered into with any of the Lenders; and
     (v) other Accommodation Obligations by Anixter and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount outstanding at any time not to exceed US$150,000,000; , , that no such Accommodation Obligations shall be entered into or incurred after the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default or Default.
provided
however
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly declare or make any payment, distribution or contribution to or investment in AXE (whether in cash or otherwise), unless (a) at the time thereof and after taking into account such payment, distribution, contribution or investment, no Event of Default or Default exists or is pending, whether or not such Event of Default or Default has been reported to the Administrative Agent; and (b) such payment, distribution, contribution or investment is made in cash or in equity interests in Anixter.
7.05 Payments to AXE.
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly engage in any business other than the business engaged in by Anixter and all of its Subsidiaries on the date hereof and any business activities substantially similar or related thereto. No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any interest rate, commodity, or foreign currency exchange, swap, collar, cap, option, forward, futures or similar agreements other than Hedging Contracts.
7.06 Conduct of Business.
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any other Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly enter into or permit to exist any transaction
7.07 Transactions with Affiliates.
 
(including,without limitation, the purchase, sale, lease or exchange of any property or the rendering of any service) with any of its Affiliates that are not Subsidiaries of Anixter on terms that are less favorable to it than those fair and reasonable terms that might be obtained in a comparable arms-length transaction at the time (other than payments to AXE in respect of directors' fees and reasonable allocated expenses not to exceed US$3,000,000 per year in the aggregate).
     
7.08 Restriction on Fundamental Changes.
     (a) No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly enter into any merger or consolidation, or liquidate, wind-up or dissolve (or suffer any liquidation or dissolution), discontinue its business or convey, lease, sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of, in one transaction or series of transactions, all or any substantial part of its business or Property, whether now or hereafter acquired, except:
     (i) as otherwise permitted under ; and
Section 7.02(a)
     (ii) any Subsidiary may merge into or convey, sell, lease or transfer all or substantially all of its assets to Anixter or any other Subsidiary of Anixter.
     (b) No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit its Subsidiaries to, acquire by purchase or otherwise any property or assets of, or stock or other evidence of beneficial ownership of, any Person, except in the ordinary course of its business or to the extent permitted pursuant to .
Section 7.03
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its ERISA Affiliates to do any of the following which, individually, or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect:
7.09 Employee Benefit Matters.
     (i) Engage in any prohibited transaction described in Section 406 of ERISA or 4975 of the Code for which a statutory or class exemption is not available or a private exemption has not been previously obtained from the DOL;
     (ii) permit to exist any accumulated funding deficiency (as defined in Sections 302 of ERISA and 412 of the Code), whether or not waived;
     (iii) fail to pay timely required contributions or annual installments due with respect to any waived funding deficiency to any Benefit Plan;
     (iv) terminate any Benefit Plan in a distress termination under Section 4041(c) of ERISA which would result in any liability to Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate;
     (v) fail to make any contribution or payment to any Multiemployer Plan which Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate may be required to make under any agreement relating to such Multiemployer Plan, or any law pertaining thereto;
     (vi) fail to pay any required installment or any other payment required under Section 412 of the Code on or before the due date for such installment or other payment;
 
     (vii) amend a Plan resulting in an increase in current liability for the plan year such that Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate is required to provide security to such Plan under Section 401(a)(29) of the Code;
     (viii) permit any unfunded liabilities with respect to any Foreign Pension Plan to exist; or
     (ix) fail to pay any required contribution or payment to a Foreign Pension Plan on or before the date for such required installment or payment.
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, become subject to any Liabilities and Costs which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect and which arise out of or are related to (a) the Release or threatened Release at any location of any Contaminant into the environment, or any Remedial Action in response thereto, or (b) any violation of any environmental, health and safety Requirements of Law.
7.10 Environmental Liabilities.
     No portion of the proceeds of any credit extended under this Agreement shall be used in any manner which might cause the extension of credit or the application of such proceeds to violate Regulation T, Regulation U or Regulation X or any other regulation of the Federal Reserve Board or to violate the Securities Exchange Act or the Securities Act, in each case as in effect on the date or dates of such Borrowing and the use of such proceeds.
7.11 Margin Regulations.
     No member of the Consolidated Group shall change its fiscal year, except that any Subsidiary of Anixter may conform its fiscal year to Anixter's Fiscal Year.
7.12 Change of Fiscal Year.
     Anixter shall not amend, modify or supplement the Revolving Subordinated Note without five Business Days' prior written notice to the Administrative Agent or in any manner materially adverse to the Lenders.
7.13 Modification of the Revolving Subordinated Note.
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Hedging Contract other than in the ordinary course of its business to hedge actual interest rate, foreign currency or commodity exposure.
7.14 Hedging Contracts.
     No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary to, permit the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in connection with Receivables Securitization Transactions to exceed a Dollar Equivalent amount of US$350,000,000.
7.15 Receivables Securitization Transactions.
     No Borrower shall permit the Leverage Ratio as of the end of any Fiscal Quarter set forth below to be greater than 3.25 to 1.
7.16 Maximum Leverage Ratio.
     No Borrower shall permit the Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio calculated at the end of each Fiscal Quarter for the period of the immediately preceding four Fiscal Quarters to be less than (a) 2.75
7.17 Minimum Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
 
to 1 for any period ending prior to December 31, 2008, and (b) 3.00 to 1 for any period ending on or after December 31, 2008.
     All financial covenants in this shall be calculated after the elimination of the minority interest in any Subsidiaries which are not wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
7.18 Calculation of Financial Covenants.
Article VII
     Any of the following shall constitute an Event of Default:
8.01 Events of Default.
     (a) . Any Borrower shall fail (i) to pay when due any principal of any Obligation, or (ii) to pay when due any interest on any Obligation, or any fee or other amount payable under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents and such failure under this shall continue for three (3) calendar days.
Failure to Make Payments When Due
clause (ii)
     (b) . Any Borrower or any Subsidiary of any Borrower shall fail duly and punctually to perform or observe any agreement, covenant or obligation under (other than , , , and thereof), , , or under (other than thereof).
Breach of Certain Covenants
Sections 6.01
clauses (c)
(e)
(h)
(i)
6.03
6.07
6.12
Article VII
Section 7.09
     (c) . Any representation or warranty made or deemed made by any Borrower or any Guarantor to the Administrative Agent or any Lender herein or by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter in any of the other Loan Documents or in any written statement or certificate at any time given by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter pursuant to any of the Loan Documents shall be false or misleading in any material respect on the date as of which made or deemed made.
Breach of Representation or Warranty
     (d) . Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter shall fail duly and punctually to perform or observe any agreement, covenant or obligation arising under this Agreement (except those described in , and ) or under any of the other Loan Documents, and such failure shall continue for fifteen (15) days (or, in the case of Loan Documents other than this Agreement, any longer period of grace expressly set forth therein).
Other Defaults
Sections 8.01(a)
(b)
(c)
     (e) . AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter shall fail to make any payment when due (whether by scheduled maturity, required prepayment, acceleration, demand or otherwise) on any Indebtedness of such Person, other than any of the Obligations, if the aggregate outstanding amount of all such Indebtedness owed by all such parties (without duplication) is US$25,000,000 or more, or any breach, default or event of default shall occur, or any other event shall occur or condition shall exist, under any instrument, agreement or indenture pertaining thereto, if the effect thereof is to accelerate, or permit the holder(s) of such Indebtedness to accelerate, the maturity of any such Indebtedness, or any such Indebtedness shall be declared to be due and payable or required to be prepaid or mandatorily redeemed (other than by a regularly scheduled required prepayment prior to the stated maturity thereof); or the holder of any Lien, in any amount, shall commence foreclosure of such Lien upon property of AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter having a book or fair market value in excess of US$25,000,000 in the aggregate.
Default as to Other Indebtedness
 
     (f) (i) An involuntary case shall be commenced against AXE, Anixter or any Borrowing Subsidiary, or against any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, and the petition shall not be dismissed within sixty (60) days after commencement of the case, or a court having jurisdiction in the premises shall enter a decree or order for relief in respect of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 in an involuntary case, under any applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereinafter in effect, or any other similar relief shall be granted under any applicable federal, state or foreign law.
Involuntary Bankruptcy; Appointment of Receiver, Etc.
     (ii) A decree or order of a court having jurisdiction in the premises for the appointment of a receiver, liquidator, sequestrator, trustee, custodian or other officer having similar powers over any of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, or over all or a substantial part of the property of any such Person, shall be entered, or an interim receiver, trustee or other custodian of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, or of all or a substantial part of any such Person's Property, shall be appointed or a warrant of attachment, execution or similar process against any substantial part of the Property of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, shall be issued and any such event shall not be stayed, vacated, dismissed, bonded or discharged within sixty (60) days of entry, appointment or issuance.
     (g)  AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall have an order for relief entered with respect to it or commence a voluntary case under any applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, or other similar law now or hereafter in effect, or shall consent to the entry of an order for relief in an involuntary case, or to the conversion of an involuntary case to a voluntary case, under any such law, or shall consent to the appointment of or taking of possession by a receiver, trustee or other custodian for all or a substantial part of its property. AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall make any assignment for the benefit of creditors or shall be unable or generally fail, or admit in writing its inability, to pay its debts as such debts become due, or the Board of Directors (or any committee thereof) of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall adopt any resolution to authorize or approve any of the foregoing.
Voluntary Bankruptcy; Appointment of Receiver, Etc.
     (h) . (i) An Enforceable Judgment (other than an Enforceable Judgment described in the proviso contained in the definition of Enforceable Judgment) for the payment of money in excess of US$25,000,000 shall be rendered against Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter and such Enforceable Judgment shall continue unsatisfied or unstayed for a period of thirty (30) days or action shall have been commenced to foreclose on such Enforceable Judgment, or (ii) an Enforceable Judgment described in the proviso contained in the definition of Enforceable Judgment shall be rendered against any Borrower.
Judgments
     (i) . Any order, judgment or decree shall be entered against AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess if US$25,000,000 decreeing its
Dissolution
 
involuntary dissolution or split-up and such order shall remain undischarged and unstayed for a period in excess of thirty (30) days, or AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall otherwise dissolve or cease to exist, in each case except as expressly permitted pursuant to .
Section 7.08
     (j) . (i) Any Change of Control occurs; (ii) Anixter shall cease to own directly or indirectly all of the capital stock of the Borrowing Subsidiaries, (other than director's qualifying shares); (iii) except as permitted in , Anixter shall cease to own at least 51% of each class of the capital stock of each Subsidiary of Anixter; or (iv) AXE shall cease to own at least 51% of each class of the capital stock of Anixter.
Change of Control
Section 7.02(a)
     (k) . (i) Any one or more Termination Events occur which could reasonably be expected to subject Anixter or an ERISA Affiliate to a liability to pay more than US$25,000,000 in the aggregate, or (ii) the plan administrator of any Plan applies under Section 412(d) of the Code for a waiver of the minimum funding standards of Section 412(a) of the Code and the substantial business hardship upon which the application for the waiver is based could reasonably be expected to subject either Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate to a liability of more than US$25,000,000 in the aggregate.
Employee Benefit Related Liabilities
     (l) . Any breach or other violation by any holder of the Revolving Subordinated Note of the subordination or enforcement restrictions shall occur.
Subordination Default
     (m) . Any party to the Guaranty, or any Person on behalf of such party, shall terminate or revoke any of its obligations thereunder or breach any of the terms thereof, or the Guaranty shall otherwise become unenforceable for any reason.
Guaranty Default
     (n) . Any Loan Document, at any time after its execution and delivery and for any reason other than as expressly permitted hereunder or satisfaction in full of all the Obligations, ceases to be in full force and effect; or any Loan Party contests in any manner the validity or enforceabilty of any Loan Document; or any Loan Party denies that it has any or further liability or obligation under any Loan Document, or purports to revoke, terminate or rescind any Loan Document.
Invalidity of Loan Documents
     For purposes of this Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents, an Event of Default shall be deemed "continuing" until cured or waived in writing in accordance with .
Section 10.01
     If any Event of Default occurs, the Administrative Agent shall, at the request of, or may, with the consent of, the Required Lenders,
8.02 Remedies Upon Event of Default.
     (a) declare the commitment of each Lender to make Loans and any obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions to be terminated, whereupon such commitments and obligation shall be terminated;
     (b) declare the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Loans, all interest accrued and unpaid thereon, and all other amounts owing or payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document to be immediately due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Borrower;
 
     (c) require that Anixter Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations and Canadian Banker's Acceptances (in an amount equal to the then Outstanding Amount thereof); and
     (d) exercise on behalf of itself and the Lenders all rights and remedies available to it and the Lenders under the Loan Documents or applicable law;
, , that upon the occurrence of any event specified in subsection (f) or (g) of , the obligation of each Lender to make Loans and any obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions shall automatically terminate, the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Loans and all interest and other amounts as aforesaid shall automatically become due and payable, and the obligation of Anixter to Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations as aforesaid shall automatically become effective, in each case without further act of the Administrative Agent or any Lender or notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived.
provided
however
Section 8.01
     After the exercise of remedies provided for in (or after the Loans have automatically become immediately due and payable and the L/C Obligations have automatically been required to be Cash Collateralized as set forth in the proviso to , any amounts received on account of the Obligations shall be applied by the Administrative Agent in the following order:
8.03 Application of Funds.
Section 8.02
Section 8.02)
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting fees, indemnities, expenses and other amounts (including reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the Administrative Agent and amounts payable under payable to the Administrative Agent in its capacity as such;
First
Article III)
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting fees, indemnities and other amounts (other than principal and interest) payable to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer (including reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the respective Lenders and the L/C Issuer (including fees and time charges for attorneys who may be employees of any Lender or the L/C Issuer) and amounts payable under ), ratably among them in proportion to the amounts described in this clause payable to them;
Second
Article III
Second
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans, L/C Borrowings and other Obligations, ratably among the Lenders and the L/C Issuer in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause payable to them;
Third
Third
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting unpaid principal of the Loans and L/C Borrowings, ratably among the Lenders and the L/C Issuer in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause held by them;
Fourth
Fourth
     , to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer, to Cash Collateralize that portion of L/C Obligations comprised of the aggregate undrawn amount of Letters of Credit; and
Fifth
     , the balance, if any, after all of the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full, to Anixter or as otherwise required by Law.
Last
 
Subject to , amounts used to Cash Collateralize the aggregate undrawn amount of Letters of Credit pursuant to clause above shall be applied to satisfy drawings under such Letters of Credit as they occur. If any amount remains on deposit as Cash Collateral after all Letters of Credit have either been fully drawn or expired, such remaining amount shall be applied to the other Obligations, if any, in the order set forth above.
Section 2.07(c)
Fifth
     
9.01 Appointment and Authority.
     Each of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer hereby irrevocably appoints Bank of America to act on its behalf as the Administrative Agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof or thereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The provisions of this Article are solely for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, and no Borrower shall have any rights as a third party beneficiary of any of such provisions.
     The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent and the term "Lender" or "Lenders" shall, unless otherwise expressly indicated or unless the context otherwise requires, include the Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder in its individual capacity. Such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, act as the financial advisor or in any other advisory capacity for and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrowers or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if such Person were not the Administrative Agent hereunder and without any duty to account therefor to the Lenders.
9.02 Rights as a Lender.
     The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent:
9.03 Exculpatory Provisions.
     (a) shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing;
     (b) shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby or by the other Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise as directed in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be expressly provided for herein or in the other Loan Documents), that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action that, in its opinion or the opinion of its counsel, may expose the Administrative Agent to liability or that is contrary to any Loan Document or applicable law; and
provided
     (c) shall not, except as expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents, have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to any of the Borrowers or any of their respective Affiliates that is communicated to or
 
obtained by the Person serving as the Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.
     The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith shall be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in and ) or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until notice describing such Default is given to the Administrative Agent by Anixter, a Lender or the L/C Issuer.
Sections 10.01
8.02
     The Administrative Agent shall not responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or thereunder or in connection herewith or therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein or therein or the occurrence of any Default, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Article IV
     The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing (including any electronic message, Internet or intranet website posting or other distribution) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed, sent or otherwise authenticated by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to have been made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. In determining compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan, or the issuance of a Letter of Credit, that by its terms must be fulfilled to the satisfaction of a Lender or the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent may presume that such condition is satisfactory to such Lender or the L/C Issuer unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice to the contrary from such Lender or the L/C Issuer prior to the making of such Loan or the issuance of such Letter of Credit. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for Anixter), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
9.04 Reliance by Administrative Agent.
     The Administrative Agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise its rights and powers hereunder or under any other Loan Document by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of this Article shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
9.05 Delegation of Duties.
 
     The Administrative Agent may at any time give notice of its resignation to the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and Anixter. If the Administrative Agent resigns under this Agreement, the Required Lenders shall appoint from among the Lenders a successor administrative agent for the Lenders which successor administrative agent shall be consented to by Anixter at all times other than during the existence of an Event of Default (which consent of Anixter shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed). If no such successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may on behalf of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, appoint a successor Administrative Agent meeting the qualifications set forth above; that if the Administrative Agent shall notify Anixter and the Lenders that no qualifying Person has accepted such appointment, then such resignation shall nonetheless become effective in accordance with such notice and (1) the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and (2) all payments, communications and determinations provided to be made by, to or through the Administrative Agent shall instead be made by or to each Lender and the L/C Issuer directly, until such time as the Required Lenders appoint a successor Administrative Agent as provided for above in this Section. Upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring (or retired) Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from all of its duties and obligations hereunder or under the other Loan Documents (if not already discharged therefrom as provided above in this Section). The fees payable by Anixter to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between Anixter and such successor. After the retiring Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, the provisions of this Article and shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while the retiring Administrative Agent was acting as Administrative Agent.
9.06 Resignation of Administrative Agent.
provided
Section 10.04
     Any resignation by Bank of America as Administrative Agent pursuant to this Section may also, at Bank of America's option, constitute its resignation as L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender. In that case, upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder, (a) such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and such duties of the retiring L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender, (b) the retiring L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender shall be discharged from all of their respective duties and obligations hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, and (c) the successor L/C Issuer shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession or make other arrangements satisfactory to the retiring L/C Issuer to effectively assume the obligations of the retiring L/C Issuer with respect to such Letters of Credit.
     Each Lender and the L/C Issuer acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender or any of their Related Parties and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender and the L/C Issuer also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender or
9.07 Non-Reliance on Administrative Agent and Other Lenders.
 
any of their Related Parties and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
     Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Syndication Agent, none of the Arranger or Co-Documentation Agents listed on the cover page hereof shall have any powers, duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, except in its capacity, as applicable, as the Administrative Agent, a Lender or L/C Issuer hereunder.
9.08 No Other Duties, Etc.
     In case of the pendency of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law or any other judicial proceeding relative to any Loan Party, the Administrative Agent (irrespective of whether the principal of any Loan or L/C Obligation shall then be due and payable as herein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Administrative Agent shall have made any demand on any Borrower) shall be entitled and empowered, by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise:
9.09 Administrative Agent May File Proofs of Claim.
     (a) to file and prove a claim for the whole amount of the principal and interest owing and unpaid in respect of the Loans, L/C Obligations and all other Obligations that are owing and unpaid and to file such other documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent (including any claim for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent and their respective agents and counsel and all other amounts due the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent under and , and ) allowed in such judicial proceeding; and
Sections 2.06(i)
(j)
2.11
10.04
     (b) to collect and receive any monies or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same;
and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or other similar official in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Lender and the L/C Issuer to make such payments to the Administrative Agent and, in the event that the Administrative Agent shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, to pay to the Administrative Agent any amount due for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Administrative Agent and its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Administrative Agent under and .
Sections 2.11
10.04
     Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to authorize the Administrative Agent to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Lender or the L/C Issuer any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition affecting the Obligations or the rights of any Lender or to authorize the Administrative Agent to vote in respect of the claim of any Lender in any such proceeding.
     The Lenders and the L/C Issuer irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its discretion, to release any Subsidiary that is a Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty if such Person ceases to be a Subsidiary as a
9.10 Guaranty Matters.
 
result of a transaction permitted hereunder. Upon request by the Administrative Agent at any time, the Required Lenders will confirm in writing the Administrative Agent's authority to release any Subsidiary Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty pursuant to this .
Section 9.10
     No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, and no consent to any departure by any Borrower or any other Loan Party therefrom, shall be effective unless in writing signed by the Required Lenders and the applicable Borrowers or the applicable Loan Party, as the case may be, and acknowledged by the Administrative Agent, and each such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given; , , that no such amendment, waiver or consent shall:
10.01 Amendments, Etc.
provided
however
     (i) extend or increase the Commitment of any Lender (or reinstate any Commitment terminated pursuant to ) without the written consent of such Lender;
Section 8.02
     (ii) postpone any date fixed by this Agreement or any other Loan Document for any payment of principal, interest, fees or other amounts due to the Lenders (or any of them) hereunder or under any other Loan Document without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby;
     (iii) reduce the principal of, or the rate of interest specified herein on, any Loan or L/C Borrowing, or (subject to clause (ii) of the second proviso below) any fees or other amounts payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby; , , that only the consent of the Required Lenders shall be necessary to amend the definition of "Default Rate" or to waive any obligation of a Borrower to pay interest or Letter of Credit Fees at the Default Rate;
provided
however
     (iv) change or in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby without the written consent of each Lender;
Section 2.15
Section 8.03
     (v) amend the definition of "Available Currency" without the written consent of each Lender;
     (vi) change any provision of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to amend, waive or otherwise modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender; or
(vii) release any material Guarantor from the Guaranty without the consent of each Lender;
and, , that (i) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the L/C Issuer in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the L/C Issuer under this Agreement or any Issuer Document relating to any Letter of Credit
provided
further
 
issued or to be issued by it; (ii) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Swing Line Lender in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the Swing Line Lender under this Agreement; (iii) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Administrative Agent in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent under this Agreement or any other Loan Document; (iv) may not be amended, waived or otherwise modified without the consent of each Granting Lender all or any part of whose Loans are being funded by an SPC at the time of such amendment, waiver or other modification; and (v) the Agent/Arranger Fee Letters may be amended, or rights or privileges thereunder waived, in a writing executed only by the parties thereto. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, no Defaulting Lender shall have any right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent hereunder, except that the Commitment of such Lender may not be increased or extended without the consent of such Lender.
Section 10.06(h)
     
10.02 Notices and Other Communications; Facsimile Copies.
     (a) . Unless otherwise expressly provided herein, all notices and other communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing (including by facsimile transmission) and mailed, faxed or delivered, to the address, facsimile number or (subject to subsection (c) below) electronic mail address specified for notices on or, in the case of a Lender, its Administrative Questionnaire; or, in the case of the Borrowers or the Administrative Agent, to such other address as shall be designated by such party in a notice to the other parties, and in the case of any other party, to such other address as shall be designated by such party in a notice to Anixter and the Administrative Agent. All such notices and other communications shall be deemed to be given or made upon the earlier to occur of (i) actual receipt by the intended recipient and (ii) (A) if delivered by hand or by courier, when signed for by the intended recipient; (B) if delivered by mail, four Business Days after deposit in the mails, postage prepaid; (C) if delivered by facsimile, when sent and receipt has been confirmed by telephone; and (D) if delivered by electronic mail (which form of delivery is subject to the provisions of subsection (c) below), as provided in subsection (c) below; , , that notices and other communications to the Administrative Agent pursuant to shall not be effective until actually received by such Person. Any notice or other communication permitted to be given, made or confirmed by telephone hereunder shall be given, made or confirmed by means of a telephone call to the intended recipient at the number specified on , it being understood and agreed that a voicemail message shall in no event be effective as a notice, communication or confirmation hereunder.
General
Schedule 10.02
provided
however
Article II
Schedule 10.02
     (b) . Loan Documents may be transmitted and/or signed by facsimile. The effectiveness of any such documents and signatures shall, subject to applicable Law, have the same force and effect as manually-signed originals and shall be binding on all Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. The Administrative Agent may also require that any such documents and signatures be confirmed by a manually-signed original thereof; , , that the failure to request or deliver the same shall not limit the effectiveness of any facsimile document or signature.
Effectiveness of Facsimile Documents and Signatures
provided
however
     . Notices and other communications to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communication (including
Electronic Communications
 
e-mail and Internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent, that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Lender or the L/C Issuer pursuant to if such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as applicable, has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication. The Administrative Agent or Anixter may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it, that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
Article II
provided
     Unless the Administrative Agent otherwise prescribes, (i) notices and other communications sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the "return receipt requested" function, as available, return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), that if such notice or other communication is not sent during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been sent at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient, and (ii) notices or communications posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
     (c) . THE PLATFORM IS PROVIDED "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE." THE AGENT PARTIES (AS DEFINED BELOW) DO NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF THE BORROWER MATERIALS OR THE ADEQUACY OF THE PLATFORM, AND EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM LIABILITY FOR ERRORS IN OR OMISSIONS FROM THE BORROWER MATERIALS. NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS OR FREEDOM FROM VIRUSES OR OTHER CODE DEFECTS, IS MADE BY ANY AGENT PARTY IN CONNECTION WITH THE BORROWER MATERIALS OR THE PLATFORM. In no event shall the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties (collectively, the "") have any liability to any Borrower, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other Person for losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses of any kind (whether in tort, contract or otherwise) arising out of any Borrower's or the Administrative Agent's transmission of Borrower Materials through the Internet, except to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Agent Party; , , that in no event shall any Agent Party have any liability to any Borrower, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other Person for indirect, special, incidental, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages).
The Platform
Agent Parties
provided
however
     (d) . Each of the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender may change its address, telecopier or telephone number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. Each other Lender may change its address, telecopier or telephone number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the Company, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender. In addition, each Lender agrees to notify the Administrative Agent
Change of Address, Etc
 
from time to time to ensure that the Administrative Agent has on record (i) an effective address, contact name, telephone number, telecopier number and electronic mail address to which notices and other communications may be sent and (ii) accurate wire instructions for such Lender.
     (e) . The Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders shall be entitled to rely and act upon any notices (including telephonic Committed Loan Notices and Swing Line Loan Notices) purportedly given by or on behalf of any Borrower even if (i) such notices were not made in a manner specified herein, were incomplete or were not preceded or followed by any other form of notice specified herein, or (ii) the terms thereof, as understood by the recipient, varied from any confirmation thereof. Anixter shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, each Lender and the Related Parties of each of them from all losses, costs, expenses and liabilities resulting from the reliance by such Person on each notice purportedly given by or on behalf of any Borrower. All telephonic notices to and other communications with the Administrative Agent may be recorded by the Administrative Agent, and each of the parties hereto hereby consents to such recording.
Reliance by Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Lenders
     No failure by any Lender or the Administrative Agent to exercise, and no delay by any such Person in exercising, any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, remedy, power or privilege. The rights, remedies, powers and privileges herein provided are cumulative and not exclusive of any rights, remedies, powers and privileges provided by law.
10.03 No Waiver; Cumulative Remedies.
     
10.04 Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
     (a) . Anixter shall pay (i) all reasonable out of pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent), in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation, negotiation, execution, delivery and administration of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out of pocket expenses incurred by the L/C Issuer in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out of pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer), and shall pay all fees and time charges for attorneys who may be employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights (A) in connection with this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or (B) in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out of pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. The Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer shall promptly notify Anixter when it intends to incur fees and time charges for attorneys who are employees of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, that Anixter will reimburse under this Agreement.
Costs and Expenses
 
     (b) . The Borrowers jointly and severally shall indemnify the Administrative Agent (and any sub-agent thereof), each Lender and the L/C Issuer, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee), and shall indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnitee from all fees and time charges and disbursements for attorneys who may be employees of any Indemnitee, incurred by any Indemnitee or asserted against any Indemnitee by any third party or by any Borrower or any other Loan Party arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or thereunder or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use or proposed use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the L/C Issuer to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by any Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to any Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or any Borrower or any other Loan Party, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, in all cases, whether or not caused by or arising, in whole or in part, out of the negligence of the Indemnitee; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available (x) to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or (y) for any loss asserted against such Indemnitee by another Indemnitee.
Indemnification by the Borrowers
Indemnitee
provided
     (c) . To the extent that the Borrowers for any reason fails to indefeasibly pay any amount required under subsection (a) or (b) of this Section to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), the L/C Issuer or any Related Party of any of the foregoing, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), the L/C Issuer or such Related Party, as the case may be, such Lender's Pro Rata Share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount, that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent) or the L/C Issuer in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of any of the foregoing acting for the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent) or L/C Issuer in connection with such capacity. The obligations of the Lenders under this subsection (c) are subject to the provisions of .
Reimbursement by Lenders
provided
Section 2.13(d)
     (d)  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, no Borrower shall assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, Etc.
 
No Indemnitee referred to in subsection (b) above shall be liable for any damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
     (e) . All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than ten Business Days after demand therefor.
Payments
     (f) . The indemnity and reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers under this to the Indemnitees, shall not include Taxes, in that the Borrowers are obligated to the Indemnitees in respect of Taxes under to the extent provided therein.
Taxes
Section 10.04
Article III
     (g) . The agreements in this Section shall survive the resignation of the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, the replacement of any Lender, the termination of the Aggregate Commitments and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all the other Obligations.
Survival
     To the extent that a Borrower makes a payment to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender, or the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender exercises its right of set-off, and such payment or the proceeds of such set-off or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside or required (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender in its discretion) to be repaid to a trustee, receiver or any other party, in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law or otherwise, then (a) to the extent of such recovery, the obligation or part thereof originally intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect as if such payment had not been made or such set-off had not occurred, and (b) each Lender and the L/C Issuer severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent upon demand its applicable share of any amount so recovered from or repaid by the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such payment is made at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect, in the applicable currency of such recovery or payment. The obligations of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Agreement.
10.05 Payments Set Aside.
     
10.06 Successors and Assigns.
     (a) . The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that no Borrower may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Section, (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Section, (iii) by way of pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of subsection (f) of this Section, or (iv) to an SPC in accordance with the provisions of subsection (h) of this Section (and any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void). Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be
Successors and Assigns Generally
 
construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in subsection (d) of this Section and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
     (b) . Any Lender may at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans (including for purposes of this subsection (b), participations in L/C Obligations, in British Pound Sterling Loans, in Canadian Dollar Loans, in Canadian Banker's Acceptances and in Swing Line Loans) at the time owing to it); that
Assignments by Lenders
provided
     (i) except in the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to a Lender, the aggregate amount of the Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans outstanding thereunder) or, if the Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment, determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if "Trade Date" is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the Trade Date, shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, Anixter otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed);
     (ii) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loans or the Commitment assigned, except that this clause (ii) shall not apply to the Swing Line Lender's rights and obligations in respect of Swing Line Loans;
     (iii) any assignment of a Commitment must be approved by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender unless the Person that is the proposed assignee is itself a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund (whether or not the proposed assignee would otherwise qualify as an Eligible Assignee); and
     (iv) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, and the Eligible Assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
     Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to subsection (c) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption, the Eligible Assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering
 
all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of , , , and with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment. Upon request, each Borrower shall execute and deliver a Note to the assignee Lender at such assignee Lender's expense. Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this subsection shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with subsection (d) of this Section.
Sections 3.01
3.04
3.05
10.04
     (c) . The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at the Administrative Agent's Office a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans and L/C Obligations owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by each of the Borrowers and the L/C Issuer at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice. In addition, at any time that a request for a consent for a material or substantive change to the Loan Documents is pending, any Lender wishing to consult with other Lenders in connection therewith may request and receive from the Administrative Agent a copy of the Register.
Register
Register
     (d) . Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, or notice to, any Borrower or the Administrative Agent, sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or Anixter or any of Anixter's Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and/or obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and/or the Loans (including such Lender's participations in L/C Obligations, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and/or Swing Line Loans) owing to it); that (i) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations, (iii) the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement and (iv) to the extent that such Participant is to participate in any Credit Extension to any Dutch Borrower, such participation is not granted for the primary or main purpose of avoiding the Dutch Financial Supervision Act ("") or the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.
Participations
Participant
provided
Wet op het financieele toezicht
     Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, waiver or other modification described in the first proviso to that affects such Participant. Subject to subsection (e) of this Section, each Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment
provided
Section 10.01
Sections 3.01
3.04
3.05
 
pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of as though it were a Lender, such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender.
Section 10.08
provided
Section 2.15
     (e) . A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with Anixter's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of unless Anixter is notified of (and agrees to) the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrowers, to comply with as though it were a Lender.
Limitation upon Participant Rights
Section 3.01
3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.01(e)
     (f) . Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement (including under its Note(s), if any) to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank; that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
     (g) . The words "execution," "signed," "signature," and words of like import in any Assignment and Assumption shall be deemed to include electronic signatures or the keeping of records in electronic form, each of which shall be of the same legal effect, validity or enforceability as a manually executed signature or the use of a paper-based recordkeeping system, as the case may be, to the extent and as provided for in any applicable law, including the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, the New York State Electronic Signatures and Records Act, or any other similar state laws based on the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
Electronic Execution of Assignments
     (h) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a "") may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and Anixter (an "") the option to provide all or any part of any Committed Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make pursuant to this Agreement; that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPC to fund any Committed Loan, and (ii) if an SPC elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to make all or any part of such Committed Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Committed Loan pursuant to the terms hereof or, if it fails to do so, to make such payment to the Administrative Agent as is required under . Each party hereto hereby agrees that (i) neither the grant to any SPC nor the exercise by any SPC of such option shall increase the costs or expenses or otherwise increase or change the obligations of the Borrowers under this Agreement (including its obligations under and ), (ii) no SPC shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement for which a Lender would be liable (all such liabilities being the obligation of the Granting Lender), and (iii) the Granting Lender shall for all purposes, including the approval of any amendment, waiver or other modification of any provision of any Loan Document, remain the lender of record hereunder. The making of a Committed Loan by an SPC hereunder shall utilize the Commitment
Special Purpose Funding Vehicles
Granting Lender
SPC
provided
Section 2.14(d)(ii)
Sections 3.01
3.04
 
of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Committed Loan were made by such Granting Lender. In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior debt of any SPC, it will not institute against, or join any other Person in instituting against, such SPC any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency, or liquidation proceeding under the laws of the United States or any State thereof. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any SPC may (i) with notice to, but without prior consent of Anixter and the Administrative Agent and with the payment of a processing fee of $3,500 assign all or any portion of its right to receive payment with respect to any Committed Loan to the Granting Lender and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its funding of Committed Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety or guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPC.
     (i) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, if at any time Bank of America assigns all of its Commitment and Loans pursuant to subsection (b) above, Bank of America may, (i) upon 30 days' notice to Anixter and the Lenders, resign as L/C Issuer and/or (ii) upon 30 days' notice to Anixter, resign as Swing Line Lender. In the event of any such resignation as L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender, Anixter shall be entitled to appoint from among the Lenders a successor L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender hereunder; , , that no failure by Anixter to appoint any such successor shall affect the resignation of Bank of America as L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender, as the case may be. If Bank of America resigns as L/C Issuer, it shall retain all the rights and obligations of the L/C Issuer hereunder with respect to all Letters of Credit outstanding as of the effective date of its resignation as L/C Issuer and all L/C Obligations with respect thereto (including the right to require the Lenders to make Base Rate Committed Loans or fund risk participations in Unreimbursed Amounts pursuant to ) and Anixter shall provide cash collateral satisfactory to Bank of America to secure its obligations with respect to such Letters of Credit and L/C Obligations. Upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as L/C Issuer hereunder, (x) such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and such duties of the retiring L/C Issuer, (y) Bank of America shall be discharged from all of its duties and obligations as L/C Issuer hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, and (z) the successor L/C Issuer shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession (in which case Bank of America shall release any cash collateral provided by Anixter pursuant to the preceding sentence) or make other arrangement satisfactory to the retiring L/C Issuer to effectively assume the obligations of the retiring L/C Issuer with respect to such Letters of Credit. If Bank of America resigns as Swing Line Lender, it shall retain all the rights of the Swing Line Lender provided for hereunder with respect to Swing Line Loans made by it and outstanding as of the effective date of such resignation, including the right to require the Lenders to make Base Rate Committed Loans or fund risk participations in outstanding Swing Line Loans pursuant to .
Resignation as L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender after Assignment
provided
however
Section 2.06(c)
Section 2.03(c)
     Each of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its Affiliates and to its and its Affiliates' respective directors, partners, officers, employees, agents, advisors and representatives (it being understood that the Persons to
10.07 Confidentiality.
 
whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential); (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) ; (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process; (d) to any other party to this Agreement; (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder; (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any Eligible Assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective Eligible Assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any direct or indirect contractual counterparty or prospective counterparty (or such contractual counterparty's or prospective counterparty's professional advisor) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to obligations of any Borrower; (g) with the consent of any Borrower; (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than any Borrower; or (i) to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any other similar organization or any nationally recognized rating agency that requires access to information about a Lender's or its Affiliates' investment portfolio in connection with ratings issued with respect to such Lender or its Affiliates. For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from a Borrower relating to a Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by such Borrower; that, in the case of information received from a Borrower after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified in writing at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Information
provided
     In addition to any rights and remedies of the Lenders provided by law, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, each Lender is authorized at any time and from time to time, without prior notice to any Borrower or any other Loan Party, any such notice being waived by each Borrower (on its own behalf and on behalf of each Loan Party) to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held by, and other indebtedness at any time owing by, such Lender to or for the credit or the account of the respective Loan Parties against any and all Obligations owing to such Lender, now or hereafter existing, irrespective of whether or not the Administrative Agent or such Lender shall have made demand under this Agreement or any other Loan Document. Each Lender agrees promptly to notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent after any such set-off and application made by such Lender; , , that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such set-off and application.
10.08 Set-off.
provided
however
     Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any Loan Document, the interest paid or agreed to be paid under the Loan Documents shall not exceed the maximum rate of non-usurious interest permitted by applicable Law (the ""). If the Administrative Agent or any Lender shall receive interest in an amount that
10.09 Interest Rate Limitation.
Maximum Rate
 
exceeds the Maximum Rate, the excess interest shall be applied to the principal of the Loans or, if it exceeds such unpaid principal, refunded to the applicable Borrower. In determining whether the interest contracted for, charged, or received by the Administrative Agent or a Lender exceeds the Maximum Rate, such Person may, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, (a) characterize any payment that is not principal as an expense, fee, or premium rather than interest, (b) exclude voluntary prepayments and the effects thereof, and (c) amortize, prorate, allocate, and spread in equal or unequal parts the total amount of interest throughout the contemplated term of the Obligations.
     This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
10.10 Counterparts.
     This Agreement, together with the other Loan Documents, comprises the complete and integrated agreement of the parties on the subject matter hereof and thereof and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, on such subject matter. In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this Agreement and those of any other Loan Document, the provisions of this Agreement shall control; that the inclusion of supplemental rights or remedies in favor of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders in any other Loan Document shall not be deemed a conflict with this Agreement. Each Loan Document was drafted with the joint participation of the respective parties thereto and shall be construed neither against nor in favor of any party, but rather in accordance with the fair meaning thereof.
10.11 Integration.
provided
     All representations and warranties made hereunder and in any other Loan Document or other document delivered pursuant hereto or thereto or in connection herewith or therewith shall survive the execution and delivery hereof and thereof. Such representations and warranties have been or will be relied upon by the Administrative Agent and each Lender, regardless of any investigation made by the Administrative Agent or any Lender or on their behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or Event of Default at the time of any Credit Extension, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as any Loan or any other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied.
10.12 Survival of Representations and Warranties.
     Any provision of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which any Borrower is a party that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions thereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction. The parties shall endeavor in good faith negotiations to replace the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provisions.
10.13 Severability.
     If any Lender requests compensation under , or if any Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , or if any Lender is a Defaulting Lender or if any other circumstance exists hereunder that gives Anixter the right to replace a Lender as a party hereto, then Anixter may, at its sole expense and effort, upon
10.14 Replacement of Lenders.
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
 
notice (a "") to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in, and consents required by, ), all of its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement and the related Loan Documents to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment), that:
Replacement Notice
Section 10.06
provided
     (a) Anixter shall have paid (or caused to be paid) to the Administrative Agent the assignment fee specified in );
Section 10.06(b
     (b) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and L/C Advances, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder and under the other Loan Documents (including any amounts under ) from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or Anixter or applicable Borrowing Subsidiary (in the case of all other amounts);
Section 3.05
     (c) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under or payments required to be made pursuant to , such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments thereafter; and
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
     (d) such assignment does not conflict with applicable Laws.
     A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment or delegation if, prior to receipt by such Lender of the applicable Replacement Notice, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling Anixter to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
     If for the purposes of obtaining judgment in any court it is necessary to convert a sum due from a Borrower hereunder in the currency expressed to be payable herein (the "specified currency") into another currency, the parties hereto agree, to the fullest extent that they may effectively do so, that the rate of exchange used shall be that at which in accordance with normal banking procedures the Administrative Agent could purchase the specified currency with such other currency at the Administrative Agent's applicable office on the Business Day preceding that on which final judgment is given. The obligation of any Borrower in respect of any sum due to any Lender or the Administrative Agent hereunder shall, notwithstanding any judgment in a currency other than the specified currency, be discharged only to the extent that on the Business Day following receipt by such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, of any sum adjudged to be so due in such other currency, such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, may in accordance with normal banking procedures purchase the specified currency with such other currency. If the amount of the specified currency so purchased is less than the sum originally due to such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, in the specified currency, the applicable Borrower shall, to the fullest extent that it may effectively do so, as a separate obligation and notwithstanding any such judgment, indemnify such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, against such loss, and if the amount of the specified currency so purchased exceeds the total of (a) the sum originally due to such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case
10.15 Judgment Currency.
 
may be, in the specified currency and (b) any amount shared with other Lenders as a result of allocations of such excess as a disproportionate payment to such Lender under , such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, agrees to remit such excess to the applicable Borrower.
Section 2.15
     Each Borrower hereby irrevocably appoints and authorizes Anixter to take such action and deliver and receive notices hereunder as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement as delegated to it by the terms hereof, together with all such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In furtherance of and not in limitation of the foregoing, for administrative convenience of the parties hereto, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall send all notices and communications to be sent to any Borrower solely to Anixter and may rely solely upon Anixter to receive all such notices and other communications for and on behalf of each Borrower. Neither Anixter nor any of its respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be liable to any other Borrower for any action taken or not taken by it in connection herewith (i) with the consent or at the request of such Borrower or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. No Person other than Anixter (and its authorized officers and employees) may act as agent for the Borrowers hereunder without the written consent of the Administrative Agent.
10.16 Borrowers' Agent.
     Anixter hereby designates this Agreement to AXE as a "Credit Agreement" as referred to in and for purposes of the Revolving Subordinated Note.
10.17 Credit Agreement.
     
10.18 Governing Law.
     (i) THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS APPLICABLE TO AGREEMENTS MADE AND TO BE PERFORMED ENTIRELY WITHIN SUCH STATE THAT THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND EACH LENDER SHALL RETAIN ALL RIGHTS ARISING UNDER FEDERAL LAW.
;
PROVIDED
     (ii) ANY LEGAL ACTION OR PROCEEDING WITH RESPECT TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT MAY BE BROUGHT IN THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS SITTING IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS, OR OF THE UNITED STATES FOR THE NORTHERN DISTRICT OF SUCH STATE, AND BY EXECUTION AND DELIVERY OF THIS AGREEMENT, EACH BORROWER, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND EACH LENDER CONSENTS, FOR ITSELF AND IN RESPECT OF ITS PROPERTY, TO THE NON-EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THOSE COURTS. EACH BORROWER, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND EACH LENDER IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY OBJECTION, INCLUDING ANY OBJECTION TO THE LAYING OF VENUE OR BASED ON THE GROUNDS OF FORUM NON CONVENIENS, WHICH IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE TO THE BRINGING OF ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING IN SUCH JURISDICTION IN RESPECT OF ANY LOAN DOCUMENT OR OTHER DOCUMENT RELATED THERETO. EACH BORROWER, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND EACH LENDER WAIVES PERSONAL SERVICE OF ANY SUMMONS, COMPLAINT OR OTHER PROCESS, WHICH MAY BE MADE BY ANY OTHER MEANS PERMITTED BY THE LAW OF SUCH STATE.
 
     EACH PARTY TO THIS AGREEMENT HEREBY EXPRESSLY WAIVES ANY RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY OF ANY CLAIM, DEMAND, ACTION OR CAUSE OF ACTION ARISING UNDER ANY LOAN DOCUMENT OR IN ANY WAY CONNECTED WITH OR RELATED OR INCIDENTAL TO THE DEALINGS OF THE PARTIES HERETO OR ANY OF THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY LOAN DOCUMENT, OR THE TRANSACTIONS RELATED THERETO, IN EACH CASE WHETHER NOW EXISTING OR HEREAFTER ARISING, AND WHETHER FOUNDED IN CONTRACT OR TORT OR OTHERWISE; AND EACH PARTY HEREBY AGREES AND CONSENTS THAT ANY SUCH CLAIM, DEMAND, ACTION OR CAUSE OF ACTION SHALL BE DECIDED BY COURT TRIAL WITHOUT A JURY, AND THAT ANY PARTY TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY FILE AN ORIGINAL COUNTERPART OR A COPY OF THIS SECTION WITH ANY COURT AS WRITTEN EVIDENCE OF THE CONSENT OF THE SIGNATORIES HERETO TO THE WAIVER OF THEIR RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY.
10.19 Waiver of Right to Trial by Jury.
     Each Lender that is subject to the Act (as hereinafter defined) and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ""), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers, which information includes the name and address of each Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify such Borrower in accordance with the Act.
10.20 USA PATRIOT Act Notice.
Act
     Each Lender represents that it is a PMP and that it is aware that a Dutch Borrower may be in breach of Dutch law and regulations if such representation is untrue.
10.21 Each Lender a PMP.
     In connection with all aspects of each transaction contemplated hereby (including in connection with any amendment, waiver or other modification hereof or of any other Loan Document), each Borrower acknowledges and agrees, and acknowledges its Affiliates' understanding, that: (i) (A) the arranging and other services regarding this Agreement provided by the Administrative Agent and the Arranger, are arm's-length commercial transactions between such Borrower and its Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent and the Arranger, on the other hand, (B) such Borrower has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it has deemed appropriate, and (C) such Borrower is capable of evaluating, and understands and accepts, the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the other Loan Documents; (ii) (A) the Administrative Agent and the Arranger each is and has been acting solely as a principal and, except as expressly agreed in writing by the relevant parties, has not been, is not, and will not be acting as an advisor, agent or fiduciary for such Borrower or any of its Affiliates, or any other Person and (B) neither the Administrative Agent nor the Arranger has any obligation to such Borrower or any of its Affiliates with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby except those obligations expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents; and (iii) the Administrative Agent and the Arranger and their respective Affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of such Borrower and its Affiliates, and neither the Administrative Agent nor the Arranger has any obligation to disclose any of such interests to the Borrower or its Affiliates. To the fullest extent permitted by law, each of the Borrowers hereby waives and releases any claims that it may have
10.22 No Advisory or Fiduciary Responsibility.
 
against the Administrative Agent and the Arranger with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty in connection with any aspect of any transaction contemplated hereby.
 
     the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULE 1.01
Where:
 
 
Each Lender shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent in writing of any change to the information provided by it pursuant to this paragraph.
 
replaces all or any of its functions) and any such determination shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
SCHEDULE 2.05
 
Each Foreign Currency Borrowing by means of Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall be in a minimum amount of C$2,500,000 and the maximum number of Canadian Banker's Acceptances outstanding at any time shall not exceed ten. Each Canadian Banker's Acceptance shall have a term of 1, 2, 3 or (subject to availability) 6 months after the date of acceptance of the order by a Canadian Dollar Lender, but no Canadian Banker's Acceptance may mature on a date which is not a Business Day or after the Maturity Date. The face amount at maturity of a Canadian Banker's Acceptance may be renewed as a Canadian Banker's Acceptance (by repayment and reissue) or repaid.
Each Canadian Dollar Lender shall advance its Canadian Dollar Pro Rata Share of each Foreign Currency Borrowing by way of Canadian Banker's Acceptances in accordance with the provisions set forth below.
 
 
Except for amounts which are paid from the proceeds of a rollover of a Canadian Banker's Acceptance or for which payment has otherwise been funded by Anixter Canada Inc., any amount which a Canadian Dollar Lender pays to any third party on or after the date of maturity of a Canadian Banker's Acceptance in satisfaction thereof or which is owing to the Canadian Dollar Lender in respect of such a Canadian Banker's Acceptance on or after the date of maturity of such a Canadian Banker's Acceptance, shall be deemed to be a Canadian Dollar Loan to Anixter Canada Inc. under this Agreement. Each Canadian Dollar Lender shall forthwith give notice of the making of such a Canadian Dollar Loan to Anixter Canada Inc., the Administrative Agent and to the other Canadian Dollar Lenders. Interest shall be payable on such Canadian Dollar Loans in accordance with the terms applicable to Canadian Dollar Loans.
Anixter Canada Inc. shall not claim from a Canadian Dollar Lender any days of grace for the payment at maturity of any Canadian Banker's Acceptances presented and accepted by such Canadian Dollar Lender pursuant to this Agreement. Anixter Canada Inc. waives any defence to payment which might otherwise exist if for any reason a Canadian Banker's Acceptance shall be held by a Canadian Dollar Lender in its own right at the maturity thereof, and the doctrine of merger shall not apply to any Canadian Banker's Acceptance that is at any time held by a Canadian Dollar Lender in its own right.
Any executed orders to be used as Canadian Banker's Acceptances shall be held in safekeeping with the same degree of care as if they were the Canadian Dollar Lender's own property, and shall be kept at the place at which such orders are ordinarily held by such Canadian Dollar Lender.
The obligations of Anixter Canada Inc. with respect to Canadian Banker's Acceptances under this Agreement shall be unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under all circumstances, including the following circumstances:
 
shall be funded and paid by Anixter Canada Inc. from its own resources, by 11:00 a.m. on the day of the Canadian Dollar Borrowing or may be advanced as a Canadian Dollar Loan under a Canadian Dollar Commitment if Anixter Canada Inc. is otherwise entitled to a Canadian Dollar Borrowing under this Agreement.
 
SCHEDULE 2.06
 
SCHEDULE 5.03
 
SCHEDULE 5.04
 
SCHEDULE 5.08
 
SCHEDULE 5.16
 
SCHEDULE 5.20
 
SCHEDULE 6.07
 
SCHEDULE 7.01(ii)
 
SCHEDULE 7.02(b)
 
SCHEDULE 7.03
 
SCHEDULE 10.02
ANIXTER INC. AND BORROWING SUBSIDIARIES
c/o Anixter Inc. 2301 Patriot Boulevard Glenview, IL 60026
BANK OF AMERICA, N.A.
(for payments and Requests for Credit Extensions):
Administrative Agent's Office and Bank of America's Lending Office
Bank of America, N.A. CA4-702-02-25 Building B 2001 Clayton Road Concord, CA 94520-2405
Payment Instructions: Bank of America, N.A. ABA# 026009593 Account No.: 3750836479 Ref: Anixter
:
Other Notices as Administrative Agent
Bank of America, N.A. Agency Management CA5-701-05-19 1455 Market Street San Francisco, CA 94103-1399
 
:
With a copy to
Bank of America, N.A. IL1-231-10-50 231 South LaSalle St. Chicago, IL 60604
L/C Issuer:
Bank of America, N.A. Trade Operations-Los Angeles #22621 Mail Code: CA9-705-07-05 1000 W. Temple Street Los Angeles, CA 90012-1514
Applicable Office of Administrative Agent for British Pound Sterling Payments:
Bank of America, N.A. CA4-702-02-25 Building B 2001 Clayton Road Concord, CA 94520-2405
Applicable Office of Administrative Agent for Euro Payments:
Bank of America, N.A. CA4-702-02-25 Building B 2001 Clayton Road Concord, CA 94520-2405
 
Applicable Office of Administrative Agent for Canadian Dollar Payments:
Bank of America, N.A. CA4-702-02-25 Building B 2001 Clayton Road Concord, CA 94520-2405
 
EXHIBIT A-1
Date: , _____
                    
To: Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
     The undersigned hereby requests (select one):
0 A Borrowing of Committed Loans 0 A conversion or continuation of Committed Loans
     [The Committed Borrowing requested herein complies with the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement.]
Section 2.01
 
EXHIBIT A-2
Date: , _____
                    
To: Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
     The undersigned hereby requests (select one):
0 A Borrowing of British Pound Sterling Loans 0 A continuation of British Pound Sterling Loans
     [The British Pound Sterling Borrowing requested herein complies with the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement.]
Section 2.04(a)
 
EXHIBIT A-3
Date: , _____
                    
To: Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
     The undersigned hereby requests (select one):
0 A Borrowing of Canadian Dollar Loans  0 A continuation of Canadian Dollar Loans 0 Canadian Banker's Acceptance(s)
     [The Canadian Dollar Borrowing requested herein complies with the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement.]
Section 2.05(a)
 
EXHIBIT B
To: Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent and Swing Line Lender
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc. (""), certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
Anixter
     The undersigned hereby requests a Swing Line Loan:
     The Swing Line Loan requested herein complies with the requirements of the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement.
Section 2.03(a)
 
EXHIBIT C-1
Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
[Date]
Attention:
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     The undersigned, Anixter Inc. (""), refers to the Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 20, 2007 (as it may hereafter be amended, modified, extended or restated from time to time, the ""), among Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries named therein, the financial institutions from time to time party thereto as Lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
Anixter
Credit Agreement
     Anixter and ___(the "") (i) confirm that the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary is a Foreign Subsidiary and (ii) make, on and as of the date hereof, the representations and warranties as to the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary contained in Article V of the Credit Agreement. The Designated Borrowing Subsidiary agrees to be bound in all respects by the terms of the Credit Agreement, including without limitation, Article IV thereof, and to perform all of the obligations of a Borrowing Subsidiary thereunder. Each reference to a Borrowing Subsidiary in the Agreement shall be deemed to include the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary.
Designated Borrowing Subsidiary
     Each Guarantor ratifies and confirms the provisions of the Guaranty with respect to all Loans made by any Lender to the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary.
     The address to which communications to the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary under the Credit Agreement should be directed is
          
                    
                    
          
                    
                    
          
                    
                    
     This instrument shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of Illinois. Loan proceeds should be deposited as provided in the Credit Agreement.
     Upon the execution of this Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement by Anixter, the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary and each Guarantor, and acceptance hereof by the Administrative Agent, the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary shall become a Borrowing Subsidiary under the Credit
 
Agreement as though it were an original party thereto and shall be entitled to borrow under the Credit Agreement upon the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in of the Credit Agreement.
Section 4.02
 
Accepted as of the date first above written.
BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as Administrative Agent
 
EXHIBIT C-2
Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
[Date]
Attention:
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Anixter Inc. ("Anixter"), refers to the Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 20, 2007 (as it may hereafter be amended, modified, extended or restated from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), among Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries named therein, the financial institutions from time to time party thereto as Lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
     Anixter elects to terminate the status of (the "") as a Borrowing Subsidiary for purposes of the Credit Agreement. Anixter represents and warrants that no Loans made to the Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary are outstanding as of the date hereof and that all principal and interest on all Loans payable by the Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to the Credit Agreement have been paid in full on or prior to the date hereof.
                    
Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary
     This instrument shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of Illinois.
 
EXHIBIT D-1
                    
                    
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, [] (the ""), hereby promises to pay to the order of (the ""), on the Maturity Date (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below) the principal amount of all Committed Loans (as defined in such Credit Agreement) made by the Lender to the Borrower under that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
                    
Borrower
                    
                    
Lender
Agreement
     The Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Committed Loan from the date of such Committed Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates, and at such times as are specified in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lender in immediately available funds in the applicable currency at the Administrative Agent's Office. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
     This Note is one of the Committed Loan Notes referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and is subject to optional and mandatory prepayment in whole or in part as provided therein. This Note is also entitled to the benefits of the Guaranty. Upon the occurrence of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. Committed Loans made by the Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by the Lender in the ordinary course of business. The Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its Committed Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     The Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
 
     THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
 
 
EXHIBIT D-2
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, ___(the ""), hereby promises to pay to the order of Bank of America, N.A. (the "") on the dates provided in the Agreement (as defined below) the principal amount of each Swing Line Loan from time to time made by the Lender to the Borrower under that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Borrower
Lender
Agreement
     The Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Swing Line Loan from the date of such Swing Line Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates and at such times as provided in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lender in the Applicable Currency of such Swing Line Loan in Same Day Funds at the Administrative Agent's Office. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
     This Note is one of the Swing Line Loan Notes referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and may be prepaid in whole or in part subject to the terms and conditions provided therein. This Note is also entitled to the benefits of the Guaranty. Upon the occurrence of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. Swing Line Loans made by the Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by the Lender in the ordinary course of business. The Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its Swing Line Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     The Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
 
     THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
 
 
EXHIBIT D-3
                    
                    
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, (the ""), hereby promises to pay to the order of (the ""), on the Maturity Date (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below) the principal amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans (as defined in such Credit Agreement) made by the Lender to the Borrower under that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
                    
                    
Borrower
                    
                    
Lender
Agreement
     The Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each British Pound Sterling Loan from the date of such British Pound Sterling Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates, and at such times as are specified in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lender in British Pounds Sterling in Same Day Funds at the Administrative Agent's Office. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
     This Note is one of the British Pound Sterling Loan Notes referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and is subject to optional and mandatory prepayment in whole or in part as provided therein. This Note is also entitled to the benefits of the Guaranty. Upon the occurrence of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. British Pound Sterling Loans made by the Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by the Lender in the ordinary course of business. The Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its British Pound Sterling Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     The Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
 
     THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
 
 
EXHIBIT D-4
                    
                    
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, Anixter Canada Inc. (the ""), hereby promises to pay to the order of (the ""), on the Maturity Date (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below) the principal amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans (as defined in such Credit Agreement) made by the Lender to the Borrower under that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Borrower
                    
Lender
Agreement
     The Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Canadian Dollar Loan from the date of such Canadian Dollar Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates, and at such times as are specified in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lender in Canadian Dollars in Same Day Funds at the Administrative Agent's Office. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
     This Note is one of the Canadian Dollar Loan Notes referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and is subject to optional and mandatory prepayment in whole or in part as provided therein. This Note is also entitled to the benefits of the Guaranty. Upon the occurrence of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. Canadian Dollar Loans made by the Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by the Lender in the ordinary course of business. The Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its Canadian Dollar Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     The Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
 
     THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
 
 
EXHIBIT E
Financial Statement Date:          ,
To:       Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc. (""), certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
Anixter
     The undersigned Responsible Officer hereby certifies as of the date hereof that he/she is the of Anixter, and that, as such, he/she is authorized to execute and deliver this Certificate to the Administrative Agent on the behalf of Anixter, and that:
                    
                    
                     
                    
                    
     1. Attached hereto as are the year-end audited financial statements required by of the Agreement for the Fiscal Year of Anixter ended as of the above date, together with the report and opinion of an independent certified public accountant required by such section.
Schedule 1
Section 6.01(b)
     1. Attached hereto as are the unaudited financial statements required by of the Agreement for the Fiscal Quarter of Anixter ended as of the above date. Such financial statements fairly present the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP as at such date and for such period, subject only to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes.
Schedule 1
Section 6.01(a)
     2. The undersigned has reviewed and is familiar with the terms of the Agreement and has made, or has caused to be made under his/her supervision, a detailed review of the transactions and condition (financial or otherwise) of Anixter during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements.
     3. A review of the activities of the Loan Parties during such fiscal period has been made under the supervision of the undersigned with a view to determining whether during such fiscal period the Loan Parties performed and observed all their Obligations under the Loan Documents, and
 
[select one:]
     
[to the best knowledge of the undersigned during such fiscal period, the Borrowers performed and observed each covenant and condition of the Loan Documents applicable to them.]
     
[the following covenants or conditions have not been performed or observed and the following is a list of each such Default or Event of Default and its nature and status:]
     4. The financial covenant analyses and information set forth on attached hereto are true and accurate on and as of the date of this Certificate.
Schedule 2
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed this Certificate as of , .
                    
                    
             
                    
 
     For the Fiscal Quarter/Fiscal Year ended ("")
                    
                    
Statement Date
     1. Consolidated Net Income for Subject Period (by Fiscal Quarter):
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
     2. Net interest expense for Subject Period (by Fiscal Quarter):
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
     3. Provision for income taxes for Subject Period (by Fiscal Quarter):
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
     4. Depreciation and amortization expenses for Subject Period (by Fiscal Quarter):
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
 
     5. Permitted Exclusions for Subject Period (by Fiscal Quarter):
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200 US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                        Description:
                    
                    
                   
                    
                    
                    
               b.     Fiscal Quarter ended , 200 US$
                    
                    
                     
                    
                        Description:
                    
                    
                   
                    
                    
                    
               c.     Fiscal Quarter ended , 200 US$
                    
                    
                     
                    
                        Description:
                    
                    
                   
                    
                    
                    
               d.     Fiscal Quarter ended , 200 US$
                    
                    
                     
                    
                        Description:     US$
                    
                    
                   
                    
                    
                    
  &nbs p;                 
     6. Consolidated EBITDA (Lines II.A.1 + 2 + 3 + 4-5)(by Fiscal Quarter):
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
     B. Rental Expense for Subject Period:
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
     C. Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense for Subject Period:
               a.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               b.      Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               c.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
               d.       Fiscal Quarter ended , 200      US$     US$
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
     D. Interest Coverage Ratio ((Line II.A.6 +Line II.B)/(Line II.C):   to 1
                    
     
Minimum required:
 
III. Section 7.16  Leverage Ratio.
 
EXHIBIT F
     This Assignment and Assumption (this "") is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [] (the "") and [] (the ""). Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below (the ""), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by the Assignee. The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in Annex 1 attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
Insert name of Assignor
Assignor
Insert name of Assignee
Assignee
Credit Agreement
     For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below (i) all of the Assignor's rights and obligations as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto to the extent related to the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of such outstanding rights and obligations of the Assignor under the respective facilities identified below (including, without limitation, the Letters of Credit, the Swing Line Loans, the British Pound Sterling Loans and the Canadian Dollar Loans included in such facilities) and (ii) to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims, suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor (in its capacity as a Lender) against any Person, whether known or unknown, arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby or in any way based on or related to any of the foregoing, including, but not limited to, contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity related to the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clause (i) above (the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) above being referred to herein collectively as, the ""). Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
[7. : ]
Trade Date
                    
                    
3
Effective Date: , 20 [TO BE INSERTED BY ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER IN THE REGISTER THEREFOR.]
                    
                    
 
 
[Consented to and] Accepted:
4
 
 
ANNEX 1 TO ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
AMENDED AND RESTATED FIVE-YEAR REVOLVING CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of April 20, 2007 among ANIXTER INC., the Borrowing Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto, the Lenders party thereto, and BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Swing Line Lender and L/C Issuer
     1. Representations and Warranties.
     1.1. . The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
     1.2. . The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement, (ii) it meets all requirements of an Eligible Assignee under the Credit Agreement (subject to receipt of such consents as may be required under the Credit Agreement), (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to Section 6.01 thereof, as applicable, and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender, and (v) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached hereto is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement, duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a
Assignee
 
Lender. The Assignee represents that it is a PMP and that it is aware that a Dutch Borrower may be in breach of Dutch law and regulations if this representation is untrue.
     2. . From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignor for amounts which have accrued to but excluding the Effective Date and to the Assignee for amounts which have accrued from and after the Effective Date.
Payments
     3. . This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts, which together shall constitute one instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption. This Assignment and Assumption shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of Illinois.
General Provisions
 
EXHIBIT G
     This GUARANTY, dated as of , 2007, is by ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC., a Delaware corporation, ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), ANIXTER-REAL ESTATE, INC., an Illinois corporation, ANIXTER INFORMATION SYSTEMS CORPORATION, an Illinois corporation, ANIXTER FINANCIAL INC., a Delaware corporation, and ANIXTER PROCUREMENT CORPORATION, an Illinois corporation (each a "" and collectively, the ""), in favor of BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as administrative agent (in such capacity, the "") for the Lenders (as hereafter defined).
                    
Anixter
Guarantor
Guarantors
Administrative Agent
     A. Anixter, Anixter International. Ltd., an English limited liability company and Anixter International BVBA, a Belgian company, Anixter Canada Inc., a Canadian company, and Anixter Eurinvest B.V., a Netherlands company (together with Anixter, Anixter International Ltd., Anixter International BVBA, Anixter Canada Inc. and any other Subsidiary that may become a Borrowing Subsidiary in accordance with the terms thereof, collectively, the "Borrowers" and individually a "Borrower"), the financial institutions from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders") and the Administrative Agent have entered into an Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007. The Credit Agreement as now in effect or hereafter extended, renewed, modified, supplemented, amended, or restated is hereinafter called the "".
Credit Agreement
     B. The Lenders are willing to make the Credit Extensions to the Borrowers on the condition (among others) that the Guarantors enter into this Guaranty.
     C. Each Guarantor will derive substantial and direct benefits (which benefits are hereby acknowledged by the Guarantors) from the Credit Extensions and other benefits to be provided to the Borrowers under the Credit Agreement.
     D. In order to induce the Lenders to make the Credit Extensions to the Borrowers as provided in the Credit Agreement, and for other valuable consideration, the Guarantors hereby issue this Guaranty.
     1. . Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms used in this Guaranty have the meanings given to them from time to time in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
     2. .
Guaranty
          2.1 . The Guarantors, jointly and severally, hereby irrevocably, absolutely and unconditionally guarantee the full and punctual payment or performance when due, whether at stated maturity, by required prepayment, declaration, acceleration, demand, or otherwise, of all of the Guaranteed Obligations, including Guaranteed Obligations in respect of amounts that would become due but for the operation of the automatic stay under Section 362(a)
Guaranty
 
of the Federal Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 (11 U.S.C.101 et seq.) (the "") or the operation of Sections 502(b) and 506(b) of the Bankruptcy Code. This Guaranty constitutes a guaranty of payment and performance when due and not of collection, and the Guarantors specifically agree that it shall not be necessary or required that the Administrative Agent or any Lender exercise any right, assert any claim or demand, or enforce any remedy whatsoever against the Borrowers (or any other Person) before or as a condition to the obligations of the Guarantors hereunder. The Administrative Agent or any Lender may permit the indebtedness of the Borrowers to the Administrative Agent or any Lender to include indebtedness other than the Guaranteed Obligations, and may apply any amounts received from any source, other than from the Guarantors, to that portion of the Borrowers' indebtedness to the Administrative Agent or any Lender which is not a part of the Guaranteed Obligations. The obligations and liabilities of the Guarantors hereunder are joint and several. "" shall mean all Obligations plus all obligations of the Borrowers to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to any agreement (including any master agreement and any agreement, whether or not in writing, relating to any single transaction) that is an interest rate swap agreement, basis swap, forward rate agreement, commodity swap, commodity option, equity or equity index swap or option, bond option, interest rate option, forward foreign exchange agreement, rate cap, collar or floor agreement, currency swap agreement, cross-currency rate swap agreement, station, currency option or any other, similar agreement (including any option to enter into any of the foregoing).
Bankruptcy Code
Guaranteed Obligations
          2.2 . The obligations hereunder are independent of the obligations of the Borrowers, and a separate action or actions may be brought and prosecuted against any or all of the Guarantors whether action is brought against a Borrower or whether any Borrower be joined in any such action or actions.
Obligations Independent
          2.3 Each Guarantor authorizes the Administrative Agent and each Lender, without notice or demand and without affecting its liability hereunder, from time to time:
Authorization of Renewals, Etc.
          (a) to renew, compromise, extend, accelerate, or otherwise change the time for payment, or otherwise change the terms, of the Guaranteed Obligations, including increase or decrease of the rate of interest thereon, or otherwise change the terms of the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document;
          (b) to receive and hold security for the payment of this Guaranty or the obligations and exchange, enforce, waive, release, fail to perfect, sell, or otherwise dispose of any such security;
          (c) to apply such security and direct the order or manner of sale thereof as the Administrative Agent, or any Lender, as the case may be, in its or their discretion may determine; and
          (d) to release or substitute any one or more of any endorsers or guarantors of the Guaranteed Obligations.
 
Each Guarantor further agrees that the performance or occurrence of any of the acts or events described in clauses (a), (b), (c), and (d) above with respect to indebtedness or other obligations of the Borrowers other than the Guaranteed Obligations, to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, shall not affect the liability of the Guarantors hereunder.
          2.4 . Each Guarantor waives any right to require the Administrative Agent or any Lender:
Waiver of Certain Rights
          (a) to proceed against the Borrowers, a Borrower or any other Person;
          (b) to proceed against or exhaust any security for the Guaranteed Obligations or any other indebtedness of the Borrowers to the Administrative Agent or any Lender; or
          (c) to pursue any other remedy in the Administrative Agent's or any such Lender's power whatsoever.
          2.5 . Each Guarantor waives any defense arising by reason of any disability or other defense of the Borrowers, or the cessation from any cause whatsoever of the liability of the Borrowers, whether consensual or arising by operation of law or any bankruptcy, insolvency or debtor relief proceeding, or from any other cause, or any claim that such Guarantor's obligations exceed or are more burdensome than those of the Borrowers. Each Guarantor waives any defense arising by reason of any statute of limitations affecting the liability of the Borrowers. Each Guarantor waives all rights and defenses arising out of an election of remedies by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, even though that election of remedies, has destroyed such Guarantor's rights of subrogation and reimbursement against the Borrowers by operation of applicable law, and all rights or defenses such Guarantor may have by reason of protection afforded to the Borrowers with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations pursuant to the antideficiency laws or other laws of the applicable jurisdiction limiting or discharging the Guaranteed Obligations.
Waiver of Certain Defenses and Rights
          2.6 Each Guarantor waives all presentments, demands for performance, notices of nonperformance, protests, notices of protest, notices of dishonor, and notices of acceptance of this Guaranty and of the existence, creation, or incurring of new or additional Guaranteed Obligations or any other indebtedness of Borrowers to the Administrative Agent or any Lender.
Waiver of Presentments, Etc.
          2.7 . Each Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that it shall have the sole responsibility for obtaining from the Borrowers such information concerning the Borrowers, financial condition or business operations as such Guarantor may require, and that neither the Administrative Agent nor any Lender has any duty at any time to disclose to the Guarantors any information relating to the business operations or financial condition of the Borrowers.
Information Relating to Borrowers
          2.8 . In addition to any rights and remedies of the Lenders provided by law, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, each Lender is authorized at any time and from time to time, without prior notice to the Guarantors, any such notice being waived by each Guarantor to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set-off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other
Right of Set-off
 
indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender to or for the credit or the account of one or more Guarantors against any and all obligations of the Guarantors now or hereafter existing under this Guaranty or any other Loan Document, irrespective of whether or not the Administrative Agent or such Lender shall have made demand under this Guaranty or any other Loan Document. Each Lender agrees promptly to notify the Guarantors and the Administrative Agent after any such set-off and application made by such Lender; that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such set-off and application. The rights of each Lender under this are in addition to the other rights and remedies (including, without limitation, other rights of set-off) which such Lender may have.
provided
Section 2.8
          2.9 . Any obligations of any Borrower to one or more of the Guarantors, now or hereafter existing, including, but not limited to, obligations to one or more of the Guarantors as subrogee of the Administrative Agent or any Lender or resulting from one or more of the Guarantors' performance under this Guaranty, are hereby fully subordinated in time and priority of payment to the Guaranteed Obligations and all other indebtedness of the Borrowers to the Administrative Agent or any Lender. The obligations of such Borrower to the Guarantors if the Lenders so request shall be enforced and performance received by the Guarantors as trustee for the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and the proceeds thereof shall be paid over to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders on account of the Guaranteed Obligations, but without reducing or affecting in any manner the liability of the Guarantors under the other provisions of this Guaranty.
Subordination
          2.10 . If any payment or transfer of any interest in property by any Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in fulfillment of any obligation is rescinded or must at any time (including after the return or cancellation of this Guaranty) be returned, in whole or in part, by the Administrative Agent or any Lender to a Borrower or any other Person, upon the insolvency, bankruptcy, or reorganization of such Borrower or otherwise, this Guaranty shall be reinstated with respect to any such payment or transfer, regardless of any such prior return or cancellation.
Reinstatement of Guaranty
          2.11 . It is not necessary for the Administrative Agent or any Lender to inquire into the powers of any Borrower or any other Person obligated in respect of the Guaranteed Obligations or of the officers, directors, partners, or agents acting or purporting to act on its or their behalf, and any Guaranteed Obligations made or created in reliance upon the professed exercise of such powers shall be guaranteed hereunder.
Powers
          2.12 . (a) Any and all payments by any Guarantor to each Lender or the Administrative Agent under this Guaranty shall be made free and clear of, and without deduction for, any Taxes. In addition, the Guarantors shall pay all Other Taxes.
Taxes
          (b) If any Guarantor shall be required by law to deduct any Taxes, from or in respect of any sum payable hereunder to any Lender or the Administrative Agent, then:
     (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that, after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section), such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may
 
be, receives and retains an amount equal to the sum it would have received and retained had no such deductions been made;
     (ii) the Guarantors shall make such deductions;
     (iii) the Guarantors shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant taxing authority or other authority in accordance with applicable law; and
     (iv) the Guarantors shall also pay to each Lender or the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender, at the time interest is paid, such additional amount that the respective Lender specifies as necessary to preserve the after-tax yield the Lender would have received if such Taxes or Other Taxes had not been imposed.
          (c) Each Guarantor agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Lender and the Administrative Agent for the full amount of (i) Taxes and (ii) Other Taxes, and (iii) amounts payable under , and (iv) any liability (including penalties, interest, additions to tax, and expenses) arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally asserted. Payment under this indemnification shall be made within 30 days after the date the Lender or the Administrative Agent makes written demand therefor.
Section 2.12(b)(iv)
          (d) Within 30 days after the date of any payment by any Guarantor of Taxes or Other Taxes, such Guarantor shall furnish to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt evidencing payment thereof, or other evidence of payment satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
          2.13 . Each Guarantor at any time a party hereto consents and agrees that, at any time that any Person executes and delivers to Administrative Agent a letter, substantially in the form of attached hereto, with such changes, if any, as Administrative Agent shall approve, such Person shall, without further action on the part of any Person, automatically become a party hereto and a "Guarantor" hereunder.
Addition of Guarantors
Exhibit A
          2.14 . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, each Guarantor shall be liable hereunder only for the largest amount that would not render such Guarantor's obligations hereunder subject to avoidance under Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code or comparable provisions of any applicable state law; that such amount shall be presumed to be the entire amount of the Guaranteed Obligations. If any Guarantor claims that such Guarantor's liability hereunder is less than the entire amount of the Obligations, such Guarantor shall have the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that such Guarantor's liability hereunder should be so limited since the information concerning, and the circumstances of, the financial condition of such Guarantor are more readily available to and are under the control of such Guarantor.
Limit of Liability
provided
          2.15 . Until such time as the Guaranteed Obligations shall have been indefeasibly paid in full in cash, each Guarantor waives any right of subrogation, reimbursement, indemnification and contribution (contractual, statutory or otherwise), including any claim or right of subrogation under the Bankruptcy Code or any successor statute, against the Borrowers arising from the existence or performance of this Guaranty, and each Guarantor
Waiver of Subrogation
 
waives any right to enforce any remedy which the Administrative Agent or any Lender now has or may hereafter have against the Borrowers, and waives any benefit of, and any right to participate in, any security now or hereafter held by the Administrative Agent or any Lender securing the Guaranteed Obligations.
     3. . Each Guarantor represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and each Lender as follows:
Representations and Warranties
          3.1 . Such Guarantor (i) is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, (ii) is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction in which it owns or leases real property or in which the nature of its business requires it to be so qualified, except those jurisdictions where the failure to be in good standing or to so qualify has not had or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and (iii) has all requisite corporate power and authority to own, operate and encumber its property and assets and to conduct its business as presently conducted and as proposed to be conducted in connection with and following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents.
Organization; Corporate Powers
          3.2 .
Authority
     (1) Such Guarantor has the requisite corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under this Guaranty.
     (2) The execution, delivery and performance (or filing or recording, as the case may be) of this Guaranty and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of this Guaranty and no other proceedings on the part of any such Person are necessary to consummate such transactions.
     (3) This Guaranty has been duly executed and delivered (or filed or recorded, as the case may be) by such Guarantor, constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligations, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms (except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by general equitable principles), and is in full force and effect (unless terminated in accordance with the terms thereof).
          3.3 . The execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty and each of the transactions contemplated hereby, do not and will not (i) conflict with any Contractual Obligation of such Guarantor, any liability resulting from which would have or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (ii) conflict with or violate such Guarantor's certificate or articles of incorporation or by-laws or similar charter and constituting documents, or (iii) conflict with, result in a breach of or constitute (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) a default under any Requirement of Law or Contractual Obligation of such Guarantor, or require termination of any Contractual Obligation of such Guarantor, or (iv) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien whatsoever upon any of the properties or assets of any such Person (other than Liens permitted pursuant to Section
No Conflict
 
7.02(b) of the Credit Agreement), or (v) require any approval of stockholders of such Guarantor, unless such approval has been obtained.
          3.4 . The execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty by such Guarantor, and the transactions contemplated hereby do not and will not require any registration with, consent or approval of, or notice to, or other action with or by, any Governmental Authority, except filings, consents or notices which have been made, obtained or given and are in full force and effect.
Governmental Consents
          3.5 . Such Guarantor is not subject to regulation under the Public Utility Holdings Company Act of 1935, the Federal Power Act, the Interstate Commerce Act, the Investment Company Act of 1940 or any other statute or regulation of any Governmental Authority such that its ability to incur indebtedness is limited or its ability to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby is materially impaired.
Governmental Regulation
     4. .
Miscellaneous
          4.1 . All payments required to be made by the Guarantors hereunder shall, unless otherwise expressly provided herein, be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders at the Administrative Agent's Office. The Administrative Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its Pro Rata Share (or other applicable share as expressly provided herein) of such payment in like funds as received. Payments received from the Guarantors shall, unless otherwise expressly provided herein, be applied to costs, fees, or other expenses due under the Loan Documents, any interest (including interest due under subsection 2.09(b) of the Credit Agreement), any principal due under the Loan Documents and any other Guaranteed Obligations, in such order as the Administrative Agent, with the consent of or at the request of the Lenders, shall determine.
Application of Payments on Guaranty
          4.2 . Subject to the provisions of Section 10.06 of the Credit Agreement, any Lender may from time to time, without notice to the Guarantors and without affecting the Guarantors' obligations hereunder, transfer its interest in the Guaranteed Obligations. Each Guarantor agrees that each such transfer will give rise to a direct obligation of the Guarantors to each such transferee and that each such transferee shall have the same rights and benefits under this Guaranty as it would have if it were a Lender party to the Credit Agreement and this Guaranty.
Assignments, Participations, Confidentiality
          4.3 . This Guaranty is a Loan Document executed and delivered pursuant to the Credit Agreement and shall (unless otherwise expressly indicated herein) be construed, administered, and applied in accordance with the terms and provisions thereof. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the provisions of Sections 1.02 through 1.08 of the Credit Agreement shall apply to the interpretation and administration of this Guaranty as if such provisions were incorporated herein, with all references to the "Agreement" in such Sections being deemed to be references to this Guaranty.
Loan Document
          4.4 . No delay or omission by the Administrative Agent or any Lender to exercise any right under this Guaranty shall impair any such right, nor shall it be construed to be a waiver thereof. No waiver of any single breach or default under this
Waivers; Writing Required
 
Guaranty shall be deemed a waiver of any other breach or default. Any amendment or waiver of any provision of this Guaranty must be in writing and signed by the Guarantors and the Administrative Agent, with the written consent of the Required Lenders or all of the Lenders, in accordance with the terms of Section 10.01 of the Credit Agreement.
          4.5 . Each Guarantor absolutely, unconditionally, knowingly, and expressly waives any right to revoke such Guarantor's guaranty obligation hereunder as to future Guaranteed Obligations. Each Guarantor fully realizes and understands that, upon execution of this Guaranty, such Guarantor will not have any right to revoke this Guaranty as to any future indebtedness and, thus, may have no control over such Guarantor's ultimate responsibility for the Guaranteed Obligations. If, contrary to the express intent of this Guaranty, any such revocation is effective notwithstanding the foregoing waiver, each Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that: (a) no such revocation shall be effective until written notice thereof has been received by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders; (b) no such revocation shall apply to any Guaranteed Obligations in existence on such date (including any subsequent continuation, extension, or renewal thereof, or change in the interest rate, payment terms, or other terms and conditions thereof); (c) no such revocation shall apply to any Guaranteed Obligations made or created after such date to the extent made or created pursuant to a legally binding commitment of the Lenders which is, or is believed in good faith by the Lenders to be, in existence on the date of such revocation; (d) no payment by any other source, prior to the date of such revocation shall reduce the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder; and (e) any payment by any Borrower or from any source other than a Guarantor, subsequent to the date of such revocation, shall first be applied to that portion of the Guaranteed Obligations, if any, as to which the revocation by a Guarantor is effective (and which are not, therefore, guarantied by the Guarantors hereunder), and, to the extent so applied, shall not reduce the Guaranteed Obligations of the Guarantors hereunder.
Revocation
          4.6 . All rights and remedies provided in this Guaranty and any instrument or agreement referred to herein are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies otherwise provided by law. Any single or partial exercise of any right or remedy shall not preclude the further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or remedy.
Remedies
          4.7 . Each Guarantor agrees to pay or reimburse the Administrative Agent and each Lender within five Business Days after demand for all reasonable costs and expenses (including Attorney Costs) incurred by them in connection with the enforcement, attempted enforcement, or preservation of any rights or remedies under this Guaranty (including in connection with any "workout" or restructuring regarding amounts due under this Guaranty, and including in any Insolvency Proceeding or appellate proceeding).
Costs and Expenses
          4.8 . The illegality or unenforceability of any provision of this Guaranty or any instrument or agreement referred to herein shall not in any way affect or impair the legality or enforceability of the remaining provisions of this Guaranty or any instrument or agreement referred to herein.
Severability
          4.9 . All notices, requests, consents, approvals, waivers and other communications shall be in writing (including, unless the context expressly otherwise provides, by facsimile transmission, provided that any matter transmitted by facsimile (i) shall be immediately confirmed by a telephone call to the recipient at the number specified on Schedule
Notices
 
10.02 to the Credit Agreement, and (ii) shall be followed promptly by delivery of a hard copy original thereof) and mailed, faxed or delivered, to the address or facsimile number specified for notices on the signature pages hereof in the case of Guarantors and as provided in the Credit Agreement in the case of Administrative Agent and Lenders; or to such other address as shall be designated by any such party in a written notice to the other parties. All such notices, requests and communications shall, when transmitted by overnight delivery, or faxed, be effective when delivered for overnight (next-day) delivery, or transmitted in legible form by facsimile machine, respectively, or if mailed, upon the fourth Business Day after the date deposited into the U.S. mail, or if delivered, upon delivery. Any agreement of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders to receive certain notices by telephone or facsimile is solely for the convenience and at the request of the Guarantors. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall be entitled to rely on the authority of any Person purporting to be a Person authorized by a Guarantor to give such notice and the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall not have any liability to any Guarantor or other Person on account of any action taken or not taken by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders in reliance upon such telephonic or facsimile notice. The obligation of the Guarantors hereunder shall not be affected in any way or to any extent by any failure by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders to receive written confirmation of any telephonic or facsimile notice or the receipt by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of a confirmation which is at variance with the terms understood by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders to be contained in the telephonic or facsimile notice.
          4.10 . THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS; PROVIDED THAT THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE LENDERS SHALL RETAIN ALL RIGHTS ARISING UNDER FEDERAL LAW.
Governing Law and Jurisdiction
          4.11 . EACH GUARANTOR, THE LENDERS, AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT EACH WAIVE THEIR RESPECTIVE RIGHTS TO A TRIAL BY JURY OF ANY CLAIM OR CAUSE OF ACTION BASED UPON OR ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS GUARANTY, THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY, IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING, OR OTHER LITIGATION OF ANY TYPE BROUGHT BY ANY OF THE PARTIES AGAINST ANY OTHER PARTY OR PARTIES, WHETHER WITH RESPECT TO CONTRACT CLAIMS, TORT CLAIMS, OR OTHERWISE. THE GUARANTORS, THE LENDERS, AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT EACH AGREE THAT ANY SUCH CLAIM OR CAUSE OF ACTION SHALL BE TRIED BY A COURT TRIAL WITHOUT A JURY. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, THE PARTIES FURTHER AGREE THAT THEIR RESPECTIVE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IS WAIVED BY OPERATION OF THIS SECTION AS TO ANY ACTION, COUNTERCLAIM OR OTHER PROCEEDING WHICH SEEKS, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, TO CHALLENGE THE VALIDITY OR ENFORCEABILITY OF THIS GUARANTY OR THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS OR ANY PROVISION HEREOF OR THEREOF. THIS WAIVER SHALL APPLY TO ANY SUBSEQUENT AMENDMENTS, RENEWALS, SUPPLEMENTS, OR MODIFICATIONS TO THIS GUARANTY AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS.
Waiver of Jury Trial
          4.12 . This Guaranty (a) integrates all the terms and conditions mentioned herein or incidental hereto, (b) supersedes all oral negotiations and prior
Entire Agreement
 
writings with respect to the subject matter hereof, and (c) is intended by the parties as the final expression of the agreement with respect to the terms and conditions set forth in this Guaranty and any such instrument, agreement and document and as the complete and exclusive statement of the terms agreed to by the parties.
          4.13 . This Guaranty may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute but one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of the signature page to this Guaranty by telecopier shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Guaranty. Any party delivering an executed counterpart of the signature page to this Guaranty by telecopier shall thereafter also promptly deliver a manually executed counterpart of this Guaranty, but the failure to deliver such manually executed counterpart shall not affect the validity, enforceability, and binding effect of this Guaranty.
Execution in Counterparts
     THIS WRITTEN GUARANTY, TOGETHER WITH THE OTHER WRITTEN LOAN DOCUMENTS EXECUTED IN CONNECTION HEREWITH, REPRESENTS THE FINAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES AND MAY NOT BE CONTRADICTED BY EVIDENCE OF PRIOR CONTEMPORANEOUS OR SUBSEQUENT ORAL AGREEMENTS OF THE PARTIES.
     THERE ARE NO UNWRITTEN ORAL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each Guarantor has executed this Guaranty by its duly authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
, 200
                    
                    
                    
To the Lenders and Administrative Agent :
Referenced below
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to the following documents: (a) that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as April 20, 2007 (as amended or modified from time to time, the ""), among Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), Anixter International Ltd., an English limited liability company, Anixter International BVBA, a Belgian company, Anixter Canada Inc., a Canadian company, and Anixter Eurinvest B.V., a Netherlands company (together with Anixter, Anixter International Ltd., Anixter Canada Inc. and Anixter International BVBA, collectively, the "" and individually a ""), the financial institutions from time to time party thereto (the ""), and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender; and (b) that certain Guaranty dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended or modified from time to time, the ""), by certain Affiliates of the Borrowers party thereto in favor of Administrative Agent. Unless specifically defined herein, capitalized terms used herein have the meaning set forth in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Anixter
Borrowers
Borrower
Lenders
Guaranty
     The undersigned hereby confirms and agrees that it has been furnished with and has read each of the Loan Documents in effect as of the date hereof and that, effective as of the date hereof, the undersigned is a party to and obligated as a Guarantor under the Guaranty. The undersigned hereby warrants and represents to you that the representations and warranties of the undersigned as a Guarantor under Section 3 of the Guaranty are true, correct, and complete in all material respects on the date hereof.
 
EXHIBIT H


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070424192705.txt.gz
TIME:20070424192705
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 24, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended March 30, 2007. The Companys press release, dated April 24, 2007, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated April 24, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended March 30, 2007.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 24, 2007 
First Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, stated, "We are pleased to note that the same trends that drove record performance in 2006 have remained largely intact through the first few months of the new year. At this time, all indications are that these trends will continue for the next few quarters. Assuming strong market conditions and continued success in our ongoing initiatives to expand our business, we should be in a position to have another very good year.
First Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended March 30, 2007, sales of $1.33 billion produced net income of $53.6 million, or $1.27 per diluted share. Included in the current year's first quarter results were sales of $33.6 million from the acquisitions of IMS and MFU in May and October 2006, respectively. Also included in this year's first quarter is income of $3.4 million or 8 cents per diluted share primarily related to the settlement of certain income tax audits. In the prior year period, sales of $1.07 billion generated net income of $31.3 million, or 74 cents per diluted share.
Operating income in the first quarter increased 52 percent to $90.4 million as compared to $59.6 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 6.8 percent compared to 5.6 percent in the first quarter of 2006.
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the first quarter grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 19 percent after adjusting for the IMS and MFU acquisitions as well as the favorable foreign exchange impact of $25.9 million on first quarter 2007 sales. This organic growth clearly exceeded our target of 8 to 12 percent as we once again saw very strong customer demand across a broad mix of end markets."
Grubbs continued, "The factors driving our organic growth were consistent with those we have seen during the past year. In the most recent quarter, we again saw strong larger project business, particularly as it relates to data center builds in the enterprise cabling market and energy / natural resources customers within the electrical wire & cable market. At the same time, we have continued to experience strong growth in the security and OEM markets. Lastly, higher copper prices continued to contribute to our organic growth in the most recent quarter, with market-based copper prices averaging approximately $2.71 per pound during the quarter compared to $2.25 per pound in the year ago first quarter and $3.20 per pound in the fourth quarter of 2006. We estimate that the higher copper prices accounted for approximately $35.0 million of our year-on-year quarterly increase in sales within the electrical wire & cable market. Excluding the impact of copper prices, the IMS and MFU acquisitions and foreign exchange, however, we were still able to grow company-wide sales by 15 percent over the prior year first quarter."
"Specifically, in North America we saw year-over-year sales grow by 19 percent to $927.0 million in the most recent quarter," commented Grubbs. "In addition to strong end-market demand, North American sales were up $12.2 million due to the acquisition of IMS and an estimated $31.4 million due to higher copper prices. Foreign exchange had a negative impact of $1.3 million. In Europe, we saw sales climb by 39 percent versus the year ago quarter, of which $26.4 million was due to exchange rate differences, $21.4 million was due to the acquisition of MFU at the end of October 2006 and $3.6 million was due to higher copper prices in the electrical wire & cable business. Taking out exchange rate differences, acquisitions and copper effects, sales in Europe still grew organically by 16 percent as compared to the year ago quarter."
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 34 percent increase in year-on-year sales, with a favorable impact of $0.8 million from currency exchange rate effects. Growth was particularly strong in Asia Pacific, which posted year-on-year growth of nearly 80 percent," continued Grubbs.
First Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of very strong sales growth, first quarter operating margins were 6.8 percent as compared to 5.6 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, the 19 percent sales growth drove an improvement in operating leverage, which generated operating margins of 7.6 percent compared to 6.0 percent in the prior year first quarter. While strong market conditions and market share gains were the primary drivers of the sales growth and improved profitability, copper prices also contributed to first quarter operating results. Specifically, copper prices added an estimated $31.4 million to North American electrical wire & cable sales, which added an estimated $5.6 million to first quarter operating income as compared to the year ago quarter."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.6 percent as compared to 3.4 percent in the year ago quarter. This significant improvement in operating margins reflects the operating leverage we gained as a result of strong organic sales growth and the acquisition of MFU. Operating income in the quarter was, however, negatively impacted by copper price changes. While year-on-year increases in copper prices added to sales in Europe, the first quarter short-term drop in copper prices reduced gross profit and operating income by $0.7 million. This reduced operating margins by 28 basis points. We were again encouraged by the results in the most recent quarter as well as the near term outlook for our business in Europe."
"First quarter operating margins in the emerging markets were 5.7 percent as compared to 7.4 percent in the year ago quarter. The year ago first quarter benefited from a gain of $2.2 million related to a favorable sales tax settlement and, after excluding this gain, the year ago operating margins were 4.3 percent. Continued sales growth throughout these markets once again allowed us to achieve better leveraging of infrastructure costs that resulted in improved operating margins" added Grubbs.
,
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the first quarter we generated cash from operations of $65.8 million as compared to $12.9 million in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "In anticipation of continued positive cash flow and in order to improve the effectiveness of our capital structure, we completed two important capital structure transactions during the quarter. We repurchased a total of 3 million shares, or approximately 7.6 percent of our outstanding shares, at an average price of $54.23 per share. To finance this repurchase the Company sold $300 million, principal amount, of 1% Convertible Senior Notes, that mature in 2013."
"As a result of these capital structure transactions our debt-to-total capital ratio at the end of the first quarter has increased to 52.5 percent as compared to 45.7 percent at the end of 2006. For the first quarter our weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.8 percent, however, compared to 5.2 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the first quarter, 80 percent of our total borrowings of $950.9 million were fixed, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging arrangements. We also had $233.3 million of available, unused credit facilities at March 30, 2007, which provides us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the coming quarters."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "2007 is off to a good start as most of the same underlying trends that generated record performance in 2006 continue to drive the business. If the underlying market fundamentals remain healthy and we continue to make solid progress on our strategic initiatives to build our security and OEM business, add to our supply chain services offering, expand the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expand our product offering, 2007 has the potential to be another very strong year."
"As we move into the next three quarters of 2007, we will be measuring our progress against three comparatively stronger quarters of performance that will have the effect of slowing the year-over-year reported rates of sales and earnings growth. Nonetheless, we believe that the current market conditions will allow us to continue growing organic sales in line with our stated goal of 8 to 12 percent. It is our expectation that sales growth at these rates will enable us to continue achieving better operating leverage over time."
First Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2007 first quarter on Tuesday, April 24, 2007, and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 220 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 247 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070724100952.txt.gz
TIME:20070724100952
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 24, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended June 29, 2007. The Companys press release, dated July 24, 2007, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1 Press Release, dated July 24, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended June 29, 2007.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 24, 2007 
Second Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, stated, "The record results generated in the first half of 2007 reflect a continuation of the broad-based market trends we have seen in the past couple of years, both from an end market and geographic standpoint, together with solid execution of the growth strategies we have been focused on over this same time period. Assuming a continuation of market conditions and further success in our ongoing initiatives to expand our business, we would expect to be in a position to have another record setting year of sales and earnings."
Second Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended June 29, 2007, sales of $1.51 billion produced net income of $64.6 million, or $1.53 per diluted share. Included in the current year's second quarter results were sales of $39.7 million coming from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year. In the prior year period, sales of $1.24 billion generated net income of $49.4 million, or $1.15 per diluted share.
Operating income in the second quarter increased 28 percent to $116.1 million as compared to $91.0 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 7.7 percent compared to 7.3 percent in the second quarter of 2006.
First Six Month Results
For the six-month period ended June 29, 2007, sales of $2.84 billion produced net income of $118.2 million, or $2.81 per diluted share. Included in the 2007 six-month results were sales of $73.3 million from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year. In the prior year period, sales of $2.31 billion produced net income of $80.7 million or $1.89 per diluted share.
Operating income in the first six months of fiscal 2007 increased by 37 percent to $206.5 million as compared to $150.6 million in the year ago period. Operating margins in the first six months of 2007 were 7.3 percent as compared to 6.5 percent in the prior year period.
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales in the second quarter grew at a year-over-year organic rate of nearly 17 percent after excluding sales from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year, as well as for the favorable foreign exchange impact of $27.0 million on second quarter 2007 sales. The organic growth clearly exceeded our target of 8 to 12 percent as we once again saw stronger than expected customer demand across a broad mix of end markets but with particularly strong large project demand in the electrical wire & cable market."
Grubbs continued, "The factors driving our organic growth were consistent with those we have seen during the past couple of years. In the most recent quarter, we again experienced strong larger project business, particularly as relates to data center builds in the enterprise cabling market and within the energy / natural resources customers in the electrical wire & cable market. At the same time, we have continued to experience strong growth in the security and OEM markets. Furthermore, copper prices had only a marginal impact (just over 1 percent) on our organic growth in the most recent quarter as year-on-year price fluctuations stabilized. Market-based copper prices averaged approximately $3.46 per pound during the quarter compared to $3.39 per pound in the year ago second quarter. We estimate that the quarterly year-on-year change in copper prices added approximately $15.9 million to sales within the electrical wire & cable market."
"In North America we saw year-over-year sales grow by 16 percent to $1.07 billion in the most recent quarter," commented Grubbs. "In addition to strong end-market demand, North American sales growth benefited by $13.2 million over last year's second quarter as a result of slightly higher copper prices. Foreign exchange rates added $2.8 million and an acquisition added a further $7.9 million to second quarter sales as compared to the year ago quarter. Strong large project demand in the North American electrical wire & cable market was the primary contributor to year-on-year sales growth in that market of 22 percent. In Europe, we saw sales climb by $85.5 million or approximately 36 percent versus the year ago quarter. Favorable exchange rate differences accounted for $21.2 of the year-on-year growth in sales and $31.8 million was due to the acquisitions. The slightly higher year-on-year copper prices had a minimal effect on sales growth. Taking out exchange rate differences and sales from acquisitions, overall sales in Europe grew organically by nearly 14 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. More specifically, our efforts to expand our presence in the electrical wire & cable market in Europe resulted in sales of $61.7 million in the quarter as compared to $37.0 million in the year ago quarter. Exclusive of $4.4 million of favorable foreign exchange effects, sales in the European electrical wire & cable market were more than 50 percent higher than the year ago quarter. "
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw an increase of $37.5 million or 49 percent in year-on-year sales, with a favorable impact of $3.0 million relating to currency exchange rate effects. Growth was again particularly strong in Asia Pacific where, for the second straight quarter, we posted year-on-year growth of approximately 80 percent," continued Grubbs.
Second Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of very strong sales growth, second quarter operating margins were 7.7 percent as compared to 7.3 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, our operating margins were 8.6 percent as compared to 8.3 percent in the year ago quarter, with sales growth producing additional operating leverage."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.6 percent as compared to 4.3 percent in the year ago quarter. This improvement in operating margins reflects the operating leverage we gained as a result of strong organic sales growth and acquisitions. Operating income in the quarter was, however, negatively impacted by $3.5 million of expenses incurred in conjunction with the consolidation of certain facilities and reductions in staff. These expenses, which will result in a favorable effect on future earnings through lower operating costs, reduced operating margins by approximately 100 basis points in the current quarter. We were again encouraged by the results in the most recent quarter as well as the near-term outlook for our business in Europe."
"Second quarter operating margins in the emerging markets were 7.7 percent as compared to 5.5 percent in the year ago quarter. Continued sales growth throughout these markets once again allowed us to leverage infrastructure costs resulting in improved operating margins" added Grubbs.
,
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the second quarter we used $30.5 million in cash to support the strong sequential sales growth of nearly 14 percent from the first to second quarter of this year. This compared to $52.5 million used in the year ago quarter, when sales growth from the first to second quarter of 2006 was approximately 16 percent," said Dennis Letham, Senior Vice President-Finance. "The cash used to support our strong sales growth is consistent with our business model, as key asset turn ratios have remained relatively unchanged from year to year."
"As a result of the increased working capital requirements associated with our strong sales growth, combined with two acquisitions completed in the first six months for a total consideration of $41.7 million and the repurchase of $162.7 million of our outstanding shares during the first quarter of 2007, our debt-to-total capital ratio at the end of the second quarter increased to 51.8 percent as compared to 45.7 percent at the end of 2006. Primarily due to the issuance of $300 million of 1% convertible notes in the first quarter of 2007, our weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.2 percent in the second quarter as compared to 5.3 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the second quarter, approximately 78 percent of our total borrowings of $1.03 billion were fixed, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging contracts. We also had $146.5 million of available, unused credit facilities at June 29, 2007, which provides us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the coming quarters."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "The record sales and earnings performance in the first half of 2007 is the result of the same underlying trends that generated record performance in 2006. If these underlying market fundamentals remain healthy, then the second half of 2007 should show continued solid growth in sales and earnings versus the second half of the prior year. We also look to make continued progress on our strategic initiatives to build our security and OEM supply businesses, add to our supply chain services offering, expand the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expand our product offering."
"A portion of the strong performance in the second quarter was driven by very strong levels of large project demand in the electrical wire & cable end market. Given the strength of the second quarter project business it is likely that the third quarter of 2007 will not generate as strong of a seasonal sales growth trend as we have seen in prior years. Nonetheless, we believe that the current market conditions will allow us to continue growing year-on-year organic sales in line with our stated goal of 8 to 12 percent."
Second Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2007 second quarter on Tuesday, July 24, 2007 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at
www.anixter.com/webcasts
. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 226 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 251 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20070913172315.txt.gz
TIME:20070913172315
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On September 11, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") promoted Robert Eck to the newly created position of Executive Vice President - Chief Operating Officer. Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 is a copy of the Companys press release, dated September 12, 2007, announcing Mr. Ecks appointment and other organization changes, including the promotion of Dennis Letham from Senior Vice President - Finance to Executive Vice President - Finance. Biographical and Other Information Regarding Mr. Eck and Mr. Letham The following biographical and other information regarding Mr. Eck and his compensatory arrangements with the Company are provided pursuant to Item 502(c)of Form 8-K. Mr. Eck, age 49, has been with the Companys operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., for 17 years in a variety of staff and commercial positions. His most recent position, held since 2004, was Executive Vice President - Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions. In this role, Mr. Eck has overs een annual sales growth specific to this end market of approximately 16 percent, including significant growth from our initiative to develop our security products business. Previous key positions include Senior Vice President - Physical Security Products and Integrated Supply (2003) and Senior Vice President - Integrated Supply Solutions (2002). In connnection with his appointment as Executive Vice President - Chief Operating Officer, Mr. Ecks base salary was increased to $450,000 and his target bonus was increased to $400,000. In addition, Mr. Eck will receive, on October 1, 2007, a long-term stock incentive valued at $850,000. The long-term stock incentive value will be delivered 50% in employee stock options and 50% in restricted stock units based on the Companys closing stock price on October 1, 2007.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated September 12, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today announced that Robert Eck has been promoted to the newly created position of Executive Vice President  Chief Operating Officer and that Dennis Letham has been promoted to the position of Executive Vice President-Finance and Chief Financial Officer.
GLENVIEW, IL, September 12, 2007 
Mr. Eck, age 49, has been with the Company's operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., for 17 years in a variety of staff and commercial positions. His most recent position, held since 2004, was Executive Vice President  Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions. In this role Eck has overseen annual sales growth specific to this end market of approximately 16 percent, including significant growth from our initiative to develop our security products business. Previous key positions include Senior Vice President  Physical Security Products and Integrated Supply (2003) and Senior Vice President  Integrated Supply Solutions (2002).
Mr. Letham, age 56, has been with Anixter for the past 14 years and has served as Senior Vice President-Finance and Chief Financial Officer for the past 12 years. During this time he has overseen the finance, accounting, tax, internal audit and legal activities of the Company.
Commenting on these appointments, Robert Grubbs, President and Chief Executive Officer, said, "The creation of the Chief Operating Officer position is a result of the Company's rapid growth over the past few years. We feel Bob Eck's strong track record at Anixter has proven that he possesses the qualities and experience necessary to support our continued success. Over the past year, Mr. Letham has taken on added responsibilities outside of the finance and accounting areas, most notably in human resources. His promotion reflects the added duties he has assumed."
Sam Zell, Chairman of the Board, said, "Over the past four years sales at Anixter have more than doubled. Included in this growth has been a series of acquisitions in the North American and European OEM Supply marketplace, which now generates in excess of $1 billion in annual sales for the company. This rapid growth and diversification of end markets has brought new organizational challenges and complexity. These executive management changes reflect the Board's desire to ensure there is sufficient depth and breadth to the management team in order for the Company to continue to execute effectively on all of its growth strategies."
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 226 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 251 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
Information set forth in this news release may contain various "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The statements can be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology such as "believe," "expects," "intends," "anticipates," "completes," "estimates," "plans," "projects," "should," "may" or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology indicating the Company's expectations or beliefs concerning future events. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include changes in supplier or customer relationships, technology changes, economic and currency risks, new or changed competitors, risks associated with inventory, commodity price fluctuations and risks associated with the integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20071002153714.txt.gz
TIME:20071002153714
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
     On September 26, 2007, Anixter International Inc.'s (the "Company") primary operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., amended its senior unsecured amended and restated revolving credit agreement, dated April 20, 2007. This amendment to the amended and restated revolving credit agreement will allow for borrowings of up to $450 million (or the equivalent in Euros) for a 5-year period ending April 2012. This represents an increase of maximum availability from a prior limit of $350 million. The pricing for this additional $100 million of borrowings under the agreement is LIBOR plus 82.5 basis points and the facility fee payable is 17.5 basis points. The pricing on the first $350 million of borrowings did not change. Other than the pricing difference, no other terms and conditions of the credit agreement changed as a result of this $100 million increase in borrowing availability.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
EXHIBIT 10.1
     THIS FIRST AMENDMENT dated as of September 26, 2007 (this "") amends the Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 20, 2007, among Anixter Inc. (""), various subsidiaries of Anixter (the ""), various financial institutions (the "") and Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ""), as Swing Line Lender and as L/C Issuer. Terms defined in the Credit Agreement are, unless otherwise defined herein or the context otherwise requires, used herein as defined therein.
Amendment
Anixter
Borrowing Subsidiaries
Lenders
Administrative Agent
     WHEREAS, Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent have entered into the Credit Agreement; and
     WHEREAS, the parties hereto desire to amend the Credit Agreement in certain respects as more fully set forth herein;
     NOW, THEREFORE, the parties hereto agree as follows:
     SECTION 1 Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows. (Text being inserted in the Credit Agreement is indicated herein by the use of an font.)
Amendments.
Section 5,
italic
     (a) Section 1.01 of the Credit Agreement is amended by (i) deleting the definition of "Increase Effective Date" therefrom and (ii) restating the following definitions to read in their entirety as follows:
     ""
Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments
means US$100,000,000, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement. The Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments are part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments. The aggregate amount of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
     ""
Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments
means US$25,000,000, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement. The Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments are part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments. The aggregate amount of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
     ""
Aggregate Commitments
means US$450,000,000, as such amount may be reduced or adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     ""
Applicable Margin
means the following percentages per annum, based upon the Debt Rating:
 
"" means, as of any date of determination, the rating as determined by either S&P, Moody's or Fitch (provided that Anixter shall have at least two such ratings and at least one of such ratings shall be from S&P or Moody's) (collectively, the "") of Anixter's non-credit-enhanced, senior unsecured long-term debt;
Debt Rating
Debt Ratings
that if the existing Debt Ratings are not the same level, then (i) if there are two Debt Ratings, the higher of such Debt Ratings shall apply (with Pricing Level 1 being the highest and Pricing Level 6 being the lowest), unless there is more than one Pricing Level between the higher Debt Rating and the lower Debt Rating, in which case, the Pricing Level that is one Pricing Level below the Pricing Level corresponding to the higher Debt Rating shall apply, and (ii) if there are three Debt Ratings not at the same level, the higher of such Debt Ratings shall apply, unless there is more than one Pricing Level between the highest Debt Rating and the lowest Debt Rating, in which case, (x) if two Debt Ratings are at the same Pricing Level and the third Debt Rating is at a lower Pricing Level, the higher Pricing Level shall apply, and (y) for all other split Debt Ratings, the Pricing Level that is one Pricing Level below the Pricing Level corresponding to the highest Debt Rating shall apply. If there are no Debt Ratings Pricing Level 6 shall apply.
provided
 
     
Initially, the Applicable Margin shall be determined based upon the Debt Rating specified in the certificate delivered pursuant to
Section 4.
01(a)(viii)
.
Thereafter, each change in the Applicable Margin resulting from a publicly announced change in the Debt Rating shall be effective, in the case of an upgrade, during the period commencing on the date of delivery by Anixter to the Administrative Agent of notice thereof pursuant to
Section 6.01(i)
and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change and, in the case of a downgrade, during the period commencing on the date of the public announcement thereof and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change.
     ""
Class
means the character of certain Loans as Committed Loans, Tranche 1 Loans, Tranche 2 Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans or Canadian Dollar Loans.
     ""
Commitment
means, as to each Lender, its Tranche 1 Commitment and/or its Tranche 2 Commitment.
     ""
Committed Borrowing
means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Tranche 1 Loans or Tranche 2 Loans, as the case may be, of the same Type and, if applicable, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Tranche 1 Lenders or the Tranche 2 Lenders, as the case may be, pursuant to
Section 2.01.
     ""
Committed Loan
means a Tranche 1 Loan or a Tranche 2 Loan.
     ""
L/C Advance
means, with respect to each Tranche 1 Lender, such Lender's funding of its participation in any L/C Borrowing in accordance with its Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share.
     ""
L/C Borrowing
means an extension of credit resulting from a drawing under any Letter of Credit which has not been reimbursed on the date when made or refinanced as a Committed Borrowing of Tranche 1 Loans.
     ""
Letter of Credit Sublimit
means an amount equal to US$20,000,000. The Letter of Credit Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments.
     ""
Swing Line Sublimit
means an amount equal to US$15,000,000. The Swing Line Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments.
     ""
Voting Percentage
means, as to any Lender, (a) at any time when the Commitments are in effect, such Lender's Pro Rata Share and (b) at any time after the termination of the Commitments, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) which (i) the sum of (A) the Outstanding Amount of such Lender's Committed Loans,
plus
(B) such Lender's Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share (if any) of the Outstanding Amount of Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations, then constitutes of (ii) the Total Outstandings;
,
provided
however,
that if any Lender has failed to fund any portion of the Committed Loans, or participations in Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances or L/C Obligations required to be funded by it hereunder, such Lender's Voting Percentage shall be deemed to be 0-, and the respective Pro Rata Shares, Tranche 1 Pro Rata Shares, Tranche 2 Pro Rata Shares and Voting Percentages of the other Lenders shall be recomputed for purposes
 
of this definition and the definition of "Required Lenders" without regard to such Lender's Commitment(s) or the outstanding amount of its Committed Loans, as the case may be.
     (b) Section 1.01 of the Credit Agreement is further amended by adding thereto the following definitions in their respective alphabetical positions:
     ""
Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments
means US$350,000,000, as such amount may be reduced or adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     ""
Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments
means US$100,000,000, as such amount may be reduced or adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     ""
First Amendment
means the First Amendment dated as of September 26, 2007 to this Agreement.
     ""
First Amendment Effective Date
means the effective date of the First Amendment.
     ""
Tranche 1 Commitment
means, as to each Tranche 1 Lender, its obligation to (a) make Tranche 1 Loans to the Borrowers pursuant to
Section 2.01 (a),
(b) purchase participations in L/C Obligations, (c) purchase participations in Swing Line Loans, (d) purchase participations in British Pound Sterling Loans and (e) purchase participations in Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances, and in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the US Dollar amount of such Tranche 1 Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on
Schedule 2.01
or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     ""
Tranche 1 Lender
means a Lender with a Tranche 1 Commitment.
     ""
Tranche 1 Loan
means a Committed Loan made by a Tranche 1 Lender under its Tranche 1 Commitment
     ""
Tranche 1 Outstandings
means at any time the aggregate outstanding principal amount (or Dollar Equivalent principal amount, as applicable) of all Tranche 1 Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans and all L/C Obligations and the Dollar Equivalent amount of the unpaid portion of the face amount of all Canadian Banker's Acceptances.
     ""
Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share
means, as to any Tranche 1 Lender, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such Tranche 1 Lender's Tranche 1 Commitment comprises of the aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments, as such share may be adjusted as contemplated herein.
     ""
Tranche 2 Commitment
means, as to each Tranche 2 Lender, its obligation to make Tranche 2 Loans to the Borrowers pursuant to
Section 2.01 (b),
and in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the US Dollar amount of such Tranche 2 Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on
Schedule 2.01
or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as
 
applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     ""
Tranche 2 Lender
means a Lender with a Tranche 2 Commitment.
     ""
Tranche 2 Loan
means a Committed Loan made by a Tranche 2 Lender under its Tranche 2 Commitment
     ""
Tranche 2 Outstandings
means at any time the aggregate outstanding principal amount (or Dollar Equivalent principal amount, as applicable) of all Tranche 2 Loans.
     ""
Tranche 2 Pro Rata Share
means, as to any Tranche 2 Lender, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such Tranche 2 Lender's Tranche 2 Commitment comprises of the aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments, as such share may be adjusted as contemplated herein.
     (c) Section 2.01 of the Credit Agreement is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
     
2.01 Committed Loans.
     
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Tranche 1 Lender severally agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") in Available Currencies to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date to the Maturity Date, in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of such Lender's Tranche 1 Commitment;
Tranche 1 Loan
provided,
however,
that after giving effect to any Committed Borrowing of Tranche 1 Loans, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (ii) the Tranche 1
Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments, and (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Tranche 1 Loans of any Lender,
plus
such Lender's Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations, shall not exceed such Lender's Tranche 1 Commitment. Within the limits of each Tranche 1 Lender's Tranche 1 Commitment, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this
Section 2.01 (a),
prepay under
Section 2.07,
and reborrow under this
Section 2.01 (a).
Tranche 1 Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
     
(b) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Tranche 2 Lender severally agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") in Available Currencies to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the First Amendment Effective Date to the Maturity Date, in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of such Lender's Tranche 2 Commitment;
Tranche 2 Loan
provided,
however,
that after giving effect to any Committed Borrowing of Tranche 2 Loans, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (ii) the Tranche 2 Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments, and (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Tranche 2 Loans of any Lender shall not exceed such Lender's Tranche 2 Commitment. Any Borrower that is a
 
Borrowing Subsidiary on the First Amendment Effective Date may borrow Tranche 2 Loans only after such Borrowing Subsidiary has delivered to the Administrative Agent with respect to the First Amendment an opinion or opinions of such Borrowing Subsidiary's counsel and evidence of the due authorization and execution of the First Amendment by such Borrowing Subsidiary and the enforceability of this Agreement as amended by the First Amendment with respect to such Borrowing Subsidiary, in each case satisfactory in form and substance to the Administrative Agent. Within the limits of each Tranche 2 Lender's Tranche 2 Commitment, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this
prepay under
Section 2.0l(b),
and reborrow under this
Section 2.07,
Tranche 2 Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
Section 2.01 (b).
     (d) Section 2.02(b) of the Credit Agreement is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
     
(b) Following receipt of a Committed Loan Notice, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of its Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share or Tranche 2 Pro Rata Share, as the case may be, of the applicable Committed Loans, and if no timely notice of a conversion or continuation is provided by a Borrower the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details of any automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans described in the preceding subsection. In the case of a Committed Borrowing, each applicable Lender shall make the amount of its Committed Loan available to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the applicable currency at the Administrative Agent's Office not later than 1:00p.m. on the Business Day specified in the applicable Committed Loan Notice. Upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in
Section 4.02
(and, if such Borrowing is the initial Credit Extension,
Section 4.01),
the Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received available to the applicable Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by (i) crediting the account of such Borrower on the books of Bank of America with the amount of such funds or (ii) wire transfer of such funds, in each case in accordance with instructions provided to the Administrative Agent by such Borrower.
     (e) Sections 2.03, 2.04, 2.05 and 2.06 of the Credit Agreement are amended so that each reference therein to a Lender, its Commitment, its Committed Loans and its Pro Rata Share shall be references to a Tranche 1 Lender, its Tranche 1 Commitment, its Tranche 1 Loans and its Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share, respectively.
     (f) Section 2.06(c)(i) of the Credit Agreement is further amended so that the sixth sentence thereof reads in its entirety as follows:
In such event, Anixter shall be deemed to have requested a Committed Borrowing of Tranche 1 Loans that are Base Rate Loans to be disbursed on the Honor Date in an amount equal to the Unreimbursed Amount, without regard to the minimum and multiples specified in for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the amount of the unutilized portion of the aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments and the conditions set forth in
Section 2.02
Section 4.02
(other than the delivery of a Committed Loan Notice).
     (g) Section 2.07(a) of the Credit Agreement is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
 
     
(a) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Tranche 1 Loans and/or Tranche 2 Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty;
provided
that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., (A) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans, and (B) on the date of prepayment of Base Rate Committed Loans; (ii) any prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans shall be in a Dollar Equivalent principal amount of US$5,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$1,000,000 in excess thereof; and (iii) any prepayment of Base Rate Committed Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$1,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment, whether Tranche 1 Loans and/or Tranche 2 Loans, and the Type(s) of Committed Loans to be prepaid. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of each such notice, and of such Lender's share of such prepayment. If such notice is given by the Borrowers, the Borrowers shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest thereon, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to
Section 3.05
.
Each such prepayment of Tranche 1 Loans shall be applied to the Tranche 1 Loans of the Tranche 1 Lenders in accordance with their respective Tranche 1 Pro Rata Shares. Each such prepayment of Tranche 2 Loans shall be applied to the Tranche 2 Loans of the Tranche 2 Lenders in accordance with their respective Tranche 2 Pro Rata Shares.
     (h) Section 2.08 of the Credit Agreement is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
     
2.08 Reduction or Termination of Commitments.
Anixter may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, terminate the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments and/or the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments, or permanently reduce the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments to an amount not less than the then Tranche 1 Outstandings, or permanently reduce the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments to an amount not less than the then Tranche 2 Outstandings;
provided
that (i) any such notice shall be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., five Business Days prior to the date of termination or reduction, and (ii) any such partial reduction shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of any such notice of reduction or termination of the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments and/or the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments. Once reduced in accordance with this Section, the Commitments may not be increased. Any reduction of the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments shall be applied to the Tranche 1 Commitment of each Tranche 1 Lender according to its Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share. Any reduction of the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments shall be applied to the Tranche 2 Commitment of each Tranche 2 Lender according to its Tranche 2 Pro Rata Share. All related facility fees accrued until the effective date of any termination of the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments or the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments shall be paid on the effective date of such termination.
     (i) Section 2.1 l(a) of the Credit Agreement is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
     
(a) 
Facility Fees
.
Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Tranche 1 Lender in accordance with its Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share, a facility fee equal to the
 
Applicable Margin
times
the actual daily amount of the Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments, regardless of usage. The facility fee in respect of the Tranche 1 Commitments shall accrue at all times from the Closing Date until the Maturity Date and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the Maturity Date. Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Tranche 2 Lender in accordance with its Tranche 2 Pro Rata Share, a facility fee equal to the Applicable Margin
times
the actual daily amount of the Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments, regardless of usage. The facility fee in respect of the Tranche 2 Commitments shall accrue at all times from the First Amendment Effective Date until the Maturity Date and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the First Amendment Effective Date, and on the Maturity Date. The facility fees shall be calculated quarterly in arrears, and if there is any change in the Applicable Margin during any quarter, the actual daily amount shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Margin separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Margin was in effect. The facility fees shall accrue at all times, including at any time during which one or more of the conditions in
Article IV
is not met.
     (j) The Credit Agreement is further amended by deleting the text of Section 2.18 of the Credit Agreement and replacing it with
"[Reserved]".
     (k) The last sentence of Section 2.20(f) of the Credit Agreement is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
In addition, on the Scheduled Maturity Date of each Non-Extending Lender, the Borrowers shall prepay any Committed Loans outstanding on such date (and pay any additional amounts required pursuant to
Section 3.05)
to the extent necessary to keep outstanding Tranche 1 Loans and Tranche 2 Loans ratable with any revised Tranche 1 Pro Rata Shares and/or Tranche 2 Pro Rata Shares, as the case may be, of the respective Lenders effective as of such date.
     (l) The Credit Agreement is further amended so that Schedule 2.01 thereto and Exhibit A-l thereto read in their entirety in the respective forms attached to this Amendment.
     SECTION 2 [RESERVED]
     SECTION 3 . By its signature hereto each Guarantor ratifies and confirms the provisions of the Guaranty with respect to all Tranche 2 Loans made by any Lender to the Borrowers.
Reaffirmation of Guaranty
     SECTION 4 . Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that, after giving effect to the effectiveness of this Amendment, (a) each warranty set forth in Article V of the Credit Agreement is true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent that such warranty specifically refers to an earlier date, and (b) no Default or Event of Default exists.
Warranties
     SECTION 5 . The amendments set forth in above shall become effective when the Administrative Agent shall have received all of the following (provided that the following are received on or before September 28, 2007): (i)
Effectiveness of Amendment
Section 1
 
counterparts of this Amendment executed by Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Guarantors, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent; (ii) all documents as shall reasonably demonstrate the corporate power and authority of the Loan Parties organized under the laws of a U.S. state to enter into, and the validity with respect to such Loan Parties of, this Amendment and the other Loan Documents and any other matters relevant hereto (including opinions of counsel), all in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and (iii) any governmental and third party approvals necessary or advisable in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Amendment by the Loan Parties.
     SECTION 6 .
Miscellaneous
     6.1 . As herein amended, the Credit Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and is hereby ratified and confirmed in all respects. After the effectiveness of this Amendment, all references in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents to "Credit Agreement" or similar terms shall refer to the Credit Agreement as amended hereby.
Continuing Effectiveness, etc
     6.2 . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by the different parties on separate counterparts, and each such counterpart shall be deemed to be an original but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same Amendment.
Counterparts
     6.3 . This Amendment shall be a contract made under and governed by the laws of the State of Illinois.
Governing Law
     6.4 . This Amendment shall be binding upon Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Guarantors, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent and the respective successors and assigns of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent.
Successors and Assigns
 
     Delivered as of the day and year first above written.
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
First Amendment
 
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
EXHIBIT A-l
Date: ,
                    
                    
To: Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
     The undersigned hereby requests (select one):
 A Borrowing of Tranche 1 Loans
o
 A conversion or continuation of Tranche 1 Loans
o
 A Borrowing of Tranche 2 Loans
o
 A conversion or continuation of Tranche 2 Loans
o
     1. On (a Business Day).
                    
     2. In the amount of [US$]. [Euro]
                    
                    
     3. Comprised of . [Type of Committed Loan requested]
                    
     4. For Eurocurrency Rate Loans: with an Interest Period of months.
                    
     [The Committed Borrowing requested herein complies with the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement (in the case of Tranche 1 Loans) or the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement (in the case of Tranche 2 Loans).]
Section 2.01(a)
Section 2.01(b)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20071024112610.txt.gz
TIME:20071024112610
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 23, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended September 28, 2007. The Companys press release, dated October 23, 2007, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated October 23, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended September 28, 2007.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 23, 2007 
Third Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, stated, "The 14 percent sales growth generated in the current quarter was particularly encouraging in light of the significant economic uncertainty that existed during the quarter, especially relating to the difficult credit environment in the U.S., our largest market. Our growth reflects the fact that we continued to see strong growth in most major geographies and end markets that we serve on a global basis. Based on our results through the first nine months we are in a good position to have another record setting year of sales and earnings."
Third Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended September 28, 2007, sales of $1.52 billion produced net income of $64.8 million, or $1.51 per diluted share. Included in the current year's third quarter results were sales of $31.7 million from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year. In the prior year period, sales of $1.33 billion generated net income of $76.2 million, or $1.76 per diluted share.
The third quarter 2006 results included $22.8 million, or 53 cents per diluted share, of income primarily associated with a refund received from the Internal Revenue Service. Excluding the refund from the prior year third quarter, net income in the current quarter increased 21 percent. This refund resulted from the final settlement of income taxes covering the period of 1996 through 1998. The interest income portion of this settlement of $7.7 million (after-tax impact of $4.7 million) was reflected on the Other, net' line of the prior year quarter's income statement. The remaining portion of the settlement was recorded as an $18.1 million reduction to the 2006 third quarter tax provision.
Operating income in the third quarter increased 23 percent to $118.2 million as compared to $96.1 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were a record 7.8 percent compared to 7.2 percent in the third quarter of 2006.
First Nine Month Results
For the nine-month period ended September 28, 2007, sales of $4.36 billion produced net income of $183.0 million, or $4.32 per diluted share. Included in the 2007 nine-month results were sales of $105.0 million from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year. Net income in the first nine months of 2007 also includes a $2.1 million gain, or 5 cents per diluted share, primarily from the settlement of certain income tax audits occurring during the first six months of this year. In the prior year period, sales of $3.64 billion produced net income of $156.9 million or $3.66 per diluted share. These results are inclusive of the above-discussed third quarter 2006 income tax settlement that added $22.8 million or 53 cents per diluted share to the year ago results.
Operating income in the first nine months of fiscal 2007 increased by 32 percent to $324.7 million as compared to $246.7 million in the year ago period. Operating margins in the first nine months of 2007 were 7.4 percent as compared to 6.8 percent in the prior year period.
Recent Sales Trends
Commenting on recent sales trends, Grubbs said, "Third quarter sales growth was very much in line with the expectation we laid out when we reported our second quarter results. After adjusting for a series of acquisitions completed in the past year, as well as for the favorable foreign exchange impact of $35.9 million on third quarter 2007 sales, our third quarter sales grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 9 percent. Once again we want to highlight that the consecutive quarter growth trend for the second quarter exceeded normal historical growth patterns. We cautioned that as a result of this, consecutive quarter growth from the second to third quarter would likely be below normal historical patterns, which it was. Looking at the second and third quarters together, we see a growth pattern that in total through the first nine months was similar to historical patterns."
Grubbs continued, "Sales growth in the current quarter was especially positive in light of the economic uncertainty that existed throughout much of the quarter, particularly in the U.S. Once again the diversity of the end markets and geographies that we serve, and the fact that a majority of these markets performed well, contributed to good overall performance. The factors driving our organic growth were consistent with those we have seen during the past couple of years. In the most recent quarter, we again experienced good levels of larger project business, together with solid day-to-day trends throughout all parts of the business. At the same time, we have continued to experience strong growth in the security and OEM markets. Copper prices had no meaningful impact on our organic growth in the most recent quarter as year-on-year price fluctuations stabilized. Market-based copper prices averaged approximately $3.48 per pound during the quarter compared to $3.54 per pound in the year ago third quarter."
"In North America we saw year-over-year sales grow by 8 percent to $1.07 billion in the most recent quarter," commented Grubbs. "Foreign exchange rates generated an additional $11.4 million in third quarter sales as compared to the year ago quarter. During the quarter we saw a few project timing issues that pushed out some business that we thought would finalize in the third quarter to future dates. This delayed project timing, however, was primarily confined to western Canada, where a very strong economy and a concurrent tight labor market are causing project construction timelines to slip. Thus, the market is good and we remain confident in the overall probability of these sales. At the same time we experienced very solid new order flows in North America, particularly in the enterprise cabling and security solutions market."
Grubbs went on to say, "In Europe, we saw sales climb by 32 percent, or an increase of $77.5 million, versus the year ago quarter, of which $21.0 million was due to exchange rate differences and $31.7 million was due to acquisitions. Taking out exchange rate differences and sales from acquisitions, overall sales in Europe grew organically by approximately 10 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. More specifically, our efforts to expand our presence in the electrical wire & cable market in Europe resulted in sales of $55.9 million in the quarter as compared to $42.3 million in the year ago quarter. Excluding $4.0 million of favorable foreign exchange effects, sales in the European electrical wire & cable market were approximately 23 percent higher than the year ago quarter. "
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 38 percent increase in year-on-year sales, including a favorable impact of $3.5 million relating to currency exchange rate effects. Growth was again particularly strong in Asia Pacific, where we posted year-on-year growth of approximately 65 percent," continued Grubbs.
Third Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of solid sales growth, third quarter operating margins were 7.8 percent as compared to 7.2 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, our operating margins were 8.6 percent as compared to 7.8 percent in the year ago quarter, with sales growth again producing additional operating leverage."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.9 percent as compared to 5.0 percent in the year ago quarter. This slight decline in operating margins reflects a drop in gross margins as we realized less benefit from copper price volatility than we did in the year ago quarter. Overall, we were again encouraged by the results in the most recent quarter as well as the near-term outlook for our business in Europe."
"Third quarter operating margins in the emerging markets were 7.8 percent as compared to 6.9 percent in the year ago quarter. Continued sales growth throughout these markets once again allowed us to leverage infrastructure costs that resulted in improved operating margins" added Grubbs.
,
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the third quarter we generated $10.0 million in cash from operations as compared to $17.4 million used in operations in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "The positive cash flow in the quarter reflects the slower consecutive growth rates we discussed above and the related effects of that on additional working capital needs."
"Increased working capital requirements associated with our year-on-year sales growth, combined with two acquisitions completed in the first nine months for total consideration of $41.7 million and the repurchase of $162.7 million of our outstanding shares during the first quarter of 2007, have increased our debt-to-total capital ratio. At the end of the third quarter that ratio was 49.6 percent as compared to 45.7 percent at the end of 2006. For the third quarter our weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.3 percent as compared to 5.5 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the third quarter, approximately 78 percent of our total borrowings of $1.03 billion had fixed interest rates, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging contracts. We also had $246.9 million of available, unused credit facilities at September 28, 2007, which provide us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the coming quarters."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "The record sales and earnings performance in the first nine months of 2007 is the result of many of the same underlying trends that generated record performances over the past couple of years. Assuming no significant deterioration in the economy during the final months of 2007, we will again have a record-setting year for sales, earnings and return on equity. That said, we do expect that fourth quarter sales and earnings, consistent with historical patterns for the fourth quarter, will show a modest decline from the results we reported for the recently completed third quarter. This projected decline is exclusively based on the fact that there are fewer working days in the fourth quarter due to the Thanksgiving and Christmas holidays."
"As we look to the start of a new year, we remain focused on building on our strategic initiatives of growing our security and OEM supply businesses, adding to our supply chain services offering, enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expanding our product offering," said Grubbs. "There is no question that the uncertainties that have developed in the credit markets in the past couple of months have introduced an element of risk in evaluating future growth. Nonetheless, if we continue to be successful with our strategic initiatives we will be in a position to continue to drive solid sales and earnings growth as we head into 2008."
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2007 third quarter on Tuesday, October 23, 2007 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at
www.anixter.com/webcasts
. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 221 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 250 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20071105110358.txt.gz
TIME:20071105110358
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On November 2, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed prior to the end of the first quarter of 2007. The Company currently has approximately 37.5 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated November 2, 2007, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits Press Release, dated November 2, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed prior to the end of the first quarter of 2007.
Glenview, IL., November 2, 2007 
Anixter currently has approximately 37.5 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 221 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 250 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20071128102018.txt.gz
TIME:20071128102018
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On November 27, 2007, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that this program is in addition to all previously announced share repurchase programs that have been completed, including the one announced on November 2, 2007. The Company currently has approximately 36.4 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated November 27, 2007, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated November 27, 2007, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that this program is in addition to all previously announced share repurchase programs that have been completed, including the one announced on November 2, 2007.
Glenview, IL, November 27, 2007 
Anixter currently has approximately 36.4 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 350,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 221 warehouses with more than 5.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 250 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080131092941.txt.gz
TIME:20080131092941
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 29, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 28, 2007. The Companys press release, dated January 29, 2008, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated January 29, 2008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended December 28, 2007.
GLENVIEW, IL, January 29, 2008 
Fourth Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, stated, "We are very pleased with the strong financial results in the quarter and the year. Our success in expanding our product and supply chain offering, along with an intense focus on broadening and diversifying our global customer base, drove record sales, operating margins and net income in 2007. We enter 2008 confident in our ability to continue executing on our growth strategies including further expanding our customer base as well as growing with our existing customers."
Fourth Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended December 28, 2007, sales of $1.49 billion produced net income of $70.5 million, or $1.69 per diluted share. Included in the current year's fourth quarter results was $20.5 million of incremental sales from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange impact of $50.5 million, fourth quarter sales grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 9 percent. Also included in the fourth quarter results was a benefit of $9.7 million, or 23 cents per diluted share, of net income primarily related to foreign tax benefits and the finalization of prior year's tax returns. Exclusive of these tax related items, net income was $60.8 million or $1.46 per diluted share.
In the prior year period, sales of $1.30 billion generated net income of $52.4 million, or $1.20 per diluted share. The fourth quarter 2006 results include $4.2 million, or 10 cents per diluted share, of net income primarily related to tax benefits for foreign operations. Included in the net income associated with these tax benefits is $0.8 million of interest expense that is reflected as a part of the other, net line in the accompanying income statement. Exclusive of these tax benefits, net income was $48.2 million or $1.10 per diluted share.
Operating income in the fourth quarter increased 27 percent to $114.4 million as compared to $90.4 million in the year ago quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 7.7 percent compared to 7.0 percent in the fourth quarter of 2006.
Twelve Month Results
For the twelve-month period ended December 28, 2007, sales of $5.85 billion produced net income of $253.5 million, or $6.00 per diluted share. The 2007 results include incremental sales of $125.5 million from a series of acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange impact of $139.3 million, full year sales grew at a year-on-year organic rate of 13 percent. Net income in 2007 also includes $11.8 million, or 28 cents per diluted share, primarily related to foreign tax benefits and the finalization of prior year's tax returns. Exclusive of these tax benefits, net income was $241.7 million or $5.73 per diluted share.
In the prior year period, sales of $4.94 billion produced net income of $209.3 million or $4.86 per diluted share. In addition to the previously discussed tax benefits recorded in the prior year's fourth quarter associated with the company's foreign operations, the 2006 twelve-month results include $22.8 million, or 53 cents per diluted share, of income primarily associated with a refund from the U.S. Internal Revenue ("IRS"). This refund was the result of the final settlement of income taxes covering the period of 1996 through 1998. The interest income portion of this settlement of $7.7 million (after-tax impact of $4.7 million) is reflected on the income statement in the other, net line. The remaining portion of the settlement is recorded as an $18.1 million reduction to the tax provision. Excluding the tax benefits and the favorable tax settlements, net income was $182.3 million or $4.23 per diluted share.
Operating income in fiscal 2007 increased by 30 percent to $439.1 million as compared to $337.1 million in the prior fiscal year. Operating margins in 2007 were 7.5 percent as compared to 6.8 percent in the prior year.
Recent Sales Trends
Commenting on recent sales trends, Grubbs said, "Sales growth in the quarter was again fairly broad based. The breadth and diversity of the end markets we serve, along with our unique ability to provide global support to those customers, continues to drive new customer acquisition and expand our role with existing customers. At the same time, we have continued to experience strong growth from our strategic initiatives in the security and OEM markets. Copper prices had no meaningful impact on our organic growth in the most recent quarter as year-on-year price fluctuations stabilized. Market-based copper prices averaged approximately $3.26 per pound during the quarter compared to $3.20 per pound in the year ago fourth quarter."
"In North America we saw year-over-year sales grow by 13 percent to $1.04 billion in the most recent quarter," commented Grubbs. "Foreign exchange rate differences contributed $23.1 million to fourth quarter sales as compared to the year ago quarter. Excluding foreign exchange effects, sales in North America grew at an organic rate of 11 percent in the fourth quarter versus the prior year. During the quarter we also continued to experience very solid new order flow in North America. We enter 2008 with a solid backlog of orders and a healthy pipeline of potential new projects and customers."
Grubbs continued, "In Europe, we saw sales climb by 16 percent, or an increase of $45.3 million, versus the year ago quarter, of which $23.9 million was due to exchange rate differences and $20.5 million was due to acquisitions. Taking out exchange rate differences and sales from acquisitions, overall sales in Europe were flat as compared to unusually strong sales results in the year ago quarter. We continue to be encouraged by our growing presence in Europe and, similar to North America, we enter 2008 with a solid backlog and healthy pipeline of potential new projects and customers. "
"In the emerging markets of Latin America and Asia Pacific, we saw a 27 percent increase in year-on-year sales to $131.4 million, including a favorable impact of $3.5 million relating to currency exchange rate effects. Growth was strong in both Asia Pacific and Latin America regions," continued Grubbs. "Like our business in the rest of the world, we enter 2008 well positioned to report continued growth in the emerging markets."
Fourth Quarter Operating Results
"As a result of solid sales growth, fourth quarter operating margins were 7.7 percent as compared to 7.0 percent in the year ago period," said Grubbs. "In North America, our operating margins were 8.6 percent as compared to 8.2 percent in the year ago quarter, with sales growth again producing additional operating leverage."
Grubbs added, "In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.9 percent as compared to 2.6 percent in the year ago quarter. This improvement in operating margins reflects improved gross margins and operating expense leverage including the fact that the prior year quarter included $1.3 million of expenses associated with certain facility consolidations and pension plan restructuring costs. We were again encouraged by the results in the most recent quarter as operating profits more than doubled. Our investments in this market in the past couple of years combined with our recent success in organically growing this business enables us to feel positive about the outlook for our business in Europe."
"Fourth quarter operating margins in the emerging markets were 6.8 percent as compared to 7.2 percent in the year ago quarter as a result of further investment in personnel and infrastructure to support future growth," added Grubbs.
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the fourth quarter we generated $92.9 million in cash from operations, up significantly compared to the $17.0 million generated in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "The positive cash flow in the quarter reflects the normal seasonal patterns associated with the previously discussed slight drop in consecutive quarter sales due to the number of holidays in the fourth quarter and the related effects on working capital needs."
"During the fourth quarter the company repurchased 1,250,000 of its outstanding shares at a total cost of $82.1 million. When combined with the 3,000,000 shares repurchased during the first quarter of 2007 for $162.7 million, the company repurchased 4,250,000, or 10.8 percent of the outstanding shares it had at the start of 2007, for a total consideration of $244.8 million or an average of $57.61 per share," continued Letham.
Letham added, "Working capital requirements associated with our year-on-year sales growth consumed $139.8 million of cash during 2007. The company also completed two acquisitions for total consideration of $35.2 million. The share repurchases, added working capital requirements and acquisition costs were financed from a combination of a $300 million convertible bond offering completed in the first quarter of 2007 and added borrowings under bank lines of credit. The company ended 2007 with a debt-to-total capital ratio of 49.4 percent as compared to 45.7 percent at the end of 2006. For the fourth quarter the weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.3 percent as compared to 5.4 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the fourth quarter, approximately 77 percent of our total borrowings of $1.02 billion had fixed interest rates, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedge contracts. We also had $243 million of available, unused credit facilities at December 28, 2007, which provide us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, in the new year."
Business Outlook
Grubbs concluded, "The record sales and earnings performance in 2007 was the result of many of the same underlying trends that generated record performances over the past couple of years, especially as relates to expansion of our customer base. While 2008 begins with a well publicized, less certain overall economic environment than 2007, recent activity levels suggest the end markets we serve have remained strong and we are comfortable they will continue to present opportunities for growth in the coming year. As we look to the start of a new year, we remain focused on building on our strategic initiatives of growing our security and OEM supply businesses, initiating an industrial automation network sales effort, adding to our supply chain services offering, enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expanding our product offering. We believe that if we continue to successfully execute our strategic initiatives to grow our product and service offerings and expand our customer base, we can drive solid sales and earnings growth in 2008."
Fourth Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2007 fourth quarter on Tuesday, January 29, 2008 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at
www.anixter.com/webcasts
. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 220 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 249 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080225131728.txt.gz
TIME:20080225131728
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
     On February 25, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced that Robert W. Grubbs will retire as President and Chief Executive Officer at the end of June 2008, following a 30-year career with the company. Mr. Grubbs, who has held those posts since 1998, will continue to serve on the company's Board of Directors. The Company also announced that, effective July 1, 2008, Robert J. Eck, age 49, will become President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Eck, has served as the company's Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer since September 2007.
     For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated February 25, 2008, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Exhibits
     99.1 Press Release, dated February 25, 20008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
February 25, 2008  Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced that Robert W. Grubbs will retire as President and Chief Executive Officer at the end of June 2008, following a 30-year career with the company. Mr. Grubbs, who has held those posts since 1998, will continue to serve on the company's Board of Directors.
GLENVIEW, IL,
Effective July 1, 2008, Robert J. Eck will become President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Eck, age 49, has served as the company's Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer since September 2007. During the last 17 years, Mr. Eck has served in a variety of senior management positions with Anixter Inc., the company's operating subsidiary, most recently as Executive Vice President  Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions (2004-2007) and Senior Vice President  Physical Security Products and Integrated Supply (2003).
Commenting on the transition, Sam Zell, Chairman of the Board, said, "During Bob Grubbs' tenure the company has seen tremendous growth in sales, profitability and shareholder returns. Under his leadership, the company has successfully evolved into one of the world's truly global distribution businesses. We are especially pleased that Bob will continue to serve on our Board of Directors, allowing Anixter to continue benefiting from his many years of company and industry experience."
In discussing his upcoming retirement, Mr. Grubbs said, "During my 30 years at Anixter the company has gone through an incredible amount of change and I have a real sense of pride in what the company's leadership team has accomplished during my tenure as CEO. The company is well positioned for the future and I look forward to continuing to contribute to the future success of the company as a member of the Board of Directors."
Mr. Zell continued, "The company has worked hard over the years to successfully develop future leaders who could continue to drive the ongoing growth and success of our business. Bob Eck brings many years of increasing responsibilities and successful leadership to his new role at Anixter. The Board of Directors has confidence that, under Bob Eck's leadership, the company can continue its consistent track record of driving strong growth and shareholder returns."
"I am honored to have the opportunity to lead the company and further build on its past successes," commented Eck. "Our priorities as a company will continue to center around building on our strategic initiatives of growing our customer base, expanding our product and service offerings and enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable and OEM supply businesses. I am very excited about the future and the opportunities that lie ahead for Anixter."
 
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 220 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 249 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080422154453.txt.gz
TIME:20080422154453
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 22, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended March 28, 2008. The Companys press release, dated April 22, 2008, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated April 22, 2008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended March 28, 2008.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 22, 2008 
First Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Grubbs, President and CEO, stated, "We are very pleased to report double digit increases in sales, operating profits and earnings per diluted share over the prior year quarter. The multiple end markets we serve, the diversity of industries in which our customers operate and the broad geographies over which our business is conducted have given us the ability to sustain overall growth despite certain economic concerns. We believe the diversity and depth of our business will continue to work to our shareholders' benefit regardless of broader economic conditions."
First Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended March 28, 2008, sales of $1.47 billion produced net income of $57.7 million, or $1.45 per diluted share. Included in the current year's first quarter results were sales of $12.3 million from acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions as well as the favorable foreign exchange impact of $43.5 million, first quarter sales grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 7 percent. Net income in the current quarter includes a gain of $1.6 million, or 4 cents per diluted share, related to foreign tax benefits associated with the recognition of net operating loss carryforwards. Exclusive of these tax benefits, net income was $56.1 million or $1.41 per diluted share.
In the prior year period, sales of $1.33 billion generated net income of $53.6 million, or $1.27 per diluted share. The first quarter 2007 results included a gain of $3.4 million, or 8 cents per diluted share, of net income related to the settlement of certain income tax audits. Exclusive of this gain, net income was $50.2 million or $1.19 per diluted share.
Operating income in the first quarter increased 12 percent to $101.5 million as compared to $90.4 million in the year ago quarter. For the current quarter, operating margins were 6.9 percent compared to 6.8 percent in the first quarter of 2007.
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Bob Eck, Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer said, "After more than two years in which sales growth was consistently broad based over the various customer end markets and geographies we serve, the first quarter of 2008 exhibited more divergent growth rates. Also, as compared to the year ago first quarter, the first quarter of 2008 reflects an unfavorable impact from holidays due to the timing of the New Year and Easter. Importantly, we continued to make significant progress on our major initiatives during the quarter, including growing in new markets. Our efforts to expand the company's presence in the security market took another encouraging step forward in the first quarter as year-on-year sales rose 34 percent. In the electrical wire & cable market our initiative to expand our presence in Europe made very good progress with year-on-year sales growth of 45 percent."
"In North America we saw sales grow by 10 percent to $1.02 billion in the quarter," continued Eck. "Foreign exchange contributed $21.7 million to first quarter sales as compared to the year ago quarter. Excluding the effects of foreign exchange, sales grew at an organic rate of 7 percent. With an 18 percent increase versus the year ago quarter, sales growth was highest in the electrical wire & cable market, due to continued strong levels of project activity. While spot market copper prices in the first quarter were up approximately 30 percent from the year ago period, they did not have a meaningful effect on sales growth due to the competitive market conditions in a softer economy that limited the amount of price increases that were actually achieved in the marketplace. Sales in the OEM supply end market were up 9 percent with continued strong growth in the aerospace and defense market. Lastly, enterprise cabling and security sales were up a combined 5 percent year-on-year in North America."
"Total European sales rose 11 percent versus the year ago quarter to $340.0 million. European sales were aided by favorable foreign exchange and acquisitions, which added $17.8 million and $12.3 million, respectively, to first quarter 2008 sales," Eck said. "Sales growth in Europe was highest in the electrical wire & cable market, where we reported a 45 percent year-on-year increase. In the OEM supply market sales grew $22.4 million or 16 percent, including the $12.3 million of sales associated with acquisitions. Sales in the enterprise cabling and security market fell by 7 percent primarily due the timing of holidays and lower project volumes, particularly in the U.K. market where the year ago first quarter had exceptionally strong project activity."
Eck added, "In the emerging markets sales grew by $18.2 million or 19 percent including $4.0 million of favorable effects related to foreign exchange rates. The lower growth rates that posted in recent quarters was largely a result of slower project growth in Asia."
First Quarter Operating Results
"First quarter operating margins were 6.9 percent compared to 6.8 percent in the year ago quarter," commented Eck. "While sales were up 11 percent, organic growth was 7 percent. As compared to the first quarter of last year, gross margins experienced some pressure in the electrical wire & cable market on a global basis and in the OEM supply market in Europe. At the same time, we have continued to invest in people to drive our initiatives of expanding our security business, the global reach of the electrical wire & cable business and our initial efforts in the factory automation market. Some of the factors pressuring gross margins in the first quarter are being mitigated through pricing actions. When combined with seasonal pick-ups in sales volumes, which should improve operating leverage, we anticipate higher operating margins during the year."
Eck continued, "In North America, our operating margins were 7.9 percent as compared to 7.6 percent in the year ago quarter, as sales growth and good expense control offset slightly lower gross margins to generate additional operating leverage. In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 4.1 percent as compared to 4.6 percent in the year ago quarter. This decline in operating margins is largely within the OEM supply business. The lower OEM supply operating margins reflect a combination of lower gross margins, costs associated with the closing of one facility, increased costs associated with preparations for business IT system conversions starting in 2009 and costs for development of expanded Asian product sourcing capabilities. In the emerging markets, continued sales growth has increased operating leverage and produced operating margins of 6.1 percent in the first quarter of this year compared to 5.7 percent in the year ago period."
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the first quarter we generated $55.4 million in cash from operations as compared to the $65.8 million generated in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Chief Financial Officer. "A significant portion of the first quarter cash flow from operations was used to repurchase 750,000 of the company's outstanding shares at a cost of $41.7 million."
Letham added, "At the end of the first quarter the company had a debt-to-total capital ratio of 49.2 percent as compared to 49.4 percent at the end of 2007. Furthermore, for the first quarter the weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.2 percent as compared to 4.8 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the first quarter, approximately 75 percent of our total borrowings of $1.04 billion had fixed interest rates, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging contracts. We also had $242 million of available, unused credit facilities at March 28, 2008, which provide us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic alternatives, such as acquisitions, throughout the remainder of the year."
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "While there were a number of customer-specific situations where spending was reduced in response to slower economic conditions, we do not believe this represents a broader trend. Overall, we are encouraged by the fact that our backlog grew slightly during the first quarter and activity levels show the prospect for continued year-on-year sales growth. It should be noted that in 2007 we experienced unusually strong 14 percent consecutive quarter growth between the first and second quarter that was more than twice historical seasonal patterns and leaves us with a difficult year-on-year comparison for the upcoming second quarter. Nonetheless, we expect to report not only consecutive quarter sales growth in the second quarter, but also year-on-year sales growth over the very strong second quarter of 2007."
"We remain focused on building on our strategic initiatives including growing our security and OEM supply businesses, initiating an industrial automation network sales effort, adding to our supply chain services offering, enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expanding our product offering. Short-term macro-economic conditions may slow our organic sales growth from the rates of the past couple of years, which when combined with the investment in these initiatives may limit near-term earnings growth. We believe, however, that continued focus, investment and successful execution on these strategies will drive full-year and longer-term growth and profitability of the business."
First Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2008 first quarter on Tuesday, April 22, 2008 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at
www.anixter.com/webcasts
. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 218 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 249 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080502161552.txt.gz
TIME:20080502161552
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On May 2, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed prior to the end of the first quarter of 2008. The Company currently has approximately 35.7 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated May 2, 2008, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated May 2, 2008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION:
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed prior to the end of the first quarter of 2008.
Glenview, IL., May 2, 2008 
Anixter currently has approximately 35.7 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 218 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 249 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080519165510.txt.gz
TIME:20080519165510
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On May 19, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced that it has modified certain terms and conditions of the employment contract between the Company and Robert W. Grubbs, its President and Chief Executive Officer who will be retiring at the end of June 2008. The new agreement amends and extends the existing provisions concerning noncompetition and nonsolicitation from the previously contracted 2 years to the longer of five years beyond his retirement or two years beyond his retirement from service on the Companys Board of Directors. In exchange, the Company has agreed that the stock options and restricted stock units currently held by Mr. Grubbs will remain outstanding and continue to vest in accordance with the expiration and vesting terms under which they were granted. Without this revision, the subject stock options and restricted stock units would have expired or terminated within 90 days of Mr. Grubbs retirement. As a result of this revision to the original te rms of the grants, the company will record a noncash, pre-tax charge to earnings in the second quarter of approximately $4.2 million, or $0.07 cents per diluted share. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated May 19, 2008, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference, as well as the Separation Agreement ("Agreement"), dated May 13, 2008, by and between the Companys primary operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., and Robert W. Grubbs, Jr. The Company is also a party to the Agreement, but solely for the purpose of Sections 4 and 5 of the Agreement, which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 10.1 Separation Agreement, dated May 13, 2008, by and between Anixter Inc., and Robert W. Grubbs, Jr. 99.1 Press Release, dated May 19, 2008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 10.1
This Separation Agreement ("Agreement") is made and entered into this 13 day of May, 2008, by and between Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Company"), and Robert W. Grubbs, Jr. ("Executive"). Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Parent"), is also a party to this Agreement, but solely for the purpose of Sections 4 and 5 hereof.
th
A. Executive is currently employed by Company as its Chief Executive Officer and holds the same office with respect to Parent pursuant to the terms of that certain Employment Agreement, dated as of January 1, 2006 ("Employment Agreement").
B. Executive has advised Company of his intention to retire from the Company, Parent and all affiliates of Company or Parent effective as of June 30, 2008 ("Effective Date").
C. Company and Parent have determined that it is in their best interests to provide for Executive's continued involvement as a member of the Board of Directors of Parent following his retirement and desire to revise the provisions of certain post-employment covenants applicable to Executive and Executive is willing to continue to serve on the Parent's Board of Directors and to agree to the revisions to his post-employment covenants pursuant to the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises and the promises and covenants herein, the parties hereby agree as follows:
1. . Executive shall voluntarily resign as the Chief Executive Officer of Company and Parent and all other employment related positions with the Company and Parent or any and all affiliates, and shall cease to be an officer or employee of the Company and Parent and any and all affiliates, effective as of the close of business on the Effective Date. Executive's employment shall be deemed to have terminated pursuant to Section 6(a) of the Employment Agreement. From and after the Effective Date, Executive shall not be eligible to participate in any employee benefit plans, programs or arrangements sponsored and maintained by the Company (other than as expressly required by COBRA or other applicable law) and shall not accrue further benefits under the Anixter Inc. Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan from and after the Effective Date.
Termination of Employment Relationship
2. . Simultaneous with the execution of this Agreement, Executive shall execute and deliver to the Company the form of release attached as to the Employment Agreement.
Release
Exhibit A
3. . Executive hereby acknowledges and agrees that his obligations under Sections 7 through 11 of the Employment Agreement shall survive the termination of his employment. Executive further agrees that:
Post-Employment Covenants and Undertakings
(a) He shall continue to abide by and be subject to the restrictions provided in Section 8 of the Employment Agreement until the later of (i) the fifth anniversary of the Termination Date or (ii) the second anniversary of the termination of his service as a member of the Parent's Board of Directors ("Extended Covenant Term"); and
(b) He shall provide assistance to the Company consistent with Section 11 of the Employment Agreement for a period of five years after the Termination Date without additional compensation; and
(c) He will not during the Extended Covenant Term, directly or indirectly, render services, in any capacity, including but not by way of limitation, as an employee, agent, consultant, director, lender, or owner, to any entity whose products are currently distributed by the Company as part of the conduct of the Business or are distributed by the Company at any time during the Extended Covenant Term; and
(d) The provisions of Section 7 of the Employment Agreement shall continue to apply with respect to all Proprietary Information to which he has access in his capacity as a member of the Board of Directors.
4. . Following the Effective Date, Executive agrees to continue to serve as a member of Parent's Board of Directors through the fifth anniversary of the Effective Date, subject to his nomination and election to the Board of Directors following the expiration of his current and any subsequent terms as a director. Executive shall be entitled to receive compensation for his post-Effective Date service as a Director in accordance with the Company's director compensation policy as in effect from time to time.
Continued Board Service
5. . In consideration of the agreements and undertakings of Executive hereunder, Parent and Executive agree that the option and restricted stock unit grant agreements entered into by Executive and Parent under the Anixter International, Inc. 2001 Stock Incentive Plan and the Anixter International Inc. 2006 Stock Incentive Plan listed on are each hereby amended as follows:
Changes In Equity Rights
Exhibit A
(a) To the extent that Executive holds vested and unexercised options on the Termination Date, notwithstanding the terms of the applicable grant agreement, Executive shall be allowed to exercise such options at any time prior to the date such options would otherwise expire if not exercised.
(b) To the extent that Executive holds non-vested options on the Termination Date, notwithstanding the terms of the applicable grant agreements, such options shall continue to vest in accordance with their terms following the termination of Executive's employment and once vested Executive shall be allowed to exercise such options at any time prior to the date such options would otherwise expire if not exercised.
(c) To the extent that Executive has non-vested restricted stock units on the Termination Date, notwithstanding the terms of the applicable grant agreements, such units shall continue to vest in accordance with their terms notwithstanding the termination of Executive's employment and shall be converted into shares upon vesting in accordance with the terms of the applicable grant agreements.
(d) In the event of Executive's Death within twenty-four (24) months of the Effective Date, (i) Executive's designated beneficiary, or his estate in the absence of a valid designation, shall be allowed to exercise vested options during the shorter of the remaining option term or the twelve months following Executive's death and (ii) restricted stock units shall continue to convert in accordance with their terms during the twelve month period following Executive's death.. In the event of Executive's death thereafter, Executive's designated beneficiary, or his estate in the absence of such designation, shall be allowed to exercise such options and to receive shares of Company common stock upon the conversion of restricted stock rights on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as would have applied to Executive if he was not deceased.
(e) In the event that Executive engages in any conduct during the Extended Covenant Term that constitutes a material violation of any of Sections 7, 8, 9, 10 or 11 of the Employment Agreement or Section 3 of this Agreement, then:
(i) all unexercised options held by Executive, whether or not vested, shall terminate, be forfeited, and cease to be exercisable by Executive;
(ii) all unconverted restricted stock units held by Executive shall terminate and shall be forfeited and shall not convert into shares of the Company's common stock; and
(iii) Executive shall be obligated to pay to the Company, in cash, an amount equal to the sum of (A) the Financial Gain realized by Executive with respect to all options and restricted stock units amended by this Agreement from and after the Effective Date and (B) the Interest Charge. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "Financial Gain" shall mean (i) with respect to each option exercised after the Effective Date, the difference between the fair market value of the Company's common stock on the exercise date and the exercise price of such option, multiplied by the gross number of shares subject to such exercise (including shares applied to pay the exercise price and shares applied to satisfy and tax withholding obligation) and (ii) with respect to each restricted stock unit, the fair market value of the Company's common stock on the date such unit vests. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "Interest Charge" shall mean interest at the Company's unsecured borrowing rate as in effect from time to time on all Financial Gain computed from the date such Financial Gain is realized (by means of the exercise of an option or the vesting of a restricted stock unit) through the date Executive satisfies such obligation.
6. . Sections 1, 8 (as modified by this Agreement), 9, 11, and 22 of the Employment Agreement shall survive the Effective Date through the end of the Extended Covenant Term or the period specified in such provision if longer. Sections 7, 10, 12, 13, 15, 19, and 22 of the Employment Agreement shall survive the Effective Date indefinitely.
Survival
[intentionally left blank  next page is signature page]
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date and year first above written.

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE) today announced that it has completed the final steps in its succession plan by appointing Robert J. Eck as President and Chief Executive Officer, effective with the retirement of Robert W. Grubbs on June 30, 2008, and by modifying certain terms and conditions of the existing employment contract with Mr. Grubbs.
GLENVIEW, IL, May 19, 2008 
Commenting on these actions, Sam Zell, Chairman of Anixter, said, "These are the final steps to provide for the orderly succession of Bob Eck to President and Chief Executive Officer. With Bob Eck's 18-year Anixter career that has included diverse and increasing responsibilities, we expect a smooth transition and a continuation of the strategies that have contributed to the Company's success."
Zell went on to say, "Bob Grubbs has been a tremendous contributor to the growth of Anixter during his 30 years with the Company, especially during his tenure as President and Chief Executive Officer. These contract changes will help to ensure that the parties' interests continue to be aligned in promoting the future growth and success of the Company."
The new agreement with Mr. Grubbs amends and extends the existing provisions concerning noncompetition and nonsolicitation, from the previously contracted two years, to the longer of five years beyond his retirement or two years beyond his retirement from service on the Company's Board of Directors.
In exchange, the Company has agreed that the stock options and restricted stock units currently held by Mr. Grubbs will remain outstanding and continue to vest in accordance with the expiration and vesting terms under which they were granted. Without this revision, the subject stock options and restricted stock units would have expired or terminated within 90 days of Mr. Grubbs' retirement. As a result of this revision to the original terms of the grants, the Company will record a non-cash, pre-tax charge to earnings in the second quarter of approximately $4.2 million, or 7 cents per diluted share.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 218 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 249 cities in 49 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080707115406.txt.gz
TIME:20080707115406
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On July 1, 2008, Robert J. Eck, age 50, became President and Chief Executive Officer of Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"). Mr. Eck has served as the Companys Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer since September 2007. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated February 25, 2008, and is incorporated herein by reference. In connection with his appointment as President and Chief Executive Officer, on July 1, 2008, Mr. Ecks base salary was increased to $600,000 and his target bonus was increased to $550,000. In addition, Mr. Eck received, on July 1, 2008, a long-term stock incentive valued at $600,000. The long-term stock incentive value was delivered 50% in employee stock options and 50% in restricted stock units based on the Companys closing stock price on July 1, 2008.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20080723121546.txt.gz
TIME:20080723121546
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 22, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended June 27, 2008. The Companys press release, dated July 22, 2008, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated July 22, 2008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION:
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers ("OEMs"), today reported results for the quarter ended June 27, 2008.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 22, 2008 
Second Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "We are pleased with the 10 percent increase in sales from the first to the second quarter of this year, which despite continuing macroeconomic uncertainty, exceeded longer-term seasonal trends. Also, while the second quarter year-on-year sales growth was modest due to the difficult comparison to last year's exceptionally strong second quarter, it was, however, stronger than we anticipated. The multiple end markets we serve, the diversity of vertical end markets that our customers operate in and the breadth of geographies in which we conduct our business continue to support the company's ongoing revenue and earnings growth."
Second Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended June 27, 2008, sales of $1.62 billion produced net income of $66.9 million, or $1.71 per diluted share, compared to sales of $1.51 billion that generated net income of $64.6 million, or $1.53 per diluted share, in the prior year period. Primarily as a result of the company's share repurchases during the last year, the diluted weighted shares declined by 7 percent during the second quarter versus the respective prior year period which produced a favorable impact on net income per diluted share of 9 cents.
Included in the current year's second quarter results were incremental sales of $4.2 million from acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions as well as the favorable foreign exchange impact of $43.1 million, second quarter sales grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 4 percent. As previously announced on May 19, 2008, the current quarter results include an after tax charge of $2.6 million, or 7 cents per diluted share, related to amendments made to the employment contract of the company's recently retired Chief Executive Officer, which extended the terms of his non-competition and non-solicitation restrictions in exchange for extended vesting and termination provisions of previously granted equity awards.
Operating income in the second quarter increased 5 percent to $121.8 million as compared to $116.1 million in the year ago quarter. Operating margins were 7.5 percent during the recent period compared to 7.7 percent in the second quarter of 2007. Excluding the former CEO's retirement-related pre-tax costs of $4.2 million recorded in the second quarter of this year, operating income growth would have been 8 percent and operating margins would have been 7.8 percent.
First Six Month Results
For the six-month period ended June 27, 2008, sales of $3.09 billion produced net income of $124.6 million, or $3.16 per diluted share. In the prior year period, sales of $2.84 billion generated net income of $118.2 million, or $2.81 per diluted share. Primarily as a result of the company's share repurchases during the last year, the diluted weighted shares declined by 6 percent during the six-month period versus the respective prior year period which produced a favorable impact on net income per diluted share of 12 cents.
Included in the 2008 six-month results were incremental sales of $16.5 million from acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange impact of $86.6 million, sales in the first six months grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 5 percent. Earnings in the first six months of 2008 were affected by the previously noted after-tax expense of $2.6 million, or 7 cents per share, related to the retirement of the company's former CEO and favorable tax adjustments of $1.6 million, or 4 cents per diluted share, associated with recognition of foreign net operating loss carryforwards recorded in the first quarter of 2008. Excluding these items, net income in the first six months of 2008 would have been $125.6 million or $3.18 per diluted share.
Earnings in the year ago period were favorably affected by $2.0 million, or 5 cents per diluted share, for net tax benefits related to the settlement of certain income tax audits. Excluding these tax benefits, net income in the year ago period would have been $116.2 million or $2.76 per diluted share. After excluding the above noted unusual tax items from both years and the former CEO retirement-related costs in 2008, net income and diluted earnings per share in the first six months of 2008 increased 8 percent and 15 percent, respectively, versus the year ago period.
Operating profits in the first six months of 2008 were $223.3 million versus $206.5 million in the year-earlier period. Operating margins were 7.2 percent in the first six months of 2008 as compared to 7.3 percent in the year ago period. Excluding the CEO retirement-related expense in 2008, operating income was $227.5 million, or an increase of 10 percent, and operating margins were 7.4 percent.
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Eck said, "Second quarter sales growth, which increased 10 percent on a consecutive quarter basis from the first quarter of this year, exceeded the longer-term seasonal trends of a mid-to-high single digit growth rate from the first to second quarter. However, as we have noted over the past year, our consecutive quarter growth of 14 percent from the first to second quarter of 2007 was well above that historical trend line, which presented us with a difficult year-on-year comparison. Even with that in mind, however, second quarter 2008 sales were still up 7 percent compared to the year-ago quarter."
"The comparatively lower year-on-year growth rates were most pronounced in the North American enterprise cabling and security solutions end market, where the year ago period benefitted from a number of large projects. As a result, North American enterprise cabling and security solution sales of $592.0 million were just 2 percent higher than the year ago quarter. Growth of 16 percent in the security portion of this market was offset by lower volumes of large projects in the overall enterprise cabling market. In the North American electrical wire & cable market we saw strong levels of project activity that produced sales of $395.6 million in the current quarter. This reflects an increase of 8 percent versus the year ago quarter despite a difficult comparison against exceptionally strong second quarter sales in 2007. Lastly, in the OEM Supply market in North America, we had sales of $125.7 million, which represented an increase of 5 percent over the prior year. In this end market, sustained growth in the aerospace and defense markets continued to offset lower production rates for customers in other vertical markets. Foreign exchange contributed $16.1 million to total North American sales in the second quarter as compared to the year ago quarter."
"Total European sales rose 12 percent versus the year ago quarter to $366.0 million," Eck said. "European sales were aided by favorable foreign exchange and acquisitions, which added $21.2 million and $4.2 million, respectively, to second quarter 2008 sales. Sales growth in Europe was highest in the OEM Supply end market, where we reported sales of $172.4 million, representing a 16 percent year-on-year increase as a result of adding business with existing customers and the addition of new accounts. Sales in the electrical wire & cable end market were $68.5 million, or 12 percent higher than the year ago period. Importantly, electrical wire & cable sales outside of the U.K. grew by 48 percent as we continue to focus on expanding the scope of efforts in this market beyond its historical base. Sales in the enterprise cabling and security market of $125.1 million grew by 7 percent versus the second quarter in 2007."
Eck added, "In the emerging markets, sales of $140.5 million grew 23 percent, including $5.8 million from favorable effects related to foreign exchange rates. Growth rates in Asia Pacific and Latin America individually approximated the overall emerging market growth rate."
Second Quarter Operating Results
"Second quarter operating margins of 7.8 percent, exclusive of the previously noted expense related to the retirement of my predecessor, compared to 7.7 percent in the year ago quarter," commented Eck. "As compared to the second quarter of last year, gross margins declined from 24.0 percent to 23.8 percent due to lower supplier volume growth incentives and continued pressure from rising steel and specialty metal prices in our OEM Supply business. At the same time, we have continued to invest in people to drive our initiatives of expanding our security business, the global reach of the electrical wire & cable business, our initial efforts in the factory automation market and expansion of our business in emerging markets. Despite the slight drop in gross margins and continued investment in growth initiatives, we were able achieve a modest improvement in operating margins due to the increased operating leverage coming from growth in sales and sound expense management."
"In North America, our operating margins excluding the expense associated with the retirement of our prior CEO were 8.6 percent, which matched that in the year ago quarter. Good expense control in North America offset the effects of slower growth and slight downward pressure on gross margins. In Europe, operating margins in the most recent quarter were 5.3 percent as compared to 4.6 percent in the year ago quarter. This improvement in European operating margins reflects good sales growth and expense controls, which offset the gross margin pressures in the OEM Supply business. In the emerging markets, operating margins of 7.6 percent in the second quarter compared to 7.7 percent in the year ago period. The slight decrease reflects higher operating costs associated with investments for future growth in this part of our business."
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the second quarter we generated $43.5 million in cash from operations as compared to the $30.5 million used in operations in the year ago quarter. During the current quarter we needed less working capital to support our sales growth," said Dennis Letham, Chief Financial Officer. "We used the cash flow from operations and a small increase in borrowings in the second quarter to repurchase 1,000,000 of the company's outstanding shares at a cost of $62.9 million, which reflects our strong confidence in the company's long-term prospects."
Letham added, "At the end of the second quarter the company had a debt-to-total capital ratio of 49.0 percent as compared to 49.4 percent at the end of 2007. Furthermore, for the second quarter, the weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.0 percent as compared to 4.2 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the second quarter, approximately 75 percent of our total borrowings of $1.06 billion had fixed interest rates, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging contracts. We also had $240 million of available, unused credit facilities at June 27, 2008, which provide us with the resources to support continued strong organic growth and to pursue other strategic initiatives, such as acquisitions, throughout the remainder of the year."
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "Given that the second quarter year-on-year comparisons were difficult because of the exceptional growth in the prior year, especially on larger projects, we are encouraged by the higher than historical trend line growth in consecutive quarter sales from the first to second quarter of this year as well as the growth we realized over the unusually strong second quarter of 2007. While we continue to see select customer situations where sales are softer, we have not observed any broad-based negative trends in the various end markets and geographical regions where we have a business presence. We believe the overall market conditions, as they currently exist, should allow for consecutive quarter sales growth from the second to third quarter of this year. If we achieve a modest level of consecutive quarter growth it will move our third quarter year-on-year growth rates closer to our longer-term target of 8 to 12 percent yearly growth."
"Going forward through the next few quarters, we will remain focused on building on our strategic initiatives, which include growing our security and OEM Supply businesses, initiating a factory automation network sales effort, adding to our supply chain services offering, enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expanding our product offering. We are confident that continued focus on these investments and successful execution on these strategies will help drive full-year and longer-term growth of the business. At the same time we believe the breadth of the end markets we serve, the diversity of the vertical markets our customers operate in and the broad geographical scope of our business will continue to provide excellent opportunities for growth."
Second Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2008 second quarter on Tuesday, July 22, 2008 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at
www.anixter.com/webcasts
. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable and a leading distributor of fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) to Original Equipment Manufacturers. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 214 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 248 cities in 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20081023120856.txt.gz
TIME:20081023120856
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 21, 2008, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended September 26, 2008. The Companys press release, dated October 21, 2008, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated October 21, 2008, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended September 26, 2008.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 21, 2008 
Third Quarter Highlights
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "While we experienced strength early in the third quarter, broader negative economic factors, especially in Europe, impacted sales activities late in the period. Despite these headwinds we still generated 2 percent organic growth, primarily driven by our initiatives to expand the company's presence in the security solutions market and increase the geographic footprint of our electrical wire and cable business in Europe. The progress realized, despite a challenging environment, demonstrates the importance of focusing on growth initiatives and programs we can control to offset some of the negative shorter-term macro economic factors. The long-term strategic initiatives and our sustained execution position us for even stronger growth when the economy improves."
Third Quarter Results
For the three-month period ended September 26, 2008, sales of $1.59 billion produced net income of $61.7 million, or $1.58 per diluted share. Included in the current year's third quarter results were sales of $22.0 million coming from acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange rate impact of $9.8 million, third quarter sales grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 2 percent. Included in third quarter net income are after tax foreign exchange losses of approximately $2.7 million incurred as a result of the rapid appreciation of the U.S. dollar versus currencies in emerging markets where there are few cost effective means of hedging. These foreign exchange losses reduced diluted net income per share by 7 cents in the third quarter.
In the prior year period, sales of $1.52 billion generated net income of $64.8 million, or $1.51 per diluted share.
Operating income in the third quarter was down slightly from $118.2 million in the year ago quarter to $117.9 million in the most recent quarter. For the latest quarter, operating margins were 7.4 percent compared to 7.8 percent in the third quarter of 2007.
First Nine Month Results
For the nine-month period ended September 26, 2008, sales of $4.68 billion produced net income of $186.3 million, or $4.73 per diluted share. Included in the 2008 nine-month results were sales of $38.5 million from acquisitions completed in the past year. After adjusting for acquisitions and the favorable foreign exchange rate impact of $96.4 million, sales in the first nine months grew at a year-over-year organic rate of 4 percent. Earnings in the first nine months of 2008 were unfavorably affected by after tax expense of $2.6 million or 7 cents per share related to the retirement of the company's former CEO in the second quarter of 2008, and after tax foreign exchange losses of $3.8 million or 10 cents per share resulting from the strengthening of the U.S. dollar during the second and third quarters of 2008.
In the prior year period, sales of $4.36 billion generated net income of $183.0 million, or $4.32 per diluted share. Earnings in the year ago period were favorably affected on an after tax basis by $1.3 million or 3 cents per diluted share due to foreign exchange gains associated with a weakening U.S. dollar in the nine month period.
Operating profits in the first nine months of 2008, inclusive of the $4.2 million of expense associated with the CEO retirement were $341.2 million versus $324.7 million in the prior year period. Operating margins were 7.3 percent in the first nine months of 2008 as compared to 7.4 percent in the year ago period. Excluding the CEO retirement related expense in 2008, operating income was $345.4 million or an increase of 6 percent, and operating margins were 7.4 percent or the same as the first nine months of the prior year.
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Eck said, "Our third quarter results were negatively impacted by macro economic trends, particularly in the last few weeks of the quarter. The quarter began very favorably, with July being the best four week month in the history of the company. August, which is traditionally a softer month because of vacation schedules, produced slightly weaker results than historical patterns would have suggested. While activity levels picked up in September, they did not come back with the strength that is typically seen following the summer vacation period."
North American Sales Trends
"We were pleased to see North American sales increase by 5 percent over the prior year quarter," said Eck. "This growth was inclusive of $11.6 million from an acquisition completed in the current quarter and $2.9 million of favorable foreign exchange rate impact. Adjusting for this acquisition and the effects of foreign exchange, organic sales growth was 3 percent."
Eck continued, "Our North American enterprise cabling and security solutions sales grew 2 percent, from $575.7 million in the third quarter of 2007 to $585.5 million. While day-to-day business remained healthy, the number and average size of larger projects was down year-on-year. Within the enterprise cabling and security solutions sales, our security-related sales grew at a year-on-year rate of 28 percent."
The company's North American electrical wire and cable business sales grew 6 percent from $372.4 million in the year ago quarter to $394.1 million in the current year quarter as larger project volumes remained comparatively healthy despite a difficult economic environment.
The North American OEM supply business saw sales grow by 18 percent, from $119.2 million in the year ago quarter to $140.0 million in the current period, including $11.6 million relating to a recently completed acquisition. Strong growth in sales to aerospace and defense customers more than offset the slight sales decline to industrial customers related to reduced production levels.
European Sales Trends
"European sales in the quarter rose 2 percent versus the year ago quarter. These results were aided by a favorable foreign exchange rate impact due primarily to the appreciation of the euro and acquisitions, which added $3.0 million and $9.0 million, respectively, to third quarter 2008 sales. Adjusted for acquisitions and the effects of foreign exchange rates on sales," Eck noted, "European sales declined 2 percent organically."
Eck added, "Our European sales growth was highest in the electrical wire and cable end market, which grew 18 percent to $65.6 million in the current quarter versus $55.5 million in the prior year. This growth was driven by our initiative to expand electrical wire and cable sales outside of our traditional market focus in the U.K. That initiative generated 29 percent year-on-year growth on electrical wire and cable sales outside of the U.K. market."
The European OEM supply business saw only modest growth, increasing 2 percent as sales grew from $146.8 million in the year ago quarter to $149.8 million in the current year period. Contributing to the year-on-year growth were the acquisitions of Sofrasar and Gergen, which added $9.0 million to current period sales. At the same time, an unfavorable foreign exchange rate impact reduced sales by $2.3 million due primarily to the depreciation of the British pound. Without these factors the company's OEM sales declined by 3 percent as the business experienced a number of customer production cutbacks in response to softening economic conditions in Europe.
The company's European enterprise cabling and security business experienced a sales decline of 6 percent to $112.7 million versus $119.7 million in the year ago quarter. The decrease in sales was partially mitigated by a favorable foreign exchange rate impact of $5.3 million and 20 percent growth in security sales. The decline in core enterprise cabling sales reflects a broader-based slowdown in activity beyond the U.K.-based weakness seen earlier this year.
Emerging Market Sales Trends
"Emerging market sales grew 10 percent, including $3.9 million from favorable effects related to foreign exchange rates and $1.4 million due to an acquisition. Sales in the current quarter were $143.1 million versus $130.3 million in the year ago quarter, including security sales that grew 51 percent to $15.8 million in the current quarter. In Asia Pacific, sales declined by 8 percent due to lower project activity while in Latin America continued good project activity drove sales growth of 19 percent," said Eck.
Third Quarter Operating Results
"Third quarter operating margins were 7.4 percent compared to 7.8 percent in the year ago quarter," commented Eck. "The slight sequential decline in sales in the third quarter, when historical patterns would normally suggest consecutive quarter growth, created some operating leverage compression. In anticipation of a more typical pattern of consecutive quarter sales growth in the third quarter, and the strength of the sales activity in the month of July, we continued to invest in people to drive our initiatives of expanding our security business, the global reach of the electrical wire & cable business, our initial efforts in the factory automation market and expansion of our business in emerging markets. We are continuing to invest in initiatives that can drive both near- and longer-term growth, while at the same time managing operating expense, exclusive of foreign exchange effects and acquisitions, in a manner consistent with the macro economic environment. Gross margins, however, continued to reflect pressure associated with lower supplier volume growth incentives as a result of lower sales growth, softening sales in our higher gross margin OEM supply business and some continued pressure from higher steel and specialty metal prices in our OEM supply business. All of these factors combined to decrease margins in the quarter."
"In North America, our operating margins were equal to the 8.6 percent reported in the year ago quarter as slower sales growth and slight downward pressure on gross margins offset good expense control. Operating margins in Europe exhibited the most significant decline in the recent quarter as softer sales, particularly in the higher gross margin OEM supply business, moved operating margins to 3.2 percent compared to 4.9 percent in the year ago quarter. In the emerging markets, operating margins of 7.9 percent in the third quarter of this year compare favorably to 7.8 percent in the year ago period," said Eck.
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the third quarter we used $8.3 million of cash in operations as compared to the $10.0 million generated in the year ago quarter," said Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "The cash flow used in operations was the result of increases in working capital. The working capital increases were the result of increases in inventory associated with the slow down in sales late in the quarter and an increase in customer receivables resulting from our very early fiscal month end on September 26, 2008."
"During the quarter we also increased borrowings under our existing credit facilities and assumed borrowings of acquired companies to complete four OEM supply acquisitions for total consideration of $136.1 million," Letham added. "As a result of the borrowings incurred for recent acquisitions the company had a debt-to-total capital ratio of 50.9 percent at the end of the third quarter as compared to 49.4 percent at the end of 2007. For the third quarter the weighted-average cost of borrowed capital was 4.0 percent as compared to 4.3 percent in the year ago quarter. At the end of the third quarter, approximately 66 percent of our total borrowings of $1.18 billion had fixed interest rates, either by the terms of the borrowing agreements or through hedging contracts. We also had $241 million of available, unused credit facilities at September 26, 2008, which together with anticipated cash flows from operations provides us with the resources necessary to support both organic growth and to pursue other strategic initiatives."
Business Outlook
Eck said, "The later weeks of the third quarter signaled a more broad-based economic slowing than the company had experienced year to date. At this time it is difficult to ascertain exactly what this will mean to sales volumes in the coming months. Historically in periods of economic softness the 15-to-20 percent of our enterprise cabling and security solutions business and our electrical wire and cable business that is project-based has shown the most variability. On the other hand, the 80-to-85 percent of day-to-day business supporting maintenance and moves, adds and changes to existing infrastructure has remained comparatively steady. Also, sales in the OEM supply business are driven by customer production slowdowns that vary from customer to customer and between customer vertical markets. Overall, we believe our business mix has changed appreciably to a less volatile mix than we had in the recession earlier in this decade."
"Specific to the fourth quarter, it is important to note that we typically report lower consecutive quarter sales in the fourth quarter due to the number of holidays in the period. However, we expect that seasonal softness this year will be somewhat offset by sales from the recently completed acquisitions that are expected to add between $55 million and $60 million to fourth quarter sales as compared to the year-ago period."
"At the same time, fourth quarter sales will be positively affected by the fact that this is a 53-week year in our fiscal calendar as our 2008 fiscal year will end on Friday January 2, 2009. This is expected to add the equivalent of approximately 3 days to fourth quarter 2008 sales. The revenue effects of the extra fiscal week is limited to 3 days due to the inclusion of the New Year holiday within that week. However, from an earnings standpoint, the effect of the extra fiscal week will be slightly negative since we will have an extra week of operating expenses matched by only three days of added revenues."
"As we go forward through the next few quarters, we will remain focused on building on our strategic initiatives including growing our security and OEM supply businesses, further developing a factory automation network sales effort, adding to our supply chain services offering, enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expanding our product offering. We believe continued focus on these investments and successful execution on the associated strategies are important to both longer-term growth of the business and offsetting near-term, soft economic conditions," Eck concluded.
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2008 third quarter on Tuesday, October 21, 2008 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at
www.anixter.com/webcasts
. The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 232 warehouses with more than 6 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 267 cities in 51 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
(In millions, except per share amounts)
(In millions)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20081124165316.txt.gz
TIME:20081124165316
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On November 20, 2008, the Board of Directors of Anixter International Inc. (the "Company') amended the Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company, which amendments took effect upon adoption by the Board of Directors.
The By-law amendments consist of the following:
1. Article II, Section 2 was amended to delete a default provision setting the date and time of the annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Article II, Section 3 and Section 6 were amended to lengthen the maximum amount of notice to be given prior to a meeting of stockholders from 50 days to 60 days.
3. Article II, Section 9 was amended to clarify that election of directors at all meetings of stockholders is by plurality vote.
4. Article II, Section 11 was amended to eliminate the ability of stockholders to take action by unanimous written consent and to clarify that the stockholders may not take action by less than unanimous written consent of the stockholders.
5. A new Article II, Section 12 was added to require written notice of nominations of directors by stockholders. Nominations by stockholders for election of directors at annual meetings must be received by the Company not less than 90 days nor more than 120 days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting; provided that if the annual meeting is not held within 30 days before or after such anniversary date, then such nomination shall have been received not later than the close of business on the 10 day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting date was made, whichever occurs first. Nominations by stockholders for election of directors at special meetings must be received by the Company not later than the close of business on the 10 day following the date on which the notice of the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the special meeting date was made, whichever occurs first. Certain information is required with respect to each proposed nominee. The chairman of the meeting is authorized to disregard defective nominations.
th
th
6. A new Article II, Section 13 was added to require written notice of business (other than nomination of directors by stockholders) to be brought before annual meetings by stockholders. In order for such business to be brought before an annual meeting of stockholders, it must specified in the notice given by the board of directors, otherwise brought before the meeting by the board of directors or brought by a stockholder who otherwise complies with the notice procedures set forth in Section 13. In order for a stockholder to bring business before an annual meeting, notice must be received by the Company not less than 90 days nor more than 120 days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting; provided that if the annual meeting is not held within 30 days before or after such anniversary date, then such notice shall have been received not later than the close of business on the 10 day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting date was made, whichever occurs first. Certain information is required with respect to each matter proposed. The chairman of the meeting is authorized to declare that any business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
th
7. Article III, Section 1 was amended to delete a statement that directors need not be stockholders.
8. Article III, Section 4 was amended to require a board of directors meeting following the annual meeting of stockholders.
Table of Contents
9. Article III, Section 5 was amended to delete default provisions for the time and place of regular meetings of the board of directors and to clarify that notice is not required for regular board meetings.
10. Article III, Section 6 was amended to shorten notice of special meetings of directors from three days to two days.
11. Article III, Section 7 was amended to change the quorum of the board of directors to a majority of the total number of directors from a fixed number.
12. Article III, Section 10 was amended to shorten notice of special meetings of board committees from three days to two days and to eliminate notice requirements for regular meetings of board committees.
13. Articles III and IV were amended to permit delivery of director notices, waivers of notice and written consents by electronic transmission.
14. Article V was amended to (i) formalize the office of Chief Financial Officer and (ii) permit superior officers to set duties and powers of subordinate officers.
15. Article V, Sections 2 and 3 were combined and eliminate the requirement that officers be elected annually.
16. Article V, Section 7 was amended to delete a provision providing for vice presidents to exercise the powers of the president in the event of the president's inability or refusal to act.
17. Article V, former Section 11 was deleted; the Section provided for discretionary bonding of the treasurer.
18. Article V, former Section 13, current Section 12, was amended to eliminate a provision mandating that the controller be the chief accounting officer.
19. Article VI was amended to clarify that shares of stock can be uncertificated.
20. Article VII was amended to eliminate sections (i) permitting the setting of reserves prior to the payment of dividends and (ii) requiring the preparation of an annual report prepared by the board of directors. A new Section 5 was added defining electronic transmission.
21. Article IX, Section 3 was amended to permit a committee of non-interested directors to authorize indemnification.
A copy of the Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company, effective November 20, 2008, is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1. A copy of the Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company, effective November 20, 2008, marked to show the changes resulting from the amendments reported in this Current Report on Form 8-K, is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 3.1
     Section 1. The registered office shall be in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, State of Delaware.
Registered Office.
     Section 2. The corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or the business of the corporation may require.
Other Offices.
     Section 1. All meetings of the stockholders for the election of Directors shall be held in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, at such place as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, or at such other place either within or without the State of Delaware as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. Meetings of stockholders for any other purpose may be held at such time and place within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting or in a duly executed waiver of notice thereof.
Place of Meetings.
     Section 2. Annual meetings of stockholders shall be held at such date and time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. At such meeting the stockholders shall elect by a plurality vote a Board of Directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
Annual Meetings.
     Section 3. Except as provided by law, written notice of the annual meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting.
Notice of Annual Meeting.
 
     Section 4. The officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the corporation shall prepare and make, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of meeting, or if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.
List of Stockholders.
     Section 5. Special meetings of the stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, unless otherwise prescribed by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation, may be called by the President and shall be called by the President or Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the Board of Directors, or at the request in writing of stockholders owning a majority in amount of the entire capital stock of the corporation issued and outstanding and entitled to vote. Such request shall state the purpose or purposes of the proposed meeting.
Special Meetings.
     Section 6. Except as provided by law, written notice of a special meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting, to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting.
Notice of Special Meeting.
     Section 7. Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice.
Business Transacted at Special Meeting.
     Section 8. The holders of one-half of the stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation. If, however, such quorum shall not be present or represented at any meeting of the stockholders, the stockholders entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall have the power to adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present or represented. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally notified. If the adjournment is for more than thirty days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the
Quorum.
 
adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.
     Section 9. When a quorum is present at any meeting, the vote of the holders of a majority of the stock having voting power present in person or represented by proxy shall decide any question brought before such meeting, unless the question is one upon which by express provision of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation a different vote is required, in which case such express provision shall govern and control the decision of such question, or unless the question brought before the meeting is election of Directors, in which case Directors shall be elected by plurality vote.
Vote Requirements.
     Section 10. Each stockholder shall at every meeting of the stockholders be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy for each share of the capital stock having voting power held by such stockholder, but no proxy shall be voted on after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.
Vote in Person or by Proxy.
     Section 11. Stockholders may not take action by written consent in lieu of a meeting.
Action without Meeting.
     Section 12. . Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as Directors. The nomination for election to the Board of Directors of the corporation at a meeting of stockholders may be made by the Board of Directors or by any stockholder (i) who is a stockholder of record on the date of the giving of notice provided for in this Section 12 and on the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 12. Nominations, other than those made by or on behalf of the Board of Directors, for the election of Directors at an annual meeting of stockholders shall be made by notice in writing delivered or mailed by first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary, and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of stockholders; , , that if the annual meeting is not held within thirty days before or after such anniversary date, then such nomination shall have been delivered to or mailed and received by the Secretary not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever occurs first. Nominations, other than those made by or on behalf of the Board of Directors, for the election of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders shall be made by notice in writing delivered to or mailed and received by the Secretary not later than the close of
Nomination of Directors
provided
however
 
business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the special meeting was made, whichever occurs first. Such notice shall set forth (a) as to each proposed nominee (i) the name, age, business address and, if known, residence address of each such nominee, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of each such nominee, (iii) the class and number of shares of stock of the corporation which are beneficially owned by each such nominee, and (iv) any other information concerning the nominee that must be disclosed as to nominees in proxy solicitations pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including such person's written consent to be named as a nominee and to serve as a Director if elected; and (b) as to the stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder. The corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as a Director of the corporation.
     The chairman of the meeting may, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
     Section 13. . At an annual meeting of the stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) otherwise properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder (i) who is a stockholder of record on the date of the giving of notice provided for in this Section 13 and on the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at such annual meeting, and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 13. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, if such business relates to the election of Directors of the corporation, the procedures in Section 12 of this Article II must be complied with. If such business relates to any other matter, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be made in writing, delivered or mailed by first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary, and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of
Notice of Business at Annual Meetings
 
stockholders; , , that if the annual meeting is not held within thirty days before or after such anniversary date, then for the notice by the stockholder to be timely it must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever occurs first. To be in proper written form, a stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's books, of the stockholder proposing such business, (c) the class and number of shares of the corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder, (d) any material interest of the stockholder in such business and (e) a representation that such stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to bring such business before the meeting. Notwithstanding anything in these By-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 13, except that any stockholder proposal which complies with Rule 14a-8 of the proxy rules, or any successor provision, promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and is to be included in the corporation's proxy statement for an annual meeting of stockholders shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this Section 13.
provided
however
     The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 13, and if he or she should so determine, the chairman shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
     Section 1. The number of Directors which shall constitute the whole Board shall be the number at any given time determined by the Board. The Directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of stockholders, except as provided in Section 2 of this Article, and each Director elected shall hold office until his successor is elected and qualified.
Number and Election.
 
     Section 2. Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of Directors may be filled by a majority of the Directors then in office though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining Director, and the Directors so chosen shall hold office until the next annual election and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, unless sooner displaced. If there are no Directors in office, then an election of Directors may be held in the manner provided by statute. If, at the time of filling any vacancy or any newly created directorship, the Directors then in office shall constitute less than a majority of the whole Board (as constituted immediately prior to any such increase), the Court of Chancery may, upon application of any stockholder or stockholders holding at least ten percent of the total number of the shares at the time outstanding having the right to vote for such Directors, summarily order an election to be held to fill any such vacancies or newly created directorships, or to replace the Directors chosen by the Directors then in office.
Vacancies.
     Section 3. The business of the corporation shall be managed by its Board of Directors which may exercise all such powers of the corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these By-laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.
Authority of Board of Directors.
     Section 4. The Board of Directors of the corporation may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware. A meeting of the Board of Directors shall be held immediately following the annual meeting of stockholders.
Meetings of the Board of Directors.
     Section 5. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times and places as are fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board. No notice need be given for regular meetings.
Regular Meetings.
     Section 6. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the President on not less than two days' prior notice to each Director, either personally, by mail or by electronic transmission. Special meetings shall be called by the President or Secretary in like manner and on like notice on the written request of two Directors.
Special Meetings.
     Section 7. At all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of Directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the act of a majority of the Directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the Directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time,
Quorum.
 
without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
     Section 8. Unless otherwise restricted by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-laws, any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or of any Committee thereof may be taken without a meeting, if all members of the Board or Committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, and the writing or writings or electronic transmission or transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or Committee. Such filing shall be in paper form if the minutes are maintained in paper form and in electronic form if the minutes are maintained in electronic form.
Action without Meeting.
     Section 9. The Board of Directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the whole Board of Directors, designate one or more Committees, each Committee to consist of two or more of the Directors of the corporation. The Board of Directors may designate one or more Directors as alternate members of any Committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the Committee. Any such Committee, to the extent provided in the resolution, shall have and may exercise the powers of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it; provided, however, that in the absence or disqualification of any member of such Committee or Committees, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not he or they constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member. Such Committee or Committees shall have such name or names as may be determined from time to time by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors.
Committees of Directors.
     Section 10. Each Committee may hold meetings, regular and/or special, either within or without the State of Delaware. No notice need be given for regular meetings of a Committee. Any special meeting of a Committee shall be held on not less than two days' prior notice to each member of such Committee, either personally, by mail or by electronic transmission.
Meetings of Committees.
     Section 11. Each Committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.
Minutes of Committee Meetings.
     Section 12. The Directors may be paid such compensation as the Board of Directors shall deem advisable.
Compensation of Directors.
     Section 13. . The Board of Directors at its first meeting after each annual
The Chairman of the Board
 
meeting of stockholders, or at such other time as it may determine, shall choose a Chairman of the Board. The Chairman of the Board shall preside at meetings of the Board, shall be the Chairman of the Executive Committee, and shall have such other powers and duties as shall from time to time be assigned by the Board of Directors.
     Section 1. Whenever, under the provisions of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation or of these By-laws, notice is required to be given to any Director or stockholder, it shall not be construed to mean personal notice, but such notice may be given in writing by mail, addressed to such Director or stockholder at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid, and such notice shall be deemed to be given at the time when the same shall be deposited in the United States mail. Notice to Directors may also be given personally and by electronic transmission.
Form of Notice.
     Section 2. Whenever any notice is required to be given under the provisions of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation or of these By-laws, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, or a waiver thereof by electronic transmission by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent thereto.
Waiver of Notice.
     Section 1. The officers of the corporation shall be chosen by the Board of Directors and shall be a President, a Chief Financial Officer, one or more Vice-Presidents, a Secretary, a Treasurer, a Controller, and a General CounselThe Board of Directors may designate certain Vice-Presidents as executive or senior Vice-Presidents and may affix such functional designations to Vice-Presidential titles as it shall deem appropriate. The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, Assistant Controllers, and Associate General Counsels. Any number of offices may be held by the same person unless the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-laws otherwise provide. The Board of Directors may authorize and approve the terms of employment contracts with officers covering the duties, term, compensation, and other terms of the employment of officers.
Officers.
.
     Section 2. The Board of Directors may appoint such other officers and
Appointment of Other Officers.
 
agents as it shall deem necessary who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.
     Section 3. The compensation of all officers of the corporation shall be fixed by the Board of Directors.
Compensation of Officers.
     Section 4. The officers of the corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify. Any officer elected or appointed by the Board of Directors may be removed at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Board of Directors. Any vacancy occurring in any office of the corporation shall be filled by the Board of Directors.
Terms of Office.
     Section 5. The President shall be Chief Executive Officer of the corporation and shall have all powers ordinarily exercised by the President and Chief Executive Officer of a corporation and such other powers and duties as shall from time to time be assigned to him by the Board of Directors. The President may execute on behalf of the corporation stock certificates, bonds, contracts, deeds, mortgages, or other instruments authorized by the Board of Directors, except in cases where the signing or execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board or by these By-laws to some other officer or agent of the corporation or such documents or instruments shall be required by law to be signed or executed otherwise, and the President may affix the seal of the corporation to any instrument requiring the same. In the performance of all the duties hereunder, the President shall be subject to the supervision of, and shall report to, the Board of Directors.
The President.
     Section 6. . The Chief Financial Officer shall have general supervision of the financial operations of the corporation. The Chief Financial Officer shall also perform such duties and have such other powers as may from time to time be prescribed by the Board of Directors or the President.
Chief Financial Officer
     Section 7. The Vice-Presidents shall perform such duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors or the President may from time to time prescribe.
The Vice-Presidents.
     Section 8. The Secretary shall attend all meetings of the Board of Directors and its Committees and all meetings of the stockholders and record all the proceedings of all such meetings in a book to be kept for that purpose. The Secretary shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors and its Committees, and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as may be prescribed by the Board of Directors or President, or other officer who either shall designate, under whose supervision he shall be. The Secretary shall have custody of the corporate seal of the corporation and the Secretary or Assistant Secretary shall have the authority to affix the same to any instrument requiring it and when
The Secretary.
 
so affixed, it may be attested by the Secretary's signature or by the signature of such Assistant Secretary. The Board of Directors may give general authority to any other officer to affix the seal of the corporation and to attest the affixing by the signature of such officer.
     Section 9. The Assistant Secretary, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Secretaries in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Secretary, or at the Secretary's request, or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, or if the office of Secretary is vacant, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President or the Secretary may from time to time prescribe.
The Assistant Secretary.
     Section 10. The Treasurer shall have the custody of the corporate funds and securities and shall keep full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements in books belonging to the corporation and shall deposit all moneys and other valuable effects in the name and to the credit of the corporation in such depositories as may be designated by the Board of Directors. The Treasurer shall disburse the funds of the corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors, or as he may deem appropriate, taking proper vouchers for such disbursements, and shall render to the President and the Board of Directors, at its regular meetings, or when the Board of Directors so requires, an account of all transactions of the Treasurer.
The Treasurer.
     Section 11. The Assistant Treasurer, or if there shall be more than one, the Assistant Treasurers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Treasurer, or at the Treasurer's request, or, in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Treasurer may from time to time prescribe.
The Assistant Treasurer.
     Section 12. The Controller shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as are ordinarily performed or exercised by the Controller of a corporation and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President or the Chief Financial Officer may from time to time prescribe.
The Controller.
     Section 13. The Assistant Controller, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Controllers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Controller or at the Controller's request, or in the event of his
The Assistant Controller.
 
inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Controller and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Controller may from time to time prescribe.
     Section 14. The General Counsel shall be the Chief Legal Officer of the corporation and shall act as legal advisor to the Board of Directors and officers. The General Counsel shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as are ordinarily performed or exercised by the General Counsel of a corporation and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors or the President, or other officer who either shall designate, may from time to time prescribe.
The General Counsel.
     Section 15. The Associate General Counsel, or if there be more than one, the Associate General Counsels either in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election) or with such allocations of the duties and powers to, between or among them as may be fixed in a manner authorized by the Board of Directors, shall in the absence of the General Counsel, or at the General Counsel's request, or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, or if the office of General Counsel is vacant, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the General Counsel and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President or the General Counsel may from time to time prescribe.
The Associate General Counsel.
     Section 1. Shares of stock of the corporation may be represented by stock certificates or uncertificated, as provided by the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware. Every holder of stock in the corporation shall be entitled to have a certificate, signed in the name of the corporation by the Chairman of the Board of Directors, or the President or a Vice-President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or Assistant Secretary of the corporation, certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation.
Form.
     Section 2. Where a certificate is countersigned (i) by a transfer agent other than the corporation or its employee, or (ii) by a registrar other than the corporation or its employee, the signatures of the officers of the corporation may be facsimiles. In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer before such certificate is
Signatures on Stock Certificates.
 
issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of issue.
     Section 3. The Board of Directors may direct a new certificate or certificates to be issued in place of any certificate or certificates theretofore issued by the corporation alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming the certificate of stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed. When authorizing such issue of a new certificate or certificates, the Board of Directors may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or certificates, or his legal representative, to give the corporation a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the corporation with respect to the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed.
Lost Certificates.
     Section 4. Except as otherwise established by rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Directors, and subject to applicable law, shares of stock may be transferred on the books of the corporation (a) in the case of shares of stock represented by a certificate, by the surrender to the corporation or the transfer agent of the corporation of a certificate representing such shares properly endorsed or accompanied by a written assignment or power of attorney properly executed, or (b) in the case of uncertificated shares, on proper instructions from the holder of record of such shares or the holder's legal representative, in either case with such proof of authority or the authenticity of signature as the corporation or its transfer agent may reasonably require.
Transfers of Stock.
     Section 5. In order that the corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, or to express consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix, in advance, a record date, which shall not be more than sixty nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting, nor more than sixty days prior to any other action. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
Fixing Record Date.
     Section 6. The corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be
Registered Stockholders.
 
bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
     Section 1. Dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, if any, may be declared by the Board of Directors at any regular or special meeting, pursuant to law. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property, or in shares of the capital stock, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
Dividends.
     Section 2. All checks or demands for money and notes of the corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the Board of Directors may from time to time designate.
Checks.
     Section 3. The fiscal year of the corporation shall be fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Fiscal Year.
     Section 4. The corporate seal shall have inscribed thereon the name of the corporation, the year of its organization and the words "Corporate Seal, Delaware." The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced otherwise.
Seal.
     Section 5. . For purposes of these By-laws, "electronic transmission" means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such recipient through an automated process.
Electronic Transmissions
     Section 1. These By-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors at any regular meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal, or adoption of new by-laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting.
Amendment of By-laws.
 
     Section 1. Subject to Section 3 of this Article IX, the corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (other than an action by or in the right of the corporation) by reason of the fact that she or he is or was a director or officer, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection with such action, suit or proceeding if she or he acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe her or his conduct was unlawful. The termination of any action, suit or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of or its equivalent, shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had reasonable cause to believe that her or his conduct was unlawful.
Power to Indemnify in Actions, Suits or Proceedings other Than Those by or in the Right of the Corporation.
nolo
contendere
     Section 2. Subject to Section 3 of this Article IX, the corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action or suit by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that she or he is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection with the defense or settlement of such action or suit if she or he acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation; except that no indemnification shall be made in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which such person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation unless and only to the extent that
Power to Indemnify in Actions, Suits or Proceedings by or in the Right of the Corporation.
 
the Court of Chancery or the court in which such action or suit was brought shall determine upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in view of all the circumstances of the case, such person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for such expenses which the Court of Chancery or such other court shall deem proper.
     Section 3. Any indemnification under this Article IX (unless ordered by a court) shall be made by the corporation only as authorized in the specific case upon a determination that indemnification of the director or officer is proper in the circumstances because she or he has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section 1 or Section 2, of this Article IX, as the case may be. Such determination shall be made (i) by the Board of Directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who were not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, or (ii) by a committee of such directors designated by majority vote of such directors, even though less than a quorum, or (iii) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (iv) by the stockholders. To the extent, however, that a director or officer of the corporation has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of any action, suit or proceeding described above, or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, she or he shall be indemnified against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection therewith, without the necessity of authorization in the specific case.
Authorization of Indemnification.
     Section 4. For purposes of any determination under Section 3 of this Article IX, a person shall be deemed to have acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, or, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, to have had no reasonable cause to believe her or his conduct was unlawful, if her or his action is based on the records or books of account of the corporation or another enterprise, or on information supplied to her or him by the officers of the corporation or another enterprise in the course of their duties, or on the advice of legal counsel for the corporation or another enterprise or on information or records given or reports made to the corporation or another enterprise by an independent certified public accountant or by an appraiser or other expert selected with reasonable care by the corporation or another enterprise. The term "another enterprise" as used in this Section 4 shall mean any other corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise of which such person is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer. The provisions of this Section 4 shall not be deemed to be exclusive or to limit in any way the circumstances in which a person may be deemed to have met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section 1 or 2 of this Article IX, as the case may be.
Good Faith Defined.
 
     Section 5. Notwithstanding any contrary determination in the specific case under Section 3 of this Article IX, and notwithstanding the absence of any determination thereunder, any director or officer may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction in the State of Delaware for indemnification to the extent otherwise permissible under Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX. The basis of such indemnification by a court shall be a determination by such court that indemnification of the director or officer is proper in the circumstances because she or he has met the applicable standards of conduct set forth in Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX, as the case may be. Notice of any application for indemnification pursuant to this Section 5 shall be given to the corporation promptly upon the filing of such application.
Indemnification by a Court.
     Section 6. Expenses incurred in defending or investigating a threatened or pending action, suit or proceeding may be paid by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit or proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer to repay such amount if it shall ultimately be determined that she or he is not entitled to be indemnified by the corporation as authorized in this Article IX.
Expenses Payable in Advance.
     Section 7. The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by or granted pursuant to this Article IX shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled under any by-law, agreement, contract, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or pursuant to the direction (howsoever embodied) of any court of competent jurisdiction or otherwise, both as to action in her or his official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office, it being the policy of the corporation that indemnification of the persons specified in Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX shall be made to the fullest extent permitted by law. The provisions of this Article IX shall not be deemed to preclude the indemnification of any person who is not specified in Sections 1 or 2 of this Article IX but whom the corporation has the power or obligation to indemnify under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, or otherwise.
Non-exclusivity of Indemnification and Advancement of Expenses.
     Section 8. The corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against her or him and incurred by her or him in any such capacity, or arising out of her or his status as such, whether or not the corporation would have the power or the obligation to indemnify her or him against such
Insurance.
 
liability under the provisions of this Article IX.
     Section 9. For purposes of this Article IX, references to "the corporation" shall include, in addition to the resulting corporation, any constituent corporation (including any constituent of a constituent) absorbed in a consolidation or merger which, if its separate existence had continued, would have had power and authority to indemnify its directors or officers so that any person who is or was a director or officer of such constituent corporation, or is or was serving at the request of such constituent corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, shall stand in the same position under the provisions of this Article IX with respect to the resulting or surviving corporation as she or he would have with respect to such constituent corporation if its separate existence had continued.
Meaning of "Corporation" for Purposes of Article IX.
     Section 10. The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted pursuant to, this section shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director or officer and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such a person.
Survival of Indemnification and Advancement of Expenses.

EXHIBIT 3.2
     Section 1. The registered office shall be in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, State of Delaware.
Registered Office.
     Section 2. The corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or the business of the corporation may require.
Other Offices.
     Section 1. All meetings of the stockholders for the election of Directors shall be held in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, at such place as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, or at such other place either within or without the State of Delaware as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. Meetings of stockholders for any other purpose may be held at such time and place within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting or in a duly executed waiver of notice thereof.
Place of Meetings.
     Section 2. Annual meetings of stockholders shall be held date and time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. At such meeting the stockholders shall elect by a plurality vote a Board of Directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
Annual Meetings.
on the third Thursday of May in each year if not a legal holiday and if a legal holiday then on the next business day following at 2:30 P.M. or at such other
at such
     Section 3. notice of the annual meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each stockholder entitled to vote at such
Notice of Annual Meeting.
Written
Except as provided by law, written
 
meeting not less than ten nor more than days before the date of the meeting.
fifty
sixty
     Section 4. The officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the corporation shall prepare and make, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of meeting, or if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.
List of Stockholders.
     Section 5. Special meetings of the stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, unless otherwise prescribed by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation, may be called by the President and shall be called by the President or Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the Board of Directors, or at the request in writing of stockholders owning a majority in amount of the entire capital stock of the corporation issued and outstanding and entitled to vote. Such request shall state the purpose or purposes of the proposed meeting.
Special Meetings.
     Section 6. notice of a special meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than ten nor more than days before the date of the meeting, to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting.
Notice of Special Meeting.
Written
Except as provided by law, written
fifty
sixty
     Section 7. Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice.
Business Transacted at Special Meeting.
     Section 8. The holders of one-half of the stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation. If, however, such quorum shall not be present or represented at any meeting of the stockholders, the stockholders entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall have the power to adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present or represented. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally notified. If the adjournment is for more
Quorum.
 
than thirty days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.
     Section 9. When a quorum is present at any meeting, the vote of the holders of a majority of the stock having voting power present in person or represented by proxy shall decide any question brought before such meeting, unless the question is one upon which by express provision of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation, a different vote is required in which case such express provision shall govern and control the decision of such question
Vote Requirements.
,
.
,
or unless the question brought before the meeting is election of Directors, in which case Directors shall be elected by plurality vote.
     Section 10. Each stockholder shall at every meeting of the stockholders be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy for each share of the capital stock having voting power held by such stockholder, but no proxy shall be voted on after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.
Vote in Person or by Proxy.
     
Section 11. Whenever the vote of stockholders at a meeting thereof is required or permitted to be taken for or in connection with any corporate action, by any provision of the statutes, the meeting and vote of stockholders may be dispensed with if all of the stockholders who would have been entitled to vote upon the action if such meeting were held shall consent in writing to such corporate action being taken; or if the Certificate of Incorporation authorizes the action to be taken with the written consent of the holders of less than all of the stockholders who would have been entitled to vote upon the action if a meeting were held, then on the written consent of the stockholders having not less than such percentage of the total number of votes as may be authorized in the Certificate of Incorporation; provided that in no case shall the written consent be by the holders of stock having less than the minimum percentage of the total vote required by statute for the proposed corporate action, and provided that prompt notice must be given to all stockholders of the taking of corporate action without a meeting and by less than unanimous written consent.
Action without Meeting.
     
Section 11.
Action without Meeting. Stockholders may not take action by written consent in lieu of a meeting.
     
Section 12. Nomination of Directors. Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as Directors. The nomination for election to the Board of Directors of the corporation at a meeting of stockholders may be made by the Board of Directors or by any stockholder (i) who is a stockholder of record on the date of the giving of notice provided for in this
 
Section 12 and on the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 12. Nominations, other than those made by or on behalf of the Board of Directors, for the election of Directors at an annual meeting of stockholders shall be made by notice in writing delivered or mailed by first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary, and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the annual meeting is not held within thirty days before or after such anniversary date, then such nomination shall have been delivered to or mailed and received by the Secretary not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever occurs first. Nominations, other than those made by or on behalf of the Board of Directors, for the election of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders shall be made by notice in writing delivered to or mailed and received by the Secretary not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the special meeting was made, whichever occurs first. Such notice shall set forth (a) as to each proposed nominee (i) the name, age, business address and, if known, residence address of each such nominee, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of each such nominee, (iii) the class and number of shares of stock of the corporation which are beneficially owned by each such nominee, and (iv) any other information concerning the nominee that must be disclosed as to nominees in proxy solicitations pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including such person's written consent to be named as a nominee and to serve as a Director if elected; and (b) as to the stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder. The corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as a Director of the corporation.
     
The chairman of the meeting may, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
 
     
Section 13. Notice of Business at Annual Meetings. At an annual meeting of the stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) otherwise properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder (i) who is a stockholder of record on the date of the giving of notice provided for in this Section 13 and on the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at such annual meeting, and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 13. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, if such business relates to the election of Directors of the corporation, the procedures in Section 12 of this Article II must be complied with. If such business relates to any other matter, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be made in writing, delivered or mailed by first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary, and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the annual meeting is not held within thirty days before or after such anniversary date, then for the notice by the stockholder to be timely it must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever occurs first. To be in proper written form, a stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's books, of the stockholder proposing such business, (c) the class and number of shares of the corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder, (d) any material interest of the stockholder in such business and (e) a representation that such stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to bring such business before the meeting. Notwithstanding anything in these By-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 13, except that any stockholder proposal which complies with Rule 14a-8 of the proxy rules, or any successor provision, promulgated
 
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and is to be included in the corporation's proxy statement for an annual meeting of stockholders shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this Section 13.
     
The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 13, and if he or she should so determine, the chairman shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
     Section 1. The number of Directors which shall constitute the whole Board shall be the number at any given time determined by the Board. The Directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of stockholders, except as provided in Section 2 of this Article, and each Director elected shall hold office until his successor is elected and qualified.
Number and Election.
Directors need not be stockholders.
     Section 2. Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of Directors may be filled by a majority of the Directors then in office though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining Director, and the Directors so chosen shall hold office until the next annual election and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, unless sooner displaced. If there are no Directors in office, then an election of Directors may be held in the manner provided by statute. If, at the time of filling any vacancy or any newly created directorship, the Directors then in office shall constitute less than a majority of the whole Board (as constituted immediately prior to any such increase), the Court of Chancery may, upon application of any stockholder or stockholders holding at least ten percent of the total number of the shares at the time outstanding having the right to vote for such Directors, summarily order an election to be held to fill any such vacancies or newly created directorships, or to replace the Directors chosen by the Directors then in office.
Vacancies.
     Section 3. The business of the corporation shall be managed by its Board of Directors which may exercise all such powers of the corporation and do all such lawful acts and things
Authority of Board of Directors.
 
as are not by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these By-laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.
     Section 4. The Board of Directors of the corporation may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware. A meeting of the Board of Directors be held immediately following the annual meeting of stockholders.
Meetings of the Board of Directors.
may
shall
without notice
     Section 5. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times as are fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board
Regular Meetings.
and places
but no less than quarterly, commencing in April, 1983, upon not less than three days' prior notice, on the Thursday subsequent to the third Monday of each month. Meetings will commence at 9:00 A.M. at the offices of the corporation or at such other time and at such other place as shall be determined by the Board of Directors.
. No notice need be given for regular meetings.
     Section 6. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the President on not less than days' prior notice to each Director, either personally by mail or by Special meetings shall be called by the President or Secretary in like manner and on like notice on the written request of two Directors.
Special Meetings.
three
two
or
,
telegram
.
electronic transmission
     Section 7. At all meetings of the Board of Directors Directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the act of a majority of the Directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the Directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Quorum.
six
a majority of the total number of
     Section 8. Unless otherwise restricted by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-laws, any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or of any Committee thereof may be taken without a meeting, if all members of the Board or Committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or Committee
Action without Meeting.
,
or by electronic transmission
or electronic transmission or transmissions
.
. Such filing shall be in paper form if the minutes are maintained in paper form and in electronic form if the minutes are maintained in electronic form
     Section 9. The Board of Directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the whole Board of Directors, designate one or more Committees, each Committee to consist of two or more of
Committees of Directors.
 
the Directors of the corporation. The Board of Directors may designate one or more Directors as alternate members of any Committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the Committee. Any such Committee, to the extent provided in the resolution, shall have and may exercise the powers of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it; provided, however, that in the absence or disqualification of any member of such Committee or Committees, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not he or they constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member. Such Committee or Committees shall have such name or names as may be determined from time to time by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors.
     Section 10. Each Committee may hold meetings, regular and/or special, either within or without the State of Delaware. regular special meeting of a Committee shall be held on not less than days' prior notice to each member of such Committee
Meetings of Committees.
Any
No notice need be given for
or
meetings of a Committee. Any
three
two
.
, either personally, by mail or by electronic transmission.
     Section 11. Each Committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.
Minutes of Committee Meetings.
     Section 12. The Directors may be paid such compensation as the Board of Directors shall deem advisable.
Compensation of Directors.
     Section 13. . The Board of Directors at its first meeting after each annual meeting of stockholders, or at such other time as it may determine, shall choose a Chairman of the Board. The Chairman of the Board shall preside at meetings of the Board, shall be the Chairman of the Executive Committee, and shall have such other powers and duties as shall from time to time be assigned by the Board of Directors.
The Chairman of the Board
     Section 1. Whenever, under the provisions of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation or of these By-laws, notice is required to be given to any Director or stockholder, it shall not be construed to mean personal notice, but such notice may be given in writing by mail, addressed to such Director or stockholder at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid, and such
Form of Notice.
 
notice shall be deemed to be given at the time when the same shall be deposited in the United States mail. Notice to Directors may also be given
by telegram.
personally and by electronic transmission.
     Section 2. Whenever any notice is required to be given under the provisions of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation or of these By-laws, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent thereto.
Waiver of Notice.
or a waiver thereof by electronic transmission by the person or persons entitled to such notice,
     Section 1. The officers of the corporation shall be chosen by the Board of Directors and shall be a President, one or more Vice-Presidents, a Secretary, a Treasurer, a Controller, and a General CounselThe Board of Directors may designate certain Vice-Presidents as executive or senior Vice-Presidents and may affix such functional designations to Vice-Presidential titles as it shall deem appropriate. The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, Assistant Controllers, and Associate General Counsels. Any number of offices may be held by the same person unless the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-laws otherwise provide. The Board of Directors may authorize and approve the terms of employment contracts with officers covering the duties, term, compensation, and other terms of the employment of officers.
Officers.
a Chief Financial Officer,
.
     Section 2. The Board of Directors may appoint such other officers and agents as it shall deem necessary who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Appointment of
Other
Officers
The Board of Directors at its first meeting after each annual meeting of stockholders shall choose a President, one or more Vice-Presidents, a Secretary, one or more Assistant Secretaries, a Treasurer, one or more Assistant Treasurers, a Controller, one or more Assistant Controllers, a General Counsel and one or more Associate General Counsels. Section 3.
at First Meeting of Newly Elected Board of Directors.
Appointment of Officers from Time to Time.
     Section  The compensation of all officers of the corporation shall be fixed by the Board of Directors.
4.
3.
Compensation of Officers.
     Section The officers of the corporation shall hold office until their successors are
5.
4.
Terms of Office.
 
chosen and qualify. Any other officer elected or appointed by the Board of Directors may be removed at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Board of Directors. Any vacancy occurring in any office of the corporation shall be filled by the Board of Directors.
     Section The President shall be Chief Executive Officer of the corporation and shall have all powers ordinarily exercised by the President and Chief Executive Officer of a corporation and such other powers and duties as shall from time to time be assigned to him by the Board of Directors. The President may execute on behalf of the corporation stock certificates, bonds, contracts, deeds, mortgages, or other instruments authorized by the Board of Directors, except in cases where the signing or execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board or by these By-laws to some other officer or agent of the corporation or such documents or instruments shall be required by law to be signed or executed otherwise, and the President may affix the seal of the corporation to any instrument requiring the same. In the performance of all the duties hereunder, the President shall be subject to the supervision of, and shall report to, the Board of Directors.
6.
5.
The President.
In the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board, or in the event that for any reason it is impracticable for the Chairman to act personally, the President shall have the powers and duties of the Chairman, including the responsibility to preside at all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors in the absence of the Chairman of the Board.
     
Section 6.
Chief Financial Officer. The Chief Financial Officer shall have general supervision of the financial operations of the corporation. The Chief Financial Officer shall also perform such duties and have such other powers as may from time to time be prescribed by the Board of Directors or the President.
     Section 7. The Vice-Presidents shall perform such duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
The Vice-Presidents.
In the absence of the President or in the event of the President's inability or refusal to act, the Vice-President (or in the event there be more than one Vice-President, the Vice-Presidents in the order designated, or in the absence of any designation, then in the order of their election) shall perform the duties of the President, and when so acting, shall have the powers of and be subject to all the restrictions upon the President.
other
or the President
     Section 8. The Secretary shall attend all meetings of the Board of Directors and its Committees and all meetings of the stockholders and record all the proceedings of all such meetings in a book to be kept for that purpose. The Secretary shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors and its Committees, and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as may be prescribed by the Board of Directors or President, under
The Secretary.
or other officer who either shall designate,
 
whose supervision he shall be. The Secretary shall have custody of the corporate seal of the corporation and the Secretary or Assistant Secretary shall have the authority to affix the same to any instrument requiring it and when so affixed, it may be attested by the Secretary's signature or by the signature of such Assistant Secretary. The Board of Directors may give general authority to any other officer to affix the seal of the corporation and to attest the affixing by the signature of such officer.
     Section 9. The Assistant Secretary, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Secretaries in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Secretary, or at the Secretary's request, or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, or if the office of is vacant, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
The Assistant Secretary.
secretary
Secretary
, the President or the Secretary
     Section 10. The Treasurer shall have the custody of the corporate funds and securities and shall keep full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements in books belonging to the corporation and shall deposit all moneys and other valuable effects in the name and to the credit of the corporation in such depositories as may be designated by the Board of Directors The Treasurer shall disburse the funds of the corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors , or as he may deem appropriate, taking proper vouchers for such disbursements, and shall render to the President and the Board of Directors, at its regular meetings, or when the Board of Directors so requires, an account of all transactions of the Treasurer.
The Treasurer.
or its Executive Committee.
or its Executive Committee
     Section 11. The Assistant Treasurer, or if there shall be more than one, the Assistant Treasurers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Treasurer, or at the Treasurer's request, or, in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board
If required by the Board of Directors, the Treasurer shall give the corporation a bond (which shall be renewed every six years) in such sum and with such surety or sureties as shall be satisfactory to the Board of Directors for the faithful performance of the duties of the Treasurer's office and for the restoration of the corporation, in case of the Treasurer's death, resignation, retirement or removal from office, of all books, papers, vouchers, money and other property of whatever kind in the possession or under the control of the Treasurer belonging to the corporation. Section 12.
Bonding of Treasurer.
The Assistant Treasurer.
 
of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
, the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Treasurer
     Section The Controller shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as are ordinarily performed or exercised by the Controller of a corporation and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
13.
12.
The Controller.
be the Chief Accounting Officer of the corporation and shall
, the President or the Chief Financial Officer
     Section The Assistant Controller, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Controllers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Controller or at the Controller's request, or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Controller and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
14.
13.
The Assistant Controller.
, the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Controller
     Section The General Counsel shall be the Chief Legal Officer of the corporation and shall act as legal advisor to the Board of Directors and officers. The General Counsel shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as are ordinarily performed or exercised by the General Counsel of a corporation and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
15.
14.
The General Counsel.
or the President, or other officer who either shall designate,
     Section 16. The Associate General Counsel, or if there be more than one, the Associate General Counsels either in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election) or with such allocations of the duties and powers to, between or among them as may be fixed in a manner authorized by the Board of Directors, shall in the absence of the General Counsel, or at the General Counsel's request, or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, or if the office of General Counsel is vacant, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the General Counsel and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe.
15.
The Associate General Counsel.
, the President or the General Counsel
     Section 1. . Every
Certificates
Form. Shares of stock of the corporation may be represented by stock certificates or uncertificated, as provided by the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware
 
holder of stock in the corporation shall be entitled to have a certificate, signed in the name of the corporation by the Chairman of the Board of Directors, or the President or a Vice-President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or Assistant Secretary of the corporation, certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation.
     Section 2. Where a certificate is countersigned (i) by a transfer agent other than the corporation or its employee, or (ii) by a registrar other than the corporation or its employee, the signatures of the officers of the corporation may be facsimiles. In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of issue.
Signatures on Stock Certificates.
     Section 3. The Board of Directors may direct a new certificate or certificates to be issued in place of any certificate or certificates theretofore issued by the corporation alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming the certificate of stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed. When authorizing such issue of a new certificate or certificates, the Board of Directors may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or certificates, or his legal representative, to give the corporation a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the corporation with respect to the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed.
Lost Certificates.
to advertise the same in such manner as it shall require and/or
     Section 4. surrender to the corporation or the transfer agent of the corporation of a certificate shares endorsed or accompanied by
Transfers of Stock.
Upon
Except as otherwise established by rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Directors, and subject to applicable law, shares of stock may be transferred on the books of the corporation (a) in the case of shares of stock represented by a certificate, by the
for
representing such
duly
properly
proper evidence of succession, assignment or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.
a written assignment or power of attorney properly executed, or (b) in the case of uncertificated shares, on proper instructions from the holder of record of such shares or the holder's legal representative, in either case with such proof of authority or the authenticity of signature as the corporation or its transfer agent may reasonably require.
     Section 5. In order that the corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to
Fixing Record Date.
 
notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, or to express consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix, in advance, a record date, which shall not be more than sixty nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting, nor more than sixty days prior to any other action. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
     Section 6. The corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Registered Stockholders.
     Section 1. Dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, if any, may be declared by the Board of Directors at any regular or special meeting, pursuant to law. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property, or in shares of the capital stock, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
Dividends.
     Section 2.
Payment of Dividends.
Before payment of any dividend, there may be set aside out of any funds of the corporation available for dividends such sum or sums as the Directors from time to time, in their absolute discretion, think proper as a reserve or reserves to meet contingencies, or for equalizing dividends, or for repairing or maintaining any property of the corporation, or for such other purpose as the Directors shall think conducive to the interest of the corporation, and the Board of Directors may modify or abolish any such reserve in the manner in which it was created.
     
Section 3. The Board of Directors shall prepare and furnish to each stockholder prior to each annual meeting an annual report, and shall present at each annual meeting and at any special meeting of the stockholders when called for by vote of
Annual Statement.
 
All checks or demands for money and notes of the corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the Board of Directors may from time to time designate.
the stockholders, a full and clear statement of the business and condition of the corporation. Section 4.
Checks.
     Section The fiscal year of the corporation shall be fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors.
5.
3.
Fiscal Year.
     Section The corporate seal shall have inscribed thereon the name of the corporation, the year of its organization and the words "Corporate Seal, Delaware." The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced otherwise.
6.
4.
Seal.
     
Section 5.
Electronic Transmissions. For purposes of these By-laws, "electronic transmission" means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such recipient through an automated process.
     Section 1. These By-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors at any regular meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal, or adoption of new by-laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting.
Amendment of By-laws.
     Section 1. Subject to Section 3 of this Article IX, the shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (other than an action by or in the right of the corporation) by reason of the fact that she or he is or was a director or officer, or is or was serving at the request
Power to Indemnify in Actions, Suits or Proceedings other Than Those by or in the Right of the Corporation.
Corporation
corporation
 
of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection with such action, suit or proceeding if she or he acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe her or his conduct was unlawful. The termination of any action, suit or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of or its equivalent, shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had reasonable cause to believe that her or his conduct was unlawful.
nolo
contendere
     Section 2. Subject to Section 3 of this Article IX, the corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action or suit by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that she or he is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection with the defense or settlement of such action or suit if she or he acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation; except that no indemnification shall be made in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which such person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation unless and only to the extent that the Court of Chancery or the court in which such action or suit was brought shall determine upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in view of all the circumstances of the case, such person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for such expenses which the Court of Chancery or such other court shall deem proper.
Power to Indemnify in Actions, Suits or Proceedings by or in the Right of the Corporation.
     Section 3. Any indemnification under this Article IX (unless ordered by a court) shall be made by the corporation only as authorized in the specific case upon a determination that indemnification of the director or officer is proper in the circumstances because she or he has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section 1 or Section 2, of this Article IX, as the case may be. Such determination shall be made (i) by the Board of Directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who were not
Authorization of Indemnification.
 
parties to such action, suit or proceeding, or (ii) a quorum directors so by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or () by the stockholders. To the extent, however, that a director or officer of the corporation has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of any action, suit or proceeding described above, or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, she or he shall be indemnified against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection therewith, without the necessity of authorization in the specific case.
if such
by a committee of such directors designated by majority vote of such directors, even though less than
is not obtainable, or, even if obtainable a quorum of disinterested
,
or (iii) if there are no such directors, or if such
directs
,
direct
iii
iv
     Section 4. For purposes of any determination under Section 3 of this Article IX, a person shall be deemed to have acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, or, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, to have had no reasonable cause to believe her or his conduct was unlawful, if her or his action is based on the records or books of account of the corporation or another enterprise, or on information supplied to her or him by the officers of the corporation or another enterprise in the course of their duties, or on the advice of legal counsel for the corporation or another enterprise or on information or records given or reports made to the corporation or another enterprise by an independent certified public accountant or by an appraiser or other expert selected with reasonable care by the corporation or another enterprise. The term "another enterprise" as used in this Section 4 shall mean any other corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise of which such person is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer. The provisions of this Section 4 shall not be deemed to be exclusive or to limit in any way the circumstances in which a person may be deemed to have met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section 1 or 2 of this Article IX, as the case may be.
Good Faith Defined.
     Section 5. Notwithstanding any contrary determination in the specific case under Section 3 of this Article IX, and notwithstanding the absence of any determination thereunder, any director or officer may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction in the State of Delaware for indemnification to the extent otherwise permissible under Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX. The basis of such indemnification by a court shall be a determination by such court that indemnification of the director or officer is proper in the circumstances because she or he has met the applicable standards of conduct set forth in Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX, as the case may be. Notice of any application for indemnification pursuant to this Section 5 shall be given to the corporation promptly upon the filing of such application.
Indemnification by a Court.
 
     Section 6. Expenses incurred in defending or investigating a threatened or pending action, suit or proceeding may be paid by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit or proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer to repay such amount if it shall ultimately be determined that she or he is not entitled to be indemnified by the corporation as authorized in this Article IX.
Expenses Payable in Advance.
     Section 7. The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by or granted pursuant to this Article IX shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled under any by-law, agreement, contract, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or pursuant to the direction (howsoever embodied) of any court of competent jurisdiction or otherwise, both as to action in her or his official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office, it being the policy of the corporation that indemnification of the persons specified in Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX shall be made to the fullest extent permitted by law. The provisions of this Article IX shall not be deemed to preclude the indemnification of any person who is not specified in Sections 1 or 2 of this Article IX but whom the corporation has the power or obligation to indemnify under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, or otherwise.
Non-exclusivity of Indemnification and Advancement of Expenses.
     Section 8. The corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against her or him and incurred by her or him in any such capacity, or arising out of her or his status as such, whether or not the corporation would have the power or the obligation to indemnify her or him against such liability under the provisions of this Article IX.
Insurance.
     Section 9. For purposes of this Article IX, references to "the corporation" shall include, in addition to the resulting corporation, any constituent corporation (including any constituent of a constituent) absorbed in a consolidation or merger which, if its separate existence had continued, would have had power and authority to indemnify its directors or officers so that any person who is or was a director or officer of such constituent corporation, or is or was serving at the request of such constituent corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, shall stand in the same position under the provisions of this Article IX with respect to the resulting or
Meaning of "Corporation" for Purposes of Article IX.
 
surviving corporation as she or he would have with respect to such constituent corporation if its separate existence had continued.
     Section 10. The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted pursuant to, this section shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director or officer and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such a person.
Survival of Indemnification and Advancement of Expenses.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20090204111653.txt.gz
TIME:20090204111653
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
          On February 3, 2009, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended January 2, 2009. The Company's press release, dated February 3, 2009, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
     Exhibits
     99.1      Press Release, dated February 3, 2009, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended January 2, 2009.
GLENVIEW, IL, February 3, 2009 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Highlights
Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
Fourth Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO stated, "Our fourth quarter results were negatively impacted by an accelerating decline in macro economic trends, particularly in the last few weeks of the quarter. However, when fourth quarter sales trends are evaluated without the effect of foreign exchange and acquisitions, as detailed in the attached tables, we saw both the influence of a softer economy, as well as examples of continuing near-term market strength and success with specific growth initiatives."
"Positive fourth quarter trends included strong organic growth of 33 percent in our European wire and cable business including 47 percent organic growth in European wire and cable sales outside of the U.K. Our emerging market business also generated healthy organic growth in both Asia/Pacific and Latin America resulting in combined year-on-year organic growth of 21 percent. Lastly, our North American OEM supply sales reported organic growth of 20 percent as continued strong growth in the aerospace and defense customer base along with the implementation of new industrial customer programs more than offset customer production slowdowns," said Eck.
"Our North American wire and cable business showed good resilience with 2 percent organic growth despite the declining macro economic environment and a very volatile spot market copper price environment," added Eck. "Sales were affected most negatively by the softening economy in the European OEM supply business where we saw significant customer production cutbacks and extended holiday shutdowns, particularly within the U.K., which resulted in negative organic sales comparisons of 16 percent as compared to the year ago quarter. The other area of our
 
business clearly impacted by the slowing economy was enterprise cabling and security where we had negative year-on-year organic sales comparisons of 4 percent and 8 percent in North America and Europe, respectively. Our security sales, however, continued to show good year-on-year growth albeit at slower rates than in recent quarters."
Fourth Quarter Operating Results
"As outlined above, the deteriorating economic conditions and tight credit markets led to sales declines in select parts of our business. As a result, those conditions led to some associated unusual items that negatively affected our fourth quarter operating results," commented Eck. "The single greatest effect was the bankruptcies of NetVersant and Nortel, which collectively caused us to take a charge of $24.1 million during the quarter for accounts receivable that we estimate will not be collectible. In markets where we experienced measureable sales declines, we were aggressive in reducing both headcount and facilities costs. Together, headcount reductions and lease write-downs resulted in a cost of $8.1 million in the quarter. We anticipate 2009 expense savings of $14.7 million associated with these actions. Lastly, while the rapidly softening economy drove down spot market copper prices in the quarter it did not have a significant effect on product pricing. However, it did necessitate the recording of a $2.0 million markdown on the carrying value of certain product lines of our wire and cable inventory in Europe. It is important to note that this adjustment is less than 1 percent of the company's total wire and cable inventory."
Eck continued, "The reduced sales volumes also produced some operating deleveraging in the quarter that was further compounded by the added operating expenses of the 53 week in our fiscal year, with little noticeable incremental year-over-year sales volume in the final fiscal month of the year. The substantially lower activity levels experienced during the last few weeks of December reflected not only the normal holiday impact, but an environment where many customers scaled back all activities to conserve cash. This drop-off in sales volume late in the year also resulted in a reassessment of supplier volume incentives earned for the year that led to lower income from those programs in the fourth quarter."
rd
operating margins inclusive of $34.2 million related to the Fourth Quarter 2008 Unusual Items declined to 3.5 percent from 7.7 percent in the year ago quarter.
Total
operating margins inclusive of $26.1 million related to the Fourth Quarter Unusual Items declined to 4.5 percent from 8.6 percent in the year ago quarter as profitability was impacted by lower enterprise cabling sales and lower gross margins associated with supplier volume incentives.
North America
operating margins inclusive of $8.1 million related to the Fourth Quarter 2008 Unusual Items were a negative 2.8 percent as compared to a positive 4.9 percent in the year ago quarter as Europe experienced an organic (exclusive of foreign exchange and acquisitions) sales decline of 6.0 percent, lower supplier volume incentives and an unfavorable sales mix shift.
Europe
operating margins were 8.0 percent, consistent with recent performance, and compared favorably to the 6.8 percent operating margin reported in the year ago quarter.
Emerging Market
 
Twelve Month Results
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the fourth quarter we generated $34.4 million of cash from operations as compared to the $92.9 million generated in the year ago quarter. This reduction in cash flow was entirely related
 
to the drop in net income," said Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "While working capital declined significantly in the fourth quarter, this was driven almost entirely by exchange rate fluctuations. The small working capital reduction, exclusive of foreign exchange effects, is consistent with the fact that fourth quarter sales, exclusive of foreign exchange effects and acquisitions, were down just 3 percent from the immediately preceding quarter, with most of the decline occurring in the last few weeks of the year."
"For the full year 2008, cash flow from operations totaled $125.0 million versus $138.2 million in the prior year with the difference all being attributable to lower net income given that less incremental working capital went into the business in 2008 than 2007 due to lower organic sales growth," added Letham. "The 2008 cash flow from operations was supplemented with $196.3 million of incremental borrowings. During 2008 the company used $180.3 million of cash for acquisitions, $104.6 million for share repurchases and $32.7 million for capital expenditures."
Letham continued, "As we manage through this slower economic period we will continue to adjust our working capital investment to reflect the near-term economic outlook. This will likely result in strong cash flow generation as the cash from net income increases without the effects of the Fourth Quarter 2008 Unusual Items and working capital investment is reduced in response to lower organic sales growth. In the short run, this cash flow will be used to reduce borrowings and enhance liquidity until an improving economy creates a more favorable environment to pursue acquisitions or other strategic actions that increase shareholder value."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the fourth quarter and year end include:
Business Outlook
Eck said, "The accelerated global economic slowdown in the final two quarters of 2008 had an increasingly negative impact on our performance as the year drew to a conclusion. The effects on our business, however, varied widely by geography and end market. We have been responsive to the changing macro environment by implementing headcount reductions and reduced facilities commitments in those geographies and end markets where the downturn has been most pronounced. At this time it is too early to ascertain if the trends of late 2008 are continuing, stabilizing or abating. However, it is likely, based on many economic forecasts, that the next few quarters will show limited, if any, sales growth. We will continue to take appropriate actions to realign our expense structure with market realities, but always with a goal of ensuring we retain personnel and resources vital to capitalize on growth opportunities when the economy improves."
"While we will be vigilant as to actions necessitated by the near-term economic outlook during the next few quarters, we will also remain focused on our strategic initiatives including growing our security and OEM supply businesses, further developing an industrial automation network sales effort, adding to our supply chain services offering, enlarging the geographic presence of our electrical wire & cable business, and expanding our product offering. The company is well positioned to withstand this recessionary environment and successfully execute on its strategic plan," Eck concluded.
 
2009 Accounting Change
As required by Financial Accounting Standards Board Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "" the company will account separately for the debt and equity components of its outstanding convertible bonds in 2009. As a result of this change, the company anticipates that diluted earnings per share for fiscal 2009 will be approximately 23 cents less than they would have been under the prior accounting rules. At the same time, the adoption of these new rules requires that the company restate its previously reported results to give effect to these new rules. The effect of this will be to reduce earnings per diluted share by 20 cents and 19 cents for fiscal 2008 and fiscal 2007, respectively, from the amounts previously reported and discussed herein.
Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlement)
Fourth Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2008 fourth quarter on Tuesday, February 3, 2009 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com/webcasts
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 237 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 271 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, technology changes, changes in supplier or customer relationships, commodity price fluctuations, exchange rate fluctuations, new or changed competitors and risks associated with integration of recently acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This release includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20090311131244.txt.gz
TIME:20090311131244
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
     On March 6, 2009, Anixter International Inc. and Anixter Inc. entered into an Underwriting Agreement with Banc of America Securities LLC, as representative of the underwriters named therein (the "Underwriting Agreement"), with respect to the offering and sale of $200,000,000 of 10% Senior Notes due 2014 (the "Notes"). The sale closed on March 11, 2009. The purchase price paid by the underwriters was 90.625% of the aggregate principal amount. The Notes were issued under the Indenture by and among Anixter Inc., Anixter International Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee, dated as of September 9, 1996, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 24, 2005, and the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 11, 2009 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"). The Notes were issued by Anixter Inc. and guaranteed by Anixter International Inc. The Notes were sold pursuant to an effective registration statement on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-153607 and 333-153607-01). On March 11, 2009, Anixter International Inc. issued a press release related to the offering of the Notes (the "Press Release") .
     A copy of the Underwriting Agreement, the Second Supplemental Indenture, the form of Note and the Press Release are filed as Exhibit 1.1, 4.1, 4.2 and 99.1, respectively, to this Report on Form 8-K, and are hereby incorporated by reference herein.
 
Item 2.03.  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
     See Item 1.01.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
      The following exhibit is filed herewith:
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 1.1
 
March 6, 2009
BANC OF AMERICA SECURITIES LLC      As Representative of the several Underwriters c/o BANC OF AMERICA SECURITIES LLC One Bryant Park New York, NY 10036
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell to the several underwriters named in (the "Underwriters") $200,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of its 10% Senior Notes due 2014 (the "Notes"). Banc of America Securities LLC ("BAS") has agreed to act as representative of the several Underwriters (in such capacity, the "Representative") in connection with the offering and sale of the Notes. The Notes will be guaranteed (the "Guarantee") by Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation and parent of the Company (the "Guarantor"). The Notes and the Guarantee are collectively referred to as the "Securities".
Introductory.
Schedule A
     The Securities will be issued pursuant to the terms, and subject to the conditions, set forth in the indenture dated as of September 9, 1996, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 24, 2005 and by a Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 11, 2009 (as supplemented, the "Indenture"), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee (the "Trustee"), on the Closing Date (as defined herein). Certain terms of the Securities will be established pursuant to an officer's certificate dated as of March 11, 2009 pursuant to the terms of the Indenture.
     The Company and the Guarantor hereby confirm their agreements with the Underwriters as follows:
        
Section 1. Representations and Warranties of the Company.
     The Company and the Guarantor each hereby jointly and severally represent and warrant to, and covenant with, each Underwriter as follows:
     (a) The Company and the Guarantor have prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333- 153607), which contains a base prospectus (the "Base Prospectus") to be used in connection with the public offering and sale of the Securities. Such registration statement, as amended, including the financial statements, exhibits and schedules thereto at the time of effectiveness under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (collectively, the "Securities Act"), including any required information deemed to be a part thereof at the time of effectiveness pursuant
 
to Rule 430B under the Securities Act or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act"), is called the "Registration Statement". Any registration statement filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Securities Act is called the "Rule 462(b) Registration Statement", and from and after the date and time of filing of the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement the term "Registration Statement" shall include the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement. Any preliminary prospectus supplement to the Base Prospectus that describes the Securities and the offering hereby and is used prior to the filing of the Final Prospectus is called, together with the Base Prospectus, a "preliminary prospectus". The term "Prospectus" shall mean the final prospectus supplement relating to the Securities, together with the Base Prospectus, that is first filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act after the date and time that this Agreement is executed and delivered by the parties hereto (the "Execution Time") or, if no filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act is required, shall mean the form of final prospectus relating to the Securities included in the Registration Statement at the effective date. Any reference herein to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3. All references in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendments or supplements to any of the foregoing, shall include any copy thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System ("EDGAR").
     (b) The Company and the Guarantor meet the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the Securities Act. The Registration Statement has become effective under the Securities Act. The Company and the Guarantor have complied to the Commission's satisfaction with all requests of the Commission for additional or supplemental information. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, the Commission has not issued any order or notice preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, are contemplated or threatened by the Commission.
Compliance with Registration and Exchange Act Requirements.
     Each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus when filed complied in all material respects with the Securities Act. Each of the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto, at the time it became effective and at the date hereof, complied and will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading. The Prospectus (including any Prospectus wrapper), as amended or supplemented, as of its date, at the date hereof, at the time of any filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act and at the Closing Date (as defined herein) did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representations and warranties set forth in the two immediately preceding sentences do not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto, or the Prospectus, or any amendments or supplements thereto, based upon and in conformity with written information
 
furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through BAS expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof. There is no contract or other document required to be described in the Prospectus or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement that has not been described or filed as required.
     (c) The documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable.
     (d) The term "Disclosure Package" shall mean (i) the Base Prospectus, including any preliminary prospectus supplement, if any, as amended or supplemented, (ii) the Final Term Sheet (as defined herein), (iii) any other issuer free writing prospectuses as defined in Rule 433 under the Securities Act (each, an "Issuer Free Writing Prospectus"), if any, that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to treat as part of the Disclosure Package and (iv) any other free writing prospectus that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to treat as part of the Disclosure Package. As of 10:00 a.m., New York time, on the date of execution and delivery of this Agreement (the "Applicable Time"), the Disclosure Package did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The preceding sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from the Disclosure Package based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through BAS expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof.
Disclosure Package.
     (e) . (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Securities Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus) and (iii) at any other time specified in the Securities Act for determining whether each of the Company and the Guarantor is a "well known season issuer" in connection with the offering of the Securities, each of the Company and the Guarantor was and is a "well known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. The Registration Statement is an "automatic shelf registration statement," as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act, that automatically became effective not more than three years prior to the Execution Time. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor has received from the Commission any notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) of the Securities Act objecting to use of the automatic shelf registration statement form and neither the Company nor the Guarantor has otherwise ceased to be eligible to use the automatic shelf registration form.
Each of Company and Guarantor is a Well-Known Seasoned Issuer
     (f) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement and (ii) as of the date of the execution and delivery of this Agreement (with such date being used as the determination date for purposes of this clause (ii)), neither the Company nor the Guarantor was and is an Ineligible Issuer (as de-
Neither Company nor Guarantor Ineligible Issuer.
 
fined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act), without taking account of any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 under the Securities Act that it is not necessary that the Company or the Guarantor be considered an Ineligible Issuer.
     (g) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the offering of Securities under this Agreement or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies BAS as described in the next sentence, did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, including any prospectus or prospectus supplement that is or becomes part of the Registration Statement. If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Company has promptly notified or will promptly notify BAS and has promptly amended or supplemented or will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict. The foregoing two sentences do not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through BAS expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8 hereof.
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses.
     (h) Neither the Company nor the Guarantor has distributed or will distribute, prior to the later of Closing Date and the completion of the Underwriters' distribution of the Securities, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Securities other than a preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus (as defined herein), the Final Term Sheet (as defined herein) or the Registration Statement.
Distribution of Offering Material By the Company or the Guarantor.
     (i) . There are no persons with registration or other similar rights to have any equity or debt securities registered for sale under the Registration Statement or included in the offering contemplated by this Agreement, except for such rights as have been duly waived.
No Applicable Registration or Other Similar Rights
     (j) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Disclosure Package, (i) there has been no material adverse change, or any development that could reasonably be expected to result in a material adverse change, in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business, properties or operations whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries, considered as one entity (any such change is called a "Material Adverse Change"); (ii) the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries, considered as one entity, have not incurred any material liability or obligation, indirect, direct or contingent, nor entered into any material transaction or agreement; and (iii) there has been no dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made by the Guarantor or, except for dividends paid to the Company, the Guarantor or other subsidiaries, any of its subsidiaries on any class of capital stock or repurchase or redemption by the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries of any class of capital stock.
No Material Adverse Change
 
     (k) . Each of the Company, the Guarantor and each "significant subsidiary" of the Guarantor (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X under the 1933 Act) (each, including the Company, a "Subsidiary" and, collectively, the "Subsidiaries") has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and has corporate power and authority to own or lease, as the case may be, and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and, in the case of the Company and the Guarantor, to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement. Each of the Company, the Guarantor and each Subsidiary is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except for such jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, result in a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or on the earnings, business, properties or operations, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries, considered as one entity (a "Material Adverse Effect"). All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each Subsidiary have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance or claim. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Guarantor, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance or claim.
Incorporation and Good Standing of the Company, the Guarantor and certain Subsidiaries
     (l) . The authorized, issued and outstanding capital stock of the Guarantor is as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (other than for subsequent issuances, if any, pursuant to employee benefit plans described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants or convertible notes described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, as the case may be). All of the issued and outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Guarantor have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and have been issued in compliance with federal and state securities laws. None of the outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Guarantor were issued in violation of any preemptive rights, rights of first refusal or other similar rights to subscribe for or purchase securities of the Guarantor. There are no authorized or outstanding options, warrants, preemptive rights, rights of first refusal or other rights to purchase, or equity or debt securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, any capital stock of the Guarantor, the Company or any of its subsidiaries other than those accurately described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. The description of the Company's and the Guarantor's stock option, stock bonus and other stock plans or arrangements, and the options or other rights granted thereunder, set forth or incorporated by reference in each of the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus accurately and fairly presents the information required to be shown with respect to such plans, arrangements, options and rights.
Capitalization and Other Capital Stock Matters
 
     (m) . The Notes to be purchased by the Underwriters from the Company are in the form contemplated by the Indenture, have been duly authorized for issuance and sale pursuant to this Agreement and the Indenture and, at the Closing Date, will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor, will constitute valid and binding agreements of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors or by general equitable principles and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture. The Guarantee of the Notes is in the form contemplated by the Indenture, has been duly authorized for issuance and sale pursuant to this Agreement and the Indenture and, at the Closing Date, will have been duly executed by the Guarantor and, when the Notes have been authenticated in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor, will constitute a valid and binding agreement of the Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors or by general equitable principles and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture.
The Notes and Guarantee
     (n) . The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and the Guarantor and, at the Closing Date, will have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor and will constitute a valid and binding agreement of the Company and the Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors or by general equitable principles.
The Indenture
     (o) . The Securities and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Conformance of Description of Notes
     (p) . None of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including, without limitation, the use of the proceeds from the sale of the Securities) will violate or result in a violation of Section 7 of the Exchange Act, or any regulation promulgated thereunder, including, without limitation, Regulations T, U, and X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Certain Regulations
     (q) . Neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any Subsidiary is (i) in violation or in default (or, with the giving of notice or lapse of time, would be in default) under ("Default") its charter or by-laws, (ii) in Default under any indenture, mortgage, loan or credit agreement, deed of trust, note, contract, franchise, lease or other agreement, obligation, condition, covenant or instrument to which the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary is subject (each, an "Existing Instrument"), or (iii) in violation of any
Non-Contravention of Existing Instruments
 
statute, law, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company, the Guarantor or such Subsidiary or any of its properties, as applicable, except with respect to clauses (ii) and (iii) only, for such Defaults or violations as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company's and the Guarantor's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities and consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby (including, without limitation, the issuance of the Securities), by the Disclosure Package and by the Prospectus (i) have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not result in any Default under the charter or by-laws of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary, (ii) will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or Default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries pursuant to, or require the consent of any other party to, any Existing Instrument, and (iii) will not result in any violation of any statute, law, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree applicable to the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries or any of its or their properties.
     (r) . No consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court or other governmental or regulatory authority or agency is required for the Company's or the Guarantor's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities and consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, by the Disclosure Package and by the Prospectus, except such as have been obtained or made by the Company and are in full force and effect under the Securities Act, or as may be required under applicable state securities or blue sky laws and from the FINRA.
No Further Authorizations or Approvals Required
     (s) . There are no legal or governmental actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the best of the Company's or the Guarantors knowledge, threatened (i) against or affecting the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries or (ii) which has as the subject thereof any officer or director of the Company, the Guarantors or any Subsidiaries in his or her role as an officer or director thereof, or property owned or leased by the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries, and, in each case, which if determined adversely, would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or adversely affect the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
No Material Actions or Proceedings
     (t) . The Guarantor is subject to and in compliance in all material respects with the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
Exchange Act Compliance
     (u) . Ernst & Young LLP, who have expressed their opinion with respect to the financial statements (which term as used in this Agreement includes the related notes thereto) and supporting schedules filed with the Commission as
Independent Accountants
 
a part of the Registration Statement and included in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, is an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company and the Guarantor as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and the applicable published rules and regulations thereunder.
     (v) . The financial statements filed with the Commission as a part of or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and included or incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, together with the related schedules and notes, present fairly the consolidated financial position of the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries as of and at the dates indicated and the results of their operations and cash flows for the periods specified. The supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein. Such financial statements and supporting schedules comply as to form with the applicable accounting requirements of the Securities Act and have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles as applied in the United States applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved, except as may be expressly stated in the related notes thereto. No other financial statements or supporting schedules are required to be included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement. The financial data set forth in the preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus under the captions "Summary Consolidated Financial Data of Anixter International" and "Capitalization" fairly present the information set forth therein on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements contained in the Registration Statement. The Guarantor's ratios of earnings to fixed charges set forth in each of the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Ratios of Earnings to Fixed Charges" and in Exhibit 12 to the Registration Statement have been calculated in compliance in all material respects with the requirements of Item 503(d) of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act.
Preparation of Financial Statements
     (w) . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor.
The Underwriting Agreement
     (x) . The Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries own, possess, license or have other rights to use, on reasonable terms, all patents, patent applications, trade and service marks, trade and service mark registrations, trade names, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets, technology, know-how and other intellectual property (collectively, the "Intellectual Property") necessary for the conduct of the Company's business as now conducted or as proposed in each of the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus to be conducted. Except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any Intellectual Property or of any facts or circumstances which would render any Intellectual Property invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Intellectual Property Rights
 
     (y) . The Company, the Guarantor and each Subsidiary possess such valid and current licenses, certificates, authorizations or permits issued by the appropriate state, federal or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct their respective businesses, and neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any Subsidiary has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of, or non-compliance with, any such license, certificate, authorization or permit which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, could have a Material Adverse Effect.
All Necessary Permits, etc
     (z) . The Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all the properties and assets reflected as owned in the financial statements referred to in Section 1(v) above (or elsewhere in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus), in each case free and clear of any security interests, mortgages, liens, encumbrances, equities, claims and other defects, except (i) as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or (ii) those which do not, singly or in the aggregate, materially and adversely affect the value of such property and do not materially interfere with the use made or proposed to be made of such property by the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries. The real property, improvements, equipment and personal property held under lease by the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary are held under valid and enforceable leases, with such exceptions as are not material and do not materially interfere with the use made or proposed to be made of such real property, improvements, equipment or personal property by the Company, the Guarantor or such Subsidiary.
Title to Properties
     (aa) . The Company, the Guarantor and their consolidated subsidiaries have filed all necessary federal, state, local and foreign income and franchise tax returns in a timely manner and have paid all taxes required to be paid by any of them and, if due and payable, any related or similar assessment, fine or penalty levied against any of them, except for any taxes, assessments, fines or penalties as may be being contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings. The Company and the Guarantor have made appropriate provisions in the applicable financial statements referred to in Section 1 (v) above in respect of all federal, state, local and foreign income and franchise taxes for all current or prior periods as to which the tax liability of the Company, the Guarantor or any of their consolidated subsidiaries has not been finally determined.
Tax Law Compliance
     (bb) . The Company and the Guarantor have been advised of the rules and requirements under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "Investment Company Act"). Neither the Company nor the Guarantor is, and after receipt of payment for the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in each of the preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus will be, an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act and will conduct its business in a manner so that it will not become subject to the Investment Company Act.
"Investment Company"
     (cc) . Each of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries are insured under policies in such amounts and with such deductibles and covering such risks
Insurance
 
as are generally deemed adequate and customary for their businesses including, but not limited to, policies covering real and personal property owned or leased by the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries against theft, damage, destruction, acts of vandalism and earthquakes. All policies of insurance and fidelity or surety bonds insuring the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries or their respective businesses, assets, employees, officers and directors are in full force and effect; the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies and instruments in all material respects; and there are no claims by the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries under any such policy or instrument as to which any insurance company is denying liability or defending under a reservation of rights clause, except for defenses under a reservations of rights clause where the failure to have coverage would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any such subsidiary has been refused any insurance coverage sought or applied for.
     (dd) . No domestic subsidiary of the Company, other than Anixter Receivables Corporation, is currently contractually prohibited, directly or indirectly, from paying any dividends or other distributions to the Company, from making any other distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring any of such subsidiary's property or assets to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor, except as described in or contemplated by the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
No Restrictions on Dividends or Other Distributions
     (ee) . Neither the Company nor the Guarantor has taken and will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or that might be reasonably expected to cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company or the Guarantor to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities.
No Price Stabilization or Manipulation
     (ff) . There are no business relationships or related-party transactions involving the Company, the Guarantor or any subsidiary or any other person required to be described in the preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus that have not been described as required.
Related Party Transactions
     (gg) . The Guarantor maintains (i) effective internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rule 13a-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and (ii) a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain asset accountability; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
Internal Controls and Procedures
     (hh) . Since the end of the Guarantor's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (i) no material weakness in the
No Material Weakness in Internal Controls
 
Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (ii) no change in the Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting.
     (ii) The Guarantor maintains an effective system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Guarantor in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Guarantor's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. Each of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries have carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act.
Disclosure Controls.
     (jj) With respect to the stock options (the "Stock Options") granted pursuant to the stock-based compensation plans of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries (the "Company Stock Plans"), (i) each Stock Option designated by the Company, the Guarantor or the relevant subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor at the time of grant as an "incentive stock option" under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"), so qualifies, (ii) each grant of a Stock Option was duly authorized no later than the date on which the grant of such Stock Option was by its terms to be effective (the "Grant Date") by all necessary corporate action, including, as applicable, approval by the board of directors of the Company, the Guarantor or the relevant subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor (or a duly constituted and authorized committee thereof) and any required stockholder approval by the necessary number of votes or written consents, and the award agreement governing such grant (if any) was duly executed and delivered by the Guarantor, (iii) each such grant was made in accordance with the terms of the Company Stock Plans, the Exchange Act and all other applicable laws and regulatory rules or requirements, including the rules of the New York Stock Exchange and any other exchange on which the securities of the Company, the Guarantor or the relevant subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor are traded, (iv) the per share exercise price of each Stock Option was equal to or greater than the fair market value of a share of Common Stock on the applicable Grant Date and (v) each such grant was properly accounted for in accordance with GAAP in the consolidated financial statements (including the related notes) of the Company and disclosed in the Company's filings with the Commission in accordance with the Exchange Act and all other applicable laws. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any of its subsidiaries has knowingly granted, and there is no and has been no policy or practice of the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries of granting, Stock Options prior to, or otherwise coordinating the grant of Stock Options with, the release or other public announcement of material information regarding the Company, the Guarantor or their subsidiaries or their results of operations or prospects.
Stock Options.
     (kk) . Neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any of their subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, any director, officer, agent, employee or affiliate of the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries is aware of or has taken any action, directly or indirectly,
No Unlawful Contributions or Other Payments
 
that would result in a violation by such Persons of the FCPA, including, without limitation, making use of the mails or any means or instrumentality of interstate commerce corruptly in furtherance of an offer, payment, promise to pay or authorization of the payment of any money, or other property, gift, promise to give, or authorization of the giving of anything of value to any "foreign official" (as such term is defined in the FCPA) or any foreign political party or official thereof or any candidate for foreign political office, in contravention of the FCPA, and the Company, the Guarantor, its subsidiaries and, to the knowledge of the Company and the Guarantor, its affiliates have conducted their businesses in compliance with the FCPA and have instituted and maintain policies and procedures designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance therewith.
     "FCPA" means Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder.
     (ll) . The operations of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries are and have been conducted at all times in material compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all applicable jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency (collectively, the "Money Laundering Laws") and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, threatened.
No Conflict with Money Laundering Laws
     (mm) . Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as may occur, neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any of their subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, any director, officer, agent, employee or affiliate of the Company, Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Treasury Department ("OFAC"); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds, to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
No Conflict with OFAC Laws
     (nn) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, except as would not, singly or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect (i) neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law and any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release, in any form, or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, asbestos, asbestos containing
Compliance with Environmental Laws
 
materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, hazardous substances, petroleum and petroleum products (collectively, "Hazardous Materials") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, "Environmental Laws"), (ii) the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (iii) there are no pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries after reasonable investigation, threatened actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation or potential responsibility, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Company, Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries, (iv) there are no events, conditions or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to result in any liability of the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries relating to any Hazardous Materials or the violation of any Environmental Laws, (v) neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is conducting or financing, in whole or in part, any investigation, response or other corrective action pursuant to any Environmental Law at any location and (vi) neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is a party to any order, judgment, decree or agreement, which imposes any obligation on any of them under any Environmental Law.
     (oo) . None of the following events has occurred or exists: (i) a failure to fulfill the obligations, if any, under the minimum funding standards of Section 302 of the United States Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"), and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder with respect to a Plan, determined without regard to any waiver of such obligations or extension of any amortization period; (ii) an audit or investigation by the Internal Revenue Service, the U.S. Department of Labor, the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any other federal or state governmental agency or any foreign regulatory agency with respect to the employment or compensation of employees by any member of the Company or the Guarantor that could have a Material Adverse Effect; or (iii) any breach of any contractual obligation, or any violation of law or applicable qualification standards, with respect to the employment or compensation of employees by any member of the Company or the Guarantor that could have a Material Adverse Effect. None of the following events has occurred or is reasonably likely to occur: (i) a material increase in the aggregate amount of contributions required to be made to all Plans in the current fiscal year of the Company and the Guarantor compared to the amount of such contributions made in the Company's and the Guarantor's most recently completed fiscal year; (ii) a material increase in the Company's or the Guarantor's "accumulated post-retirement benefit obligations" (within the meaning of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 106) compared to the amount of such obligations in the Company's or the Guarantor's most recently completed fiscal year; (iii) any event or condition giving rise to a liability under Title IV of ERISA that could have a Material Adverse Effect; or (iv) the filing of a claim by one or more employees or former employees of the Company or the Guarantor related to their employment that could have a Material Adverse Effect. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "Plan" means a plan (within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title IV of ERISA with respect to which any member of the Company or the Guarantor may have any liability.
ERISA Compliance
     (pp) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, there is no broker, finder or other party that is entitled to receive from the
Brokers
 
Company any brokerage or finder's fee or other fee or commission as a result of any transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
     (qq) . There are no outstanding loans, advances (except normal advances for business expenses in the ordinary course of business) or guarantees or indebtedness by the Company or the Guarantor to or for the benefit of any of the executive officers or directors of the Company or the Guarantor or any of the members of any of them, except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
No Outstanding Loans or Other Indebtedness
     (rr) . There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or the Guarantor and any of the Company's or the Guarantor's respective directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act"), including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Sarbanes-Oxley Compliance
     (ss) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package, no "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" as such term is defined for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Securities Act (i) has imposed (or has informed the Company that it is considering imposing) any condition (financial or otherwise) on the Company's or the Guarantor's retaining any rating assigned to the Company or the Guarantor, any securities of the Company or the Guarantor or (ii) has indicated to the Company or Guarantor that it is considering (a) the downgrading, suspension, or withdrawal of, or any review for a possible change that does not indicate the direction of the possible change in, any rating so assigned or (b) any change in the outlook for any rating of the Company or the Guarantor or any securities of the Company or the Guarantor.
Ratings
     (tt) . Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor the Guarantor (i) have any material lending or other relationship with any bank or lending affiliate of any Underwriter and (ii) intend to use any of the proceeds from the sale of the Securities hereunder to repay any outstanding debt owed to any affiliate of any Underwriter (excluding any commercial paper conduit sponsored by any affiliate of any Underwriter).
Lending Relationship
     (uu) . Nothing has come to the attention of the Company or the Guarantor that has caused the Company or the Guarantor to believe that the statistical and market-related data included in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus is not based on or derived from sources that are reliable and accurate in all material respects.
Statistical and Market Related Data
     (vv) . Each of the Company and the Guarantor is, and immediately after the Closing Date will be, Solvent. As used herein, the term "Solvent" means, with respect to any person on a particular date, that on such date (i) the fair market value of the assets of such person is greater than the total amount of liabilities (including contingent liabilities) of such person, (ii) the present fair salable value of the assets of such person is greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liabilities of such person on its debts as they become absolute and matured, (iii) such person is able to realize upon
Solvency
 
its assets and pay its debts and other liabilities, including contingent obligations, as they mature and (iv) such person does not have unreasonably small capital.
     Any certificate signed by an officer of the Company or the Guarantor and delivered to the Representative or to counsel for the Underwriters shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Company and the Guarantor to each Underwriter as to the matters set forth therein.
               
Section 2. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of the Securities.
          (a) The Company agrees to issue and sell to the several Underwriters the Securities upon the terms herein set forth. On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, and upon the terms but subject to the conditions herein set forth, the Underwriters agree, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company the respective aggregate principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their names on Schedule A. The purchase price per Note to be paid by the several Underwriters to the Company shall be equal to 90.625% of the aggregate principal amount thereof.
The Securities.
          (b) Delivery of the Securities to be purchased by the Underwriters and payment therefor shall be made at the offices of Schiff Hardin LLP, 6600 Sears Tower, Chicago, IL 60606 (or such other place as may be agreed to by the Company and BAS) at 9:00 a.m., New York time, on March 11, 2009, or such other time and date not later than 1:30 p.m., New York time, on March 11, 2009 as BAS shall designate by notice to the Company (the time and date of such closing are called the "Closing Date").
The Closing Date.
          (c) The Representative hereby advises the Company that the Underwriters intend to offer for sale to the public, as described in the Prospectus, their respective portions of the Securities as soon after this Agreement has been executed as BAS, in its sole judgment, has determined is advisable and practicable.
Public Offering of the Securities.
          (d) Payment for the Securities shall be made at the Closing Date by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the order of the Company.
Payment for the Securities.
     It is understood that the Representative has been authorized, for its own account and the accounts of the several Underwriters, to accept delivery of and receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Securities the Underwriters have agreed to purchase. BAS, individually and not as the Representative of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment for any Securities to be purchased by any Underwriter whose funds shall not have been received by the Representative by the Closing Date for the account of such Underwriter, but any such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from any of its obligations under this Agreement.
          (e) The Company shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Representative for the accounts of the several Underwriters, the Securities (guaranteed by the Guarantor) the Underwriters have agreed to purchase on the Closing Date, against the irrevocable release of a wire transfer of immediately available funds for the amount of the purchase price therefor. Delivery of the Securities shall be made through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company unless BAS shall otherwise instruct. Time shall be of the essence, and delivery
Delivery of the Securities.
 
at the time and place specified in this Agreement is a further condition to the obligations of the Underwriters.
     (f) . The Company shall deliver or cause to be delivered, copies of the Prospectus in such quantities and at such places as BAS shall request.
Delivery of Prospectus to the Underwriters
          
Section 3. Covenants of the Company and the Guarantor.
     The Company and the Guarantor covenant and agree with each Underwriter as follows:
     (a) During the period beginning on the Applicable Time and ending on the later of the Closing Date or such date, as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, the Prospectus is no longer required by law to be delivered in connection with sales by an Underwriter or dealer, including in circumstances where such requirement may be satisfied pursuant to Rule 172 under the Securities Act (the "Prospectus Delivery Period"), prior to amending or supplementing the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, the Company shall furnish to BAS for review a copy of each such proposed amendment or supplement, and neither the Company nor the Guarantor shall file or use any such proposed amendment or supplement to which BAS reasonably objects.
BAS' Review of Proposed Amendments and Supplements.
     (b) After the date of this Agreement, the Company shall promptly advise BAS in writing (i) of the receipt of any comments of, or requests for additional or supplemental information from, the Commission, (ii) of the time and date of any filing of any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, (iii) of the time and date that any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement becomes effective and (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any order or notice preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, or of any proceedings to remove, suspend or terminate from listing or quotation the Common Stock from any securities exchange upon which it is listed for trading or included or designated for quotation, or of the threatening or initiation of any proceedings for any of such purposes. The Company and the Guarantor shall use their best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such stop order or notice of prevention or suspension of such use. If the Commission shall enter any such stop order or issue any such notice at any time, the Company will use its best efforts to obtain the lifting or reversal of such order or notice at the earliest possible moment, or, subject to Section 3(a), will file an amendment to the Registration Statement or will file a new registration statement and use its best efforts to have such amendment or new registration statement declared effective as soon as practicable. Additionally, each of the Company and the Guarantor agrees that it shall comply with the provisions of Rules 424(b) and 430B, as applicable, under the Securities Act, including with respect to the timely filing of documents thereunder, and will use its reasonable efforts to confirm that any filings made by the Company under such Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act were received in a timely manner by the Commission.
Securities Act Compliance.
 
     (c) If, during the Prospectus Delivery Period, any event or development shall occur or condition exist as a result of which the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or then prevailing, as the case may be, not misleading, or if it shall be necessary to amend or supplement the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or then prevailing, as the case may be, not misleading, or if in the opinion of BAS it is otherwise necessary or advisable to amend or supplement the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or to file a new registration statement containing the Prospectus, in order to comply with law, including in connection with the delivery of the Prospectus, each of the Company and the Guarantor agrees to (i) notify BAS of any such event or condition and (ii) promptly prepare (subject to Sections 3(a) and 3(e) hereof), file with the Commission (and use its best efforts to have any amendment to the Registration Statement or any new registration statement to be declared effective) and furnish at its own expense to the Underwriters and to dealers, amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any new registration statement, necessary in order to make the statements in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus as so amended or supplemented, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or then prevailing, as the case may be, not misleading or so that the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, will comply with law.
Amendments and Supplements to the Registration Statement, Disclosure Package and Prospectus and Other Securities Act Matters.
     (d) The Company will prepare a final term sheet, containing solely a description of final terms of the Securities and the offering thereof, in the form approved by BAS and attached as Schedule B hereto (the "Final Term Sheet") and will file such Final Term Sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d) within the time required by such rule.
Final Term Sheet.
     (e) Each of the Company and the Guarantor represents that it has not made, and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of BAS, it will not make, any offer relating to the Securities that constitutes or would constitute an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or that otherwise constitutes or would constitute a "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) or a portion thereof required to be filed by the Company and the Guarantor with the Commission or retained by the Company and the Guarantor under Rule 433 under the Securities Act; provided that the prior written consent of BAS hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Final Term Sheet. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by BAS is hereinafter referred to as a "Permitted Free Writing Prospectus". Each of the Company and the Guarantor agrees that (i) it has treated and will treat, as the case may be, each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, and (ii) has complied and will comply, as the case may be, with the requirements of Rules 164 and 433 under the Securities Act applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including in respect of timely filing with the Commission, legending and record keeping. The Company and the Guarantor consent to the use by any Underwriter
Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses.
 
of a free writing prospectus that (a) is not an "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433, and (b) contains only (i) information describing the preliminary terms of the Securities or their offering, (ii) information that describes the final terms of the Securities or their offering and that was included in the Final Term Sheet of the Company contemplated in Section 1(d)(ii) as previously filed with the Commission or (iii) information permitted under Rule 134 under the Securities Act; provided that each Underwriter severally covenants with the Company not to take any action without the Company's consent which consent shall be confirmed in writing that would result in the Company being required to file with the Commission under Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Underwriter that otherwise would not be required to be filed by the Company thereunder, but for the action of the Underwriter.
     (f) The Company agrees to furnish the Representative, without charge, during the Prospectus Delivery Period, as many copies of the Prospectus and any amendments and supplements thereto (including any documents incorporated or deemed incorporated by reference therein) and the Disclosure Package as the Representative may request.
Copies of any Amendments and Supplements to the Prospectus.
     (g) The Company will furnish to the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters conformed copies of the Registration Statement (including exhibits thereto) as originally filed and, so long as delivery of a prospectus by an Underwriter or dealer may be required by the Act, as many copies of each preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus and any supplement thereto and the Disclosure Package as the Representative may reasonably request.
Copies of the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
     (h) The Company and the Guarantor shall cooperate with the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters to qualify or register the Securities for sale under (or obtain exemptions from the application of) the state securities or blue sky laws or Canadian provincial securities laws or other foreign laws of those jurisdictions designated by the Representative, shall comply with such laws and shall continue such qualifications, registrations and exemptions in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Securities. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor shall be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to take any action that would subject it to general service of process in any such jurisdiction where it is not presently qualified or where it would be subject to taxation as a foreign corporation, other than those arising out of the offering or sale of the Securities in any jurisdiction where it is not now so subject. The Company and the Guarantor will advise the Representative promptly of the suspension of the qualification or registration of (or any such exemption relating to) the Securities for offering, sale or trading in any jurisdiction or any initiation or threat of any proceeding for any such purpose, and in the event of the issuance of any order suspending such qualification, registration or exemption, each of the Company and the Guarantor shall use its best efforts to obtain the withdrawal thereof at the earliest possible moment.
Blue Sky Compliance.
     (i) The Company shall apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Securities sold by it in the manner described under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Use of Proceeds.
     (j) The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the Exchange Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security
Earnings Statement.
 
holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act.
     (k) During the Prospectus Delivery Period the Company and the Guarantor shall file, on a timely basis, with the Commission and the New York Stock Exchange all reports and documents required to be filed under the Exchange Act and Rule 158 under the Securities Act.
Periodic Reporting Obligations.
     (l) During the period commencing on the date hereof and ending on the 90th day following the date of the Prospectus, neither the Company nor the Guarantor will, without the prior written consent of BAS (which consent may be withheld at the sole discretion of BAS), directly or indirectly, sell, offer, contract or grant any option to sell, pledge, transfer or establish an open "put equivalent position" or liquidate or decrease a "call equivalent position" within the meaning of Rule 16a-1(h) under the Exchange Act, or otherwise dispose of or transfer (or enter into any transaction that is designed to, or might reasonably be expected to, result in the disposition of), or announce the offering of, or file any registration statement under the Securities Act in respect of, any debt securities of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary or securities exchangeable for or convertible into debt securities of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary (other than contemplated by this Agreement).
Agreement Not to Offer or Sell Additional Securities.
     (m) . The Company and the Guarantor will comply with all applicable securities and other laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the Sarbanes Oxley Act, and use its best efforts to cause the Company's and the Guarantor's respective directors and officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with such laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the provisions of the Sarbanes Oxley Act.
Compliance with Sarbanes Oxley Act
     (n) . The Company agrees to pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) of the Securities Act without regard to the proviso therein and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) of the Securities Act.
Filing Fees
     (o) . During the period of two years hereafter the Company will furnish to the Representative (i) to the extent not available on the Commission's EDGAR filing system, as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, copies of the Annual Report of the Guarantor containing the balance sheet of the Guarantor as of the close of such fiscal year and statements of income, stockholders' equity and cash flows for the year then ended and the opinion thereon of the Guarantor's independent public or certified public accountants; (ii) to the extent not available on the Commission's EDGAR filing system, as soon as practicable after the filing thereof, copies of each proxy statement, Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q, Current Report on Form 8-K or other report filed by the Guarantor with the Commission, the NASD or any securities exchange; and (iii) as soon as available, copies of any publicly available report or communication of the Company or the Guarantor mailed generally to holders of its capital stock.
Future Reports to the Representative
     (p) The Company shall not invest or otherwise use the proceeds received by the Company from its sale of the Securities in such a manner as
Investment Limitation.
 
would require the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries to register as an investment company under the Investment Company Act.
     (q) Neither the Company nor the Guarantor will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to cause or result in, or that has constituted or might reasonably be expected to constitute, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any securities of the Company or the Guarantor to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities.
No Manipulation of Price.
     (r) The Company will cooperate with the Representative and use its best efforts to permit the Securities to be eligible for clearance and settlement through The Depository Trust Company.
DTC.
          
Section 4. Payment of Expenses.
     The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to pay all costs, fees and expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their obligations hereunder and in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby, including without limitation (i) all expenses incident to the issuance and delivery of the Securities (including all printing and engraving costs), (ii) all necessary issue, transfer and other stamp taxes in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities to the Underwriters, (iii) all fees and expenses of the Company's and the Guarantor's counsel, independent public or certified public accountants and other advisors, (iv) all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, printing, filing, shipping and distribution of Registration Statement (including financial statements, exhibits, schedules, consents and certificates of experts), each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus, and all amendments and supplements thereto, and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers, this Agreement, the Indenture and the Notes and Guarantee, (v) all filing fees, attorneys' fees and expenses incurred by the Company, the Guarantor or the Underwriters in connection with qualifying or registering (or obtaining exemptions from the qualification or registration of) all or any part of the Securities for offer and sale under the securities laws of the several states of the United States, the provinces of Canada or other jurisdictions designated by the Underwriters (including, without limitation, the cost of preparing, printing and mailing preliminary and final blue sky or legal investment memoranda), (vi) the fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee in connection with the Indenture and the Securities, (vii) any fees payable in connection with the rating of the Securities with the ratings agencies, (viii) any filing fees incident to, and any reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel to the Underwriters in connection with the review by the FINRA, if any, of the terms of the sale of the Securities, (ix) all fees and expenses (including reasonable fees and expenses of counsel) of the Company and the Guarantor in connection with approval of the Securities by the DTC for "book-entry" transfer, (x) all expenses incident to the "road show" for the offering of the Securities, including the cost of any chartered airplane or other transportation, (xi) all other fees, costs and expenses referred to in Item 14 of Part II of the Registration Statement, and (xii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section 4. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section 4, Section 6, Section 8 and Section 9 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees and expenses of their counsel.
 
          
Section 5. Conditions of the Obligations of the Underwriters.
     The obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Securities as provided herein on the Closing Date and shall be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company and the Guarantor set forth in Section 1 hereof as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Date as though then made and, to the accuracy of the statements of the Company and the Guarantor made in any certificates pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the timely performance by the Company and the Guarantor of its covenants and other obligations hereunder, and to each of the following additional conditions:
     (a) On the date hereof, the Representative shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP, independent public accountants for the Company and the Guarantor, a letter dated the date hereof addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representative.
Accountants' Comfort Letter.
     (b) For the period from and after effectiveness of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date:
Compliance with Registration Requirements; No Stop Order.
     (i) the Company shall have filed the Prospectus with the Commission (including the information required by Rule 430B under the Securities Act) in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act; or the Company shall have filed a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement containing the information required by such Rule 430B under the Securities Act, and such post-effective amendment shall have become effective;
     (ii) all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act, including the Final Term Sheet, shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings under such Rule 433 under the Securities Act; and
     (iii) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, or any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, shall be in effect and no proceedings for such purpose shall have been instituted or threatened by the Commission; and the Company shall not have received from the Commission any notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) of the Securities Act objecting to use of the automatic shelf registration statement form.
     (c) For the period from and after the date of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date:
No Material Adverse Change or Ratings Agency Change.
     (i) in the judgment of BAS there shall not have occurred any Material Adverse Change;
     (ii) there shall not have been any change or decrease specified in the letter or letters referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section 5 which is, in the sole judgment of BAS, so material and adverse as to make it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the offering or delivery of the Securities as contemplated by the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; and
 
     (iii) there shall not have occurred any downgrading, nor shall any notice have been given of any intended or potential downgrading or of any review for a possible change that does not indicate the direction of the possible change, in the rating accorded any securities of the Company, the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" as such term is defined for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Securities Act.
     (d) On the Closing Date the Representative shall have received favorable opinions of Schiff Hardin LLP, counsel for the Company and the Guarantor and John A. Dul, General Counsel to the Company and the Guarantor, each dated as of such Closing Date, the forms of which are attached as Exhibit A and Exhibit B, respectively.
Opinion of Counsel for the Company and Guarantor.
     (e) On the Closing Date the Representative shall have received the favorable opinion of Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP counsel for the Underwriters, dated as of such Closing Date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to, and addressed to, the Representative, and the Company and the Guarantor shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they request for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon such matters.
Opinion of Counsel for the Underwriters.
     (f) On the Closing Date the Representative shall have received a written certificate executed by the Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Officer or President of the Company and the Guarantor and the Chief Financial Officer or Chief Accounting Officer of the Company and the Guarantor, dated as of such Closing Date to the effect that the signers of such certificate have carefully examined the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto and this Agreement, to the effect set forth in subsections (b)(iii) and (c)(iii) of this Section 5, and further to the effect that:
Officers' Certificate.
     (i) for the period from and after the date of this Agreement and prior to such Closing Date there has not occurred any Material Adverse Change;
     (ii) the representations and warranties of the Company and the Guarantor set forth in Section 1 of this Agreement are true and correct on and as of such Closing Date with the same force and effect as though expressly made on and as of such Closing Date; and
     (iii) each of the Company and the Guarantor has complied with all the agreements hereunder and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to such Closing Date.
     (g) On the Closing Date, the Representative shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP, independent public accountants for the Company and the Guarantor, a letter dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representative, to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished by them pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 5, except that the specified date referred to therein for the carrying out of procedures shall be no more than three business days prior to such Closing Date.
Bring-down Comfort Letter.
 
     (h) . On the Closing Date, the Securities shall be eligible for clearance and settlement through the DTC.
Securities Eligible for DTC
     (i) . The Securities and the Indenture shall be executed by the Company and the Guarantor in substantially the form previously delivered to you.
The Securities
     (j) On or before the Closing Date the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters shall have received such information, documents and opinions as they may reasonably require for the purposes of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as contemplated herein, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations and warranties, or the satisfaction of any of the conditions or agreements, herein contained.
Additional Documents.
     If any condition specified in this Section 5 is not satisfied when and as required to be satisfied, this Agreement may be terminated by BAS by notice to the Company at any time on or prior to the Closing Date which termination shall be without liability on the part of any party to any other party, except that Section 4, Section 6, Section 8, Section 9 and Section 14 shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
          
Section 6. Reimbursement of Underwriters' Expenses.
     If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 5, Section 10 or clauses (i) or (iv) of Section 11 or if the sale to the Underwriters of the Securities on the Closing Date is not consummated because of any refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company or the Guarantor to perform any agreement herein or to comply with any provision hereof, the Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to reimburse the Representative and the other Underwriters (or such Underwriters as have terminated this Agreement with respect to themselves) that have not defaulted under Section 10, severally, upon demand for all out-of-pocket expenses that shall have been reasonably incurred by the Representative and the Underwriters in connection with the proposed purchase and the offering and sale of the Securities, including but not limited to fees and disbursements of counsel, printing expenses, travel expenses, postage, facsimile and telephone charges.
          
Section 7. Effectiveness of this Agreement.
     This Agreement shall not become effective until execution by the parties hereto.
          
Section 8. Indemnification.
     (a) The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its directors, officers, employees and agents, and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense, as incurred, to which such Underwriter, director, officer, employee, agent or controlling person may become subject, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or expense (or actions in respect thereof as contemplated below) arises out of or is based (i) upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, or any amendment thereto, including any information deemed to be a part thereof pursuant to Rule 430A, Rule 430B or Rule 430C under the Securities Act, or the omission or alleged omission
Indemnification of the Underwriters.
 
therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; or (ii) upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the information contained in the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any prospectus wrapper material distributed in Canada in connection with foreign sales or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact, in each case, necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and to reimburse each Underwriter, its officers, directors, employees, agents and each such controlling person for any and all expenses (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by BAS) as such expenses are reasonably incurred by such Underwriter, or its officers, directors, employees, agents or such controlling person in connection with investigating, defending, settling, compromising or paying any such loss, claim, damage, liability, expense or action; provided, however, that the foregoing indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense to the extent, but only to the extent, arising out of or based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through BAS expressly for use in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof. The indemnity agreement set forth in this Section 8(a) shall be in addition to any liabilities that the Company and Guarantor may otherwise have.
     (b) Each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Guarantor, each of their respective directors, each of their respective officers who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company or the Guarantor within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense, as incurred, to which the Company, or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or expense (or actions in respect thereof as contemplated below) arises out of or is based upon any untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the information contained in the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or arises out of or is based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, and only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by BAS expressly for use therein; and to reimburse the Company or the Guarantor, or any such director, officer or controlling person for any legal and other expense reasonably incurred by the Company or the Guarantor, or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating, defending, settling, compromising or paying any such loss, claim, damage, liability, expense or action. The Company and the Guarantors hereby acknowledge that the only information that the Underwriters have furnished to the Company and Guarantor expressly for use in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) are the statements set forth in the sixth, seventh and eighth paragraphs under the caption of "Underwriting" in the prospectus sup-
Indemnification of the Company, its Directors and Officers.
 
plement. The indemnity agreement set forth in this Section 8(b) shall be in addition to any liabilities that each Underwriter may otherwise have.
     (c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 8 of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against an indemnifying party under this Section 8, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof, but the failure to so notify the indemnifying party (i) will not relieve it from liability under paragraph (a) or (b) above unless and to the extent it did not otherwise learn of such action and such failure results in the forfeiture by the indemnifying party of substantial rights and defenses and (ii) will not, in any event, relieve the indemnifying party from any obligations to any indemnified party other than the indemnification obligation provided in paragraph (a) or (b) above. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party and such indemnified party seeks or intends to seek indemnity from an indemnifying party, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate in, and, to the extent that it shall elect, jointly with all other indemnifying parties similarly notified, by written notice delivered to the indemnified party promptly after receiving the aforesaid notice from such indemnified party, to assume the defense thereof with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party; provided, however, if the defendants in any such action include both the indemnified party and the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have reasonably concluded that a conflict may arise between the positions of the indemnifying party and the indemnified party in conducting the defense of any such action or that there may be legal defenses available to it and/or other indemnified parties that are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party, the indemnified party or parties shall have the right to select separate counsel to assume such legal defenses and to otherwise participate in the defense of such action on behalf of such indemnified party or parties. Upon receipt of notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of such indemnifying party's election so to assume the defense of such action and approval by the indemnified party of counsel, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section 8 for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof unless (i) the indemnified party shall have employed separate counsel in accordance with the proviso to the preceding sentence (it being understood, however, that the indemnifying party shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate counsel (other than local counsel), reasonably approved by the indemnifying party (or by BAS in the case of Section 8(b)), representing the indemnified parties who are parties to such action) or (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have employed counsel satisfactory to the indemnified party to represent the indemnified party within a reasonable time after notice of commencement of the action, in each of which cases the fees and expenses of counsel shall be at the expense of the indemnifying party.
Notifications and Other Indemnification Procedures.
     (d) The indemnifying party under this Section 8 shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, which shall not be withheld unreasonably, but if settled with such consent or if there is a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by Section  8(c) hereof, the indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 30 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request and (ii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior
Settlements.
 
to the date of such settlement. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement, compromise or consent to the entry of judgment in any pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity was or could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement, compromise or consent (x) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such action, suit or proceeding and (y) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
          
Section 9. Contribution.
     If the indemnification provided for in Section 8 is for any reason unavailable to or otherwise insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount paid or payable by such indemnified party, as incurred, as a result of any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses referred to therein (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the untrue statements or omissions or alleged untrue statements or alleged omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company, and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the front cover page of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on such cover. The relative fault of the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, or the Underwriters, on the other hand, and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
     The amount paid or payable by a party as a result of the losses, claims, damages, liabilities and expenses referred to above shall be deemed to include, subject to the limitations set forth in Section 8(c), any legal or other fees or expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating or defending any action or claim.
     The Company, the Guarantor and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 9 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in this Section 9.
 
     Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 9, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the underwriting discount or commission received by such Underwriter in connection with the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 9 are several, and not joint, in proportion to their respective underwriting commitments as set forth opposite their names in . For purposes of this Section 9, each director, officer, employee and agent of an Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company and the Guarantor, each officer of the Company and the Guarantor who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company and the Guarantor within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company and the Guarantor.
Schedule A
          
Section 10. Default of One or More of the Several Underwriters.
     If, on the Closing Date, any one or more of the several Underwriters shall fail or refuse to purchase Securities that it or they have agreed to purchase hereunder on such date, and the aggregate principal amount of Securities which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed or refused to purchase does not exceed 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased on the Closing Date, the other Underwriters shall be obligated, severally, in the proportions that the aggregate principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their respective names on bears to the aggregate principal amount of Securities set forth opposite the names of all such non-defaulting Underwriters, or in such other proportions as may be specified by BAS with the consent of the non-defaulting Underwriters, to purchase the Securities which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed or refused to purchase on such date. If, on the Closing Date, any one or more of the Underwriters shall fail or refuse to purchase Securities and the aggregate principal amount of Securities with respect to which such default occurs exceeds 10% of the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be purchased on such date, and arrangements satisfactory to BAS and the Company for the purchase of such Securities are not made within 48 hours after such default, this Agreement shall terminate without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Section 4, Section 6, Section 8, Section 9 and Section 18 shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination. In any such case either BAS or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Closing Date but in no event for longer than seven days in order that the required changes, if any, to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus or any other documents or arrangements may be effected.
Schedule A
     As used in this Agreement, the term "Underwriter" shall be deemed to include any person substituted for a defaulting Underwriter under this Section 10. Any action taken under this Section 10 shall not relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of any default of such Underwriter under this Agreement.
          
Section 11. Termination of this Agreement.
     Prior to the Closing Date this Agreement may be terminated by BAS by notice given to the Company if at any time (i) trading or quotation in any of the Company's or Guarantor's securities shall have been suspended or limited by the Commission or by the NYSE, (ii) trading in
 
securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange shall have been suspended or limited, or minimum or maximum prices shall have been generally established by the Commission or FINRA or on such stock exchange; (iii) a general banking moratorium shall have been declared by federal or New York authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States has occurred; (iv) in the judgment of BAS there shall have occurred any Material Adverse Change or (v) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of national or international hostilities or declaration of a national emergency or war by the United States or any crisis or calamity, or any change in the United States or international financial markets, or any substantial change or development involving a prospective substantial change in United States' or international political, financial or economic conditions, as in the judgment of BAS is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities in the manner and on the terms described in the Prospectus or to enforce contracts for the sale of securities. Any termination pursuant to this Section 11 shall be without liability on the part of (a) the Company and the Guarantor to any Underwriter, except that the Company and Guarantor shall be obligated to reimburse the expenses of the Representative and the Underwriters pursuant to Sections 4 and 6 hereof or (b) any Underwriter to the Company or the Guarantor.
          
Section 12. No Advisory or Fiduciary Responsibility.
     The Company and the Guarantor acknowledge and agree that: (i) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, and the Company and the Guarantor are capable of evaluating and understanding and understand and accept the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (ii) in connection with each transaction contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the financial advisor, agent or fiduciary of the Company or the Guarantor or their respective affiliates, stockholders, creditors or employees or any other party; (iii) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory, agency or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company or the Guarantor with respect to any of the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company or the Guarantor on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company or Guarantor with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement; (iv) the several Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company and the Guarantor and that the several Underwriters have no obligation to disclose any of such interests by virtue of any advisory, agency or fiduciary relationship; and (v) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company and the Guarantor have consulted their own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent they deemed appropriate.
     This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company, the Guarantor and the several Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof. The Company and the Guarantor hereby waive and release, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims that the Company or the Guarantor may have against the several Underwriters with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty.
 
          
Section 13. Representations and Indemnities to Survive Delivery.
     The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the Guarantor, of their respective officers and of the several Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement (i) will remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of any (A) investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, officers or employees of any Underwriter, or any person controlling the Underwriter, the Company, the Guarantor, the officers or employees of the Company or the Guarantor or any person controlling the Company or the Guarantor, as the case may be or (B) acceptance of the Securities and payment for them hereunder and (ii) will survive delivery of and payment for the Securities sold hereunder and any termination of this Agreement.
          
Section 14. Notices.
     All communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be mailed, hand delivered or telecopied and confirmed to the parties hereto as follows:
If to BAS or to the Representative:
Banc of America Securities LLC One Bryant Park New York, NY 10036 Facsimile: (212) 901-7897 Attention: Legal Department
with a copy to:
Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP 80 Pine Street New York, NY 10005 Facsimile: (212)269-5420 Attention: James J. Clark, Esq.
If to the Company:
Anixter International Inc. 2301 Patriot Blvd. Glenview, Illinois 60026 Facsimile: 224-521-8990 Attention: Treasurer
with a copy to:
Schiff Hardin LLP 6600 Sears Tower Chicago, Illinois 60606 Facsimile: 312-258-5700 Attention: David McCarthy, Esq.
 
Any party hereto may change the address for receipt of communications by giving written notice to the others.
          
Section 15. Successors and Assigns.
     This Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto, including any substitute Underwriters pursuant to Section 10 hereof, and to the benefit of (i) the Company and the Guarantor, their respective directors, any person who controls the Company or the Guarantor within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act and any officer of the Company and the Guarantor who signs the Registration Statement, (ii) the Underwriters, the officers, directors, employees and agents of the Underwriters, and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, and (iii) the respective successors and assigns of any of the above, all as and to the extent provided in this Agreement, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. The term "successors and assigns" shall not include a purchaser of any of the Securities from any of the several Underwriters merely because of such purchase.
          
Section 16. Partial Unenforceability.
     The invalidity or unenforceability of any Section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other Section, paragraph or provision hereof. If any Section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement is for any reason determined to be invalid or unenforceable, there shall be deemed to be made such minor changes (and only such minor changes) as are necessary to make it valid and enforceable.
          
Section 17. Governing Law Provisions.
     (a) THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED AND INTERPRETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Governing Law Provisions.
          
Section 18. General Provisions.
     This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement of the parties to this Agreement and supersedes all prior written or oral and all contemporaneous oral agreements, understandings and negotiations with respect to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each one of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument. This Agreement may not be amended or modified unless in writing by all of the parties hereto, and no condition herein (express or implied) may be waived unless waived in writing by each party whom the condition is meant to benefit. The Section headings herein are for the convenience of the parties only and shall not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement.
     Each of the parties hereto acknowledges that it is a sophisticated business person who was adequately represented by counsel during negotiations regarding the provisions hereof, including, without limitation, the indemnification provisions of Section 8 and the contribution provisions of Section 9, and is fully informed regarding said provisions. Each of the parties hereto further acknowledges that the provisions of Sections 8 and 9 hereto fairly allocate the risks in light of the ability of the parties to investigate the Company, its affairs and its business in order
 
to assure that adequate disclosure has been made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus (and any amendments and supplements thereto), as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act.
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to the Company the enclosed copies hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts hereof, shall become a binding agreement in accordance with its terms.
 
     The foregoing Underwriting Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted by the Representative as of the date first above written.
Banc of America Securities LLC Acting as Representative of the several Underwriters named in the attached Schedule A.
 
 
 
The following changes are being made to the "Description of Debt Securities" section in the Prospectus dated September 22, 2008 (the "Prospectus") to generally conform the Limitations on Secured Debt covenant and the definition of "Unrestricted Subsidiary" to the similar covenant and definition in Anixter's Indenture that is applicable to its 5.95% Senior Notes due 2015:
(i) The exception contained in the sixth bullet of the covenant titled "Certain Covenants of Anixter and Anixter InternationalLimitations on Secured Debt" on page 9 of the Prospectus is deleted and will be replaced with the following:
"Security Interests securing indebtedness of Anixter or a Restricted Subsidiary owing to an Unrestricted Subsidiary of the character described in clause (c) of the definition of Unrestricted Subsidiary that finances accounts receivable;"
(ii) The definition of Unrestricted Subsidiary on page 18 of the Prospectus under "Certain Covenants of Anixter and Anixter InternationalCertain Definitions" is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
     "" means (a) any Subsidiary acquired or organized after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture to the Indenture, , , that such Subsidiary is not a successor, directly or indirectly, to, and does not directly or indirectly own any equity interest in, any Restricted Subsidiary, (b) any Subsidiary the principal business and assets of which are located outside the United States of America (including its territories and possessions), (c) any Subsidiary the principal business of which consists of financing the acquisition or disposition of machinery, equipment, inventory, accounts receivable and other real, personal and intangible property by persons including Anixter, Anixter International or a Subsidiary, (d) any Subsidiary the principal business of which is owning, leasing, dealing in or developing real property for residential or office building purposes, and (e) any Subsidiary substantially all the assets of which consist of stock or other securities of an Unrestricted Subsidiary or Unrestricted Subsidiaries of the character described in clauses (a) through (d) of this paragraph, unless and until, in each of the cases specified in this paragraph, any such Subsidiary shall have been designated to be a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to clause (b) of the definition of "Restricted Subsidiary."
Unrestricted Subsidiary
provided
however
(iii) The following sentence at the end of the definition of Secured Debt on page 17 of the Prospectus under "Certain Covenants of Anixter and Anixter InternationalCertain Definitions" is deleted in its entirety:
"Notwithstanding the foregoing, a binding commitment to lend under a revolving credit facility shall be deemed to be an incurrence of indebtedness in the full amount of such
 
commitment on the date that such commitment is entered into, regardless of whether the full amount of such revolving credit facility is actually borrowed, and thereafter the amount of such commitment shall be deemed to be fully borrowed at all times for purposes of the "Limitations on Secured Debt" covenant."
(iv) The definition of Secured Leverage Ratio on page 17 of the Prospectus under "Certain Covenants of Anixter and Anixter InternationalCertain Definitions" is deleted in its entirety.
The following changes are being made to the "Supplemental Description of the Notes" section in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement (as defined below):
(i) The following sentence at the end of the definition of Total Debt on page S-20 of the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement under "Certain Covenants of Anixter and Anixter InternationalCertain Definitions" is deleted in its entirety:
     "Notwithstanding the foregoing, a binding commitment to lend under a revolving credit facility shall be deemed to be an incurrence of indebtedness in the full amount of such commitment on the date that such commitment is entered into, regardless of whether the full amount of such revolving credit facility is actually borrowed, and thereafter the amount of such commitment shall be deemed to be fully borrowed at all times for purposes of the Total Leverage Ratio."
(ii) The parenthetical "(other than under a revolving credit facility as set forth in the last sentence of the definition of Total Debt)" in the first sentence of the second paragraph of the definition of Total Leverage Ratio on page S-21 of the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement under "Certain Covenants of Anixter and Anixter InternationalCertain Definitions" is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
     "(other than the incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness in the ordinary course of business for working capital purposes pursuant to any revolving credit arrangement)"
The information in this term sheet supplements Anixter's preliminary prospectus supplement, dated March 2, 2009 (the "Preliminary Prospectus Supplement") and supersedes the information in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement to the extent inconsistent with the information in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement. This term sheet is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement. Terms used herein but not defined herein shall have the respective meanings as set forth in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement.
Other financial information presented in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement is deemed to have changed to the extent effected by the changes described herein.
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at . Alternatively,
www.sec.gov
 
the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Banc of America Securities LLC toll-free 1-800-294-1322 or by e-mailing a request to or by calling J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. at the following collect number: 1-212-834-4533 or by calling Wachovia Capital Markets, LLC at the following toll -free number: 1-866-289-1262 or by calling Scotia Capital (USA) Inc. at the following toll -free number: 1-800-372-3930.
dg.prospectusdistribution@bofasecurities.com

EXHIBIT 4.1
 
     SECOND SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of March 11, 2009 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), between Anixter Inc. (the "Company"), Anixter International Inc. (the "Guarantor") and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee (the "Trustee").
     Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Indenture, dated as of September 9, 1996, among the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee, as amended by a First Supplemental Indenture, dated February 24, 2005 (as amended, the "Indenture").
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Guarantor executed and delivered the Indenture to the Trustee to provide for the issuance from time to time of the Company's unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, guaranteed by the Guarantor, to be issued in one or more series unlimited as to principal amount;
     WHEREAS, Section 901(4) of the Indenture provides that the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee may without the consent of any Holders enter into indentures supplemental to the Indenture to add, change or eliminate provisions in respect to one or more series of Securities provided, however, that any such addition, change or elimination shall either (i) not adversely affect the rights of the Holders of Outstanding Securities of any series in any material respect, or (ii) not apply to any Outstanding Securities of any series created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture where such addition, change or elimination has an adverse effect on the rights of the Holders of such Outstanding Securities in any material respect;
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Guarantor desire to further amend the Indenture with respect to all series of Securities hereafter established under the Indenture;
     WHEREAS, the changes contained herein do not adversely affect the rights of the Holders of Outstanding Securities of any series issued pursuant to the Indenture in any material respect and therefore do not require the consent of any Holders of Outstanding Securities;
     WHEREAS, all actions necessary to make this Second Supplemental Indenture a legal, valid and binding obligation of the parties hereto in accordance with its terms and the terms of the Indenture have been performed; and
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Trustee desire to enter into, execute and deliver this Second Supplemental Indenture in compliance with the provisions of the Indenture;
     NOW THEREFORE, the Company does hereby covenant and agree to and with the Trustee as follows:
     This Indenture is hereby amended as follows:
 
     1.1 . This Second Supplemental Indenture is supplemental to the Indenture and does and shall be deemed to form a part of, and shall be construed with and as a part of, the Indenture with respect to Securities of any series established on or after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture. Holders of Securities of any series established on or after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture shall be bound hereby, and shall be entitled to the benefits of the Second Supplemental Indenture. Holders of Securities of any series established prior to the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture shall not be bound hereby, and shall not be entitled to the benefits of the Second Supplemental Indenture.
Supplemental Indenture
     1.2 . Section 101 ("Definitions") is hereby amended as follows:
Amendment of Section 101
(a) The following definitions are added:
"", when used with respect to any Sale and Leaseback Transaction, means, as at the time of determination, the present value (discounted at a rate borne by the series of Securities for which such determination is being made, compounded on a semiannual basis) of the total obligations of the lessee for rental payments during the remaining term of the lease included in any such Sale and Leaseback Transaction.
Attributable Indebtedness
"" means the board of directors of the Guarantor.
Board of Directors
"" means, with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interests, participations or other equivalents (however designated, whether voting or non-voting) in equity of such Person, whether outstanding on the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture or issued thereafter, including, without limitation, all common stock and preferred stock.
Capital Stock
"" means a lease required to be capitalized for financial reporting purposes in accordance with GAAP.
Capitalized Lease
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under a Capitalized Lease, and the amount of such obligation shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capitalized Lease Obligations
"" means such time as:
Change of Control
(1) the direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Guarantor and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, to any "person" (as
 
that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Guarantor or a Subsidiary;
(2) a "person" or "group" (within the meaning of Sections 13(d) and 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) becomes the ultimate "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) of more than 50% of the total voting power of the Voting Stock of the Guarantor on a fully diluted basis;
(3) the failure of the Guarantor to own 100% of the outstanding Capital Stock of the Company, provided that up to 3% of the outstanding Voting Stock of the Company may be issued or transferred to employees of the Guarantor and its Subsidiaries without such issuance or transfer constituting a Change of Control;
(4) the adoption of a plan relating to the liquidation or dissolution of the Company or the Guarantor;
(5) individuals who on the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture constitute the Board of Directors (together with any new directors whose election by the Board of Directors or whose nomination by the Board of Directors for election by stockholders of the Guarantor was approved by a vote of at least a majority of the members of the Board of Directors then in office who either were members of the Board of Directors on the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture or whose election or nomination for election was previously so approved) cease for any reason to constitute a majority of the members of the Board of Directors then in office; or
(6) the Company or the Guarantor consolidates with, or merges with or into, any Person, or any Person consolidates with, or merges with or into the Company or the Guarantor, in any such event pursuant to a transaction in which any of the outstanding Voting Stock of the Company or the Guarantor, as applicable, or such other Person is converted into or exchanged for cash, securities or other property, other than any such transaction
 
where (a) the Voting Stock of the Company or the Guarantor, as applicable, outstanding immediately prior to such transaction constitutes or is converted into or exchanged for a majority of the outstanding shares of Voting Stock of the surviving Person or any direct or indirect parent company of the Surviving Person (immediately after giving effect to such issuance) and (b) immediately after such transaction, no "person" or "group" (as such terms are used in Section 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act) becomes, directly or indirectly, the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) of 50% or more of the voting power of the Voting Stock of the surviving Person.
"" means, with respect to any Person for any period:
Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges
(1) the sum of, without duplication, the amounts for such period, taken as a single accounting period, of:
(a) Consolidated Net Income;
(b) Consolidated Non-cash Charges;
(c) Consolidated Interest Expense;
(d) Consolidated Income Tax Expense (other than income tax expense (either positive or negative) attributable to extraordinary gains or losses); and
(2) less non-cash items increasing Consolidated Net Income for such period, other than (a) the accrual of revenue consistent with past practice, and (b) reversals of prior accruals or reserves for cash items previously excluded in the calculation of Consolidated Non-cash Charges.
In calculating "Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges" for any period, if any Asset Sale or Asset Acquisition (whether pursuant to a stock or an asset transaction) shall have occurred since the first day of any four fiscal quarter period for which the "Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges" is being calculated, such calculation shall give pro forma effect to such Asset Sale or Asset Acquisition.
 
For the purposes of calculating "Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges" "Asset Acquisition" means any acquisition of property or series of related acquisitions of property that constitutes all or substantially all of the assets of a business, unit or division of a Person or constitutes all or substantially all of the common stock (or equivalent) of a Person; and "Asset Sale" means any disposition of property or series of related dispositions of property that involves all or substantially all of the assets of a business, unit or division of a Person or constitutes all or substantially all of the common stock (or equivalent) of a Subsidiary.
"" for any period means the sum, without duplication, of (a) Consolidated Interest Expense of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries for such period, plus (b) the product of (a) all dividend payments on any series of Disqualified Equity Interests of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary or any Preferred Stock of any Subsidiary (other than any such Disqualified Equity Interests or any Preferred Stock held by the Company, the Guarantor or a Subsidiary or to the extent paid in Qualified Equity Interests) for such period, (b) a fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which is one the then current combined federal, state and local statutory tax rate of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries, expressed as a decimal.
Consolidated Fixed Charges
multiplied by
minus
"" means the ratio of Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries during the most recent four consecutive full fiscal quarters for which financial statements are available (the "Four-Quarter Period") ending on or prior to the date of the transaction giving rise to the need to calculate the Consolidated Interest Coverage Ratio (the "Transaction Date") to Consolidated Fixed Charges of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries for the Four-Quarter Period. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in the definitions of Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges and Consolidated Interest Expense (and all component definitions referenced in such definitions), for purposes of determining the Consolidated Interest Coverage Ratio, such definitions (and all component definitions referenced in such definitions) shall be calculated with respect to the Company, the Guarantor and all of the Subsidiaries, notwithstanding the use of the term "Restricted Subsidiaries" in such definitions, and otherwise in accordance with such definitions.
Consolidated Interest Coverage Ratio
 
For purposes of this definition, Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges and Consolidated Fixed Charges shall be calculated after giving effect on a pro forma basis for the period of such calculation to the incurrence of any Indebtedness or the issuance of any Preferred Stock of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary (and the application of the proceeds thereof) and any repayment of other Indebtedness or redemption of other Preferred Stock (and the application of the proceeds therefrom) (other than the incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness in the ordinary course of business for working capital purposes pursuant to any revolving credit arrangement) occurring during the Four-Quarter Period or at any time subsequent to the last day of the Four-Quarter Period and on or prior to the Transaction Date, as if such incurrence, repayment, issuance or redemption, as the case may be (and the application of the proceeds thereof), occurred on the first day of the Four-Quarter Period.
In calculating Consolidated Fixed Charges for purposes of determining the denominator (but not the numerator) of this Consolidated Interest Coverage Ratio:
(a) interest on outstanding Indebtedness determined on a fluctuating basis as of the Transaction Date and which will continue to be so determined thereafter shall be deemed to have accrued at a fixed rate per annum equal to the rate of interest on such Indebtedness in effect on the Transaction Date;
(b) if interest on any Indebtedness actually incurred on the Transaction Date may optionally be determined at an interest rate based upon a factor of a prime or similar rate, a eurocurrency interbank offered rate, or other rates, then the interest rate in effect on the Transaction Date will be deemed to have been in effect during the Four-Quarter Period; and
(c) notwithstanding clause (a) or (b) above, interest on Indebtedness determined on a fluctuating basis, to the extent such interest is covered by agreements relating to Hedging Obligations, shall be deemed to accrue at the rate per annum resulting after giving effect to the operation of these agreements.
 
"" means, with respect to any Person for any period the provision for federal, state, local and foreign income taxes of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period as determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Income Tax Expenses
"" means, with respect to any Person for any period, without duplication, the sum of:
Consolidated Interest Expense
(1) the interest expense of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period as determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; and
(2) the interest component of capital lease obligations paid, accrued and/or scheduled to be paid or accrued by such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries during such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
"" means, with respect to any Person, for any period, the consolidated net income (or loss) of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period as determined in accordance with GAAP, adjusted, to the extent included in calculating such net income, by excluding, without duplication:
Consolidated Net Income
(1) all extraordinary gains or losses (net of fees and expenses relating to the transaction giving rise thereto);
(2) the portion of net income of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries allocable to minority interests in unconsolidated Persons to the extent that cash dividends or distributions have not actually been received by such Person or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries;
(3) gains or losses in respect of any sales of capital stock or asset sales outside the ordinary course of business by such Person or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries (net of fees and expenses relating to the transaction giving rise thereto), on an after-tax basis;
(4) any gain or loss realized as a result of the cumulative effect of a change in accounting principles;
 
(5) any fees and expenses paid in connection with the issuance of the Securities or other indebtedness;
(6) nonrecurring or unusual gains or losses;
(7) the net after-tax effects of adjustments in the inventory, property and equipment, goodwill and intangible assets line items in such Person's consolidated financial statements pursuant to GAAP resulting from the application of purchase accounting or the amortization or write-off of any amounts thereof;
(8) any fees and expenses incurred during such period, or any amortization thereof for such period, in connection with any acquisition, investment, asset sale, issuance or repayment of indebtedness, issuance of stock, stock options or other equity-based awards, refinancing transaction or amendment or modification of any debt instrument (including without limitation any such transaction undertaken but not completed);
(9) any gain or loss recorded in connection with the designation of a discontinued operation (exclusive of its operating income or loss);
(10) any non-cash compensation or other non-cash expenses or charges arising from the grant of or issuance or repricing of stock, stock options or other equity-based awards or any amendment, modification, substitution or change of any such stock, stock options or other equity-based awards; and
(11) any non-cash impairment, restructuring or special charge or asset write-off or write-down, and the amortization or write-off of intangibles.
"" means, with respect to any Person for any period, the aggregate depreciation, amortization (including amortization of goodwill and other intangibles) and other non-cash expenses (including stock option expenses and any goodwill impairment charges) of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries reducing Consolidated Net Income of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a
Consolidated Non-cash Charges
 
consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP (excluding any such charges which require an accrual of or a reserve for cash charges for any future period).
"" means the amended and restated five year revolving credit agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007, as amended, among the Company and other borrowers party thereto from time to time the lenders party thereto from time to time, Bank of America, N.A. as Administrative Agent, and the lenders from time to time party thereto, together with any agreements, instruments, security agreements, guaranties and other documents executed or delivered pursuant to or in connection with such credit agreement, as such credit agreement or such agreements, instruments, security agreements, guaranties or other documents may be amended, supplemented, extended, restated, renewed or otherwise modified from time to time and any successive refundings, refinancings, replacements or substitutions thereof or therefor, whether with the same or different lenders.
Credit Agreement
"" means one or more debt facilities (including, without limitation, the Credit Agreement), commercial paper facilities or indentures, in each case with banks or other institutional lenders or a trustee, providing for revolving credit loans, term loans, receivables financing (including through the sale of receivables to such lenders or to special purpose entities formed to borrow from such lenders against such receivables), letters of credit or issuances of notes, in each case, as amended, restated, modified, renewed, refunded, replaced or refinanced in whole or in part from time to time.
Credit Facilities
"" means (1) any Event of Default or (2) any event, act or condition that, after notice or the passage of time or both, would be an Event of Default.
Default
"" of any Person means any class of Equity Interests of such Person that, by its terms, or by the terms of any related agreement or of any security into which it is convertible, puttable or exchangeable, is, or upon the happening of any event or the passage of time would be, required to be redeemed by such Person, whether or not at the option of the holder thereof, or matures or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, in whole or in part, on or prior to the date which is 91 days after the final maturity date of the Securities; , , that any class of Equity Interests of such Person that, by its terms, authorizes such Person to satisfy in full its obligations with respect to the payment of dividends or upon maturity, redemption (pursuant to a sinking fund or
Disqualified Equity Interests
provided
however
 
otherwise) or repurchase thereof or otherwise by the delivery of Equity Interests that are not Disqualified Equity Interests, and that is not convertible, puttable or exchangeable for Disqualified Equity Interests or Indebtedness, will not be deemed to be Disqualified Equity Interests so long as such Person satisfies its obligations with respect thereto solely by the delivery of Equity Interests that are not Disqualified Equity Interests; , , , that any Equity Interests that would not constitute Disqualified Equity Interests but for provisions thereof giving holders thereof (or the holders of any security into or for which such Equity Interests are convertible, exchangeable or exercisable) the right to require the Company or the Guarantor to redeem such Equity Interests upon the occurrence of a change in control occurring prior to the 91st day after the final maturity date of the Securities shall not constitute Disqualified Equity Interests if the change of control applicable to such Equity Interests are no more favorable to such holders than the provisions described under of this Indenture and such Equity Interests specifically provide that the Company will not redeem any such Equity Interests pursuant to such provisions prior to the Company's purchase of the Securities as required pursuant to of this Indenture.
provided
further
however
Section 1010
Section 1010
"" means any Subsidiary of the Company or the Guarantor that is organized under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States or the District of Columbia.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" of any Person means (1) any and all shares or other equity interests (including common stock, preferred stock, limited liability company interests and partnership interests) in such Person and (2) all rights to purchase, warrants or options (whether or not currently exercisable), participations or other equivalents of or interests in (however designated) such shares or other interests in such Person, but excluding any debt securities that are convertible into such shares or other interests in such Person.
Equity Interests
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person under swap, cap, collar, forward purchase or similar agreements or arrangements dealing with interest rates, currency exchange rates or commodity prices, either generally or under specific contingencies.
Hedging Obligations
"" of any Person at any date means, without duplication:
Indebtedness
(a) all liabilities, contingent or otherwise, of such Person for borrowed money (whether or not
 
the recourse of the lender is to the whole of the assets of such Person or only to a portion thereof);
(b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or other similar instruments;
(c) all reimbursement obligations of such Person in respect of letters of credit, letters of guaranty, bankers' acceptances and similar credit transactions;
(d) all obligations of such Person to pay the deferred and unpaid purchase price of property or services, except trade payables and accrued expenses incurred by such Person in the ordinary course of business in connection with obtaining goods, materials or services;
(e) the maximum fixed redemption or repurchase price of all Disqualified Equity Interests of such Person;
(f) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person;
(g) all Indebtedness of others secured by a Security Interest on any asset of such Person, whether or not such Indebtedness is assumed by such Person;
(h) all Indebtedness of others guaranteed by such Person to the extent of such guarantee; that Indebtedness of the Company, the Guarantor or the Subsidiaries that is guaranteed by the Company, the Guarantor or the Subsidiaries shall only be counted once in the calculation of the amount of Indebtedness of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis;
provided
(i) all Attributable Indebtedness;
(j) to the extent not otherwise included in this definition, Hedging Obligations of such Person; and
(k) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to assets purchased by such Person.
 
The amount of Indebtedness of any Person at any date shall be the outstanding balance at such date of all unconditional obligations as described above, the maximum liability of such Person for any such contingent obligations at such date and, in the case of clause (g), the lesser of (a) the fair market value of any asset subject to a Security Interest securing the Indebtedness of others on the date that the Security Interest attaches and (b) the amount of the Indebtedness secured. For purposes of clause (e), the "maximum fixed redemption or repurchase price" of any Disqualified Equity Interests that do not have a fixed redemption or repurchase price shall be calculated in accordance with the terms of such Disqualified Equity Interests as if such Disqualified Equity Interests were redeemed or repurchased on any date on which an amount of Indebtedness outstanding shall be required to be determined pursuant to the Indenture.
"" means March 11, 2009.
Issue Date
"" means (1) BBB or above, in the case of S&P (or its equivalent under any successor Rating Categories of S&P) and Baa3 or above, in the case of Moody's (or its equivalent under any successor Rating Categories of Moody's) or (2) the equivalent in respect of the Rating Categories of any Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" means an offer to purchase Securities then outstanding by the Company from the Holders commenced by mailing a notice to the Trustee and each Holder stating:
Offer to Purchase
(1) that all Securities validly tendered will be accepted for payment;
(2) the purchase price and the date of purchase (which shall be a business day no earlier than 30 days nor later than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed) (the "");
Payment Date
(3) that any Security not tendered will continue to accrue interest pursuant to its terms;
(4) that, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the purchase price, any Security accepted for payment pursuant to the Offer to Purchase shall cease to accrue interest on and after the Payment Date;
 
(5) that Holders electing to have a Security purchased pursuant to the Offer to Purchase will be required to surrender the Security, together with the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" on the reverse side of the Security completed, to the Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice prior to the close of business on the business day immediately preceding the Payment Date;
(6) that Holders will be entitled to withdraw their election if the Paying Agent receives, not later than the close of business on the third business day immediately preceding the Payment Date, a telegram, facsimile transmission or letter setting forth the name of such Holder, the principal amount of Securities delivered for purchase and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing his election to have such Securities purchased; and
(7) that Holders whose Securities are being purchased only in part will be issued new Securities equal in principal amount to the unpurchased portion of the Securities surrendered; that each Security purchased and each new Security issued shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.
provided
On the Payment Date, the Company shall (1) accept for payment Securities or portions thereof tendered pursuant to an Offer to Purchase; (2) deposit with the Paying Agent money sufficient to pay the purchase price of all Securities or portions thereof so accepted; and (3) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Trustee all Securities or portions thereof so accepted together with an officers' certificate specifying the Securities or portions thereof accepted for payment by the Company. The Paying Agent shall promptly mail to the Holders of Securities so accepted payment in an amount equal to the purchase price, and the Trustee shall promptly authenticate and mail to such Holders a new Security equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Security surrendered; that each Security purchased and each new Security issued shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. The Company will publicly announce the results of an Offer to Purchase as soon as practicable after the Payment Date. The Trustee shall act as the Paying Agent for an Offer to Purchase. The Company will comply with Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent such laws and
provided
 
regulations are applicable, in the event that the Company is required to repurchase Securities pursuant to an Offer to Purchase.
"" means, with respect to any Person, any and all preferred or preference stock or other equity interests (however designated) of such Person whether now outstanding or issued after the Issue Date.
Preferred Stock
"" of any Person means Equity Interests of such Person other than Disqualified Equity Interests; that such Equity Interests shall not be deemed Qualified Equity Interests to the extent sold to a Subsidiary of such Person or financed, directly or indirectly, using funds (1) borrowed from such Person or any Subsidiary of such Person until and to the extent such borrowing is repaid or (2) contributed, extended, guaranteed or advanced by such Person or any Subsidiary of such Person (including, without limitation, in respect of any employee stock ownership or benefit plan). Unless otherwise specified, Qualified Equity Interests refer to Qualified Equity Interests of the Guarantor.
Qualified Equity Interests
provided
"" means (1) S&P and Moody's or (2) if S&P or Moody's or both of them are not making ratings publicly available, a nationally recognized U.S. rating agency or agencies, as the case may be, selected by the Company, which will be substituted for S&P or Moody's or both, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
"" means (1) with respect to S&P, any of the following categories (any of which may include a "+" or ""): AAA, AA, A, BBB, BB, B, CCC, CC, C and D (or equivalent successor categories), (2) with respect to Moody's, any of the following categories (any of which may include a "1", "2" or "3"): Aaa, Aa, A, Baa, Ba, B, Caa, Ca, C and D (or equivalent successor categories) and (3) the equivalent of any such categories of S&P or Moody's used by another Rating Agency, if applicable.
Rating Category
"" means any of the following:
Restricted Payment
(a) the declaration or payment of any dividend or any other distribution on Equity Interests of the Guarantor or any payment made to the direct or indirect holders (in their capacities as such) of Equity Interests of the Guarantor, including, without limitation, any payment in connection with any merger or consolidation involving the Guarantor but excluding dividends or distributions payable solely in Qualified Equity Interests of the Guarantor or
 
through accretion or accumulation of such dividends on such Equity Interests; or
(b) the redemption of any Equity Interests of the Guarantor, including, without limitation, any payment in connection with any merger or consolidation involving the Guarantor.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) no purchase of common stock by the Guarantor from Merrill Lynch International pursuant to the Confirmation of OTC Convertible Note Hedge, dated February 12, 2007, between the Guarantor and Merrill Lynch International, and no cash payment by the Guarantor to Merrill Lynch International pursuant to the Confirmation of OTC Warrant Transaction, dated February 12, 2007, between Merrill Lynch International and the Guarantor, will be deemed a Restricted Payment and (ii) any payment made as a result of a merger or consolidation will be deemed a Restricted Payment only to the extent paid from the funds of the Guarantor, the Company or its Subsidiaries or from newly borrowed funds used to complete such merger or consolidation that would be deemed Indebtedness of the Guarantor, the Company or its Subsidiaries.
"" means Standard & Poor's, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies.
S&P
"" means Indebtedness of the Company or the Guarantor or any Subsidiary that is expressly subordinated in right of payment to the Securities or the guarantees of the Securities by the Guarantor or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Subordinated Indebtedness
"" means, at any date of determination, the aggregate amount of all outstanding Indebtedness of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Total Debt
"" means, as of the date of determination, the ratio of (a) the Total Debt of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries to (b) Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries for the most recently ended four fiscal quarter period ending immediately prior to such date for which financial statements are available. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in the definition of Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges (and all component definitions referenced in such definitions), for purposes of determining the Total Leverage Ratio, such definition (and all component definitions referenced in such definition) shall
Total Leverage Ratio
 
be calculated with respect to the Company, the Guarantor and all of the Subsidiaries, notwithstanding the use of the term "Restricted Subsidiaries" in such definitions, and otherwise in accordance with such definitions.
In the event that the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary incurs, redeems, retires or extinguishes any Total Debt (other than the incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness in the ordinary course of business for working capital purposes pursuant to any revolving credit arrangement) subsequent to the commencement of the period for which the Total Leverage Ratio is being calculated but prior to or simultaneously with the event for which the calculation of the Total Leverage Ratio is made, then the Total Leverage Ratio shall be calculated giving effect to such incurrence, redemption, retirement or extinguishment of Total Debt as if the same had occurred at the beginning of the applicable four-quarter period.
pro forma
"" means with respect to any Person, Capital Stock of any class or kind ordinarily having the power to vote for the election of directors, managers or other voting members of the governing body of such Person.
Voting Stock
     (b) The definition of "GAAP" is amended and restated to read in its entirety as follows:
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States which are in effect on the date of the Second Supplement Indenture.
GAAP
     (c) The definitions of "Consolidated Net Tangible Assets," "Principal Facility" and "Restricted Subsidiary" are hereby amended to change the phrase "the date of the First Supplemental Indenture" to "the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture."
     1.3 . Section 501 ("Events of Default") is hereby amended:
Amendment of Section 501
     (a) to renumber paragraph (8) as paragraph (9),
     (b) to add the parenthetical "(or 120 days in the case of the covenant contained in Section 1007 hereof)" after the words "30 days" in paragraph (4),
     (c) to amend and restate paragraph (5) to read in its entirety as follows:
 
if a default by the Company or the Guarantor under one or more mortgages, indentures, bonds, debentures, notes or instruments under which there may be issued, secured or evidenced indebtedness for money borrowed shall happen and shall either (x) constitute a failure to pay more than $25,000,000 in principal amount of such indebtedness when due and payable at its stated maturity, or (y) result in $25,000,000 in principal amount of such indebtedness becoming or being declared due and payable prior to its stated maturity, and that acceleration shall not be rescinded or annulled, or such indebtedness shall not have been discharged before written notice to the Company and Guarantor is given pursuant to Section 502; or
(d) to add a new paragraph (8) to read in its entirety as follows:
(8) the entry against the Company or the Guarantor of a final judgment or final judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $100,000,000, by a court or courts of competent jurisdiction, which judgments remain undischarged, unwaived, unstayed, unbonded or unsatisfied for a period of 60 consecutive days; or
     1.4 . Section 1005 ("Restriction on Creation of Secured Debt") is hereby amended:
Amendment of Section 1005
(a) to change the phrase "the date of the First Supplemental Indenture" to "the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture",
(b) to amend and restate clause (i) of paragraph (a) to read as follows:
Any Security Interest on any property acquired, constructed, developed or improved after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture by the Guarantor or a Restricted Subsidiary created prior to or contemporaneously with, or within 180 days after the acquisition of property which is a parcel of real property, a building, machinery or equipment; or
     1.5 . Section 1007 (currently reserved) is renamed "Commission Reports and Reports to Holders" and shall read in its entirety as follows:
Amendment of Sections 1007
Whether or not the Guarantor is then required to file reports with the Commission, the Guarantor shall file with the Commission all such reports and other information as it would be required to file with the Commission by Section 13(a) or 15(d) under the Exchange Act if it were subject thereto within the time periods specified by the Commission's rules and regulations. For as long as any Securities are outstanding, the Guarantor shall supply the
 
Trustee and each Holder who so requests or shall supply to the Trustee for forwarding to each such Holder, without cost to such Holder, copies of such reports and other information.
     1.6 . Section 1008 (currently reserved) is renamed "Future Guarantees" and shall read in its entirety as follows:
Amendment of Sections 1008
(A) (x) If the Company, the Guarantor or any Restricted Subsidiary acquires or creates a Domestic Subsidiary that is a Restricted Subsidiary with either (i) assets having a book value (determined in accordance with GAAP on a stand-alone basis and not consolidated with its subsidiaries and not including any equity interests held by such Domestic Subsidiary) in excess of 5% of the Guarantor's consolidated total assets (determined as of the end of the Guarantor's most recently completed fiscal quarter for which financial statements are prepared) or (ii) Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges (determined on a stand-alone basis and not consolidated with its subsidiaries) in excess of 5% of the Guarantor's Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges for the most recently completed last four fiscal quarters for which financial statements are prepared, or (y) if a Domestic Subsidiary that is a Restricted Subsidiary (i) has, as of any fiscal year end, assets having a book value (determined in accordance with GAAP on a stand-alone basis and not consolidated with its subsidiaries and not including any equity interests held by such Domestic Subsidiary) in excess of 5% of the Guarantor's consolidated total assets as of the end of such fiscal year or (ii) generates Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges (determined on a stand-alone basis and not consolidated with its subsidiaries) for any fiscal year in excess of 5% of the Guarantor's annual Consolidated Cash Flow Available for Fixed Charges for such fiscal year, and (B) whether before or after the occurrence of any event described in clause (A)(x) or (y) above, such Domestic Subsidiary either guarantees any other indebtedness of the Guarantor or the Company or incurs any indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount in excess of $50,000,000, such Domestic Subsidiary will, within 30 days of later of the date on which it was acquired or created and the date on which it guarantees any such indebtedness or incurs any such indebtedness (in the case of clause (A)(x)) or within 30 days of the later of the filing of the Guarantor's annual audited financial statements for the applicable fiscal year with the Commission and the date on which it guarantees any such indebtedness or incurs any such indebtedness (in the case of clause (A)(y)), jointly and severally, guarantee the Securities of each series established on or after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture by executing and delivering a supplemental indenture to this Indenture.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Anixter Receivables Corporation shall not be required to guarantee the Securities for as long as its sole business is the purchase, sale and financing of receivables and related activities in connection with the Company's receivables facility.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Section 1008 shall cease to apply to a series of Securities during any period of time that, and for so long as, such Securities become rated Investment Grade by each of the Rating Agencies; provided that if on any subsequent date such Securities cease to be rated Investment Grade for any reason by either Rating Agency, then the Company, the Guarantor and the Restricted Subsidiaries will thereafter again be subject to this Section 1008. Any guarantees of a series of Securities that are required by the preceding paragraph or that have been made pursuant to such preceding paragraph, in each case prior to such series of Securities becoming rated Investment Grade, shall continue in effect at all times, regardless of such series of Securities becoming rated Investment Grade.
     1.7 . Section 1010 (currently reserved) is renamed "Repurchase of Securities upon a Change of Control" and shall read in its entirety as follows:
Amendment of Sections 1010
The Company shall commence, within 30 days of the occurrence of a Change of Control, and consummate an Offer to Purchase for all Securities of each series established on or after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture then outstanding, at a purchase price equal to 101% of their principal amount, plus accrued interest, if any, to the Payment Date.
The Company shall not be required to make an Offer to Purchase upon a Change of Control if (i) a third party makes the Offer to Purchase in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this Indenture, and purchases all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under the Offer to Purchase upon a Change of Control, or (ii) a notice of redemption has been given pursuant to this Indenture as described in Section 1104 to redeem all outstanding Securities otherwise subject to the Offer to Purchase, unless and until there is a default in payment of the applicable Redemption Price. An Offer to Purchase upon the occurrence of a Change of Control may be made by either the Company or a third party in advance of a Change of Control if a definitive agreement to effect the Change of Control is in place at the time such Offer to Purchase is made and the Offer to Purchase is effected upon the consummation of the Change of Control, and
 
such Offer to Purchase may be conditional on the Change of Control.
     1.7 . Section 1012 is named "Limitations on Restricted Payments" and shall read in its entirety as follows:
Addition of Section 1012
The Company and the Guarantor will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, make any Restricted Payment if at the time of such Restricted Payment:
(a) a Default shall have occurred and be continuing or shall occur as a consequence thereof;
(b) after giving effect to such Restricted Payment (including, without limitation, the incurrence of any Indebtedness to finance such Restricted Payment), the Consolidated Interest Coverage Ratio would be less than 2:00 to 1:00; or
(c) the amount of such Restricted Payment, when added to the aggregate amount of all other Restricted Payments made after the Issue Date (other than Restricted Payments made pursuant to clauses (b), (c) or (d) of the next paragraph), exceeds the sum (the "Restricted Payments Basket") of (without duplication):
(i) 50% of consolidated net income of the Guarantor and all of its Subsidiaries (for the avoidance of doubt, including Unrestricted Subsidiaries) determined in accordance with GAAP for the period (taken as one accounting period) commencing on the first day of the first full fiscal quarter commencing after the Issue Date to and including the last day of the fiscal quarter ended immediately prior to the date of such calculation for which consolidated financial statements are available (or, if such consolidated net income shall be a deficit, minus 100% of such aggregate deficit),
plus
(ii) 100% of the aggregate net cash proceeds received by the Guarantor from the issuance and sale of Qualified Equity Interests of the Guarantor after the Issue Date, other than (A) any such proceeds which are used to redeem Securities in accordance with the terms of such Securities or (B)
 
any such proceeds or assets received from a Subsidiary of the Company,
plus
(iii) the aggregate amount by which Indebtedness (other than any Subordinated Indebtedness) incurred by the Company or the Guarantor or any Subsidiary subsequent to the Issue Date is reduced on the Guarantor's balance sheet upon the conversion or exchange (other than by a Subsidiary of the Company) into Qualified Equity Interests of the Guarantor (less the amount of any cash, or the fair value of assets, distributed by the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary upon such conversion or exchange).
     The foregoing provisions will not prohibit:
(a) the payment by the Guarantor of any dividend within 60 days after the date of declaration thereof, if on the date of declaration the payment would have complied with the provisions of this Indenture;
(b) the redemption of any Equity Interests of the Guarantor in exchange for, or out of the proceeds of the substantially concurrent issuance and sale of, Qualified Equity Interests;
(c) payments by the Guarantor to redeem Equity Interests of the Guarantor held by officers, directors or employees or former officers, directors or employees (or their transferees, estates or beneficiaries under their estates) of the Company, the Guarantor or the Subsidiaries, upon their death, disability, retirement, severance or termination of employment or service; that the aggregate cash consideration paid for all such redemptions shall not exceed (A) $5 million since the Issue Date (B) the amount of any net cash proceeds received by the Guarantor from the issuance and sale after the Issue Date of Qualified Equity Interests of the Guarantor to officers, directors or employees of the Company, the Guarantor or the Subsidiaries that have not been applied to the payment of Restricted Payments pursuant to this clause (c), (C) the net cash proceeds of any "key-man" life insurance policies that have not been
provided
plus
plus
 
applied to the payment of Restricted Payments pursuant to this clause (c);
(d) repurchases of Equity Interests deemed to occur upon the exercise of stock options if the Equity Interests represents a portion of the exercise price thereof;
(e) Restricted Payments in an amount not to exceed $125 million since the Issue Date; and
(f) other Restricted Payments if, at the time of the making of such payments, and after giving effect thereto (including, without limitation, the incurrence of any Indebtedness to finance such payment), the Total Leverage Ratio would not exceed 3.25 to 1.00.
that (a) in the case of any Restricted Payment pursuant to clause (c), (e) or (f) above, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing or occur as a consequence thereof and (b) no issuance and sale of Qualified Equity Interests that are used to make a payment pursuant to clauses (b) or (c)(B) above shall increase the Restricted Payments Basket.
provided
     2.1 . The Trustee accepts the amendments to the Indenture effected by this Second Supplemental Indenture and agrees to execute the trusts created by the Indenture as hereby amended, but only upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Indenture.
Acceptance by Trustee
     2.2 . The Trustee shall not be responsible for and makes no representation as to the validity or adequacy of this Second Supplemental Indenture or the Securities, and it shall not be responsible for the recitals or any statement of the Company in this Second Supplemental Indenture.
Trustee's Disclaimer
     2.3 . Except as hereby expressly amended, the Indenture and the Securities issued thereunder are in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect.
Ratification
     2.4 . This Second Supplemental Indenture shall become effective as of the date first above written.
Effectiveness
 
     2.5 . This Second Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without regard to the conflict of laws principals thereof (other than Section 5-1401 of the General Obligation Law).
Governing Law
     2.6 . This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts or with counterpart signatures, each of which as executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterpart Originals
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Second Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.

EXHIBIT 4.2
     THIS NOTE IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE OF A DEPOSITARY. THIS NOTE IS EXCHANGEABLE FOR NOTES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR ITS NOMINEE ONLY IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT AS A WHOLE BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY.
     UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
     THIS NOTE IS ISSUED WITH ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 1271 ET SEQ. OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. A HOLDER MAY OBTAIN THE ISSUE PRICE, AMOUNT OF ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT, ISSUE DATE AND YIELD TO MATURITY FOR SUCH NOTES BY SUBMITTING A REQUEST FOR SUCH INFORMATION TO THE COMPANY AT THE FOLLOWING ADDRESS: 2301 PATRIOT BOULEVARD, GLENVIEW, ILLINOIS 60026 ATTENTION: CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER.
     ANIXTER INC., a corporation incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware (hereinafter called the "Company", which term includes any successor corporation under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of $200,000,000 on March 15, 2014 and to pay interest thereon at the rate per annum of 10.00% from March 11, 2009 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid, semiannually on March 15 and September 15 in each year, commencing September 15, 2009, until the principal hereof has been paid or duly provided for in accordance with said Indenture. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or
 
duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in the Indenture, be paid to the Holder of this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) of record at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the March 1 or September 1 next preceding each Interest Payment Date. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date, and may be paid to the Holder of this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) of record at the close of business on a Special Record Date fixed by the Trustee for the payment of such defaulted interest, notice whereof shall be given to Holders not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or may be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in the Indenture. Interest shall be calculated on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months.
     Payment of principal, premium (if any) and interest due on this Note at Maturity or upon redemption or repurchase will be paid by wire transfer in immediately available funds against presentation and surrender of this Note by the Holder hereof at the office of the Paying Agent, but only if appropriate wire transfer instructions have been received in writing (or by such other means as deemed acceptable by the Paying Agent) by the Paying Agent not less than 15 days before Maturity or the Redemption Date or the Repurchase Date. In the event such instructions are not received by such 15th day, such principal and interest will be paid by check against such presentation and surrender.
     All interest payments on this Note (other than interest due at Maturity, redemption or repurchase) will be made by mailing a check for such interest, payable to or upon the written order of the Holder of this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) of record at the close of business on the Regular Record Date preceding the Interest Payment Date for such interest, to the address of such Holder as it appears on the Security Register. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Holder of Securities of any series issued under the Indenture (including the Notes) which pay interest on the same Interest Payment Date and which are in an aggregate principal amount in excess of $10,000,000 may elect to receive payments of interest with respect to such Securities (other than interest due at Maturity) via wire transfer in immediately available funds to a bank in New York, New York (or other bank approved by the Paying Agent) by making arrangements therefor in writing (or such other means as deemed acceptable by the Paying Agent) with the Paying Agent not later than the Regular Record Date immediately preceding the applicable Interest Payment Date.
     The provisions of this Note are continued on the reverse hereof and such continued provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as though fully set forth at this place. Unless the certificate of authentication herein has been executed by or on behalf of the Trustee by manual signature, this Note shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture, or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
     This Note shall be construed in accordance with and governed by laws of the State of New York.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
[SEAL]
 
     This Note is one of a duly authorized issue of Notes of the Company (herein called the "Notes"), issuable in series, unlimited in aggregate principal amount except as may be otherwise provided in respect of the Notes of a particular series, issued and to be issued under and pursuant to an Indenture dated as of September 9, 1996, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 24, 2005 and the Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of March 11, 2009 (as supplemented, the "Indenture"), duly executed and delivered by the Company, Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Guarantor") and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, and is one of a series designated as 10.00% Senior Notes due March 15, 2014 (herein called the "10.00% Notes"), limited in aggregate principal amount to $200,000,000. Reference is hereby made to the Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto for a description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities thereunder of the Trustee, the Company, the Guarantor and the Holders.
     The 10.00% Notes will not be redeemable at any time prior to maturity except as set forth below.
     The Company may redeem all or part of the 10.00% Notes at any time at its option at a redemption price equal to the greater of (1) 100% of the principal amount of the 10.00% Notes being redeemed plus accrued interest to the Redemption Date or (2) the Make-Whole Amount for the 10.00% Notes being redeemed. For purposes of this provision:
          "Make-Whole Amount" means the sum, as determined by a Quotation Agent, of the present values of the principal amount of the 10.00% Notes to be redeemed, together with scheduled payments of interest (exclusive of interest to the Redemption Date) from the Redemption Date to the Stated Maturity of the 10.00% Notes, in each case discounted to the Redemption Date on a semi-annual basis, assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months, at the Adjusted Treasury Rate, plus accrued interest on the principal amount of the 10.00% Notes being redeemed to the Redemption Date.
          "Adjusted Treasury Rate" means, with respect to any Redemption Date, (i) the yield, under the heading which represents the average for the immediately preceding week, appearing in the most recently published statistical release designated "H.15 (519)" or any successor publication which is published weekly by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption "Treasury Constant Maturities," for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue (if no maturity is within three months before or after the remaining term of the 10.00% Notes, yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue shall be determined and the Adjusted Treasury Rate shall be interpolated or extrapolated from such yields on a straight line basis, rounding to the nearest month) or (ii) if such release (or any successor release) is not published
 
during the week preceding the calculation date or does not contain such yields, the rate per year equal to the semi-annual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue assuming a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for such Redemption Date, in each case calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date, plus 0.50%.
          "Comparable Treasury Issue" means the United States Treasury security selected by the Quotation Agent as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term from the Redemption Date to the Stated Maturity of the 10.00% Notes that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the 10.00% Notes.
          "Comparable Treasury Price" means, with respect to any Redemption Date, if clause (ii) of the definition of Adjusted Treasury Rate is applicable, the average of three, or such lesser number as is obtained by the Trustee, Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for such Redemption Date.
          "Quotation Agent" means the Reference Treasury Dealer selected by the Company.
          "Reference Treasury Dealers" mean Banc of America Securities LLC and any successor thereto or any other primary U.S. Government securities dealers selected by the Company.
          "Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by a Reference Treasury Dealer, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue, expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount, quoted in writing to the Trustee by such Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the third Business Day preceding such Redemption Date.
     In addition, at any time prior to March 15, 2012, the Company may redeem up to 35% of the principal amount of the 10.00% Notes with the net cash proceeds of one or more public sales of the Guarantor's common stock at a redemption price (expressed as a percentage of principal amount) of 110%, plus accrued interest to the redemption date; that at least 65% of the aggregate principal amount of 10.00% Notes originally issued on March 11, 2009 remains outstanding after each such redemption and notice of any such redemption is mailed within 60 days of each such sale of common stock.
provided
     Subject to certain exceptions contained in the Indenture, the Company must commence, within 30 days of the occurrence of a Change of Control, and consummate an Offer to Purchase for all 10.00% Notes of each series established on or after the date of the Second Supplemental Indenture then outstanding, at a purchase price equal to 101% of their principal amount, plus accrued interest, if any, to the Payment Date pursuant to and in accordance with the terms of the Indenture.
     The Indenture provides that each Holder of a Note is entitled to the benefits of a Guarantee by the Guarantor of the timely payment of the principal, and premium, if any, of and
 
interest on the Notes. The Guarantee enclosed herein is an integral part of this Note. The Indenture contains provisions for defeasance at any time of the entire indebtedness of the Company on this Note upon compliance by the Company with certain conditions set forth therein, which provisions apply to this Note. The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the Guarantor and the rights of the Holders under the Indenture at any time by the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of Notes at the time Outstanding of each series which is affected by such amendment or modification voting as one class, except that certain amendments specified in the Indenture may be made without approval of Holders of the Notes. The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series to waive on behalf of the Holders of such series of Securities compliance by the Company or the Guarantor with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Note shall be binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Note and any Note issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Note.
     Unless this Note is defeased and discharged as provided in the Indenture, no reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the respective obligations of the Company and the Guarantor, which are absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and interest on this Note at the times, place, and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
     As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, transfer of this Note is registrable on the Security Register, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Trustee in New York, New York, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or his attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Notes of the same series containing identical terms and provisions, of authorized denominations and for a like aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
     The 10.00% Notes are issuable only as registered Notes without coupons in denominations of $2,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000. As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Notes are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Notes of the same series containing identical terms and provisions and of different authorized denominations, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
     No service charge will be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge payable in connection therewith.
     The Company, the Guarantor, the Trustee and any agent of the Company, the Guarantor or the Trustee may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment as herein provided and for all other purposes whether or not
 
this Note be overdue, and neither the Company, the Guarantor, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
     All terms used in the Note which are defined in the Indenture have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
     This is one of the Securities of the series designated herein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
          If you wish to have this Note purchased by the Company pursuant to Section 1010 of the Indenture, check the Box:
o
          If you wish to have a portion of this Note purchased by the Company pursuant to Section 1010 of the Indenture, state the principal amount: $.
                    
          Signature must be guaranteed by a participant in a recognized signature guaranty medallion program or other signature guarantor acceptable to the Trustee.
 
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, Anixter International Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (the "Guarantor"), hereby unconditionally guarantees to the Holder of the Note upon which this Guarantee is endorsed the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on said Note, when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, according to the terms thereof and of the Indenture referred to therein.
     In case of the failure of the Company punctually to pay any such principal, premium, if any, or interest, the Guarantor hereby agrees to cause any such payment to be made punctually when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, and as if such payment were made by the Company.
     The Guarantor hereby agrees that its obligations hereunder shall be as if it were principal debtor and not merely surety, and shall be absolute and unconditional, irrespective of, and unaffected by, any invalidity, irregularity or unenforceability of any Note or the Indenture, any failure to enforce the provisions of any Note or the Indenture, any waiver, modification or indulgence granted to the Company with respect thereto by the Holder of any Note or the Trustee, or any other circumstance which may otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge of a surety or guarantor; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, no such waiver, modification, indulgence or circumstance shall without the consent of the Guarantor increase the principal amount of any Note or the interest rate thereon or change the currency of payment with respect to any Note, or alter the Stated Maturity thereof, or increase any premium payable upon redemption thereof. The Guarantor hereby waives diligence, presentment, demand of payment, filing of claims with a court in the event of merger or bankruptcy of the Company, any right to require a proceeding first against the Company, protest or notice with respect to any Note or the indebtedness evidenced thereby and all demands whatsoever, and covenants that this Guarantee will not be discharged with respect to any Note except by payment in full of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest, if any, thereon.
provided, however,
     The Guarantor shall not be subrogated to the rights of the Holder of this Note against the Company in respect of any amounts paid to the Holder pursuant to the provisions of this Guarantee unless and until the Guarantor or the Company has made due payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on each and every other outstanding Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, in accordance with the terms of the Indenture.
     If at any time any payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on this Note is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company, the Guarantor's obligations hereunder with respect to such payment shall be reinstated as of the date of such rescission, restoration or return as though such payment had become due but had not been made at such time.
 
     This Guarantee ranks equally with all other unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Guarantor. This Guarantee will remain in full force and effect until the principal of and interest on the Note have been fully paid.
     This Guarantee shall not be valid or become obligatory for any purpose with respect to the Note upon which it is endorsed until the certificate of authentication on said Note shall have been signed by the Trustee or the authenticating agent.
     This Guarantee shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to conflicts of law principles thereof.
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Guarantor has caused this Guarantee to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
[SEAL]
Attest:

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communications and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today announced that through its wholly owned subsidiary, Anixter Inc. it had completed an offering of 10% senior notes due 2014 having a principal amount at maturity of $200 million. The notes were priced at a discount to par that resulted in a yield to maturity of 12%. Net proceeds, after estimated expenses, from the sale of the notes were approximately $180.5 million. The proceeds will be used to pay down short term borrowings and for general corporate purposes.
GLENVIEW, IL, March 11 , 2009
Anixter International Inc. fully and unconditionally guarantees the notes, which are unsecured obligations of Anixter Inc.
Commenting on the sale of the notes, Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President  Finance said, "This sale extends the average maturities of our borrowings and provides the company with enhanced liquidity to meet these uncertain economic times. While anticipated cash flows in coming quarters together with existing available bank lines of credit gave us the projected ability to deal with a "put" right the holders of our 3.25% zero coupon convertible bonds have in July of 2009, and the annual renewal of our accounts receivable securitization facility in September of 2009, this additional capital more fully insures our ability to meet those potential liquidity events."
Letham added, "Although there will be some earnings dilution associated with the higher cost of these borrowings in comparison to the borrowings they will be replacing, we believe it is appropriate given the added assurance and flexibility this capital offers the company in managing through this period of economic uncertainty as well as provide the availability to support future growth as the economy eventually improves."
About Anixter
Anixter International is the world's leading distributor of communications and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 237 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 271 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, changes in supplier sales strategy or financial viability, political, economic and currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20090429123703.txt.gz
TIME:20090429123703
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On April 28, 2009, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended April 3, 2009. The Company's press release, dated April 28, 2009, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
     Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended April 3, 2009.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 28, 2009 
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Note: Throughout this announcement prior year amounts have been restated to conform with the requirements of FASB Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlement)" that became effective in 2009.
First Quarter Highlights
 
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO stated, "Our underlying results in the first quarter were sound given the uncertain macroeconomic environment. As we expected, our first quarter results were negatively impacted by strengthening of the U.S. dollar and the decline in the spot market price of copper that occurred in late 2008. After excluding these effects and those associated with acquisitions completed in the second half of 2008, we saw an overall organic sales decline of 7 percent. Emerging Markets reported 3 percent organic sales growth due to comparatively strong end market conditions in Latin America. North American OEM supply, where the combination of new customer additions in the second half of 2008 and comparatively solid market demand with aerospace and defense customers, produced a year-on-year organic sales increase of 12 percent."
"However, our other end markets and geographies reported negative organic sales comparisons due to the soft economic conditions. Enterprise cabling and security solutions sales showed organic declines of approximately 5 percent in both North America and Europe as lower project volumes weighed on the year-on-year comparisons. Within the global enterprise cabling and security market we saw security-related sales grow by 11 percent, exclusive of foreign currency impacts, as compared to the first quarter of last year," added Eck. "After excluding the effects of foreign exchange and lower copper prices, electrical wire & cable sales were down 10 percent in North America and 5 percent in Europe due to lower demandThe largest organic sales decline was in the European OEM supply business, where significant customer production cutbacks due to very poor economic conditions resulted in negative comparisons of 32 percent."
.
First Quarter Operating Results
"As highlighted above, reduced sales volumes, lower copper prices and the translation effects of a stronger dollar all combined to negatively affect performance in the first quarter," commented Eck. "In addition to the effects of lower sales, we also saw lower gross margins primarily due to
 
larger sales declines in our higher margin North American electrical wire & cable and European OEM supply end markets than elsewhere in the business."
"The actions we took in 2008 have already begun to yield positive results, both from a financial, as well as an organizational standpoint. We have continued to adjust staffing to levels appropriate to the market conditions in each of the end markets and geographies in which we operate with an ongoing goal of improving operating efficiency, profitability and cash flow," continued Eck. "In the first quarter, after adjusting for foreign exchange effects and operating expenses of acquired businesses, our operating expenses declined on an organic basis by 2 percent versus the prior year. As we begin to realize the full benefits of the fourth quarter restructuring actions, together with further select expense reduction actions, we expect the year-on-year reduction in organic expenses to increase. We are continuing to address the changing economic landscape and are carefully balancing cost reductions with a desire to preserve institutional knowledge, service capabilities and momentum on key initiatives so we can fully capture the benefits of a recovering market when the economy begins to improve."
operating margins declined to 4.5 percent from 6.9 percent in the year ago quarter as the effects of lower sales and the adverse sales mix changes on gross margins were greater than the year-on-year operating expense reductions achieved in the quarter.
Company-wide
operating margins declined to 5.5 percent from 7.9 percent in the year ago quarter as a consequence of lower sales, lower gross margins due to less favorable sales mix and the effects of lower copper prices.
North America
operating margins were a negative 0.4 percent as compared to a positive 4.1 percent in the year ago quarter due largely to a sales decline of 30 percent (18 percent organically), an unfavorable sales mix shift that negatively affected gross margins and the effects of lower copper prices.
Europe
operating margins increased to 6.8 percent in the current quarter compared to 6.1 percent in the year ago quarter, primarily due to sales mix-related increases in gross margin
Emerging Markets
.
Cash Flow and Leverage
"In the first quarter we generated $88.0 million of cash from operations, an increase of 59 percent from the $55.4 million generated in the year ago quarter. The increase in cash flow reflects the lower working capital requirements associated with the organic reduction in sales and the deflationary effects of lower copper prices," said Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "We anticipate continuing strong cash flow over the near term as our inventory levels continue to decline."
"We ended the quarter with cash balances of $100.1 million, $45.0 million of which was short-term invested cash. We also had $299.4 million in committed, unused lines of credit that run until 2012, as well as only $5.0 million of outstanding borrowings under our $255.0 million accounts receivable securitization facility that expires in September of 2009, giving us significant excess liquidity," Letham continued. "Our strong liquidity position at the end of the first quarter was aided by the successful completion of a $200 million senior note offering in the first quarter. Net of fees, expenses and original issue discount this debt offering generated $180.5 million in added liquidity. At this point the company is well positioned to manage through near term liquidity challenges, as well as the potential "put" of the company's 3.25 percent convertible
 
notes in July of 2009, should that event occur. We regard our strong financial position and available liquidity as important differentiators from many companies in today's market."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the first quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "Following a very soft finish to 2008, and an extension of those market conditions into the first few days of 2009, we were pleased to see activity levels rebound to a limited degree and then stabilize through the balance of the quarter. At this time it is too early to ascertain if the stabilizing trends of the past couple of months are reflective of the current recession beginning to find a bottom or if this is merely a period of calm in a continuing uncertain market. It appears, however, that the normal seasonal sales patterns that typically produce low-to-mid-single digit consecutive quarter growth from the first to the second quarter will be more muted than normal"
.
"As the year progresses we will continue to be responsive to changes in the macroeconomic environment and will aggressively manage costs and working capital. We will also balance these efforts with continued focus on and investment in those initiatives that can produce both short-term benefits and improved long-term market positioning. We remain focused on moving our strategic initiatives forward, generating significant cash flow, and continuing to benefit from our diverse geographic presence, product offering and variety of important end markets. Our most important objective is ensuring that we react appropriately to the economic cycle and position the company to take full advantage of the eventual recovery," Eck concluded.
2009 Accounting Change
As required by Financial Accounting Standards Board Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "" the company is now accounting separately for the debt and equity components of its outstanding convertible bonds. As a result of this change, the company reported diluted earnings per share for the first quarter of 2009 that were 5 cents less than they would have been under the prior accounting rules. At the same time, the adoption of these new rules required that the company restate its previously reported first quarter 2008 results to give effect to these new rules. The effect of this was to reduce first quarter 2008 earnings per diluted share by 5 cents from the amounts previously reported.
Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlements)
First Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2009 first quarter on Tuesday, April 28, 2009 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be
www.anixter.com/webcasts
 
available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 235 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 271 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
Financial Measures That Supplement GAAP
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
First Quarter Sales Growth Trends


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20090728130313.txt.gz
TIME:20090728130313
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
          On July 23, 2009, Anixter International Inc.'s (the "Company") primary operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., amended its senior unsecured revolving credit agreement. The following key changes have been made to the revolving credit agreement:
          All other material terms and conditions of the revolving credit facility remain unchanged, including the April 2012 maturity. The amendment to the senior unsecured revolving credit agreement, dated July 23, 2009, is attached as Exhibit 10.1
          On July 24, 2009, Anixter Inc. also renewed its accounts receivable securitization program for a new 364-day period ending in July of 2010. As a part of the renewal, the size of the facility has been reduced from $255 million to $200 million to bring it in-line with the size of the current receivable collateral base. The renewed program carries an all-in drawn funding cost of Commercial Paper ("CP") plus 150 basis points (previously CP plus 95 basis points). Unused capacity fees increased from 45 to 55 basis points to 85 to 95 basis points. All other material terms and conditions remain unchanged. The amendments related to the renewal of the accounts receivable securitization program, dated July 24, 2009, are attached as Exhibit 10.2 and Exhibit 10.3.
          The Company's press release, dated July 28, 2009, announcing Anixter Inc.'s amendment of its senior unsecured revolving credit agreement and renewal of its accounts receivable securitization program is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
          On July 28, 2009, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended July 3, 2009. The Company's press release, dated July 28, 2009, is attached as Exhibit 99.2.
Table of Contents
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 10.1
     THIS SECOND AMENDMENT dated as of July 23, 2009 (this "") amends the Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 20, 2007, as amended as of September 26, 2007 (as previously amended, the ""), among Anixter Inc. (""), various subsidiaries of Anixter (the ""), various financial institutions (the "") and Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ""), Swing Line Lender and L/C Issuer. Terms defined in the Credit Agreement are, unless otherwise defined herein or the context otherwise requires, used herein as defined therein.
Amendment
Credit Agreement
Anixter
Borrowing Subsidiaries
Lenders
Administrative Agent
     WHEREAS, Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent have entered into the Credit Agreement; and
     WHEREAS, the parties hereto desire to amend the Credit Agreement in certain respects as more fully set forth herein;
     NOW, THEREFORE, the parties hereto agree as follows:
     SECTION 1 . Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in , the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows. (Text being inserted in the Credit Agreement is indicated herein by the use of an font.)
Amendments
Section 4
italic
     1.1 . Section 1.01 is amended by (i) deleting the definitions of ", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "" and ""; (ii) replacing all references to "Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments" or "Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments" with references to "Aggregate Commitments"; and (iii) amending the following definitions in their entirety to read as follows:
Deletion and Replacement of Definitions
"
Aggregate Tranche 1 Commitments
Aggregate Tranche 2 Commitments
Tranche 1 Commitment
Tranche 1 Lender
Tranche 1 Loan
Tranche 1 Outstandings
Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share
Tranche 2 Commitment
Tranche 2 Lender
Tranche 2 Loan
Tranche 2 Outstandings
Tranche 2 Pro Rata Share
     
"
Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments
" means US$100,000,000, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement. The Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments are part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments. The aggregate amount of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
     
"
Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments
" means US$25,000,000, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement. The Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments are part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments. The aggregate amount of the Aggregate British Pound Sterling
 
Commitments and the Aggregate Canadian Dollar Commitments shall not exceed US$125,000,000.
     
"
Aggregate Commitments
" means US$350,000,000, as such amount may be reduced or adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     
"
Class
" means the character of certain Loans as Committed Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans or Canadian Dollar Loans.
     
"
Commitment
" means, as to each Lender, its obligation to (a) make Committed Loans to the Borrowers pursuant to
Section 2.01
, (b) purchase participations in L/C Obligations, (c) purchase participations in Swing Line Loans, (d) purchase participations in British Pound Sterling Loans and (e) purchase participations in Canadian Dollar Loans and Canadian Banker's Acceptances, and in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the US Dollar amount of such Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on
Schedule 2.01
or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
     
"
Committed Borrowing
" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Loans of the same Type and, if applicable, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Lenders pursuant to
Section 2.01
.
     
"
Committed Loan
" has the meaning specified in
Section 2.01
.
     
"
L/C Advance
" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's funding of its participation in any L/C Borrowing in accordance with its Pro Rata Share.
     
"
L/C Borrowing
" means an extension of credit resulting from a drawing under any Letter of Credit which has not been reimbursed on the date when made or refinanced as a Committed Borrowing of Loans.
     
"
Letter of Credit Sublimit
" means an amount equal to US$20,000,000. The Letter of Credit Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
     
"
Pro Rata Share
" means, as to any Lender, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such Lender's Commitment comprises of the Aggregate Commitments, as such share may be adjusted as contemplated herein.
     
"
Swing Line Sublimit
" means an amount equal to US$15,000,000. The Swing Line Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
     
"
Total Outstandings
" means at any time the aggregate outstanding principal amount (or Dollar Equivalent principal amount, as applicable) of all
 
Loans, Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans and all L/C Obligations and the Dollar Equivalent amount of the unpaid portion of the face amount of all Canadian Banker's Acceptances.
     
"
Voting Percentage
" means, as to any Lender, (a) at any time when the Commitments are in effect, such Lender's Pro Rata Share and (b) at any time after the termination of the Commitments, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) which (i) the sum of (A) the Outstanding Amount of such Lender's Committed Loans,
plus
(B) such Lender's Pro Rata Share (if any) of the Outstanding Amount of Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations, then constitutes of (ii) the Total Outstandings;
provided
that if any Lender has failed to fund any portion of the Committed Loans, or participations in Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances or L/C Obligations required to be funded by it hereunder, such Lender's Voting Percentage shall be deemed to be 0-, and the respective Pro Rata Shares and Voting Percentages of the other Lenders shall be recomputed for purposes of this definition and the definition of "Required Lenders" without regard to such Lender's Commitment or the outstanding amount of its Committed Loans, as the case may be.
     1.2 . Section 1.01 is further amended by adding thereto the following definitions in proper alphabetical sequence:
Addition of Definitions
     
"
Second Amendment
" means the Second Amendment dated as of July 23, 2009 to this Agreement.
     
"
Second Amendment Effective Date
" means the effective date of the Second Amendment.
     1.3 Pricing. Section 1.01 is further amended by replacing the table in the definition of "Applicable Margin" with the following:
     1.4 . Section 2.01 is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Committed Loans
 
     
2.01 Committed Loans.
     
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender severally agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "
Committed Loan
") in Available Currencies to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date to the Maturity Date, in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of such Lender's Commitment;
provided
,
however
, that after giving effect to any Committed Borrowing, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments and (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender,
plus
such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all Swing Line Loans, British Pound Sterling Loans, Canadian Dollar Loans, Canadian Banker's Acceptances and L/C Obligations, shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment. Within the limits of each Lender's Commitment, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this
Section 2.01
, prepay under
Section 2.07
, and reborrow under this
Section 2.01
. Committed Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
     1.5 Section 2.02(b) is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Funding Procedures, etc.
     
(b) Following receipt of a Committed Loan Notice, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of its Pro Rata Share of the applicable Committed Loans, and if no timely notice of a conversion or continuation is provided by a Borrower the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details of any automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans described in the preceding subsection. In the case of a Committed Borrowing, each applicable Lender shall make the amount of its Committed Loan available to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the applicable currency at the Administrative Agent's Office not later than 1:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified in the applicable Committed Loan Notice. Upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in
Section 4.02
(and, if such Borrowing is the initial Credit Extension,
Section 4.01
), the Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received available to the applicable Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by (i) crediting the account of such Borrower on the books of Bank of America with the amount of such funds or (ii) wire transfer of such funds, in each case in accordance with instructions provided to the Administrative Agent by such Borrower.
     1.6 . Sections 2.03, 2.04, 2.05 and 2.06 are amended so that each reference therein to a Tranche 1 Lender, its Tranche 1 Commitment, its Tranche 1 Loans and its Tranche 1 Pro Rata Share shall be references to, respectively, a Lender, its Commitment, its Committed Loans and its Pro Rata Share.
References to Tranche 1
 
     1.7 . Section 2.06(c)(i) is further amended so that the sixth sentence thereof reads in its entirety as follows:
Deemed Borrowings
In such event, Anixter shall be deemed to have requested a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans to be disbursed on the Honor Date in an amount equal to the Unreimbursed Amount, without regard to the minimum and multiples specified in
Section 2.02
for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the amount of the unutilized portion of the Aggregate Commitments and the conditions set forth in
Section 4.02
(other than the delivery of a Committed Loan Notice).
     1.8 . Section 2.07(a) is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Prepayments
     
(a) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Committed Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty;
provided
that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., (A) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans, and (B) on the date of prepayment of Base Rate Committed Loans; (ii) any prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loans shall be in a Dollar Equivalent principal amount of US$5,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$1,000,000 in excess thereof; and (iii) any prepayment of Base Rate Committed Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$1,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment, and the Type(s) of Committed Loans to be prepaid. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of each such notice, and of such Lender's share of such prepayment. If such notice is given by the Borrowers, the Borrowers shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Eurocurrency Rate Committed Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest thereon, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to
Section 3.05
. Each such prepayment of Committed Loans shall be applied to the Committed Loans of the Lenders in accordance with their respective Pro Rata Shares.
     1.9 . Section 2.08 is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Commitment Reductions
     
2.08 Reduction or Termination of Commitments.
Anixter may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, terminate the Aggregate Commitments, or permanently reduce the Aggregate Commitments to an amount not less than the then Total Outstandings;
provided
that (i) any such notice shall be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., five Business Days prior to the date of termination or reduction, and (ii) any such partial reduction shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of any such notice of reduction or termination of the Aggregate Commitments. Once reduced in accordance with this Section, the Commitments may not be increased. Any reduction of the Aggregate Commitments shall be applied to the Commitment of each Lender according to its Pro Rata Share. All related facility fees accrued
 
until the effective date of any termination of the Aggregate Commitments shall be paid on the effective date of such termination.
     1.10 . Section 2.11(a) is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Facility Fees
     
(a)
Facility Fees
. Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender in accordance with its Pro Rata Share, a facility fee equal to the Applicable Margin
times
the actual daily amount of the Aggregate Commitments, regardless of usage. The facility fee in respect of the Commitments shall accrue at all times from the Closing Date until the Maturity Date and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the Maturity Date. The facility fee shall be calculated quarterly in arrears, and if there is any change in the Applicable Margin during any quarter, the actual daily amount shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Margin separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Margin was in effect. The facility fee shall accrue at all times, including at any time during which one or more of the conditions in
Article IV
is not met.
     1.11 . Section 2.20(f) is amended so that the last sentence thereof reads in its entirety as follows:
Maintaining Pro Rata Shares
In addition, on the Scheduled Maturity Date of each Non-Extending Lender, the Borrowers shall prepay any Committed Loans outstanding on such date (and pay any additional amounts required pursuant to
Section 3.05
) to the extent necessary to keep outstanding Committed Loans ratable with any revised Pro Rata Shares of the respective Lenders effective as of such date.
     1.12 . Section 7.05 is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Restricted Payments
     
7.05 Payments to AXE.
No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly declare or make any payment, distribution or contribution to or investment in AXE (whether in cash or otherwise),
provided
that (a) so long as no Event of Default or Default exists or would result from such payment, Anixter may make cash payments to AXE if either (i) the proceeds of such payment are immediately used by AXE to pay dividends or repurchase shares of its stock (or warrants, options or other rights in respect of such shares)
and
the aggregate amount of all such payments made after the Second Amendment Effective Date does not exceed the sum of (A) $150,000,000 and (B) 50% of cumulative Consolidated Net Income for all Fiscal Quarters ending after the Second Amendment Effective Date; or (ii) the proceeds of such payment are immediately used by AXE to prepay, purchase or redeem outstanding Indebtedness of AXE
and
after giving effect to such payment, the Aggregate Commitments will exceed the Total Outstandings by not less than $50,000,000; (b) Anixter and its Subsidiaries may make payments permitted by the parenthetical clause at the end of
Section 7.07
; and (c) Anixter and its Subsidiaries may make payments to AXE (i) that are applied by AXE to pay its actual income tax liabilities in respect of income earned by Anixter and its
 
Subsidiaries, (ii) that are in repayment of intercompany loans made by AXE to Anixter or such Subsidiary, or (iii) that are applied by AXE to make any cash settlements to management or employees under equity awards consistent with its past practice not in excess of US$5,000,000 in the aggregate in any calendar year.
     1.13 . Section 7.17 is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
     
7.17 Minimum Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
No Borrower shall permit the Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio calculated at the end of each Fiscal Quarter for the period of the immediately preceding four Fiscal Quarters to be less than (a) 2.25 to 1 for any period ending prior to the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2010, (b) 2.50 to 1 for any period ending on or after the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2010 but on or prior to the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011 or (c) 3.00 to 1 for any period ending after the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011.
     1.14 . Schedule 2.01 is replaced by hereto.
Commitment Schedule
Section 2.01
     1.15 . Exhibit A-1 is replaced by hereto.
Form of Committed Loan Notice
Exhibit A-1
     SECTION 2 . By its signature hereto, each Guarantor ratifies and confirms the provisions of the Guaranty with respect to all Loans made by any Lender to the Borrowers.
Reaffirmation of Guaranty
     SECTION 3 . Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that, after giving effect to the effectiveness of this Amendment, (a) each warranty set forth in Article V of the Credit Agreement is true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent that such warranty specifically refers to an earlier date, and (b) no Default or Event of Default exists.
Warranties
     SECTION 4 . The amendments set forth in above shall become effective when the Administrative Agent shall have received all of the following (provided that the following are received on or before July 23, 2009): (i) counterparts of this Amendment executed by Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Guarantors, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent; (ii) all documents as shall reasonably demonstrate the corporate power and authority of the Loan Parties organized under the laws of a U.S. state to enter into, and the validity with respect to such Loan Parties of, this Amendment and the other Loan Documents and any other matters relevant hereto (including opinions of counsel), all in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; (iii) any governmental and third party approvals necessary or advisable in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Amendment by the Loan Parties; and (iv) for the account of each Lender that delivers a signed counterpart hereof to the Administrative Agent by 4:00 p.m. Central time on July 20, 2009, an amendment fee in amount equal to 25 basis points multiplied by the amount of such Lender's Commitment after giving effect to this Amendment.
Effectiveness of Amendment
Section 1
 
     SECTION 5 .
Miscellaneous
     5.1 As herein amended, the Credit Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and is hereby ratified and confirmed in all respects. After the effectiveness of this Amendment, all references in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents to "Credit Agreement" or similar terms shall refer to the Credit Agreement as amended hereby.
Continuing Effectiveness, etc.
     5.2 . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by the different parties on separate counterparts, and each such counterpart shall be deemed to be an original but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same Amendment. Delivery of a signed signature page hereto by facsimile or e-mail (in a .pdf or similar file) shall be effective as delivery of a manually signed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
     5.3 . This Amendment shall be a contract made under and governed by the laws of the State of Illinois.
Governing Law
     5.4 . This Amendment shall be binding upon Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Guarantors, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent and the respective successors and assigns of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent.
Successors and Assigns
 
     Delivered as of the day and year first above written.
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
Second Amendment
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
SCHEDULE 2.01
 
EXHIBIT A-1
Date: ___________, _____
To: Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 20, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ";" the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
     The undersigned hereby requests (select one):
A Borrowing of Committed Loans
o
A conversion or continuation of Committed Loans
o
          [The Committed Borrowing requested herein complies with the proviso to the first sentence of of the Agreement.]
Section 2.01

EXHIBIT 10.2
          THIS AMENDMENT NO. 7 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES PURCHASE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of July 24, 2009, among ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the ""), ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), as the initial Servicer, each financial institution party hereto as a Financial Institution, FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION COMPANY LLC ("") and THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (f/k/a Three Pillars Funding Corporation) (""), as conduits, (collectively, the "" and each individually, a ""), SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC. and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. (successor by merger to Bank One, NA) (""), as managing agents (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and J.P. Morgan, as agent for the Purchasers (the "").
Amendment
Seller
Anixter
Falcon
Three Pillars
Conduits
Conduit
J.P. Morgan
Managing Agents
Managing Agent
Agent
          WHEREAS, the Seller, Anixter, the Financial Institutions, the Conduits, the Managing Agents and the Agent are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
          WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
          NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
     SECTION 1. . Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
     SECTION 2. . Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the parties hereto agree that the Agreement is amended as follows:
Amendments to the Agreement
Section 3
     (a) Section 1.2 of the Agreement is hereby amended by amending and restating the second sentence of such section in its entirety to read as follows:
     "Each Purchase Notice shall be subject to hereof and, except as set forth below, shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested (i) Purchase Price (which shall not be less than $500,000 per Purchase Group) and (ii) in the event a Conduit declines to make an Incremental Purchase and such Incremental Purchase is to be funded by the related Financial Institutions, the type of Discount Rate and Tranche Period."
Section 6.2
 
     (b) Section 1.3 of the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to "which must be a Monthly Settlement Date or a Mid-Month Report Date," from such section in its entirety.
     (c) Section 2.6 of the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to "three (3) Business Days" appearing therein and replacing such reference with a reference to "one (1) Business Day".
     (d) Section 5.1(g) of the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to "any Monthly Report, any Mid-Month Report" appearing therein and replacing such reference with a reference to "any Report".
     (e) Clause (ii) of Section 5.1(t) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
          "Each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance as an Eligible Receivable on the date of its purchase under the Receivables Sale Agreement was an Eligible Receivable on such purchase date, and, as of the date of each Report and any other report delivered pursuant to , each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance on each such Report or other report was an Eligible Receivable."
Section 8.5
     (f) Clause (i) of Section 6.2 of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
          "(i) all Reports and other reports as and when due under Section 8.5;"
     (g) Section 8.5 of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
          "Section 8.5 . The Servicer shall prepare and forward to each Managing Agent:
Reports
     (i) on each Determination Date, a Monthly Report;
     (ii) if (x) Rating Level II is in effect or (y) Rating Level I is in effect and the Servicer has notified the Managing Agents that it will deliver Reports as if Rating Level II were in effect, on the last Business Day of each calendar month, a Mid-Month Report containing information relating to the period from the first day of the related fiscal month to and including the Friday closest to the fifteenth day of such calendar month;
     (iii) if Rating Level III is in effect, on the Tuesday of each week (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next succeeding Business Day), a Weekly Report containing information relating to the Weekly Period then most recently ended;
     (iv) if Rating Level IV is in effect, on each Business Day, a Daily Report containing information relating to the period since the last delivery of any Report hereunder;
 
     (v) at such times as either Managing Agent shall reasonably request, a report in the form of a Monthly Report updating the information contained in the most recent Monthly Report; and
     (vi) at such times as either Managing Agent shall request, a listing by Obligor of all Receivables together with an aging of such Receivables."
     (h) Section 9.1(j) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
          "[Intentionally Omitted.]"
     (i) Section 9.1 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following new clauses (l), (m) and (n) to the end of such section:
          "(l) Failure of Seller to deliver, on or before September 23, 2009, a fully executed Collection Account Agreement (or another account control agreement that is reasonably satisfactory to the Agent) with respect to Collection Account # 8666000209 maintained at Bank of America, N.A.
          "(m) The Leverage Ratio as of the end of any Fiscal Quarter shall be greater than 3.25 to 1.00."
          "(n) the Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio calculated at the end of each Fiscal Quarter for the period of the immediately preceding four Fiscal Quarters shall be less than (a) 2.25 to 1.00 for any period ending prior to the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2010, (b) 2.50 to 1.00 for any period ending on or after the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2010 but on or prior to the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011 or (c) 3.00 to 1.00 for any period ending after the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011."
     (j) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Applicable Margin
     """ means 3.50%."
Applicable Margin
     (k) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Base Rate
     """ means:
Base Rate
          (a) with respect to each Financial Institution in the Falcon Purchase Group, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus / of 1% and (c) the LIBO Rate for a one month Tranche Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1%, that, for the avoidance of doubt, the LIBO Rate for purposes of this definition for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters BBA Libor Rates Page 3750 (or on any successor or substitute page of such page) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day; and
1
2
provided
 
          (b) with respect to each Financial Institution in the Three Pillars Purchase Group, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greater of (i) the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate most recently determined by SunTrust Bank plus one half of one percent (0.50%), and (ii) the SunTrust Prime Rate.
          Any change in the Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate, the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate or the LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate, the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate or the LIBO Rate, respectively."
     (l) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Credit Agreement
          """ means that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 20, 2007 by and among Anixter, the Subsidiaries of Anixter identified as Borrowing Subsidiaries thereunder, Bank of America, N.A. as Administrative Agent, Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. as Syndication Agent, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and The Bank of Nova Scotia as Co-Documentation Agents, and the lenders party thereto from time to time, as the same may be amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time."
Credit Agreement
     (m) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to the percentage "2.25%" appearing in such definition and replacing such percentage with the percentage "4.5%".
Default Fee
     (n) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting therefrom the reference to "2.0" and replacing such reference with a reference to "Stress Factor".
Dilution Reserve Ratio
     (o) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Excluded Receivable
          """ means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Originator, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's Latin American export locations, (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pacer", "IMS", "QSN", "Pentacon" and "World Class Wire and Cable" divisions which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by any of Originator's divisions which are acquired after July 24, 2009 which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer numbers: 139661 or 804470 (in each case, as such customer numbers are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009), (v) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer prefixes: N-N, NN+ or ORO (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009) and (vi) all accounts receivable existing at Originator's general corporate division coded WC (as such division is in effect or otherwise structured as of July 24, 2009)."
Excluded Receivable
 
     (p) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Liquidity Termination Date
          """ means July 23, 2010."
Liquidity Termination Date
     (q) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Loss Horizon Ratio
          """ means, for any Collection Period, a fraction (calculated as a percentage) computed by dividing (i) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during Applicable Loss Horizon Period by (ii) the aggregate Net Receivables Balance as at the last day of the most recently ended Collection Period."
Loss Horizon Ratio
     (r) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to the percentage "9%" appearing in such definition and replacing such percentage with the percentage "12%".
Loss Reserve
     (s) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting therefrom the reference to "2.0" and replacing such reference with a reference to "Stress Factor".
Loss Reserve Ratio
     (t) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Purchase Limit
          """ means $200,000,000, as such amount may be increased or decreased in accordance with the provisions of ."
Purchase Limit
Article XII
     (u) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs
          """ if
Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs
          (a) any request for an Incremental Purchase is made and such Incremental Purchase does not occur; or
          (b) any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment that is funded through the issuance of commercial paper (a "") or any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment that is not funded through the issuance of commercial paper (an "") (i) in either such case, has its principal reduced without compliance by Seller with the notice requirements hereunder, (ii) [Reserved], (iii) in the case of a CP Rate Funding, is assigned under any Three Pillars Credit Agreement to the related Three Pillars Credit Bank for credit related reasons, due to a termination event or event of default or as required under the Three Pillars Credit Agreement or (iv) in the case of an Alternate Rate Funding, is terminated or reduced prior to the last day of the then current Settlement Period,
CP Rate Funding
Alternate Rate Funding
 
then, the amount of "Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs" related thereto shall be equal to the excess, if any, of (1) the CP Costs and fees that would have accrued during the remainder of the Settlement Period determined by SunTrust to relate to such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment subsequent to, as applicable, the proposed date related to such failure to complete such Incremental Funding or Reinvestment or the date of such reduction, assignment or termination, assuming that, as applicable, such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment had occurred, such reduction, assignment or termination had not occurred or such notice had not been delivered, over (2) the income, if any, actually received during the remainder of such period by Three Pillars from investing the principal related to, as applicable, such Incremental Purchase that did not occur or such reduction, assignment or termination that did not occur. All Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs shall be due and payable hereunder upon demand."
     (v) The definition of the term "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the phrase "one, two, three or six months" appearing in clause (a) thereof and replacing such phrase with the phrase "one, two or three months".
Tranche Period
     (w) The following definitions are hereby added to Exhibit I to the Agreement in the appropriate alphabetical locations:
          "" means GAAP as of the date of this Agreement together with any changes in GAAP after the date hereof which are not "Material Accounting Changes" (as defined below). If any changes in GAAP are hereafter required or permitted and are adopted by Anixter International Inc. or Anixter with the agreement of its independent certified public accountants and such changes result in a material change in the method of calculation of any of the financial covenants, restrictions or standards herein or in the related definitions or terms used therein (""), the parties hereto agree to enter into negotiations, in good faith, in order to amend such provisions in a credit neutral manner so as to reflect equitably such changes with the desired result that the criteria for evaluating Anixter's consolidated financial condition shall be the same after such changes as if such changes had not been made; , , that no Material Accounting Change shall be given effect in such calculations until such provisions are amended in a manner reasonably satisfactory to the Required Financial Institutions. If such amendment is entered into, all references in this Agreement to Agreement Accounting Principles shall mean GAAP as of the date of such amendment together with any changes in GAAP after the date of such amendment which are not Material Accounting Changes.
Agreement Accounting Principles
Material Accounting Changes
provided
however
          "" means, at any time:
Applicable Loss Horizon Period
          (a) if Rating Level I is in effect, the four Collection Periods most recently ended;
          (b) if (x) Rating Level II is in effect or (y) Rating Level I is in effect and the Servicer has notified the Managing Agents that it will deliver Reports as if Rating Level II were in effect (and the Servicer is actually delivering Reports as if Rating Level II were in effect), the three Collection Periods most recently ended and one-half of the fourth Collection Period most recently ended;
 
          (c) if Rating Level III is in effect, the three Collection Periods most recently ended and one-quarter of the fourth Collection Period most recently ended; and
          (d) if Rating Level IV is in effect, the three Collection Periods most recently ended.
     For purposes of clarification, if any Applicable Loss Horizon Period includes a fraction of a Collection Period, the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during such fraction of such Collection Period for purposes of calculating the Loss Horizon Ratio shall be calculated by multiplying (a) such fraction by (b) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during such Collection Period.
          "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, (i) Consolidated Net Income for such period taken as a single accounting period, (ii) the provision for depreciation and amortization expense of the Consolidated Group for such period, (iii) income taxes of the Consolidated Group for such period, and (iv) net interest expense of the Consolidated Group for such period; that there shall be excluded from Consolidated EBITDA any non-cash, non-operating gains or losses (including, without limitation, extraordinary or unusual gains or losses, gains or losses arising from the sale of capital assets or the sale of owned buildings and properties and other non-recurring gains or losses) during such period.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
plus
plus
provided
          "" means, for any period, the ratio of (a) the sum of Consolidated EBITDA and Rental Expense for such period to (b) the amount of Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense of the Consolidated Group for such period.
Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
          "" means, for any period, the net interest expense of the Consolidated Group (including the interest component of capital leases, the interest component of synthetic lease obligations, facility fees, and fees for standby letters of credit, excluding amortization of deferred financing fees) plus consolidated yield or discount accrued on the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction (as defined in the Credit Agreement) (regardless of the accounting treatment of such Receivables Securitization Transaction) and Rental Expense of the Consolidated Group for such period calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense
          "" means, as of any date of determination, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations and liabilities, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including Obligations hereunder), (b) that portion of obligations with respect to capital leases that are capitalized in the consolidated balance sheet of the Consolidated Group, (c) the principal portion of synthetic lease obligations, (d) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables under Receivables Securitization Transactions (as defined in the Credit Agreement), and (e) without duplication, all Accommodation Obligations (as defined in the Credit Agreement) with
Consolidated Funded Indebtedness
 
respect to Indebtedness of the type specified in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) above of Persons other than Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries.
          "" means Anixter and each of its Subsidiaries.
Consolidated Group
          "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the net income of the Consolidated Group for that period, determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Net Income
          "" means a report, in substantially the form of hereto (appropriately completed), furnished by the Servicer to the Managing Agents pursuant to .
Daily Report
Exhibit XIII
Section 8.5
          "" for any Person at any time means the then current rating by (i) S&P, (ii) Moody's or (iii) any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency of such Person's long term public senior unsecured noncredit enhanced debt.
Debt Rating
          "" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
          "" means a 13-week accounting period of Anixter ending on or about March 31, June 30, September 30 or December 31 of any fiscal year.
Fiscal Quarter
          "" means, as of any date of determination, for Anixter and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of (a) the Consolidated Funded Indebtedness of the Consolidated Group as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of the four Fiscal Quarters ending on such date, that, for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated on a pro forma basis (in accordance with Article 11 of Regulation S-X of the Securities and Exchange Commission) to the extent necessary to give effect to (a) any acquisition made by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries during such period (without giving effect to any increase in Consolidated EBITDA reflecting projected synergies resulting from such acquisition) so long as, and to the extent that, (i) Anixter delivers to the Agent (which shall promptly deliver to each Financial Institution) a summary in reasonable detail of the assumptions underlying, and the calculations made, in computing Consolidated EBITDA on a pro forma basis and (ii) the Required Financial Institutions do not object to such assumptions and/or calculations within ten (10) Business Days after receipt thereof; and (b) any divestiture of a Subsidiary, division or other operating unit made during such period.
Leverage Ratio
provided
          "" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
          "" means, any of the following based upon the Debt Rating of Anixter then in effect:
Rating Level
          Rating Level I: Greater than or equal to BBB- by S&P and Baa3 by Moody's;
          Rating Level II: Less than BBB- by S&P or Baa3 by Moody's but greater than or equal to BB by S&P or Ba2 by Moody's;
          Rating Level III: Less than BB by S&P and Ba2 by Moody's but greater than or equal to B+ by S&P and B1 by Moody's; and
          Rating Level IV: Less than B+ by S&P or B1 or by Moody's or unrated by S&P or Moody's.
     "" means, for any period, the total rental expense for operating leases of the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Rental Expense
     "" means a Monthly Report, a Mid-Month Report, a Weekly Report or a Daily Report, as applicable.
Report
     "" means, as of any date, (i) if the Servicer's Debt Ratings are greater than or equal to BB- and Ba3 as of such date, 2.0 and (ii) at all other times, 2.25.
Stress Factor
     "" means, a period commencing on a Monday and ending on the immediately following Sunday.
Weekly Period
     "" means a report, in substantially the form of hereto (appropriately completed), furnished by the Servicer to the Managing Agents pursuant to ."
Weekly Report
Exhibit XII
Section 8.5
     (x) The definition of "Bank One Federal Funds Rate" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety.
     (y) Schedule A to the Agreement is hereby replaced with attached hereto.
Schedule A
     (z) Exhibit IV to the Agreement is hereby replaced with attached hereto.
Exhibit IV
     (aa) The Agreement is hereby amended by adding Exhibits XII and XIII thereto in the forms of and attached hereto.
Exhibits XII
XIII
     SECTION 3. . This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when:
Effective Date
     (a) the Agent shall have received counterparts hereof executed by each Person for which a signature block is attached hereto;
 
     (b) the Agent shall have received counterparts to Amendment No. 4 to Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement executed by each Person for which a signature block is attached thereto;
     (c) the Seller shall have paid all invoiced audit and legal fees of Sidley Austin LLP and Protiviti Inc. incurred by the Agent in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Amendment and the Agreement; and
     (d) the Managing Agents shall have received (1) counterparts to the Third Amended and Restated Fee Letter duly executed by each Person for which a signature is attached thereto and (2) all fees payable on the date hereof pursuant to such Third Amended and Restated Fee Letter.
     SECTION 4. . In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, each of the Seller Parties represents and warrants to the Agent and the Purchasers, as to itself, that:
Representations and Warranties of the Seller Parties
     (a) The representations and warranties of such Seller Party set forth in of the Agreement, as hereby amended, are true, correct and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof and there exists no Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event on the date hereof, provided that in the case of any representation or warranty in Section 5.1 that expressly relates to facts in existence on an earlier date, the reaffirmation thereof under this shall be made as of such earlier date.
Section 5.1
Section 4(a)
     (b) The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Seller Party and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Seller Party, enforceable against such Seller Party in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
     SECTION 5. . The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
     SECTION 6. . From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
     SECTION 7. . THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
CHOICE OF LAW
     SECTION 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed
Execution of Counterparts
 
shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
     SECTION 9. .
Sale and Assignment
     (a) In consideration of the payment of $85,784.31 at or before 11:00 a.m. (New York time) on the date hereof and concurrently with the effectiveness hereof, Three Pillars hereby sells and assigns to Falcon, and Falcon hereby purchases and assumes from Three Pillars, $85,784.31 of outstanding Capital held by Three Pillars before giving effect to this (the ""). Immediately after giving effect to this , (i) Three Pillars shall hold $1,875,000 in outstanding Capital and (ii) Falcon shall hold $3,125,000 in outstanding Capital.
Section 9
Assigned Amount
Section 9
     (b) All accrued and unpaid fees and CP Costs in respect of the Assigned Amount until but excluding the date hereof shall be paid to SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. as Managing Agent for the Three Pillars Purchase Group, and all other amounts in respect of the Assigned Amount from and including the date hereof shall be paid to J.P. Morgan as Managing Agent for the Falcon Purchase Group.
     (c) By executing and delivering this Amendment, Three Pillars and Falcon confirm to and agree with each other, the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Financial Institutions as follows: (1) other than the representation and warranty that it has not created any Adverse Claim upon any interest being transferred hereunder, Three Pillars makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made by any other Person in or in connection with the Agreement, the Liquidity Agreement or the Transaction Documents or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of Falcon, the Agreement or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or the perfection, priority, condition, value or sufficiency of any collateral; (2) Three Pillars makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Seller, any Obligor, any Affiliate of Seller or the performance or observance by the Seller, any Obligor, any Affiliate of Seller of any of their respective obligations under the Transaction Documents or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or in connection therewith; and (3) Falcon will, independently and without reliance upon the Agent, any Conduit, any Managing Agent, the Seller or any other Financial Institution or Purchaser and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Agreement, the Liquidity Agreement and the Transaction Documents.
 
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered as of the date first written above:
 
 
 
FALCON PURCHASE GROUP
PURCHASE GROUP LIMIT: $125,000,000
THREE PILLARS PURCHASE GROUP
PURCHASE GROUP LIMIT: $75,000,000
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 10.3
          THIS AMENDMENT NO. 4 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES SALE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of July 24, 2009, between ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation, (the "") and ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the "").
Amendment
Originator
Buyer
          WHEREAS, the Originator and the Buyer are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
          WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
          NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
     SECTION 1. . Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
     SECTION 2. . Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the parties hereto agree that the Agreement is amended as follows:
Amendments to the Agreement
Section 3
     (a) The definition of "" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Excluded Receivable
     """ means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Originator, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's Latin American export locations, (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pacer", "IMS", "QSN", "Pentacon" and "World Class Wire and Cable" divisions which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by any of Originator's divisions which are acquired after July 24, 2009 which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer numbers: 139661 or 804470 (in each case, as such customer numbers are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009), (v) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the
Excluded Receivable
 
following customer prefixes: N-N, NN+ or ORO (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009) and (vi) all accounts receivable existing at Originator's general corporate division coded WC (as such division is in effect or otherwise structured as of July 24, 2009)."
     (b) Exhibit III to the Agreement is hereby replaced with attached hereto.
Exhibit III
     SECTION 3. . This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when the parties shall have received a copy of this Amendment duly executed by each of the parties hereto.
Effective Date
     SECTION 4. . In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, the Originator represents and warrants to the Buyer, as to itself, that the execution and delivery by such Originator of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Originator and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Originator, enforceable against such Originator in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
Representations and Warranties of the Originator
     SECTION 5. . The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
     SECTION 6. . From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
     SECTION 7.
CHOICE OF LAW
. THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
     SECTION 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Execution of Counterparts
 
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered as of the date first written above:
 
Acknowledged and Agreed as of the date first written above:
 
Acknowledged and Agreed as of the date first written above:
 

Exhibit 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today announced that its wholly-owned subsidiary, Anixter Inc., has amended its senior unsecured revolving credit agreement and renewed its accounts receivable securitization program.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 28, 2009 
In response to the impact of the current soft economic environment, the following key changes have been made to the revolving credit agreement:
All other material terms and conditions of the revolving credit facility remain unchanged, including the April 2012 maturity.
Anixter Inc. also renewed its accounts receivable securitization program for a new 364-day period ending in July of 2010. As a part of the renewal, the size of the facility has been reduced from $255 million to $200 million to bring it in-line with the size of the current receivable collateral base. The renewed program carries an all-in drawn funding cost of Commercial Paper ("CP") plus 150 basis points (previously CP plus 95 basis points). Unused capacity fees increased from 45 to 55 basis points to 85 to 95 basis points. All other material terms and conditions remain unchanged.
At the end of the second quarter of 2009 the company had outstanding borrowings of $94.6 million under the amended revolving credit facility and $5.0 million of outstanding funding under the accounts receivable program.
 
Commenting on the amendment to the revolving credit facility, Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President  Finance, said, "At the end of the second quarter the company was in full compliance with all of the then-existing covenants. However, the lack of a seasonal sales pick-up in the second quarter of this year and the resulting lower earnings, combined with the still uncertain economic outlook, increased the probability that the company would violate the fixed charge coverage covenant at a future date. The revised fixed charge coverage ratio provides a cushion not only against a continuation of the current economic environment, but also against the possibility of yet unseen economic deterioration."
Letham added, "We are pleased that we have addressed the uncertainties associated with the revolving credit facility fixed charge coverage covenant as well as renewed the accounts receivable securitization facility. With cash balances of $112.8 million at the end of the second quarter of 2009 along with the $195.3 million reduction in borrowings that have been achieved in the first six months of 2009, the reduced size of the two facilities provide the company with ample liquidity for the foreseeable future, particularly in a slower-growth environment. By reducing the size of the facilities we were able to trim selected costs associated with maintaining excess available capacity and the greater funding expense under the amended and renewed facilities. With these changes now in effect, we believe the company has been more strongly positioned to weather the current environment, as well as, support a growing business through a future period of economic recovery."
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and over $950 million in inventory, 3) 232 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 270 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.

Exhibit 99.2
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended July 3, 2009.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 28, 2009 
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Note: Throughout this announcement prior year amounts have been restated to conform to the requirements of FASB Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlement)" that became effective in 2009.
Second Quarter Highlights
 
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO stated, "Our second quarter sales patterns were largely a continuation of flat daily sales patterns experienced over much of the first quarter. The usual seasonal patterns of consecutive quarter growth from the first to the second quarter failed to materialize. The additional holidays in the second quarter, compared to the first quarter, negatively impacted sales on a consecutive quarter basis by 4 percent. We are, however, encouraged that our sales on a holiday-adjusted basis have been relatively flat over the past six months, reflecting a possible sign of stabilization in our business."
Eck added, "As we expected, year-on-year sales comparisons continue to be negatively impacted by the broader economic slowdown combined with the strengthening of the U.S. dollar and the decline in the spot market price of copper that occurred in late 2008. The year-on-year comparison was also affected by the lack of a seasonal pick-up in sales during the current quarter versus a strong seasonal pick-up in the second quarter of 2008, along with the timing of holidays that saw both the Easter and Fourth of July holidays fall within the second fiscal quarter in 2009."
 
"All geographic segments, as well as all end markets, enterprise cabling and security, electrical wire & cable and OEM supply, reported year-on-year sales declines," continued Eck. "The best performance was within our North American OEM supply market where we saw a 10 percent year-on-year organic decline. Our North American enterprise cabling and security sales were down 13 percent year-on-year. However, one sign that conditions in the North American enterprise cabling and security market may be nearing bottom was that sales within this market were up 2 percent on a sequential basis from the first to the second quarter of this year. Our worst performance in the quarter was within the European OEM supply market where we had a 46 percent year-on-year organic sales decline. Importantly, the sequential decline in this market has slowed considerably from rates experienced over the past few quarters, with sales down 10 percent sequentially before adjusting for the impact of holidays in the second quarter."
Second Quarter Operating Results
"As highlighted previously, reduced sales volumes, lower copper prices and the translation effects of a stronger dollar combined to negatively affect performance in the second quarter," commented Eck. "In addition to the effects of lower sales, we also saw lower gross margins primarily due to larger sales declines in our higher gross margin European segment and key end markets, including North American electrical wire & cable and worldwide OEM supply, than elsewhere in the business."
"While the expense actions taken over the past few quarters are clearly producing their intended results, they have not been sufficient to offset continued sales weakness and the lack of a seasonal upturn in the business. As a result, in the second quarter, we recorded additional severance expense of $5.7 million that is expected to yield an additional $28 million of annualized expense savings beginning in the second half of 2009," continued Eck. "Second quarter operating expenses of $235.2 million are down $27.1 million or 10 percent from the second quarter 2008 levels. Acquisitions completed in the past year added $13.3 million to current quarter expenses while foreign exchange effects reduced expenses by $16.1 million. The net effects of acquisitions and foreign exchange, together with current quarter severance costs and $4.2 million of prior year costs associated with the retirement of our former CEO, on year-on-year expenses was minimal. While we are continuing to adjust our cost structure to reflect the current economic landscape we are carefully balancing short-term cost reductions with a desire to preserve institutional knowledge, service capabilities and momentum on key initiatives so we can fully capture the benefits of a recovering market when the economy begins to improve."
operating margins declined to 3.4 percent (exclusive of the goodwill impairment charge) from 7.5 percent in the year ago quarter as the effects of lower sales and the adverse sales mix changes on gross margins were greater than the year-on-year operating expense reductions achieved in the second quarter.
Company-wide
operating margins declined to 4.6 percent from 8.3 percent in the year ago quarter as profitability was impacted by lower sales, lower gross margins due to less favorable sales mix and the effects of lower copper prices.
North America
operating margins were a negative 3.2 percent (exclusive of the goodwill impairment charge) as compared to a positive 5.3 percent in the year ago quarter due largely to a sales decline of 40 percent (33 percent organically), an unfavorable shift in sales mix that negatively affected gross margins and the effects of lower copper prices.
Europe
 
operating margins decreased to 6.8 percent in the current quarter compared to 7.6 percent in the year ago quarter, due to lower sales that offset sales mix-related improvements in gross margin and good expense management
Emerging Markets
.
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We are pleased with the fact that in the second quarter we generated $171.6 million of cash flow from operations or roughly four times the $43.5 million generated in the year ago quarter," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "For the first six months of the year, cash flow from operations was $259.6 million versus $98.9 million in the first six months of last year. The increase in cash flow reflects the lower working capital requirements associated with the organic reduction in sales, the deflationary effects of lower copper prices and the benefits of continued cost management. In the second half of 2009, we anticipate continuing positive cash flow from a combination of earnings, good expense management and further working capital adjustments."
"Year-to-date we have made a number of significant changes in our capital structure, including the first quarter issuance of a new series of senior notes that raised net proceeds of $185.2 million to help diversify the sourcing of borrowed capital and reduce some of our dependency on the contracting bank credit market," said Letham. "We have used the strong cash flow to reduce borrowings by $195.3 million from year end 2008. More recently, we have successfully concluded a renewal of our accounts receivable securitization facility through July of 2010 and amended our bank revolving credit agreement to adjust the covenants to ensure we have sufficient flexibility to work through the bottom of the current economic cycle. In both of these cases, we have reduced the size of the facilities to more realistically reflect our likely needs through the life of the facilities while still ensuring ample liquidity for growth when the economy improves."
"We ended the quarter with cash balances of $112.8 million, $47.3 million of which was short-term invested cash. Based on recent amendments to our bank credit agreements we currently have $309.3 million in committed, unused lines of credit that run until 2012, as well as only $5.0 million of outstanding borrowings under our recently renewed $200 million accounts receivable securitization facility, giving us significant excess liquidity," Letham continued. "We regard our strong financial position and available liquidity as significant competitive advantages and important differentiators from many companies in today's market."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the second quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "As previously noted, sales have remained relatively flat on a per day basis through much of the first half of the year, and at this time, there are no signs pointing to a significant change in this pattern. Assuming a continuation of this trend, a key component in determining sales expectations for the remainder of the year will be the number of holidays or
 
vacation days that exist in a given quarter and whether or not customers will extend production shutdowns around those times. Extended holiday and vacation shutdowns are a trend we have seen over recent quarters as customers attempt to deal with the soft economic environment. In addition, beginning in the fourth quarter, we will begin exiting a multi-year customer relationship we have had with Alcatel Lucent. Due to a combination of lower industry spending in the end markets served under this contract and changing supply chain models since the acquisition of Lucent by Alcatel, this contract no longer meets our profitability targets. Beginning in 2010, this will reduce our annual sales by approximately 3 percent, but the company's operating margins will be positively impacted."
"We will continue to aggressively manage costs and working capital in response to evolving market conditions. As discussed, we will balance expense reduction efforts with continued focus and investment in those initiatives capable of providing both short-term benefits and improved long-term market positioning that will provide an advantage in a recovering economy. We remain focused on achieving profitable long-term growth and strong positive cash flow, while benefiting from our diverse geographic presence, product offerings and participation in many important end markets. Our most important objective in the upcoming years continues to be ensuring that we react appropriately to the economic cycle and in a manner that maintains our financial flexibility and positions us well for the eventual economic rebound," Eck concluded.
2009 Accounting Change
As required by Financial Accounting Standards Board Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "" the company is now accounting separately for the debt and equity components of its outstanding convertible bonds. As a result of this change, the company reported diluted losses per share for the second quarter and first six months of 2009 that were 6 cents and 11 cents greater, respectively, than would have been reported under the prior accounting rules. At the same time, the adoption of these new rules required the company to restate its previously reported results to give effect to these new rules. The effect of this change was to reduce second quarter and first six months 2008 earnings per diluted share by 5 cents and 10 cents, respectively, from the amounts previously reported.
Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlements)
Second Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2009 second quarter on Tuesday, July 28, 2009 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com/webcasts
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management
 
programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and over $950 million in inventory, 3) 232 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 270 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20090804170334.txt.gz
TIME:20090804170334
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
          On July 31, 2009, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") amended its $40.0 million (Canadian dollar) Credit Facility. The agreement, dated July 31, 2009, is among Anixter Canada Inc., a subsidiary of the Company's primary operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., and The Bank of Nova Scotia. The key change to the credit facility is the adjustment of the ratings based pricing grid such that the all-in drawn cost of borrowings, based on Anixter Inc.'s current credit ratings of BB+/Ba2, is now the Banker Acceptance/Canadian Dollar Offered Rate ("BA/CDOR") plus 250 basis points (previously 75 basis points). In addition, the Applicable Margin for Canadian Dollar Prime Rate Advances is now 150 basis points (previously 15 basis points)..
          All other material terms and conditions of the credit facility remain unchanged, including the maturity. The amendment to the $40.0 million (Canadian dollar) Credit Facility, dated July 31, 2009, is attached as Exhibit 10.1.
Item 8.01 Other Events.
          On July 31, 2009, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed. The Company currently has approximately 35.6 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated July 31, 2009, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
     Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
is dated and effective as of the 31 day of July, 2009.
THIS SECOND AMENDMENT AGREEMENT
st
B E T W E E N:
RECITALS:
     in consideration of the premises and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and adequacy of which are hereby acknowledged, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties agree as follows:
NOW THEREFORE
Section 1  Amendment to Definitions
     Section 1.1.112 of the Existing Credit Agreement is deleted.
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     Section 1.1.129 of the Existing Credit Agreement is deleted and replaced with the following provision:
Section 2  Amendment to Credit
     Section 2.6(1) of the Existing Credit Agreement is deleted and replaced with the following provision:
Section 3  Amendment to Negative Covenants
     Section 7.4(2)(c) of the Credit Agreement is deleted and replaced with the following provision:
     7.4(2)(c) directly or indirectly declare or make any payment, distribution or contribution to or investment in to Anixter International Inc. (whether in cash or otherwise) except to the extent that it may do so in compliance with the U.S. Credit Agreement, as amended by any Scotia Approved Amendment;
Second Amendment Agreement
 
Section 4  Conditions Precedent to Effectiveness of this Second Amendment Agreement
     This Second Amendment Agreement shall become binding on the Lenders only upon satisfaction of the following conditions precedent:
Section 5  Representations and Warranties of the Obligors
     Each of the Obligors represents and warrants to the Agent and Lenders as follows:
Second Amendment Agreement
 
Section 6  Loan Document
     Each of the Obligors acknowledges that this Second Amendment Agreement is a Loan Document and that all of its representations and warranties concerning Loan Documents that are contained in the Existing Credit Agreement apply to this Second Amendment Agreement and are deemed to be repeated on its execution of this Second Amendment Agreement as if set out in full in this Second Amendment Agreement.
Section 7  Continuing Effect of Existing Credit Agreement
     Except as amended by this Second Amendment Agreement, the Existing Credit Agreement shall remain in full force and effect, without amendment, and is hereby ratified and confirmed. Without in any way limiting the terms of the Existing Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, each Obligor confirms that the Security made or granted by it pursuant to the Existing Credit Agreement remains in full force and effect notwithstanding the amendments to the Existing Credit Agreement contained herein and that such Security shall continue to secure and support all of the debts, liabilities and obligations described in Section 3.2 of the Existing Credit Agreement, including but not limited to those debts, liabilities and obligations arising as a result of this Second Amendment Agreement. In addition, all of the Loan Documents shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with their respective terms and are hereby ratified and confirmed in all respects.
Section 8  Further Assurances
     The Borrower shall promptly do, make, execute or deliver, or cause to be done, made, executed or delivered, all such further acts, documents and things as the Agent may require from time to time for the purposes of giving effect to this Second Amendment Agreement and shall use reasonable efforts and take all such steps as may be within its power to implement, to the full extent, the provisions of this Second Amendment Agreement.
Section 9  Counterparts and Facsimile
     This Second Amendment Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and such counterparts together shall constitute one and the same agreement. For the purposes of this Section, the delivery of a facsimile copy of an executed counterpart of this Second Amendment Agreement shall be deemed to be valid execution and delivery thereof.
Section 10  Governing Law
     The parties agree that this Second Amendment Agreement shall be conclusively deemed to be a contract made under, and shall for all purposes be governed by and construed in accordance with, the laws of the Province of Ontario and the laws of Canada applicable in the Province of Ontario.
Second Amendment Agreement
 
Section 11  Interpretation
     Capitalized terms used herein, unless otherwise defined or indicated herein, have the respective meanings defined in the Existing Credit Agreement. This Second Amendment Agreement and the Existing Credit Agreement shall be read together and have effect so far as practicable as though the provisions thereof and the relevant provisions hereof are contained in one document. Without limitation of the foregoing, the principles of construction and interpretation set forth in Sections 1.2, 1.3 and 1.4 of the Existing Credit Agreement apply to this Second Amendment Agreement.
Section 12  Effective Date
     This Second Amendment Agreement may be referred to as being dated as of July 31, 2009, notwithstanding the actual date of execution by the parties hereto as set forth on their respective signing pages.
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement
 
     , the parties have duly executed this Second Amendment Agreement as of July 31, 2009.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
[signature page for Second Amendment Agreement to Credit Agreement relating to Anixter Canada Inc. et al.]
Second Amendment Agreement

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed.
Glenview, IL., July 31, 2009 
Anixter currently has approximately 35.6 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and over $950 million in inventory, 3) 232 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 270 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on The New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20091028163808.txt.gz
TIME:20091028163808
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On October 27, 2009, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended October 2, 2009. The Company's press release, dated October 27, 2009, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended October 2, 2009.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 27, 2009 
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Note: Throughout this announcement prior year amounts have been restated to conform to the requirements of FASB Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlement)" that became effective in 2009.
Third Quarter Highlights
 
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated "Our third quarter sales patterns were largely a continuation of flat daily sales patterns experienced over much of the first half of this year. Sequentially, the current quarter benefited from the fewer number of holidays as compared to the second quarter. At the same time, some of the normal seasonal effects (vacations, factory shutdowns) had less of an impact than our historical experience. As we expected, year-on-year sales comparisons continue to be negatively impacted by the broader economic slowdown combined with the year-on-year strengthening of the U.S. dollar and the decline in the spot market price of copper that occurred in late 2008. Although, in the case of the latter two items, the impact in the third quarter was less significant than the previous quarter as the U. S. dollar weakened and copper strengthened on a consecutive quarter basis."
Eck added, " Our three primary end markets as well as all geographic segments reported year-on-year sales declines. The best sales performance in North America was within our OEM Supply end market, where continuing softness with aerospace customers was partially offset by a small amount of growth with industrial customers, resulting in an 8 percent year-on-year decline in sales, exclusive of acquisition benefits. Our worst sales performance in the quarter was within the European OEM Supply market where, similar to recent quarters, we had a 34 percent year-on-year organic sales decline. However, sales in this market were flat sequentially from the second to the third quarter, exclusive of currency benefits related to further weakening of the U.S. dollar in the third quarter. This improvement occurred despite the fact that many customers traditionally schedule plant closings and vacations during the third quarter."
Third Quarter Operating Results
" Reduced sales volumes, the year-on-year effects of lower copper prices and a stronger dollar again combined to negatively affect our performance in the third quarter of this year," commented Eck. "In addition to the effects of lower sales, we also saw lower gross margins, primarily due to larger sales declines in our higher gross margin end markets, including North American electrical wire & cable and worldwide OEM Supply, than elsewhere in the business."
 
"While the expense actions taken over the past few quarters are clearly positively impacting our profitability, they have not been able to fully offset the organic decline in business thus far in 2009," continued Eck. "Third quarter operating expenses of $229.8 million were down $25.0 million or 10 percent from levels in the third quarter of 2008. Acquisitions completed in the past year added $6.7 million to current quarter expenses while foreign exchange effects reduced expenses by $9.1 million. After adjusting for the effects of acquisitions and foreign exchange, year-on-year expenses declined on an adjusted basis by approximately 9 percent. Expense trends over the next few quarters are expected to continue to be positively affected as we realize additional savings from headcount reductions instituted in the second quarter."
operating margins declined to 4.6 percent from 7.4 percent in the year ago quarter as the effects of lower sales and the adverse sales mix changes on gross margins were greater than the year-on-year operating expense reductions achieved in the third quarter.
Company-wide
operating margins declined to 5.8 percent from 8.6 percent in the year ago quarter as profitability was impacted by lower sales, lower gross margins due to less favorable sales mix and the effects of lower copper prices.
North America
operating margins were a negative 2.3 percent as compared to a positive 3.2 percent in the year ago quarter due largely to a sales decline of 33 percent (28 percent organically), an unfavorable sales mix shift that negatively affected gross margins and the effects of lower copper prices.
Europe
operating margins decreased to 7.4 percent in the current quarter compared to 7.9 percent in the year ago quarter due to lower sales that offset sales mix-related improvements in gross margin and good expense management
Emerging Markets
.
Importantly, company-wide operating margins as well as the operating margins in each of the geographic segments showed consecutive quarter improvement from results reported in the second quarter as higher sales and lower operating expenses offset a small decline in gross margin.
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We are pleased with our continued strong cash generation, including the third quarter cash flow from operations of $134.0 million, up dramatically from the $8.3 million used by operations in the year ago quarter," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. " For the first nine months of the year, cash flow from operations was $393.6 million versus $90.6 million in the first nine months of the previous year. The increase in cash flow reflects the lower working capital requirements associated with the organic reduction in sales and the deflationary effects of lower copper prices. In the final quarter of 2009, we anticipate continuing positive cash flow from a combination of earnings, good expense management and further working capital reductions."
" During the most recent quarter, we used the strong cash flow to retire $33.1 million of outstanding debt, including $18.5 million of bank revolving credit borrowings and 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes with an accreted value of $14.6 million. In the quarter, we also repurchased one million shares of our common stock at an average price of $34.95 per share," said Letham. "With a quarter end cash balance of $167.6 million, including $98.0 million of short-term invested cash, and an expectation of continued positive cash flow, we may from time
 
to time repurchase additional amounts of the company's outstanding shares, 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes or other outstanding debt obligations."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the third quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "As we head towards year end, we are cognizant that there will be fewer shipping days in the fourth quarter due to the Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year's holidays. We also anticipate that certain of our OEM Supply customers will use this time period to extend normal holiday factory shutdowns to further ensure their finished goods inventory levels are properly balanced for the current economic environment. Additionally, as previously announced, we will exit a long running contractual relationship with Alcatel Lucent during the fourth quarter. Lastly, on a year-over-year basis, we will have one less week in the fourth quarter as compared to the year ago quarter due to the fact that we had a 53-week fiscal year in 2008."
" While we are hopeful that the broader economic rebound predicted by many economists will help offset some of the anticipated seasonal softness during the fourth quarter, it is by no means assured. By factoring in the flat daily sales trends we have continued to see, we anticipate a drop in sales from the third to the fourth quarter. Assuming the anticipated economic recovery continues into the first half of 2010, we would expect customers to begin spending more capital dollars on the types of projects that would favorably affect sales trends in our enterprise cabling and security business as well as our electric wire & cable business. Increased capital spending would also increase demand for the end products manufactured by many of our OEM Supply customers, which would lead to increased sales in that end market. We believe our measured approach to cost reductions during the past few quarters, along with a robust balance sheet and significant cash flow generation, has positioned us well to capitalize on an economic recovery. When sales begin to recover, we anticipate strong operating leverage and profit improvement," Eck concluded.
2009 Accounting Change
As required by Financial Accounting Standards Board Staff Position No. APB 14-1 " " the company began accounting separately for the debt and equity components of its outstanding convertible bonds at the beginning of the year. As a result of this change, the company reported diluted income per share for the third quarter of 2009 that was 6 cents lower than would have been reported under the prior accounting rules. On a year-to-date basis, the company's diluted loss per share was 17 cents greater than what would have been
Accounting
for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlements)
 
reported. At the same time, the adoption of these new rules required the company to restate its previously reported results to give effect to these new rules. The effect of this change was to reduce third quarter and first nine months 2008 earnings per diluted share by 5 cents and 14 cents, respectively, from the amounts previously reported.
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2009 third quarter on Tuesday, October 27, 2009 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the Investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com/webcasts
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 425,000 products and approximately $950 million in inventory, 3) 229 warehouses with more than 6.5 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 268 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20100203095507.txt.gz
TIME:20100203095507
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On February 2, 2010, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended January 1, 2010. The Company's press release, dated February 2, 2010, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended January 1, 2010.
GLENVIEW, IL, February 2, 2010 
Financial Highlights
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Note: Throughout this announcement prior year amounts have been restated to conform to the requirements of FASB Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlement)" that became effective in 2009.
Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
Fourth Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "Our fourth quarter sales patterns were largely a continuation of flat daily sales trends the company experienced over much of the first nine months of this year. Sequentially, the current quarter was negatively impacted by an increased number of holidays as compared to the third quarter. As we expected, year-on-year sales comparisons were negatively impacted by the economic slowdown and lower copper prices, which were partially offset by favorable foreign exchange effects."
"Once again our three primary end markets, within all geographic segments, reported year-on-year sales declines," continued Eck. "Our best sales performance was within our North American OEM Supply end market, where continuing softness with aerospace customers was partially offset by slight growth with industrial customers, resulting in a 10 percent year-on-year organic decline in sales. Our worst sales performance in the quarter was within the electrical wire & cable end markets in North America and Europe, where even after adjusting for lower copper prices and foreign exchange effects we reported a 25 percent year-on-year organic decline in sales due to a decrease in the number of larger projects in the current quarter."
 
Fourth Quarter Operating Results
"After adjusting for unusual items in both years, the primary contributors to the decline in operating profitability were reduced sales volumes and, to a lesser degree, the year-on-year effects of lower copper prices," commented Eck. "In addition to the effects of lower sales, we also experienced lower gross margins, primarily due to larger sales declines in select higher gross margin end markets, such as worldwide electrical wire & cable and European OEM Supply."
"While the expense actions taken over the past few quarters, as anticipated, are positively impacting our profitability, they have not fully offset the organic decline in business, as the company seeks to balance expense reduction with preservation of customer service capabilities," continued Eck. "Fourth quarter operating expenses of $225.7 million were down $61.1 million or 21 percent from levels in the fourth quarter of 2008. After adjusting for the year ago unusual items, relevant to operating expense, year-on-year operating expenses declined by $28.9 million or 11 percent. Exchange rates caused an increase in year-on-year expenses by $7.8 million. While we remain focused on tight expense management, we nonetheless anticipate some expense increases during 2010 particularly for higher pension, incentive and wage costs."
operating margins improved to 3.9 percent from 3.5 percent in the year ago quarter. However, excluding the inventory markdown in the current quarter and adjusting the prior year quarter for the relevant portions of the unusual items, operating margins have declined from 5.8 percent in the prior year quarter to 4.2 percent in the current quarter. The decline from the year ago adjusted operating margin is attributable to the fact that the combined effects of lower sales and the impact of the adverse sales mix on gross margins were greater than the year-on-year operating expense reductions achieved in the fourth quarter.
Company-wide
operating margins increased to 5.7 percent from 4.5 percent in the year ago quarter; however, after excluding relevant portions of the unusual items, year ago operating margins would have been 7.0 percent. The decline from the year ago adjusted operating margin is primarily due to lower sales volumes, an 80 basis point decline in gross margins and $2.6 million in lower earnings due to lower copper prices that collectively exceeded the benefit of a 14 percent reduction in operating expenses from the adjusted level of the year ago quarter.
North America
operating margins were a negative 2.6 percent as compared to a negative 2.8 percent in the year ago quarter; however, adjusted for the relevant portion of the unusual items, operating margins in the year ago quarter would have been slightly positive. The declines from the year ago adjusted operating margins reflect lower sales volumes and gross profit that was greater than the reduction in operating expense from the adjusted level of the year ago quarter.
Europe
operating margins decreased to 3.5 percent in the current quarter compared to 8.0 percent in the year ago quarter primarily due to lower sales and the $4.2 million exchange rate driven lower of cost or market inventory adjustment in Venezuela. Without the exchange rate driven inventory markdown, operating margins in the fourth quarter of 2009 would have been 6.7 percent.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We are pleased with our continued strong cash generation, including our fourth quarter cash flow from operations of $47.0 million, up from the $34.4 million generated in the year ago quarter," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "For full year 2009,
 
cash flow from operations was $440.9 million, up substantially from the $125.0 million generated in the previous year. The biggest driver of the increase in cash flow was a $306.9 million decrease in working capital associated with the reduction in sales."
"During the most recent quarter, we used $70.8 million of existing cash balances and cash flow to retire outstanding debt, bringing the year-to-date debt reduction to approximately $300 million. Included in the fourth quarter reduction were $23.5 million of 10% senior notes and 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes with an accreted value of $45.5 million. Not only have we reduced the leverage levels through the debt buy back, but we have also reduced the potential dilution associated with the 3.25% convertible notes through the cumulative retirement of 35 percent of that outstanding issue," said Letham. "With a quarter end cash balance of $111.5 million, including $72.5 million of short-term invested cash, and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow in 2010, we may from time to time repurchase additional amounts of the company's outstanding shares or debt obligations. In addition, this reduced leverage on our balance sheet better positions the company to quickly capitalize on the eventual economic rebound."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the fourth quarter include:
Venezuela
In anticipation of a pending devaluation of the Venezuelan Bolivar, the company repatriated cash balances from Venezuela using the parallel market in December 2009. As a result of this action using the parallel market, the company determined it was appropriate to remeasure assets denominated in Bolivars in its December balance sheet at the parallel market rate. The foreign exchange loss from the repatriation of cash balances and the remeasurement of the December balance sheet totaled $13.8 million on a pre-tax basis. In addition, the company incurred a loss by marking down the inventory value in Venezuela by $4.2 million due to the exchange rate driven lower of cost or market valuation considerations. The after tax impact of the above actions was a loss of $8.9 million or $0.24 per diluted share.
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "As Anixter enters 2010, we are encouraged by reports of economic conditions stabilizing and even improving in many parts of the world, despite not yet seeing a meaningful positive impact on our business. For us to benefit from this trend, overall economic growth will need to be sustained for at least two to three quarters such that our customers gain the confidence to invest in new projects or the growth in their respective business requires new capital projects or generates increased levels of production. Assuming positive trends in macro economic conditions continue, we would anticipate seeing some growth in sales by the middle of 2010."
 
"Until we experience improved and consistent sales trends our focus will remain on diligent cost management efforts and building our market share positions across all end markets and geographic segments while maintaining or improving gross margins. Strategically we will focus on adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate, developing end market presence in either electrical wire & cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited to only the enterprise cabling and security solutions end market. We will also selectively work to deepen our geographic presence in countries where our current presence is largely confined to the capital or the principal business city. As we begin to see sales growth from either the recovering economy or our own growth initiatives, we believe the excess capacity in our expense structure positions us well to drive significant improvement in operating profitability," Eck concluded.
2009 Accounting Change
As required by Financial Accounting Standards Board Staff Position No. APB 14-1 "" the company began accounting separately for the debt and equity components of its outstanding convertible bonds at the beginning of the year. As a result of this change, the company reported diluted income per share for the fourth quarter of 2009 that was 6 cents lower than would have been reported under the prior accounting rules. For the full year the company's diluted loss per share was 24 cents greater than what would have been reported. At the same time, the adoption of these new rules required the company to restate its previously reported results to give effect to these new rules. The effect of this change was to reduce fourth quarter and full year 2008 earnings per diluted share by 6 cents and 20 cents, respectively, from the amounts previously reported.
Accounting for Convertible Debt Instruments that May be Settled in Cash Upon Conversion (Including Partial Cash Settlements)
Fourth Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2009 fourth quarter on Tuesday, February 2, 2010 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com/webcasts
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 225 warehouses with more than 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 265 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, acquisitions and copper pricing, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20100208113855.txt.gz
TIME:20100208113855
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On February 4, 2010, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed. The Company currently has approximately 34.5 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated February 4, 2010, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated February 4, 2010, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed.
Glenview, IL., February 4, 2010 
Anixter currently has approximately 34.5 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 225 warehouses with more than 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 265 cities in 52 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20100427162058.txt.gz
TIME:20100427162058
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On April 27, 2010, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended April 2, 2010. The Company's press release, dated April 27, 2010, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended April 2, 2010.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 27, 2010 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Highlights
First Quarter Highlights
 
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "We entered the first quarter of 2010 with an expectation that sales would decline year-on-year, despite the improving macro economic trends experienced in the second half of 2009, due to several factors. First, as we had commented during the past couple of quarters, we believed it would take two-to-three quarters of sustained economic recovery before we would see capital spending increase to a level that would drive sales growth within our customer base. On this basis, we felt it would be late in the first quarter or early in the second quarter of 2010 before the company experienced the sales benefits of this increased capital spending. Secondly, during the fourth quarter we exited a major customer sales contract that had 2009 first quarter sales of $31.7 million. Lastly, the sales in our electrical wire and cable, aerospace and North American OEM Supply end markets did not hit bottom until the second quarter of 2009, leaving us with difficult year-on-year comparisons in each of those markets for the first quarter."
"A weaker U.S. dollar and stronger copper prices combined to offset some of these expected headwinds, leaving the company with flat year-on-year sales," continued Eck. "Importantly, however, we did experience some initial signs of improving sales trends within the quarter, including a year-on-year sales increase in our European OEM Supply end market. These improving sales trends were even more evident in the final weeks of the quarter on a broader basis, leaving us positioned, assuming a continued economic recovery, to expect year-on-year sales growth in the second quarter."
First Quarter Operating Results
"Year-on-year operating profitability was virtually flat with a 30 basis point drop in gross margin percentage being offset by an identical drop in operating expenses as a percent of sales," commented Eck. "Importantly, despite generally soft economic conditions, the gross margin percent has remained relatively flat for four consecutive quarters, reflecting a fairly consistent mix of business by both end market and geography. We are pleased with our operating performance as we realize the benefit of our prudent cost reduction actions taken last year."
"First quarter operating expenses of $232.7 million were down slightly from the first quarter of 2009," continued Eck. "Productivity and cost management actions resulted in spending reductions of $12.0 million or 5.0 percent, but were largely offset by exchange rate-driven increases of $8.3 million."
operating margins were flat year-on-year at 4.5 percent with an adverse sales mix impact on gross margins being fully offset by operating expense savings.
Company-wide
operating margins increased to 5.7 percent from 5.4 percent in the year ago quarter. This improvement reflects the benefit of slightly higher copper prices and exiting the low profitability major customer contract.
North America
operating margins were 0.2 percent as compared to a negative 0.4 percent in the year ago quarter. The year-on-year improvement reflects a stronger sales mix with a greater percentage of
Europe
 
higher margin OEM Supply business, while the other, lower gross margin end markets declined slightly year-on-year.
operating margins decreased to 4.6 percent in the current quarter compared to 7.1 percent in the year ago quarter, primarily due to project mix combined with reduced sales as a result of relatively unsettled market conditions in Venezuela.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We are extremely pleased with our continued strong cash generation, including our first quarter cash flow from operations of $74.7 million," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "The continued strong cash flow was achieved despite the working capital requirements associated with consecutive quarter sales growth experienced in this year's first quarter. We expect to generate significant cash during 2010 despite the working capital requirements associated with growing sales as economic conditions slowly improve."
"During the most recent quarter, our strong cash position allowed us to purchase 1 million shares of outstanding stock for $41.2 million, as well as retire a large portion of the previously mentioned 10% Senior Notes. Over the last six months we retired nearly 80 percent of these 10% Senior Notes, helping reduce our average cost of debt. The 2010 reduction in the higher cost debt, combined with the current quarter's share repurchase is projected to have a positive impact on diluted earnings per share by approximately $0.25 for 2010," Letham said. "With a quarter end cash balance of $65.6 million, including $30.7 million of short-term invested cash, and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow in 2010, we will continue to evaluate the optimal use of these funds and may from time to time repurchase additional amounts of the company's outstanding shares, 3.25% convertible notes or other outstanding debt obligations. We continue to believe that this reduced leverage on our balance sheet better positions the company to quickly capitalize on the economic rebound, as well as acquisition opportunities if and when they become available."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the first quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "The increasing number of reports from around the world citing improved economic conditions and continued positive outlooks have begun to take out some of the uncertainty in our expectations for the upcoming quarters. As previously noted, the strength of the final weeks of the first quarter has started to show the effects of an improving economy. While we contemplate being able to report year-on-year sales growth in the second quarter, we still believe that a more significant improvement will require extended positive trends and an expansion of those macro economic trends to more fully include Europe."
 
"Even though we are beginning to see improving sales trends, we will remain very diligent with our cost management efforts. We will continue to focus on adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate while developing end market presence in either electrical wire & cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large, but limited to only the enterprise cabling and security solutions end market. We will also selectively work to deepen our geographic presence in select countries, such as Brazil and China, where our current presence is largely confined to the capital or the principal business city. Assuming the forecasts of general economic growth materialize, we believe that our current cost structure positions us well to drive further improvement in overall operating profitability," Eck concluded.
First Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2010 first quarter on Tuesday, April 27, 2010 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at m, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com/webcasts
www.companyboardroom.co
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 223 warehouses with approximately 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 265 cities in 51 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20100512163346.txt.gz
TIME:20100512163346
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 11, 2010, the shareholders of Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") approved the Company's 2010 Stock Incentive Plan. The description of the 2010 Stock Incentive Plan is incorporated by reference to pages 5 through 8 of the Company's Proxy Statement filed on April 8, 2010. A copy of the 2010 Stock incentive Plan is incorporated by reference to pages A-1 through A-3 of the Company's Proxy Statement filed on April 8, 2010.
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
The annual meeting of stockholders was held May 11, 2010. In connection with the meeting, proxies were solicited pursuant to the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934. The following are the voting results on proposals considered and voted upon at the meeting, all of which were described in the Company's 2010 Proxy Statement filed on April 8, 2010.
(1) The Directors of the Company were elected as follows:
(2) The Company's 2010 Stock Incentive Plan was approved by a vote of 26,986,325 shares "for" and 2,901,364 shares "against" with 124,679 shares abstaining. There were 1,638,607 broker non-votes for the 2010 Stock Incentive Plan.
(3) The Company's ratification of Ernst & Young LLP as the Company's independent auditors for the fiscal year 2010 was approved by a vote of 31,458,082 shares "for" and 96,409 shares "against" with 96,484 shares abstaining.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20100726152501.txt.gz
TIME:20100726152501
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
     On July 23, 2010, Anixter Inc. (the "Company") renewed its accounts receivable securitization program for a new 364-day period ending in July of 2011. Specifically, the Company amended its Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement and its Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, both dated October 3, 2002. The renewed program carries an all-in drawn funding cost of Commercial Paper ("CP") plus 115 basis points (previously CP plus 150 basis points). Unused capacity fees decreased from 75 to 85 basis points to 57.5 to 60 basis points. All other material terms and conditions remain unchanged. The amendment related to the renewal of the accounts receivable securitization program, dated July 23, 2010, is attached as Exhibit 10.1.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
EXECUTION COPY
     This OMNIBUS AGREEMENT (this "") is entered into as of July 23, 2010, among ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the ""), ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), as the initial Servicer, each financial institution party hereto as a Financial Institution, FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION COMPANY LLC ("") and THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (f/k/a Three Pillars Funding Corporation) (""), as conduits, (collectively, the "" and each individually, a ""), SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC. and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. (successor by merger to Bank One, NA) (""), as managing agents (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and J.P. Morgan, as agent for the Purchasers (the ""). Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the RPA referred to below.
Agreement
Seller
Anixter
Falcon
Three Pillars
Conduits
Conduit
J.P. Morgan
Managing Agents
Managing Agent
Agent
          A. The parties hereto are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "").
RPA
          B. Anixter and the Seller (collectively, the "") are parties to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement dated as of October 3, 2002 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "").
Seller Parties
RSA
          C. Anixter has requested that the Seller transfer and assign to Anixter all of the Seller's interest in the unpaid Receivables owing by Obligors with the customer prefixes SIE and SG. (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of the date hereof)and all Related Security with respect to the such Receivables (collectively, the "") that were previously transferred and assigned to the Seller prior to the date hereof pursuant to the RSA. The Seller is willing to transfer and assign the Specified Assets to Anixter.
Specified Assets
          D. The Seller Parties have requested that the Agent, the Managing Agent, the Financial Institutions and the Conduits consent to the transfer of the Specified Assets by Anixter to the Seller.
          E. The applicable parties hereto have agreed to (i) amend the RPA, (ii) amend the RSA, (iii) transfer the Specified Assets from the Seller to Anixter and (iv) consent to the transfer of the Specified Assets, in each case, on the terms and conditions set forth herein.
          NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises set forth above, and other good and valuable consideration (which, in the case of the transfer of the Specified Assets by the Seller to Anixter, may be in the form of the reduction of Purchase Price Credits owing by the Seller to Anixter under the RSA), the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
          SECTION 1. . Effective as of the "Agreement Effective Date" (as defined below) and subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the RSA is hereby amended as follows
Amendments to RSA
Section 5
:
          1.1 Section 4.1(i) of the RSA is hereby amended to add the following sentence to the
 
end of such section:
     "On or before September 23, 2010, the Originator shall instruct the Obligors with the customer prefixes SIE and SG. to pay all amounts due with respect to their Receivables to an account which is not a Lock-Box or Collection Account."
          1.2 The definition of "Excluded Receivable" set forth in Exhibit I to the RSA is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
     "" means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Originator, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's Latin American export locations, (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pacer", "IMS" and "Pentacon" divisions which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by any of Originator's divisions which are acquired after July 24, 2009 which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer prefixes: N-N, NN+, SIE or SG. (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009), and thereafter, and (v) all accounts receivable existing at Originator's general corporate division coded WC (as such division is in effect or otherwise structured as of July 24, 2009).
Excluded Receivable
          SECTION 2. . Effective as of the Agreement Effective Date and subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the RPA is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to the RPA
Section 5
          2.1 Section 7.1(b) of the RPA is hereby amended to add the following as a new clause (vii) thereof:
     "(vii) . The decision to appoint a new director of Seller as the "Independent Director" for purposes of this Agreement, such notice to be issued not less than ten (10) days prior to the effective date of such appointment and to certify that the designated Person satisfies the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director.""
Appointment of Independent Director
          2.2 Section 7.1(j) of the RPA is hereby amended to add the following sentence to the end of such section:
     "On or before September 23, 2010, the Seller Parties shall instruct the Obligors with the customer prefixes SIE and SG. to pay all amounts due with respect to their Receivables to an account which is not a Lock-Box or Collection Account."
          2.3 Clause (M) of Section 7.1(i) of the RPA is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
     "(M) maintain its corporate charter in conformity with this Agreement, such that (1) it does not amend, restate, supplement or otherwise modify its Certificate of Incorporation or By-Laws in any respect that would impair its ability to comply with the terms or provisions of any of the Transaction Documents, including, without limitation, of this Agreement; and (2) its corporate charter, at all times that this Agreement is in effect, provides for not less than ten (10) days' prior written notice to the Agent of the replacement or appointment of any director that is to serve as an Independent
Section 7.1(i)
 
     Director for purposes of this Agreement and the condition precedent to giving effect to such replacement or appointment that Seller certify that the designated Person satisfied the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director" and the Agent's written acknowledgement that in its reasonable judgment the designated Person satisfies the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director;"
          2.4 Section 9.1 of the RPA is hereby amended to (i) delete the period at the end of clause (k) thereof and replace such period with "; and" and (ii) add the following as a new clause (l) thereof:
     "(l) Any Person shall be appointed as an Independent Director of Seller without prior notice thereof having been given to the Agent in accordance with or without the written acknowledgement by the Agent that such Person conforms, to the satisfaction of the Agent, with the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director."
Section 7.1(b)(vii)
          2.5 Section 10.2 of the RPA is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
     "Section 10.2 . (a) If any Regulatory Change (i) subjects any Purchaser or any Funding Source to any charge or withholding on or with respect to any Funding Agreement or a Purchaser's or Funding Source's obligations under a Funding Agreement, or on or with respect to the Receivables, or changes the basis of taxation of payments to any Purchaser or any Funding Source of any amounts payable under any Funding Agreement (except for changes in the rate of tax on the overall net income of a Purchaser or Funding Source or taxes excluded by ) or (ii) imposes, modifies or deems applicable any reserve, assessment, fee, tax, insurance charge, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or liabilities of a Funding Source or a Purchaser, or credit extended by a Funding Source or a Purchaser pursuant to a Funding Agreement or (iii) imposes any other condition the result of which is to increase the cost to a Funding Source or a Purchaser of performing its obligations under a Funding Agreement, or to reduce the rate of return on a Funding Source's or Purchaser's capital as a consequence of its obligations under a Funding Agreement, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by a Funding Source or a Purchaser under a Funding Agreement, or to require any payment calculated by reference to the amount of interests or loans held or interest received by it, then, upon demand by the Agent or the relevant Managing Agent, Seller shall pay to the applicable Managing Agent, for the benefit of the relevant Funding Source or Purchaser, such amounts charged to such Funding Source or Purchaser or such amounts to otherwise compensate such Funding Source or such Purchaser for such increased cost or such reduction. The term "" shall mean (i) the adoption after the date hereof of any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy) or any change therein after the date hereof, (ii) any change after the date hereof in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency, or (iii) the compliance, commenced after the date hereof, by any Funding Source or Purchaser with the final rule titled
Increased Cost and Reduced Return
Section 10.1
Regulatory Change
Risk-Based Capital Guidelines; Capital Adequacy Guidelines; Capital Maintenance: Regulatory Capital; Impact of Modifications to Generally Accepted Accounting Principles; Consolidation of Asset-Backed Commercial Paper Programs; and
 
, adopted by the United States bank regulatory agencies on December 15, 2009, or any rules or regulations promulgated in connection therewith by any such agency.
Other Related Issues
     (b) A certificate of the applicable Purchaser or Funding Source setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Purchaser or Funding Source pursuant to paragraph (a) of this shall be delivered to Seller and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Seller shall pay such Purchaser or Funding Source the amount as due on any such certificate on the next Settlement Date following receipt of such notice.
Section 10.2
     (c) If any Purchaser or any Funding Source has or anticipates having any claim for compensation from the Seller pursuant to clause (iii) of the definition of Regulatory Change appearing in paragraph (a) of this , and such Purchaser or Funding Source believes that having the facility publicly rated by one credit rating agency would reduce the amount of such compensation by an amount deemed by such Purchaser or Funding Source to be material, such Purchaser or Funding Source shall provide written notice to Seller and the Servicer (a "") that such Purchaser or Funding Source intends to request a public rating of the facility from one credit rating agency selected by such Purchaser or Funding Source and reasonably acceptable to Seller, of at least the equivalent of A by S&P and A2 by Moody's (the ""). Seller and the Servicer agree that they shall cooperate with such Purchaser's or Funding Source's efforts to obtain the Specified Rating, and shall provide the applicable credit rating agency (either directly or through distribution to the Agent, Purchaser or Funding Source), any information requested by such credit rating agency for purposes of providing and monitoring the Specified Rating. The Purchasers shall pay the initial fees payable to the credit rating agency for providing the rating and all ongoing fees payable to the credit rating agency for their continued monitoring of the rating. Nothing in this shall preclude any Purchaser or Funding Source from demanding compensation from Seller pursuant to hereof at any time and without regard to whether the Specified Rating shall have been obtained, or shall require any Purchaser or Funding Source to obtain any rating on the facility prior to demanding any such compensation from Seller."
Section 10.2
Ratings Request
Specified Rating
Section 10.2(c)
Section 10.2(a)
          2.6 Section 13.14 of the RPA is hereby amended to add the following as a new clause (c) thereof:
     "(c) If, notwithstanding the intention of the parties expressed above, any sale or transfer by Seller hereunder shall be characterized as a secured loan and not a sale or such sale shall for any reason be ineffective or unenforceable (any of the foregoing being a ""), then this Agreement shall be deemed to constitute a security agreement under the UCC and other applicable law. In the case of any Recharacterization, Seller represents and warrants that each remittance of Collections to the Agent or the Purchasers hereunder will have been (i) in payment of a debt incurred in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs and (ii) made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs."
Recharacterization
          2.7 The definition of "Liquidity Termination Date" set forth in Exhibit I to the RPA is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
     "" means July 22, 2011.
Liquidity Termination Date
 
          2.8 The definitions of "Amortization Date", "Applicable Margin", "Default Fee" and "Excluded Receivable" set forth in Exhibit I to the RPA are hereby amended and restated in their entirety to read as follows:
     "" means the earliest to occur of:
Amortization Date
     (i) the day on which any of the conditions precedent set forth in (except for ) are not satisfied;
Section 6.2
Section 6.2(d)(iii)
     (ii) the Business Day immediately prior to the occurrence of an Amortization Event set forth in ;
Section 9.1(d)(ii)
     (iii) the Business Day specified in a written notice from the Agent pursuant to following the occurrence of any other Amortization Event; and
Section 9.2
     (iv) the Business Day specified in a written notice from the Agent following the failure to obtain the Specified Rating within 90 days following delivery of a Ratings Request to Seller and the Servicer, and (v) the date which is thirty (30) Business Days after the Agent's receipt of written notice from Seller that it wishes to terminate the facility evidenced by this Agreement.
     "" means 3.15%.
Applicable Margin
     "" means with respect to any amount due and payable by Seller in respect of any Aggregate Unpaids, an amount equal to interest on any such unpaid Aggregate Unpaids at a rate per annum equal to 4.15% above the Base Rate.
Default Fee
     "" means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Originator, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's Latin American export locations, (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Originator's "Pacer", "IMS" and "Pentacon" divisions which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by any of Originator's divisions which are acquired after July 24, 2009 which are not included in Originator's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer prefixes: N-N, NN+, SIE or SG. (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009), and thereafter, and (v) all accounts receivable existing at Originator's general corporate division coded WC (as such division is in effect or otherwise structured as of July 24, 2009).
Excluded Receivable
          2.9 Exhibit I to the RPA is hereby amended to insert the following definitions thereto in appropriate alphabetical order:
     "" shall mean a member of the Board of Directors of Seller who (i) shall not have been at the time of such Person's appointment or at any time during the preceding five years, and shall not be as long as such Person is a director of Seller, (A) a director, officer, employee, partner, shareholder, member, manager or Affiliate of any of the following Persons (collectively, the ""): the Servicer, Originator, or any of their respective Subsidiaries or Affiliates (other than Seller), (B) a supplier to any of the Independent Parties, (C) a Person controlling or under common control with any partner, shareholder, member, manager, Affiliate or supplier of any of the Independent Parties, or (D) a member of the immediate family of any director, officer, employee,
Independent Director
Independent Parties
 
partner, shareholder, member, manager, Affiliate or supplier of any of the Independent Parties; (ii) has prior experience as an independent director for a corporation or limited liability company whose charter documents required the unanimous consent of all independent directors thereof before such corporation or limited liability company could consent to the institution of bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings against it or could file a petition seeking relief under any applicable federal or state law relating to bankruptcy and (iii) has at least three years of employment experience with one or more entities that provide, in the ordinary course of their respective businesses, advisory, management or placement services to issuers of securitization or structured finance instruments, agreements or securities.
          "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Ratings Request
Section 10.2(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Recharacterization
Section 13.14(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Regulatory Change
Section 10.2(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Specified Rating
Section 10.2(c)
          SECTION 3. . Effective as of the Agreement Effective Date and subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, (i) the Seller does hereby sell and assign to Anixter, without representation, recourse or warranty of any kind, all of the Seller's right, title and interest in and to the Specified Assets and (ii) Anixter does hereby purchase from the Seller, without representation, recourse or warranty of any kind, all of the Seller's right, title and interest in and to the Specified Assets.
Transfer of Specified Assets
Section 5
          SECTION 4. . Effective as of the Agreement Effective Date and subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below:
Consent to Transfer of Specified Assets
Section 5
          4.1 each of the Conduits, the Managing Agents, the Financial Institution and the Agent hereby releases the security interest in the Specified Assets that was granted by the Seller pursuant to the RPA; and
          4.2 each of the Conduits, the Managing Agents, the Financial Institutions and the Agent hereby consents to the Seller's sale and transfer to Anixter of all of the Seller's right, title and interest in and to the Specified Assets in accordance with hereof.
Section 3
          SECTION 5. . This Agreement shall become effective, as of the date first above written (the "") upon the Agent's receipt of each of the following:
Effective Date
Agreement Effective Date
          5.1 counterparts hereof executed by each party for which a signature block is attached hereto;
          5.2 evidence that the Seller has amended its Certificate of Incorporation to, among other things, amend the definition of "Independent Director" set forth therein to be consistent with the definition thereof set forth herein;
          5.3 counterparts to the Fourth Amended and Restated Fee Letter duly executed by each Person for which a signature block is attached thereto; and
 
          5.4 all fees payable on the date hereof pursuant to such Fourth Amended and Restated Fee Letter.
          SECTION 6. . In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Agreement, each of the Seller Parties represents and warrants to the Agent and the Purchasers, as to itself, that:
Covenants, Representations and Warranties of the Seller Parties
     (a) The representations and warranties of such Seller Party set forth in Section 5.1 of the RPA, as hereby amended, are true, correct and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof and there exists no Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event on the date hereof, provided that in the case of any representation or warranty in Section 5.1 that expressly relates to facts in existence on an earlier date, the reaffirmation thereof under this shall be made as of such earlier date.
Section 6.1(a)
     (b) The representations and warranties of Anixter set forth in Section 2.1 of the RSA, as hereby amended, are true, correct and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof and there exists no Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event on the date hereof, provided that in the case of any representation or warranty in Section 2.1 that expressly relates to facts in existence on an earlier date, the reaffirmation thereof under this shall be made as of such earlier date.
Section 6.1(b)
     (c) The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Agreement has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Seller Party and this Agreement, and the RPA and the RSA, as amended by this Agreement, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Seller Party, enforceable against such Seller Party in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
          SECTION 7. . The RPA and the RSA, as amended hereby, are hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
          SECTION 8. .
Effect on the RPA and the RSA
          8.1 On and after the Agreement Effective Date, each reference in the RPA and the RSA, as applicable, to "this Agreement", "hereunder", "hereof", "herein" or words of like import, and all references to the RPA and the RSA, as applicable, in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean and be a reference to the RPA and the RSA, as applicable, as amended hereby. The RPA, the RSA and other documents, instruments and agreements executed and/or delivered in connection therewith shall remain in full force and effect and are hereby ratified and confirmed.
          8.2 The execution, delivery and effectiveness of this Agreement shall not operate as a waiver of any right, power or remedy of any party to the RPA, the RSA or any of the other Transaction Documents, nor constitute a waiver of any provision contained therein, except as specifically set forth herein.
          8.3 Each party hereto agrees and acknowledges that this Agreement constitutes a "Transaction Document" under and as defined in the RPA.
 
          SECTION 9. . THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
GOVERNING LAW
          SECTION 10. . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute but one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic transmission shall be deemed as effective as delivery of an originally executed counterpart. Any party delivering an executed counterpart of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic transmission will also deliver an original executed counterpart, but the failure of any party to so deliver an original executed counterpart of this Agreement will not affect the validity or effectiveness of this Agreement.
Execution in Counterparts
          SECTION 11. . This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of each party hereto and their respective successors and assigns.
Successors and Assigns
          SECTION 12. . Section headings in this Agreement are included herein for convenience of reference only and shall not constitute a part of this Agreement for any other purpose.
Headings
          SECTION 13. . This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties hereto with regard to the subject matter contained herein. This Agreement supersedes all prior or contemporaneous negotiations, promises, covenants, agreements and representations of every nature whatsoever with respect to the matters referred to in this Agreement, all of which have become merged and finally integrated into this Agreement. Each of the parties hereto understands that in the event of any subsequent litigation, controversy or dispute concerning any of the terms, conditions or provisions of this Agreement, no party shall be entitled to offer or introduce into evidence any oral promises or oral agreements between the parties relating to the subject matter of this Agreement not included or referred to herein and not reflected by a writing included or referred to herein.
Integration
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed on the date first set forth above to be effective as hereinabove provided.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20100727125846.txt.gz
TIME:20100727125846
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On July 27, 2010, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended July 2, 2010. The Company's press release, dated July 27, 2010, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended July 2, 2010.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 27, 2010 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Highlights
Second Quarter Highlights
 
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "Three months ago we were cautiously optimistic as we saw improving daily sales trends in late March moving into early April. These improving trends accelerated through the current quarter and helped fuel growth in most of our businesses around the world. Improvement in our day-to-day business was supplemented by higher levels of project activity in both our enterprise cabling and industrial wire and cable businesses. These growth trends are even more encouraging considering sales were negatively affected in the current quarter and first half of the year by $33.0 million and $64.7 million, respectively, as a result of the exit of a major customer contract."
"We are very pleased with the company's strong organic sales increase of 12 percent in the current quarter," continued Eck. "Equally as positive is the fact that this was the first quarter since the third quarter of 2008 that we have delivered a year-on-year sales increase in all three geographic segments, as well as all three of our end markets. We are encouraged by the rate and breadth of the company's sales rebound despite the uncertain macroeconomic conditions that continue to exist."
Second Quarter Operating Results
"Excluding the prior year impairment and severance charges, year-on-year operating profitability during the quarter was very strong, including a 20 basis point improvement in gross margin percentage and a 100 basis point improvement in operating expenses as a percent of sales," commented Eck. "The improvement in operating expense was driven both by our fully executed cost reduction actions, as well as critical fixed cost leverage in these early months of the recovery. The incremental operating margin of 15.7 percent on the increased year-on-year sales positions us well to achieve our operating leverage goal through this ongoing recovery period."
 
"Second quarter operating expenses of $242.9 million were up $7.7 million from the second quarter of 2009," continued Eck. "Excluding the impact of exchange rates, as well as the prior year quarter's impairment and severance charges, expenses were only up $12.3 million, or 5 percent, on a 12 percent increase in organic sales. Increases in variable expenses to support the higher volume and increased incentive compensation costs were largely offset by our previous cost reduction actions. We are pleased with our operating leverage performance as we realize the benefit of our gross margin focus and continued prudent cost management."
operating margins of 5.1 percent were up 120 basis points from the 3.9 percent achieved in the year ago quarter, excluding the impact of the impairment and severance charges in the second quarter of 2009. The year-on-year improvement reflects the impact of a stronger sales mix on gross margins combined with strong volume leverage on our cost structure.
Company-wide
operating margins increased to 6.4 percent from 5.1 percent in the year ago quarter, excluding the prior year severance charge. This improvement reflects the benefit of mix-driven gross margin improvement and higher year-on-year copper prices, combined with excellent cost leverage on six percent organic sales growth. Exiting a low-margin major customer contract that generated sales of $31.4 million in the prior year quarter also contributed to the improvement. Sequentially, operating margins in the current period improved 70 basis points from the first quarter of 2010.
North America
operating margins improved to a negative 0.3 percent as compared to a negative 2.7 percent in the year ago quarter, excluding the impairment and severance charges in the prior year quarter. The year-on-year improvement reflects a stronger sales mix with a greater percentage of higher-margin OEM Supply business, combined with strong cost structure leverage from a 19 percent organic sales improvement. Sequentially, operating margins in the current period dropped by 50 basis points from the first quarter of 2010 due to gross margin pressure on flat sales.
Europe
operating margins decreased to 5.8 percent in the current quarter compared to 6.7 percent in the year ago quarter. The benefit of a strong 20 percent organic sales growth was offset by weaker country mix and significantly lower volume in Venezuela due to the country's unsettled economic environment. Sequentially, operating margins in the current period improved by 120 basis points from the first quarter of 2010.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We are very pleased with our continued strong cash generation, including our second quarter cash flow from operations of $36.6 million," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "The strong cash flow was achieved despite the working capital requirements associated with sequential quarter sales growth experienced in this year's second quarter. We expect to generate additional positive cash flow during the second half of 2010."
"During the most recent quarter, our strong cash position allowed us to continue to buy back debt as we repurchased a portion of the 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes with an accreted value of $28.6 million. This transaction resulted in a pre-tax gain of $0.8 million," Letham said. "With a quarter-end cash balance of $79.2 million, including $35.9 million of short-term invested cash, and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow in 2010, we will continue to evaluate the optimal use of these funds for general corporate purposes. We may from time to time repurchase additional amounts of the company's outstanding shares, 3.25% convertible notes or other
 
outstanding debt obligations. We are confident that this reduced leverage on our balance sheet better positions the company to effectively capitalize on the improved economic environment as well as acquisition opportunities when they become available."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the second quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "The improved economic conditions that we saw around the world in the second quarter give us more confidence in our ability to generate year-on-year sales growth in 2010. However, the uncertainty that still remains in Europe and more recent concerns about a moderating growth rate in the U.S. cause us to remain cautiously optimistic. Accelerating daily sales rates that we saw through much of the second quarter began to level off in June and have continued at that pace through the first three weeks of July. It should also be noted that there will be one less shipping day in the third quarter compared to the second quarter. In addition, the normal seasonality of slower business in Europe due to the summer vacation impact, combined with scheduled factory shutdowns for our customers in the OEM Supply end market, will impact the sequential growth from the second to third quarter. Although we were very encouraged with our growth in the second quarter, we still believe that a more significant improvement will require extended positive trends and an expansion of those macro economic trends to more fully include Europe."
"Even though we have seen improving sales trends, we will remain very diligent with our cost management efforts. In addition to benefiting from the general economic improvement, we expect our growth to be fueled by our market share gains combined with our strategic growth initiatives, which include adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate; developing end market presence in either electrical wire & cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large, but limited to only the enterprise cabling and security solutions end market; and selectively deepening our geographic presence in countries, such as Brazil and China, where our current presence is largely confined to the country's principal business city. Assuming no macro economic deterioration occurs, we expect to continue delivering positive year-on-year performance and over time drive further improvement in overall operating profitability," Eck concluded.
Second Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2010 second quarter on Tuesday, July 27, 2010 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual
www.anixter.com/webcasts
www.companyboardroom.com
 
Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $900 million in inventory, 3) 219 warehouses with approximately 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 262 cities in 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20101027150312.txt.gz
TIME:20101027150312
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On October 26, 2010, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended October 1, 2010. The Company's press release, dated October 26, 2010, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended October 1, 2010.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 26, 2010 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Highlights
Third Quarter Highlights
 
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "The continuation of higher daily sales rates from the second quarter allowed us to post not only strong year-on-year sales growth of 10 percent but also consecutive quarter sales growth of 2 percent. The consecutive quarter sales growth was achieved despite there being one less shipping day in the third quarter as compared to the second quarter, as well as the third quarter having the normal seasonal vacation effects in the European and OEM Supply businesses. The sales growth that we are experiencing is being fueled by stronger day-to-day business in both of our cabling businesses along with an increasing number of major projects. Our sales performance was also driven by the second straight quarter of 20 percent year-on-year growth in our OEM Supply business, which is indicative of a broad-based increase in production levels within virtually all the vertical markets of our OEM customers. These growth trends are even more encouraging considering sales in our enterprise cabling and security products business were negatively affected in the current quarter and first three quarters of 2010 by $30.7 million and $95.4 million, respectively, as a result of exiting a major customer contract in 2009."
"Considering the uncertainty that has continued to exist in most major economies, we believe that customer capital spending decisions are impacting company results more than broader macro economic factors," continued Eck. "In the current environment, the strength of customer relationships, quality of our value proposition and execution of company-specific growth initiatives are critical to our ability to drive growth. Our current rate of sales improvement in each of our end markets leads us to believe that we continue to gain share. Furthermore, the breadth of the company's sales rebound is indicative of our ability to capitalize on the slow growth recovery while leveraging our strategic sales initiatives."
Third Quarter Operating Results
"Year-on-year operating profitability during the quarter was very strong compared to the prior year's quarter. A 60 basis point improvement in gross margin percentage combined with a 30 basis point improvement in operating expenses as a percent of sales drove a 5.5 percent operating profit margin," commented Eck. "While still not back to our pre-recession profitability levels, the third quarter's operating profit margin was the highest in seven quarters. The improvement in profitability was a result of both an improved mix of business across our three end markets and strong fixed cost leverage on the increased sales volume. With an incremental operating profit
 
margin of 15.3 percent on the increased year-on-year sales, the company believes it is still in a position to drive improved operating margin through this ongoing recovery period."
"Third quarter operating expenses of $247.2 million represented 17.7 percent of sales compared to 18.0 percent in the prior year quarter," continued Eck. "Excluding the impact of exchange rates, expenses were up $19.4 million, or 8 percent, on a 12 percent increase in organic sales. Increases in variable expenses to support the higher sales volume, increased incentive compensation costs and operating expenses to support the higher cost-to-serve OEM Supply end market were partially offset by our previous cost reduction actions. We continue to be pleased with an incremental operating margin leverage of almost three times our consolidated operating margin as we begin to more fully realize the benefit of our gross margin focus and continued prudent cost management."
operating profit margin of 5.5 percent was up 90 basis points from the 4.6 percent reported in the year ago quarter and up 40 basis points sequentially. Both the year-on-year improvement and the sequential improvement reflect the impact of a stronger sales mix driving higher gross margin combined with volume leverage on the company's cost structure.
Company-wide
operating profit margin increased to 7.0 percent from 5.8 percent in the year ago quarter. The 120 basis point improvement year-on-year and 19.6 percent incremental operating margin leverage reflect very strong performance in the company's most mature segment. This improvement reflects the benefit of mix-driven gross margin improvement and higher year-on-year copper prices, combined with excellent cost leverage on 11 percent organic sales growth. Exiting a low-margin major customer contract that generated sales of $29.8 million in the prior year quarter also contributed to the improvement. Sequentially, operating profit margin in the current period improved 60 basis points from the second quarter of 2010.
North America
operating profit margin improved to a negative 0.8 percent as compared to a negative 2.3 percent in the year ago quarter. The year-on-year improvement reflects a 220 basis point decrease in operating expenses as a percentage of sales, driven by a 19 percent organic sales growth coupled with strong cost management. Gross margin was negatively impacted by product cost increases in the company's OEM Supply end market greater than what the company was able to recover from customers in the short term. Sequentially, operating profit margin in the current period dropped by 50 basis points from the second quarter of 2010, partially due to normal seasonality resulting in lower daily sales in the third quarter compared to the second quarter combined with the product cost pressures mentioned above.
Europe
operating profit margin decreased to 6.3 percent in the current quarter compared to 7.5 percent in the year ago quarter. Year-on-year organic sales growth was 6 percent despite weaker country mix and significantly lower volume in Venezuela due to the country's unsettled economic environment. Sequentially, operating profit margin in the current period improved by 50 basis points from the second quarter of 2010.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We continue to be very pleased with our strong cash generation, including our third quarter cash flow from operations of $54.2 million," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "This strong cash flow was achieved despite the working capital requirements associated with sequential quarter sales growth experienced in this year's third quarter. We expect to generate additional positive cash flow from operations during the last quarter of 2010."
 
"Our strong cash generation through the first three quarters of 2010 allowed us to support the working capital needs associated with the growth in sales, continue deleveraging the balance sheet and return capital to shareholders through a combination of share repurchases and a special dividend," Letham said. "The special dividend we announced during the quarter was $3.25 per share payable on October 28, 2010 to shareholders of record on October 15, 2010. Additionally during the third quarter, we repurchased a portion of the 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes with an accreted value of $8.2 million, resulting in a pre-tax gain of $0.1 million. We were also able to retire $11.8 million of the 10% senior notes during the third quarter resulting in a pre-tax loss of $2.8 million."
"With a quarter-end cash balance of $66.2 million and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow in 2010, we will continue to evaluate the optimal use of these funds. We may from time to time repurchase additional amounts of the company's outstanding shares, 3.25% convertible notes or other outstanding debt obligations. The company maintains the flexibility to utilize future cash flows to invest in the growth of the business, and we are confident that the significantly reduced leverage on our balance sheet better positions the company to effectively capitalize on the improved economic environment as well as acquisition opportunities when they become available," Letham concluded.
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the third quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "With macro economic growth rates in North America, Europe and elsewhere in the world expected to be more moderate than normally experienced when exiting a major recession, we remain cautiously optimistic. Despite what appears to be a slow-growth recovery, we believe that we are exiting the recent downturn with not only a stronger, leaner cost structure, but also with a strong position within each of our end markets."
"While the strong daily sales rates that we experienced throughout the third quarter continued into the first few weeks of the fourth quarter, it should be noted that due to the number of holidays in the period there will be two less shipping days in the fourth quarter compared to the third quarter. Seasonal factors, as they traditionally do, are expected to lead to a slight decline in consecutive quarter sales in the fourth quarter."
"Overall, we were encouraged with our growth in the third quarter; however, we still believe that a more significant improvement will require extended positive trends across all major economies around the world, and as such we will continue our diligent cost management efforts. In addition to benefiting from the general economic improvement, we expect our growth to be fueled by our strategic growth initiatives, which include adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate; developing end market presence in either electrical wire & cable or OEM Supply in
 
countries where our current presence is large, but limited to only the enterprise cabling and security solutions end market; and selectively deepening our geographic presence in countries, such as Brazil and China, where our current presence is largely confined to the country's principal business city. Assuming no macro economic deterioration occurs, we expect to continue delivering positive year-on-year performance and over time drive improvement in overall operating profitability," Eck concluded.
Third Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2010 third quarter on Tuesday, October 26, 2010 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $950 million in inventory, 3) 218 warehouses with approximately 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 260 cities in 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20101217172336.txt.gz
TIME:20101217172336
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
     
 
     On December 13, 2010, an arbitration panel in an arbitration brought by Raytheon Co. against Anixter Inc., a subsidiary of Anixter International Inc., entered an interim award against Anixter Inc. in the amount of $20.8 million. The arbitration is more fully described in Note 11 to Anixter International Inc.'s financial statements contained in its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended October 1, 2010. Raytheon may seek an additional award of attorneys' fees and arbitration proceeding costs in this matter, and the company may object to such a request. The company anticipates recording a pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter in an amount that approximates the award after consideration of insurance proceeds and all legal costs.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110201123930.txt.gz
TIME:20110201123930
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On February 1, 2011, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 31, 2010. The Company's press release, dated February 1, 2011, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION:
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended December 31, 2010.
GLENVIEW, IL, February 1, 2011 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Highlights
Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
Fourth Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "Our fourth quarter sales were not only stronger than we anticipated, but they also were strong enough to overcome the historical patterns that typically produce consecutive quarter sales declines from the third to fourth quarter due to the larger number of holidays in the fourth quarter. In addition to the better-than-expected year-on-year sales increase of 18 percent, we also experienced a nearly 3 percent sequential increase in sales. Consistent with trends we have experienced in the last few quarters, higher copper prices added approximately $19 million to revenues in the fourth quarter, but in terms of year-on-year comparisons this increase was offset by the reduction in sales due to exiting a major customer contract in late 2009 and the negative effects of currency translation on reported sales outside the U.S."
"Importantly, sales were strong across all reporting segments with North America, Europe and Emerging Markets, all reporting sales increases between 17 and 18 percent year-on-year," continued Eck. "Sales growth by end market was also robust, with the biggest improvement
 
coming from the Electrical Wire & Cable end market. In that end market, the building backlog of new project bookings over the past couple of quarters produced higher fourth quarter billings that led to year-on-year sales growth of 30 percent. The Enterprise Cabling and Security end market as well as the OEM Supply business each produced approximately 13 percent year-on-year sales growth, with the Enterprise Cabling and Security business producing 16 percent growth in sales, excluding the impact of the major customer contract exited in the fourth quarter of 2009."
Fourth Quarter Operating Results
"Strong year-on-year operating profit growth continued the upward momentum we have experienced this year. Fourth quarter operating margin was the highest since 2008. Excluding the items discussed above, a 60 basis point improvement in gross margin combined with a strong 90 basis point improvement in operating expense leverage due to higher sales, drove operating margin, exclusive of the arbitration award, to its highest level in eight quarters at 5.7 percent. An improvement in sales mix, both by geographic segment and by end market, largely drove the gross margin improvement while the higher volume resulted in improved fixed cost leverage. The incremental operating profit margin of 14.0 percent on the increased year-on-year sales reflects the success of the continued cost management discipline while supporting a growing revenue base."
"Fourth quarter operating expenses of $252.2 million, excluding the above-mentioned arbitration award, represented 17.6 percent of sales compared to 18.5 percent in the prior year quarter," continued Eck. "Excluding the impact of exchange rates and the arbitration award, year-on-year operating expenses increased by $28.0 million or 12 percent, on an 18 percent increase in organic sales. Expense increases were primarily volume related including distribution costs, incentive compensation and operating expenses to support growth in the higher cost-to-serve OEM Supply end market."
operating margin improved to 4.3 percent from 3.9 percent in the year ago quarter. However, excluding the arbitration award from fourth quarter 2010 and the inventory markdown in the prior year quarter, operating margin improved by 150 basis points from 4.2 percent in the prior year quarter to 5.7 percent in the current quarter. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 20 basis points. Both year-on-year and sequential improvements benefited from a stronger sales mix coupled with sales-driven operating leverage on the company's cost structure.
Company-wide
operating margin declined to 5.1 percent from 5.7 percent in the year ago quarter; however, excluding the arbitration award from fourth quarter 2010, operating margin would have been 7.1 percent. The 140 basis point improvement from the year ago operating margin was driven by a richer sales mix and higher sales volumes, with a 90 basis point improvement in gross margin and a 50 basis point improvement in operating expenses as a percent of sales. This resulted in a 14.8 percent incremental operating margin on the increased year-on-year sales. Sequentially, operating profit margin grew by 10 basis points in the current quarter.
North America
operating profit was break-even for the quarter compared to a loss of $6.0 million in the year ago quarter. The operating margin in the current quarter was a 260 basis point improvement year-on-year. The 30 basis point decline in gross margin year-on-year was more than offset by the 290 basis point improvement in operating expense as a percent of sales driven by the 23 percent organic growth year-on-year. Sequentially, operating profit margin improved by 80 basis points.
Europe
 
operating margin improved to 6.5 percent in the current quarter compared to 3.1 percent in the year ago quarter. Without the exchange rate-driven inventory markdown in the fourth quarter of 2009, operating margin would have been 6.1 percent in the prior year quarter. The 40 basis point improvement year-on-year and the 20 basis point sequential improvement were largely driven by strong volume improvement.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"We were pleased to deliver another quarter of solid cash generation, including fourth quarter cash flow from operations of $29.7 million, down from the $47.0 million generated in the year ago quarter," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "For full year 2010, cash flow from operations was $195.2 million, down from the $440.9 million in the previous year when there was a significant reduction in working capital associated with lower sales. The strong cash flow for the quarter and for the full year was achieved despite the increased working capital requirement to support a year-on-year sales increase in the quarter and full year of 18 and 10 percent, respectively."
"During the fourth quarter we continued to retire higher-cost term debt and replaced it with lower-cost borrowings," said Letham. "Specifically during the quarter we retired $30.2 million in accreted value of our 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes, bringing the full year 2010 accreted value reduction of these notes to $67.0 million. When combined with the $133.7 million reduction in outstanding 10% senior notes completed earlier in the year, we successfully lowered the weighted average cost of borrowed capital in the current quarter to 5.6 percent as compared to 7.8 percent in the year ago quarter."
"With the payment of a special dividend of $3.25 per share in the fourth quarter for a total cash outlay of $111.0 million, along with the acquisition of Clark Security Products for cash consideration of $36.4 million, we have increased the financial leverage at year end to 46.9 percent, within our longstanding target range of 45 to 50 percent. With an anticipated continuation of solid positive cash flow in 2011, our near term priorities for the use of cash will be for short-term borrowing reductions. We may also further reduce the outstanding amount of the 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes utilizing available capacity in our bank revolving lines of credit. Our strong balance sheet position at year end, combined with anticipated positive cash flows, also leaves us well positioned to pursue strategic acquisition opportunities in the coming year as we continue to evaluate the optimal use of these funds," concluded Letham.
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the fourth quarter include:
 
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "The strong fourth quarter sales results leave us with increased confidence that the improving economic fundamentals of the past few quarters can be sustained into 2011. We recognize that on a macro basis sustained growth is still at risk from factors such as sovereign debt issues outside the U.S. and significant pressures to reduce budget deficits at all levels of government within the U.S. At the same time, we will begin to experience more difficult growth comparisons as the year unfolds due to the strong growth we achieved in 2010. Nevertheless, we believe that a combination of improved economic conditions and our own strategic growth initiatives positions us well to achieve strong sales growth and improved operating leverage in the coming year."
"Overall, our strategic growth initiatives should continue to improve our market share positions across all end markets and geographic segments while maintaining or improving gross margins. Specifically, our growth will be fueled by our focus on adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate; developing end market presence in either Electrical Wire & Cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited to only the Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions end market; and selectively expanding our geographic presence in countries such as Brazil and China, where our current presence is largely confined to the capital or the principal business city. As an indication of our positive outlook, we committed to investments for future growth during the fourth quarter through our acquisition of Clark Security Products as well as by opening a new operation in Morocco," Eck concluded.
Fourth Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will report results for the 2010 fourth quarter on Tuesday, February 1, 2011 and broadcast a conference call discussing them at 9:30 am central time. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1.0 billion in inventory, 3) 228 warehouses with approximately 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 263 cities in 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110222154753.txt.gz
TIME:20110222154753
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
     On February 18, 2011, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced that Dennis J. Letham, who will reach age 60 in July, will retire as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer at the end of June 2011, following an 18-year career with the company as the Chief Financial Officer. The Company also announced that, effective July 1, 2011, Theodore ("Ted") A. Dosch will become Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Dosch, age 51, has served as the Company's Senior Vice President  Global Finance since January 2009. Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Dosch served in a variety of senior financial management positions with Whirlpool Corporation, most recently Chief Financial Officer, North America. Mr. Dosch is also a member of the Board of Directors of Habitat for Humanity International, where he currently serves as Vice-Chair of the Board.
     For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated February 18, 2011, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Exhibits
          99.1    Press Release, dated February 18, 2011, issued by Anixter International Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
February 18, 2011  Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today announced that Dennis J. Letham, who will reach age 60 in July, will retire as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer at the end of June 2011, following an 18-year career with the company as the Chief Financial Officer.
GLENVIEW, IL,
Effective July 1, 2011, Theodore ("Ted") A. Dosch will become Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Dosch, age 51, has served as the company's Senior Vice President  Global Finance since January 2009. Prior to joining Anixter, Mr. Dosch served in a variety of senior financial management positions with Whirlpool Corporation, most recently Chief Financial Officer, North America. Mr. Dosch is also a member of the Board of Directors of Habitat for Humanity International, where he currently serves as Vice-Chair of the Board.
In discussing his upcoming retirement, Mr. Letham said, "During my 18-year tenure at Anixter, the company has experienced tremendous change and success, and I am proud of the role the finance organization has played in that success. The company, through a rigorous succession planning process and continuity in key finance positions, is well positioned for the future and to support continued growth."
Commenting on the transition, Bob Eck, President and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Over the past two years, Ted has led our operational finance activities, becoming deeply involved with the end market leaders in performance measurement and improvement, including our working capital efficiency initiative. More recently, Ted has been increasingly engaged in the company's treasury, audit and investor relations functions, preparing for an orderly succession in our finance function. Overall, the succession planning process has properly positioned the company for a smooth and transparent transition, which allows for continuation of the strategies and initiatives that have served us well over the long-term."
Mr. Eck continued, "Ted brings many years of increasing responsibilities and successful leadership with large, complex international financial organizations to his new role at Anixter. I want to thank Dennis for his years of service and commitment to Anixter. During his tenure the company has seen tremendous growth in sales, profitability and shareholder returns. Under Dennis' outstanding leadership, the company developed an effective balance in capital structure, capital allocation and internal controls that helped to serve as the foundation of the company's global growth platform from both an organic and acquisition perspective."
 
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1.0 billion in inventory, 3) 228 warehouses with approximately 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 263 cities in 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110414103737.txt.gz
TIME:20110414103737
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
          On April 11, 2011, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company) announced that its wholly-owned operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., refinanced its senior unsecured revolving credit facility on April 8, 2011 with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, and other banks named therein. The following key changes have been made to the prior revolving credit agreement:
          All other material terms and conditions of the new revolving credit agreement, which is guaranteed by the Company, are similar to the prior credit agreement. The new revolving credit agreement, dated April 8, 2011, is attached as Exhibit 10.1.
          The Company's press release, dated April 11, 2011, announcing Anixter Inc.'s new senior unsecured revolving credit agreement is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
          As a result of the execution of the new senior unsecured revolving credit agreement dated April 8, 2011 and discussed in Item 1.01 herein, Anixter Inc.'s prior revolving credit agreement dated April 20, 2007, as amended, has been terminated.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
Published CUSIP Number: 03528CAD2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     This FIVE-YEAR REVOLVING CREDIT AGREEMENT ("") is entered into as of April 8, 2011, among ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), the BORROWING SUBSIDIARIES (as defined herein), each lender from time to time party hereto (collectively, the "" and individually, a "") and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative Agent, Swing Line Lender and L/C Issuer.
Agreement
Anixter
Lenders
Lender
     Anixter and certain of the Borrowing Subsidiaries have requested, and, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders have agreed, to extend certain credit facilities to Anixter and the Borrowing Subsidiaries on the terms and conditions stated herein.
     In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained, the parties hereto covenant and agree as follows:
     1.01 . As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below:
Defined Terms
     "" means the 5.95% unsecured senior notes due March 1, 2015 issued by Anixter pursuant to that certain indenture dated as of September 9, 1996 among Anixter, AXE, as guarantor, and The Bank of New York, as trustee.
2015 Senior Notes
     "", as applied to any Person, means any contractual obligation, contingent or otherwise, of that Person with respect to any Indebtedness or other obligation or liability of another, including, without limitation, any such Indebtedness, obligation or liability directly or indirectly guaranteed, supported by letter of credit, endorsed (otherwise than for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business), co-made or discounted or sold with recourse by that Person, or in respect of which that Person is otherwise directly or indirectly liable, including Contractual Obligations (contingent or otherwise) arising through any agreement to purchase, repurchase, or otherwise acquire such Indebtedness, obligation or liability or any security therefor, or to provide funds for the payment or discharge thereof (whether in the form of loans, advances, stock purchases, capital contributions or otherwise), or to maintain solvency, assets, level of income, or other financial condition, or to make payment other than for value received. For purposes of interpreting any provision of this Agreement which refers to the amount of Accommodation Obligations of any Person, such provision shall be deemed to mean the maximum amount of such Accommodation Obligations or, in the case of an Accommodation Obligation to maintain solvency, assets, level of income or other financial condition, the amount of Indebtedness to which such Accommodation Obligation relates, or if less, the stated maximum, if any, in the documents evidencing such Accommodation Obligation. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the term "Accommodation Obligation" shall not be interpreted to include any letter of credit Obligations or any other Obligations hereunder guaranteed by Anixter or any other Guarantor.
Accommodation Obligation
     "" means Wells Fargo Bank in its capacity as administrative agent under any of the Loan Documents, or any successor administrative agent.
Administrative Agent
     "" means, with respect to any currency, the Administrative Agent's address and, as appropriate, account as set forth on with respect to such currency, or such
Administrative Agent's Office
Schedule 10.02
 
other address or account with respect to such currency as the Administrative Agent may from time to time notify Anixter and the Lenders.
     "" means an administrative questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
     "" means, as to any Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under direct or indirect common control with, such Person. A Person shall be deemed to be "controlled by" any other Person if such other Person possesses, directly or indirectly, power (a) to vote 33% or more (or, in the case of an Affiliate of a Lender, 20% or more) of the securities (on a fully diluted basis) having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or managing general partners; or (b) to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person whether by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
     "" means the separate fee letter agreement dated March 17, 2011 between Anixter and Wells Fargo Bank.
Agent Fee Letter
     "" means US$400,000,000, as such amount may be reduced or adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
Aggregate Commitments
     "" means this Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
Agreement
     "" means GAAP as of the date of this Agreement together with any changes in GAAP after the date hereof which are not "Material Accounting Changes" (as defined below). If any changes in GAAP are hereafter required or permitted and are adopted by AXE or Anixter with the agreement of its independent certified public accountants and such changes result in a material change in the method of calculation of any of the financial covenants, restrictions or standards herein or in the related definitions or terms used therein (""), the parties hereto agree to enter into negotiations, in good faith, in order to amend such provisions in a credit neutral manner so as to reflect equitably such changes with the desired result that the criteria for evaluating Anixter's consolidated financial condition shall be the same after such changes as if such changes had not been made; , , that no Material Accounting Change shall be given effect in such calculations until such provisions are amended in a manner reasonably satisfactory to the Required Lenders. If such amendment is entered into, all references in this Agreement to Agreement Accounting Principles shall mean GAAP as of the date of such amendment together with any changes in GAAP after the date of such amendment which are not Material Accounting Changes.
Agreement Accounting Principles
Material Accounting Changes
provided
however
     "" has the meaning assigned to that term in the preamble hereto.
Anixter
     "" means, with respect to any Loan or other Obligation, the currency in which such Loan or other Obligation is denominated.
Applicable Currency
     "" means any Affiliate of a Lender designated thereby from time to time with the consent of the Administrative Agent and Anixter (which such consents shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed) to fund all or any portion of such Lender's Pro Rata Share of any Credit Extension under this Agreement. As of the Closing Date, the Applicable Designees of each Lender are set forth on (which schedule may be updated from time to time upon written notice by any Lender to the Administrative Agent and Anixter). Each Applicable Designee will be subject at all times to the terms and provisions of this Agreement, including, without limitation, and hereof.
Applicable Designee
Schedule 1.01(a)
Sections 3.08
10.13
 
     "" means the following percentages per annum as set forth below based on the Leverage Ratio:
Applicable Margin
     The Applicable Margin shall be determined and adjusted quarterly on the date (each, a "") five (5) Business Days after the date on which the Administrative Agent has received from Anixter financial information and a Compliance Certificate pursuant to for the most recently ended Fiscal Quarter; that (a) the Applicable Margin shall be based on Pricing Level II until the first Calculation Date occurring after the Closing Date and, thereafter the Pricing Level shall be determined by reference to the Leverage Ratio as of the last day of the most recently ended Fiscal Quarter preceding the applicable Calculation Date, and (b) if Anixter fails to provide such financial information and Compliance Certificate as required by for the most recently ended Fiscal Quarter preceding the applicable Calculation Date, the Applicable Margin from such Calculation Date shall be based on Pricing Level IV until such time as such financial information and an appropriate Compliance Certificate are provided, at which time the Pricing Level shall be determined by reference to the Leverage Ratio as of the last day of the most recently ended Fiscal Quarter preceding such Calculation Date. The Applicable Margin shall be effective from one Calculation Date until the next Calculation Date. Any adjustment in the Applicable Margin shall be applicable to all Credit Extensions then existing or subsequently made or issued.
Calculation Date
Section 6.01(d)
provided
Section 6.01(d)
     Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that any financial statement or Compliance Certificate delivered pursuant to is shown to be inaccurate at any time prior to the date six months after the satisfaction in full of the Obligations (regardless of whether (i) this Agreement is in effect, (ii) the Commitments are in effect or (iii) any Credit Extension is outstanding when such inaccuracy is discovered or such financial statement or Compliance Certificate was delivered), and such inaccuracy, if corrected, would have led to the application of a higher Applicable Margin for any period (an "") than the Applicable Margin applied for such Applicable Period, then (x) Anixter shall immediately deliver to the Administrative Agent a corrected Compliance Certificate for such Applicable Period, (y) the Applicable Margin for such Applicable Period shall be determined as if the Leverage Ratio in the corrected Compliance Certificate were applicable for such Applicable Period, and (z) the Borrowers shall immediately and retroactively be obligated to pay to the Administrative Agent the accrued additional interest and fees owing as a result of such increased Applicable Margin for such Applicable Period, which payment shall be promptly applied by the Administrative Agent in accordance with . Nothing in this paragraph shall limit the rights of the Administrative Agent or any Lender with respect to and or any of their other rights under this Agreement. The Borrowers' obligations under this paragraph shall survive for a period of six months following the termination of the Commitments and the repayment of all other Obligations hereunder.
Section 6.01
Applicable Period
Section 2.14
Sections 2.10(b)
8.02
 
     "" means, with respect to any borrowings and payments in (a) British Pound Sterling, not later than 1:00 p.m. London time and (b) any other Foreign Currency, the local time in the place of settlement for such Foreign Currency as may be determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, to be necessary for timely settlement on the relevant date in accordance with normal banking procedures in the place of payment.
Applicable Time
     "" means any Fund that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
     "" means the financing arrangement pursuant to the Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement dated October 3, 2002, among Anixter Receivables Corporation, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as agent, and the other financial institutions named therein, as the same may be amended or replaced from time to time.
ARS Facility
     "" means an Assignment and Assumption substantially in the form of .
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit F
     "" means, on any date, (a) in respect of any Capital Lease of any Person, the capitalized amount thereof that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP, and (b) in respect of any Synthetic Lease Obligation, the capitalized amount of the remaining lease payments under the relevant lease that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP if such lease were accounted for as a Capital Lease.
Attributable Indebtedness
     "" means the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Consolidated Group for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, and the related consolidated statements of income and cash flows for such fiscal year of the Consolidated Group.
Audited Financial Statements
     "" means the period from and including the Closing Date to the earliest of (a) the Maturity Date, (b) the date of termination of the Aggregate Commitments pursuant to , and (c) the date of termination of the commitment of each Lender to make Loans and of the obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions pursuant to .
Availability Period
Section 2.08
Section 8.02
     "" means (a) US Dollars and (b) each Foreign Currency; that with respect to Letters of Credit, Available Currency shall not include British Pound Sterling or Canadian Dollars.
Available Currency
provided
     "" means Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation.
AXE
     "" means for any day a fluctuating rate per annum equal to the highest of (a) the Federal Funds Rate plus / of 1%, (b) the Prime Rate and (c) except during any period of time during which a notice delivered to Anixter under or shall remain in effect, the Eurocurrency Rate determined by the Administrative Agent on such day for an Interest Period of one month plus 1%. Each change in the Base Rate shall take effect simultaneously with the corresponding change or changes in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Rate or the Eurocurrency Rate.
Base Rate
1
2
Section 3.02
Section 3.03
     "" means a Loan that bears interest based on the Base Rate. All Base Rate Loans shall be denominated in US Dollars.
Base Rate Loan
 
     "" means a defined benefit plan as defined in Section 3(35) of ERISA (other than a Multiemployer Plan) in respect of which Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate is, or within the immediately preceding six (6) years was, an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Benefit Plan
     "" means Anixter and each Borrowing Subsidiary.
Borrower
     "" means a Committed Borrowing or a Swing Line Borrowing, as the context may require.
Borrowing
     "" means a notice, substantially in the form of , of (a) a Committed Borrowing and/or Swing Line Borrowing, (b) a conversion of Loans from one Type to the other or (c) a continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans.
Borrowing Notice
Exhibit A
     "" means any Foreign Subsidiary of Anixter named as such on the signature pages hereto or designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary by Anixter pursuant to .
Borrowing Subsidiary
Section 2.16
     "" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit C-1
     "" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit C-2
     "" means the lawful currency of the United Kingdom.
British Pound Sterling
     "" means a Committed Loan denominated in British Pound Sterling that bears interest based on the Eurocurrency Rate.
British Pound Sterling Loan
     "" means an amount equal to the lesser of (a) US$100,000,000 and (b) the Aggregate Commitments. The British Pound Sterling Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
British Pound Sterling Sublimit
     "" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks are authorized to close under the Laws of, or are in fact closed in, the state where the Administrative Agent's Office with respect to Obligations denominated in US Dollars is located and:
Business Day
     (a) if such day relates to any interest rate settings as to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan denominated in US Dollars, any fundings, disbursements, settlements and payments in US Dollars in respect of any such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, or any other dealings in US Dollars to be carried out pursuant to this Agreement in respect of any such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, means any such day on which dealings in deposits in US Dollars are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank eurodollar market;
     (b) if such day relates to any interest rate settings as to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan denominated in Euro, any fundings, disbursements, settlements and payments in Euro in respect of any such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, or any other dealings in Euro to be carried out pursuant to this Agreement in respect of any such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, means a TARGET Day;
     (c) if such date relates to any interest rate settings as to a Canadian Dollar Loan, means any such date on which dealings in deposits in Canadian Dollars are conducted by and between banks in Toronto, Ontario and dealings in deposits in Canadian Dollars are conducted by and between banks in London;
 
     (d) if such day relates to any interest rate settings as to a Loan denominated in a currency other than US Dollars, Euro or Canadian Dollars, means any such day on which dealings in deposits in the relevant currency are conducted by and between banks in the London or other applicable offshore interbank market for such currency; and
     (e) if such day relates to any fundings, disbursements, settlements and payments in a currency other than US Dollars, Euro or Canadian Dollars in respect of a Loan denominated in a currency other than US Dollars, Euro or Canadian Dollars, or any other dealings in any currency other than US Dollars, Euro or Canadian Dollars to be carried out pursuant to this Agreement in respect of any such Loan (other than any interest rate settings), means any such day on which banks are open for foreign exchange business in the principal financial center of the country of such currency.
     "" means Anixter Canada Inc. and any other Borrowing Subsidiary established under the laws of or resident in Canada or any of its provinces or territories.
Canadian Borrower
     "" means a Committed Loan denominated in Canadian Dollars that bears interest based on the Canadian Prime Rate.
Canadian Dollar Loan
     "" means an amount equal to the lesser of (a) US$25,000,000 and (b) the Aggregate Commitments. The Canadian Dollar Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
Canadian Dollar Sublimit
     "" or "" means lawful currency of Canada.
Canadian Dollars
C$
     "" means, on any day, a fluctuating rate of interest per annum equal to the greater of (a) the annual rate of interest announced by the Administrative Agent on that day as its reference rate for commercial loans made by it in Canadian Dollars to Canadian customers and designated as its "prime rate" (the "prime rate" is a rate set by the Administrative Agent based upon various factors, including the Administrative Agent's costs and desired return, general economic conditions and other factors, which is used as a reference point for pricing some loans and may be priced at, above or below such announced rate, and any change in the prime rate announced by the Administrative Agent shall take effect at the opening of business on the day specified in the public announcement of such change); and (b) Canadian LIBOR on such day 0.50%. As used herein, "" means the rate of interest per annum determined on the basis of the rate for deposits in Canadian Dollars for a period of one month which appears on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, then on the immediately preceding Business Day). If, for any reason, such rate does not appear on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page, then "Canadian LIBOR" shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be the arithmetic average of the rate per annum at which deposits in Canadian Dollars would be offered by first class banks in the London interbank market to the Administrative Agent for a period of one month at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, then on the immediately preceding Business Day). Each calculation by the Administrative Agent of Canadian LIBOR shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes, absent manifest error.
Canadian Prime Rate
plus
Canadian LIBOR
     "" as applied to any Person, means any lease of any property (whether real, personal, or mixed) by that Person as lessee which, in conformity with Agreement Accounting Principles, is or should be accounted for as a capital lease on the balance sheet of that Person.
Capital Lease
 
     "" has the meaning specified in . "" shall have a meaning correlative to the foregoing and shall include the proceeds of such cash collateral and other credit support.
Cash Collateralize
Section
2.06(g)
Cash Collateral
     "" means (a) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States Government or issued by an agency thereof and backed by the full faith and credit of the United States, in each case maturing within ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof, (b) money market funds consisting primarily of marketable direct obligations issued by any state or local government of the United States maturing within ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof and, at the time of acquisition, having one of the two highest ratings obtainable from either S&P or Moody's (or, if at any time neither S&P nor Moody's shall be rating such obligations, then from such other nationally recognized rating services acceptable to the Administrative Agent) and not listed in Credit Watch published by S&P (or a similar publication of S&P or another nationally recognized rating service), (c) commercial paper (other than commercial paper issued by AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or any of their Affiliates), domestic and Eurodollar certificates of deposit, time deposits or bankers' acceptances, in any such case maturing no more than ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof and, at the time of the acquisition thereof, the issuer's rating on its commercial paper is at least A-1 or P-1 from either S&P or Moody's (or, if at any time neither S&P nor Moody's shall be rating such obligations, then the highest rating from other nationally recognized rating services acceptable to the Administrative Agent); and (d) commercial paper (other than commercial paper issued by AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or any of their Affiliates), domestic and Eurodollar certificates of deposit, time deposits or bankers' acceptances, in any such case maturing no more than ninety (90) days after the date of acquisition thereof and, at the time of the acquisition thereof, the issuer is a Lender and has a rating on its commercial paper of at least A-2 or P-2 from either S&P or Moody's (or, if at any time neither S&P nor Moody's shall be rating such obligations, then the equivalent rating from other nationally recognized rating services acceptable to the Administrative Agent), the amount of Cash Equivalents under this clause (d) shall not at any time exceed US$5,000,000.
Cash Equivalents
provided
     "" means the occurrence, after the date of this Agreement, of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty (including, without limitation, the adoption or taking effect of any regulation related to any existing law, rule or treaty) by any Governmental Authority, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority or (c) the making or issuance of any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; that notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Change in Law", regardless of the date enacted, adopted or issued.
Change in Law
provided
     "" shall occur if:
Change of Control
     (a) any "person," as such term is defined in Section 13(d)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act, other than the Samuel Zell Group, is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of 33% or more of the combined voting power of AXE's or Anixter's outstanding securities ordinarily having the right to vote at elections of directors, and such person at such time owns more of such combined voting power than the Samuel Zell Group; or
     (b) individuals who, at the beginning of any period of 24 consecutive months, constitute AXE's board of directors (together with any new directors whose election by AXE's board of directors or whose nomination for election by AXE's shareholders was approved by a vote of at least a majority of the
 
directors then still in office who either were directors at the beginning of such period or whose election or nomination was previously so approved) cease for any reason (other than death, disability or mandatory retirement) to constitute a majority of AXE's board of directors then in office.
     "" means the first date all the conditions precedent in are satisfied or waived in accordance with (or, in the case of , waived by the Person entitled to receive the applicable payment).
Closing Date
Section 4.01
Section 4.01
Section 4.01(d)
     "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
     "" means the Securities and Exchange Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
Commission
     "" means, as to each Lender, its obligation to (a) make Committed Loans to the Borrowers pursuant to , (b) purchase participations in L/C Obligations and (c) purchase participations in Swing Line Loans, in each case in an aggregate principal Dollar Equivalent at any one time outstanding not to exceed the US Dollar amount of such Commitment set forth opposite such Lender's name on or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
Commitment
Section 2.01
Schedule 2.01
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Commitment Fee
Section 2.11(a)
     "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Loans of the same Type, in the same currency and, if applicable, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Lenders pursuant to .
Committed Borrowing
Section 2.01
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Committed Loan
Section 2.01
     "" means a promissory note made by the Borrowers in favor of a Lender evidencing Committed Loans made by such Lender, substantially in the form of .
Committed Loan Note
Exhibit D-1
     "" means a certificate substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit E
     "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, (a) Consolidated Net Income for such period taken as a single accounting period (b) the sum of the following, without duplication, to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income for such period: (i) the provision for depreciation and amortization expense of the Consolidated Group for such period, (ii) income taxes of the Consolidated Group for such period, and (iii) net interest expense of the Consolidated Group for such period; that there shall be excluded from Consolidated EBITDA any non-cash, non-operating gains or losses (including, without limitation, extraordinary or unusual gains or losses, gains or losses arising from the sale of capital assets or the sale of owned buildings and properties and other non-recurring gains or losses) during such period.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
provided
     "" means, as of any date of determination, the ratio of (a) the sum of Consolidated EBITDA and Rental Expense to (b) the Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense, in each case determined in accordance with for the period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters ending on or immediately prior to such determination date.
Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
Section 7.18
 
     "" means, for any period, the net interest expense of the Consolidated Group (including the interest component of Capital Leases, the interest component of Synthetic Lease Obligations, Commitment Fees and fees for standby letters of credit, excluding amortization of deferred financing fees) consolidated yield or discount accrued on the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction (regardless of the accounting treatment of such Receivables Securitization Transaction) Rental Expense for such period calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense
plus
plus
     "" means, as of any date of determination, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations and liabilities, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including Obligations hereunder), (b) that portion of obligations with respect to Capital Leases that are capitalized in the consolidated balance sheet of the Consolidated Group, (c) the principal portion of Synthetic Lease Obligations, (d) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables under Receivables Securitization Transactions, and (e) without duplication, all Accommodation Obligations with respect to Indebtedness of the type specified in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) above of Persons other than any Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Consolidated Funded Indebtedness
     "" means Anixter and each of its Subsidiaries.
Consolidated Group
     "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the net income of the Consolidated Group for that period, determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Net Income
     "" means any pollutant, hazardous substance, hazardous chemical, toxic substance, hazardous waste or special waste, as those terms are defined in federal, state or local laws and regulations, radioactive material, petroleum, including crude oil or any petroleum-derived substance, or breakdown or decomposition product thereof, or any constituent of any such substance or waste, including but not limited to polychlorinated biphenyls and asbestos.
Contaminant
     "" means, as to any Person, any provision of any security issued by such Person or of any agreement, instrument or other undertaking to which such Person is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound.
Contractual Obligation
     "" means each of the following: a Committed Borrowing, a Swing Line Loan, and an L/C Credit Extension.
Credit Extension
     "" means:
Customary Permitted Liens
     (a) Liens (other than Environmental Liens, Liens imposed under ERISA or Enforceable Judgments) for claims, taxes, assessments or charges of any Governmental Authority not yet due or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which adequate reserves or other appropriate provisions are being maintained in accordance with GAAP;
     (b) statutory Liens of landlords, bankers, carriers, warehousemen, mechanics, materialmen and other Liens (other than Environmental Liens, Liens imposed under ERISA or Enforceable Judgments) imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and for amounts which (A) are not yet due, (B) are not more than thirty (30) days past due as long as no notice of default has been given or other action taken to enforce such Liens, or (C) (1) are not more than thirty (30) days past due and a notice of default
 
has been given or other action taken to enforce such Liens, or (2) are more than thirty (30) days past due, and, in the case of clause (1) or (2), are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which are sufficient to prevent imminent foreclosure of such Liens and with respect to which adequate reserves or other appropriate provisions are being maintained in accordance with GAAP;
     (c) Liens (other than Environmental Liens, Liens imposed under ERISA or Enforceable Judgments) incurred or deposits made in the ordinary course of business (including, without limitation, surety bonds and appeal bonds) in connection with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other types of employment benefits or to secure the performance of tenders, bids, leases, contracts (other than for the repayment of Indebtedness), statutory obligations and other similar obligations or arising as a result of progress payments under government contracts;
     (d) easements (including, without limitation, reciprocal easement agreements and utility agreements), rights-of-way, covenants, consents, rights of landlords, reservations, encroachments, variations and other restrictions, charges or encumbrances (whether or not recorded) affecting the use of real property, which do not materially interfere with the ordinary conduct of the business of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter;
     (e) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities arising as a matter of law to secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods; and
     (f) precautionary filings of financing statements in connection with assets that are not owned by Anixter or its Subsidiaries (including in connection with Operating Leases entered into in the ordinary course of business).
     "" means, as of any date of determination, the rating as determined by S&P, Moody's or Fitch of Anixter's non-credit-enhanced, senior unsecured long-term debt.
Debt Rating
     "" means the Bankruptcy Code of the United States, and all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar debtor relief Laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect and affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Debtor Relief Laws
     "" means any Event of Default or any event that, with the giving of any notice, the passage of time, or both, would be an Event of Default.
Default
     "" means (a) when used with respect to Obligations other than Letter of Credit Fees, an interest rate equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Margin applicable to Base Rate Loans 2% per annum; , , that (i) with respect to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the Default Rate shall be an interest rate equal to the interest rate (including any Applicable Margin and Mandatory Cost) otherwise applicable to such Loan 2% per annum, in each case to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Laws, (ii) with respect to a Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan, the Default Rate shall be the interest rate applicable thereto the Applicable Margin applicable to Eurocurrency Rate Loans any Mandatory Cost 2% per annum and (iii) with respect to a Canadian Dollar Loan, the Default Rate shall be an interest rate equal to the applicable Canadian Prime Rate the Applicable Margin 2% per annum, and (b) when used with respect to Letter of Credit Fees, a rate equal to the Applicable Margin applicable to Base Rate Loans 2% per annum.
Default Rate
plus
plus
provided
however
plus
plus
plus
plus
plus
plus
plus
     "" means, subject to , any Lender (or, if applicable, its Applicable Designee) that (a) has failed to fund any portion of the Committed Loans or participations in L/C Obligations or Swing Line Loans required to be funded by it hereunder within two Business Days of
Defaulting Lender
Section 3.08(b)
 
the date required to be funded by it hereunder unless such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and Anixter in writing that such failure is the result of such Lender's determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding (each of which conditions precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing) has not been satisfied, (b) has otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, the Swing Line Lender or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder (including in respect of its participation in L/C Obligations or Swing Line Loans) within two Business Days of the date when due, (c) has notified Anixter, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations hereunder, or has made a public statement to that effect (unless such writing or public statement relates to such Lender's obligation to fund a Loan hereunder and states that such position is based on such Lender's determination that a condition precedent to funding (which condition precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing or public statement) cannot be satisfied), (d) has failed, within three Business Days after written request by the Administrative Agent or Anixter, to confirm in writing to the Administrative Agent and Anixter that it will comply with its prospective funding obligations hereunder (provided that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (d) upon receipt of such written confirmation by the Administrative Agent and Anixter), or (e) has, or has a direct or indirect parent company that has, (i) become the subject of a proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law, or (ii) had appointed for it a receiver, custodian, conservator, trustee, administrator, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with reorganization or liquidation of its business or assets, including the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other state or federal regulatory authority acting in such a capacity; that a Lender shall not be a Defaulting Lender solely by virtue of the ownership or acquisition of any equity interest in that Lender or any direct or indirect parent company thereof by a Governmental Authority so long as such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Lender with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Lender (or such Governmental Authority) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made with such Lender. Any determination by the Administrative Agent that a Lender is a Defaulting Lender under clauses (a) through (e) above shall be conclusive and binding absent manifest error, and such Lender shall be deemed to be a Defaulting Lender (subject to ) upon delivery of written notice of such determination to Anixter, the L/C Issuer, the Swing Line Lender and each Lender; that any failure of the Administrative Agent to deliver such notice will not prevent the Borrowers from exercising their rights with respect to any Defaulting Lender.
provided
Section 3.08(b)
provided
     "" or "" means the sale, transfer, license or other disposition (including any sale and leaseback transaction) of any property by any Person, including any sale, assignment, transfer or other disposal, with or without recourse, of any notes or accounts receivable or any rights and claims associated therewith.
Disposition
Dispose
     "" means, at any time, (a) with respect to any amount denominated in US Dollars, such amount and (b) with respect to any specified amount denominated in any Foreign Currency, the equivalent amount thereof in US Dollars, as determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, at such time based on the Spot Rate (determined in respect of the most recent Revaluation Date) for the purchase of US Dollars with such Foreign Currency.
Dollar Equivalent
     "" means Anixter-Real Estate, Inc., an Illinois corporation, Anixter Information Systems Corporation, an Illinois corporation, Anixter Financial Inc., a Delaware corporation and Anixter Procurement Corporation, an Illinois corporation.
Domestic Subsidiaries
     "" means Eurinvest B.V., Anixter Eurotwo Holdings B.V. and any other Borrowing Subsidiary established under the laws of or resident in the Netherlands.
Dutch Borrower
 
     "" means any Person that meets the requirements to be an assignee under , and (subject to such consents, if any, as may be required under ); that so long as a Dutch Borrower is party hereto, each Eligible Assignee shall be a PMP.
Eligible Assignee
Section 10.06(b)(iii)
(v)
(vi)
Section 10.06 (b)(iii)
provided
     "" means the legislative measures of the European Council for the introduction of, changeover to or operation of a single or unified European currency.
EMU Legislation
     "" means a judgment or order as to which (a) Anixter has not demonstrated to the reasonable satisfaction of the Required Lenders that the Borrowers are covered by third-party insurance (other than retro-premium insurance) therefor and (b) the period, if any, during which the enforcement of such judgment or order is stayed shall have expired, it being understood that a judgment or order which is under appeal or as to which the time in which to perfect an appeal has not expired shall not be deemed an "Enforceable Judgment" so long as enforcement thereof is effectively stayed pending the outcome of such appeal or the expiration of such period, as the case may be; that if enforcement of a judgment or order has been stayed on condition that a bond or collateral equal to or greater than US$25,000,000 be posted or provided, such judgment or order shall immediately be an "Enforceable Judgment."
Enforceable Judgment
provided
     "" means all Laws relating to environmental, health, safety and land use matters applicable to any property.
Environmental Laws
     "" means a Lien in favor of any Governmental Authority for (i) any liability of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter under federal or state Environmental Laws or regulations, or (ii) damages from, or costs incurred by such Governmental Authority in response to, a Release or threatened Release of a Contaminant into the environment.
Environmental Lien
     "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and any regulations issued pursuant thereto.
ERISA
     "" means any (i) corporation which is a member of the same controlled group of corporations (within the meaning of Section 414(b) of the Code) as Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries, (ii) partnership or other trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control (within the meaning of Section 414(c) of the Code) with Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries, and (iii) member of the same affiliated service group (within the meaning of Section 414(m) of the Code) as Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries, any corporation described in clause (i) above or any partnership or trade or business described in clause (ii) above.
ERISA Affiliate
     "" means (a) any Reportable Event with respect to any Plan; (b) the failure to make the "minimum required contributions" under Section 412 or 430 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by Anixter or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) any Termination Event; or (f) the receipt by Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
     "" and "" mean the lawful currency of the Participating Member States introduced in accordance with the EMU Legislation.
Euro
EUR
 
     "" means for any Interest Period with respect to a Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the rate per annum equal to the British Bankers Association LIBOR Rate (""), as published by Reuters (or other commercially available source providing quotations of BBA LIBOR as designated by the Administrative Agent from time to time) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, for deposits in the relevant currency (for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period) with a term equivalent to such Interest Period. If such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "Eurocurrency Rate" for such Interest Period shall be the rate per annum determined by the Administrative Agent to be the rate at which deposits in the relevant currency for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period in Same Day Funds in the approximate amount of the Eurocurrency Rate Loan being made, continued or converted by Wells Fargo Bank and with a term equivalent to such Interest Period would be offered by Wells Fargo Bank's London Branch (or other Wells Fargo Bank branch or Affiliate) to major banks in the London or other offshore interbank market for such currency at their request at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
Eurocurrency Rate
BBA LIBOR
     "" means a Loan that bears interest at a rate based on the Eurocurrency Rate (other than a Base Rate Loan).
Eurocurrency Rate Loan
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Event of Default
Section 8.01
     "" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of any Borrower hereunder, (a) taxes imposed on or measured by its overall net income (however denominated), and franchise taxes imposed on it (in lieu of net income taxes), by the jurisdiction (or any political subdivision thereof) under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable Lending Office is located; (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which such Borrower is located; (c) except as provided in the following sentence, in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by Anixter under ), any United States withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party hereto (or designates a new Lending Office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure or inability (other than as a result of a Change in Law) to comply with or , except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new Lending Office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the applicable Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to ; and (d) taxes imposed under FATCA. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this definition, "Excluded Taxes" shall not include any withholding tax imposed at any time on payments made by or on account of a Foreign Obligor hereunder or under any other Loan Document, provided that such recipient shall have complied with and .
Excluded Taxes
Section 10.13
Section 3.01(e)
Section 3.01(h)
Section 3.01(a)
Section 3.01(e)
Section 3.01(h)
     "" means that certain Amended and Restated Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 20, 2007, among Anixter, certain of the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the lenders party thereto and Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
     "" means the Indebtedness of Anixter and any of its Subsidiaries reflected on , but in any event excluding the Indebtedness evidenced by the Revolving Subordinated Note.
Existing Indebtedness
Schedule 7.01(b)
     "" means the standby letters of credit existing on the Closing Date, issued under the Existing Credit Agreement and listed on .
Existing Letters of Credit
Schedule 2.06
 
     "" means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the date of this Agreement, and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
     "" means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Business Day next succeeding such day; that (a) if such day is not a Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day, and (b) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate (rounded upward, if necessary, to a whole multiple of 1/100 of 1%) charged to Wells Fargo Bank on such day on such transactions as determined by the Administrative Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
provided
     "" means, with respect to any Person, any of the chief financial officer, controller or treasurer of such Person and, with respect to Anixter shall include its Vice President-Finance and the Assistant Treasurer.
Financial Officer
     "" means a 13-week (or, as the case may be, periodically a 14-week) accounting period of the Borrowers ending on or about March 31, June 30, September 30 or December 31 of any Fiscal Year.
Fiscal Quarter
     "" means the fiscal year of the Borrowers, which shall be the annual accounting period of the Borrowers ending on the Friday closest to December 31 of each year.
Fiscal Year
     "" means Fitch Ratings and any successor thereto.
Fitch
     "" means (a) Euro, (b) British Pound Sterling, (c) Canadian Dollars and (d) any other currency (other than US Dollars) which may be requested by Anixter and approved in accordance with .
Foreign Currency
Section 1.04(c)
     "" means, at any time, with respect to any amount denominated in US Dollars, the equivalent amount thereof in the applicable Foreign Currency as determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, at such time based on the Spot Rate (determined in respect of the most recent Revaluation Date) for the purchase of such Foreign Currency with US Dollars.
Foreign Currency Equivalent
     "" means a Swing Line Loan made in a Foreign Currency.
Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan
     "" means any plan, program, policy, agreement or contract maintained or contributed to or for the benefit of employees or Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate which is governed by the laws of a jurisdiction outside the United States.
Foreign Employee Benefit Plan
     "" means, with respect to any Borrower, any Lender or L/C Issuer that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which such Borrower is resident for tax purposes. For purposes of this definition, (a) the United States, each state thereof and the District of Columbia and (b) Canada and each province and territory thereof shall be deemed, collectively, to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
     "" means a Loan Party that is not a US Person.
Foreign Obligor
 
     "" means any pension plan or other deferred compensation plan, program or arrangement maintained or contributed to or for the benefit of employees of Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate, which, under the applicable local law, is required to be funded through a trust or other funding vehicle and which is governed by the laws of a jurisdiction outside the United States.
Foreign Pension Plan
     "" means Anixter Puerto Rico, Inc., Anixter Venezuela Inc., Anixter Thailand Inc., Anixter Philippines Inc. and any of Anixter's Subsidiaries which are incorporated in any jurisdiction outside of the United States, and their respective successors and assigns.
Foreign Subsidiaries
     "" means, at any time there is a Defaulting Lender, (a) with respect to the L/C Issuer, such Defaulting Lender's Pro Rata Share of the outstanding L/C Obligations with respect to Letters of Credit issued by the L/C Issuer other than L/C Obligations as to which such Defaulting Lender's participation obligation has been reallocated to other Lenders or Cash Collateralized in accordance with the terms hereof and (b) with respect to the Swing Line Lender, such Defaulting Lender's Pro Rata Share of outstanding Swing Line Loans made by the Swing Line Lender other than Swing Line Loans as to which such Defaulting Lender's participation obligation has been reallocated to other Lenders.
Fronting Exposure
     "" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is (or will be) engaged in making, purchasing, holding or otherwise investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its activities.
Fund
     "" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or such other principles as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States, that are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
GAAP
     "" means any nation or government, any state, any province, any territory, any municipality or other political subdivision thereof, any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, administrative tribunal, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government, and any corporation or other entity owned or controlled, through stock or capital ownership or otherwise, by any of the foregoing.
Governmental Authority
     "" means (a) Anixter, AXE and each Domestic Subsidiary, and (b) each Subsidiary that becomes a Guarantor as provided in .
Guarantors
Section 6.11
     "" means the Guaranty made by the Guarantors in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, which shall be in form and substance acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Guaranty
     "" means interest rate, foreign currency or commodity exchange, swap, collar, cap, option, forward, futures or similar agreements entered into by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to which Anixter or such Subsidiary has hedged its interest rate, foreign currency or commodity exposure.
Hedging Contracts
     "" means Her Majesty's Revenue and Customs.
HMRC
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Honor Date
Section 2.06(c)(i)
 
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Incremental Term Loan
Section 2.17(a)
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Incremental Term Loan Commitment
Section 2.17(a)
     "" means, as to any Person at a particular time, all of the following (without duplication):
Indebtedness
     (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money and all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, loan agreements or other similar instruments;
     (b) any direct or contingent obligations of such Person arising under letters of credit (including standby and commercial), banker's acceptances, bank guaranties, surety bonds and similar instruments;
     (c) net obligations under any Hedging Contract in an amount equal to (i) if such Hedging Contract has been closed out, the termination value thereof, or (ii) if such Hedging Contract has not been closed out, the mark-to-market value thereof determined on the basis of readily available quotations provided by any recognized dealer in such Hedging Contract;
     (d) whether or not so included as liabilities in accordance with GAAP, all obligations of such Person to pay the deferred purchase price of property or services, and indebtedness (excluding prepaid interest thereon) secured by a Lien on property owned or being purchased by such Person (including indebtedness arising under conditional sales or other title retention agreements), whether or not such indebtedness shall have been assumed by such Person or is limited in recourse;
     (e) Capital Leases and Synthetic Lease Obligations;
     (f) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of such Person in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction; and
     (g) all Accommodation Obligations of such Person in respect of any of the foregoing.
     For all purposes hereof, the Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any partnership or joint venture in which such Person is a general partner or a joint venturer, unless such Indebtedness is expressly made non-recourse to such Person except for customary exceptions acceptable to the Required Lenders. The amount of any Capital Lease or Synthetic Lease Obligation as of any date shall be deemed to be the amount of Attributable Indebtedness in respect thereof as of such date.
     "" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Indemnitees
Section 10.04(b)
     "" means, (a) as to any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan or Canadian Dollar Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable to such Loan and the Maturity Date; , however, that if any Interest Period for a Eurocurrency Rate Loan exceeds three months, the respective dates that fall every three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be Interest Payment Dates; and (b) as to any Base Rate Loan (including a Swing Line Loan) or any Canadian Dollar Loan, the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December and the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
provided
 
     "" means as to each Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the period commencing on the date such Eurocurrency Rate Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a Eurocurrency Rate Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, as selected by the related Borrower in its Borrowing Notice; that, in each case:
Interest Period
provided
     (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day;
     (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and
     (c) no Interest Period shall extend beyond the Maturity Date.
     "" has the meaning assigned to that term in .
Investment
Section 7.03
     "" means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
     "" means, with respect to any Letter of Credit, the "International Standby Practices 1998" published by the Institute of International Banking Law & Practice, Inc. (or such later version thereof as may be in effect at the time of issuance).
ISP
     "" means with respect to any Letter of Credit, the Letter of Credit Application and any other document, agreement and instrument entered into by the L/C Issuer and Anixter (or any Subsidiary) or in favor of the L/C Issuer and relating to such Letter of Credit.
Issuer Documents
     "" means the separate fee letter agreement dated March 17, 2011 among Anixter, Wells Fargo Bank, Bank of America, N.A., JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and the Joint Lead Arrangers.
Joint Fee Letter
     "" means Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, in their capacities as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, and each of their respective successors.
Joint Lead Arrangers
     "" means, collectively, all international, foreign, Federal, state, provincial, territorial and local statutes, treaties, rules, guidelines, regulations, ordinances, codes and administrative or judicial precedents or authorities, including the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority charged with the enforcement, interpretation or administration thereof, and all applicable administrative orders, directed duties, requests, licenses, authorizations and permits of, and agreements with, any Governmental Authority, in each case whether or not having the force of law.
Laws
     "" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's funding of its participation in any L/C Borrowing in accordance with its Pro Rata Share.
L/C Advance
     "" means an extension of credit resulting from a drawing under any Letter of Credit which has not been reimbursed on the date when made or refinanced as a Committed Borrowing of Loans.
L/C Borrowing
     "" means, with respect to any Letter of Credit, the issuance thereof or extension of the expiry date thereof, or the increase of the amount thereof.
L/C Credit Extension
 
     "" means Wells Fargo Bank, in its capacity as issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, or any successor issuer thereto; that "L/C Issuer" shall include Bank of America, N.A., in its capacity as issuer of, and solely for purposes of, the Existing Letters of Credit.
L/C Issuer
provided
     "" means, as at any date of determination, the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit plus the aggregate of all Unreimbursed Amounts, including all L/C Borrowings. For all purposes of this Agreement, if on any date of determination a Letter of Credit has expired by its terms but any amount may still be drawn thereunder by reason of the operation of Rule 3.14 of the ISP, such Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be "outstanding" in the amount so remaining available to be drawn. For purposes of computing the amount available to be drawn under any Letter of Credit, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be determined in accordance with .
L/C Obligations
Section 1.07
     "" has the meaning specified in the introductory paragraph hereto and includes, as the context requires, the Swing Line Lender. Each reference to any Lender shall be deemed to include such Lender's Applicable Designee. Notwithstanding the designation by any Lender of an Applicable Designee, the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent shall be permitted to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, and no such designation shall relieve any such Lender of its obligations hereunder.
Lender
     "" means, as to any Lender, the office or offices of such Lender described in such Lender's Administrative Questionnaire, or such other office or offices as a Lender may from time to time notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent.
Lending Office
     "" means any standby letter of credit issued hereunder and any Existing Letter of Credit. Letters of Credit may be issued in an Available Currency.
Letter of Credit
     "" means an application and agreement for the issuance or amendment of a Letter of Credit in the form from time to time in use by the L/C Issuer.
Letter of Credit Application
     "" means the day that is seven days prior to the Maturity Date then in effect (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day).
Letter of Credit Expiration Date
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Letter of Credit Fee
Section 2.06(i)
     "" means an amount equal to the lesser of (a) US$50,000,000 and (b) the Aggregate Commitments. The Letter of Credit Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
Letter of Credit Sublimit
     "" means, as of any date of determination, for Anixter and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis and in accordance with , the ratio of (a) Consolidated Funded Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of the four Fiscal Quarters ending on or immediately prior to such date, that, for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated on a pro forma basis (in accordance with Article 11 of Regulation S-X of the Commission) to the extent necessary to give effect to (i) any acquisition made by Anixter or any Subsidiary during such period (without giving effect to any increase in Consolidated EBITDA reflecting projected synergies resulting from such acquisition) so long as, and to the extent that, (A) Anixter delivers to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly deliver to each Lender) a summary in reasonable detail of the underlying assumptions, and the calculations made, in computing Consolidated EBITDA on a pro forma basis and (B) the Required Lenders do not object to such assumptions and/or calculations within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof; and (ii) any divestiture of a Subsidiary, division or other operating unit made during such period.
Leverage Ratio
Section 7.18
provided
 
     "" means all liabilities, claims, obligations, responsibilities, losses, damages, punitive damages, consequential damages, treble damages, charges, costs and expenses (including, without limitation, attorneys', experts' and consulting fees and costs of investigation and feasibility studies), fines, penalties and monetary sanctions, interest, direct or indirect, known or unknown, absolute or contingent, past, present or future.
Liabilities and Costs
     "" means any mortgage, pledge, hypothecation, assignment, deposit arrangement, encumbrance, lien (statutory or other), Environmental Lien, Enforceable Judgment, charge, or preference, priority or other security interest or preferential arrangement of any kind or nature whatsoever (including any conditional sale or other title retention agreement, the interest of a lessor under a Capital Lease, any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing, and the filing of any financing statement under the Uniform Commercial Code or comparable Laws of any jurisdiction), including the interest of a purchaser of accounts receivable.
Lien
     "" means an extension of credit by a Lender to a Borrower under in the form of a Committed Loan (including a British Pound Sterling Loan and a Canadian Dollar Loan) or a Swing Line Loan.
Loan
Article II
     "" means this Agreement, each Note, the Guaranty, the Agent Fee Letter, the Joint Fee Letter, each Borrowing Notice, each Issuer Document, each Compliance Certificate and each Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement.
Loan Documents
     "" means, collectively, the Borrowers and the Guarantors.
Loan Parties
     "" means, with respect to any period, the percentage rate per annum determined in accordance with .
Mandatory Cost
Schedule 1.01(b)
     "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Regulation U.
Margin Stock
     "" means (a) a material adverse change in, or a material adverse effect upon, the operations, assets, liabilities (actual or contingent), business, properties, financial condition or prospects of AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole; (b) a material impairment of the ability of the Loan Parties (taken as a whole) to perform the obligations of all Loan Parties under any Loan Document to which it is a party; or (c) a material adverse effect upon the legality, validity, binding effect or enforceability against any Loan Party of any Loan Document to which it is a party or the rights and remedies of the Lenders under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
     "" means any sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance or other disposition of (a) assets of any member of the Consolidated Group or (b) capital stock of any member of the Consolidated Group which, when combined with all such other sales, assignments, transfers, conveyances or other dispositions in the immediately preceding twelve-month period represents the disposition of an amount which is greater than ten percent (10.0%) of the Consolidated Group's (x) assets or (y) revenues.
Material Transaction
     "" means the earlier of (a) April 8, 2016 and (b) such earlier date upon which the Commitments may be terminated in accordance with the terms hereof.
Maturity Date
     "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and any successor thereto.
Moody's
     "" means a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA which is, or within the immediately preceding six (6) years was, contributed to by Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate.
Multiemployer Plan
 
     "" means, at any time, each Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender at such time.
Non-Defaulting Lender
     "" means a Lender that is not a US Person.
Non-US Lender
     "" means, collectively, the Committed Loan Notes and the Swing Line Loan Note.
Notes
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Notice Date
Section 3.06(d)
     "" means a notice, substantially in the form of , of the deposit account(s) of the Borrowers.
Notice of Account Designation
Exhibit B
     "" means all advances to, and debts, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of, any Loan Party arising under any Loan Document or otherwise with respect to any Loan or Letter of Credit, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest that accrues after the commencement by or against any Loan Party or any Affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Laws naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding.
Obligations
     "" means, as to any corporation, a certificate executed on behalf of such corporation by a Financial Officer of such corporation.
Officer's Certificate
     "" means, as applied to any Person, any lease of any Property by that Person as lessee which is not a Capital Lease.
Operating Lease
     "" means, (a) with respect to any corporation, the certificate or articles of incorporation and the bylaws (or equivalent or comparable constitutive documents with respect to any non-US jurisdiction), (b) with respect to any limited liability company, the certificate, memorandum and articles of association or articles of formation or organization and operating agreement, and (c) with respect to any partnership, joint venture, trust or other form of business entity, the partnership, joint venture or other applicable agreement of formation or organization and any agreement, instrument, filing or notice with respect thereto filed in connection with its formation or organization with the applicable Governmental Authority in the jurisdiction of its formation or organization and, if applicable, any certificate or articles of formation or organization of such entity, in each case as amended from time to time.
Organization Documents
     "" means all present or future stamp, court or documentary, intangible, recording, filing taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or under any other Loan Document or from the execution, delivery, performance, enforcement or registration of, from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement or any other Loan Document.
Other Taxes
     "" means (a) with respect to Committed Loans and Swing Line Loans on any date, the aggregate outstanding principal Dollar Equivalent thereof after giving effect to any borrowings and prepayments or repayments of Committed Loans and Swing Line Loans, as the case may be, occurring on such date and (b) with respect to any L/C Obligations on any date, the Dollar Equivalent of the aggregate outstanding amount of such L/C Obligations on such date after giving effect to any L/C Credit Extension occurring on such date and any other changes in the aggregate amount of the L/C Obligations as of such date, including as a result of any reimbursements by Anixter of Unreimbursed Amounts.
Outstanding Amount
 
     "" means, for any day, (a) with respect to any amount denominated in US Dollars, the greater of (i) the Federal Funds Rate and (ii) an overnight rate determined by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender, as the case may be, in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation, and (b) with respect to any amount denominated in a Foreign Currency, the rate of interest per annum at which overnight deposits in the applicable Foreign Currency, in an amount approximately equal to the amount with respect to which such rate is being determined, would be offered for such day by a branch or Affiliate of Wells Fargo Bank in the applicable offshore interbank market for such currency to major banks in such interbank market.
Overnight Rate
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Participant
Section 10.06(d)
     "" means each state so described in any EMU Legislation.
Participating Member State
     "" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.
PBGC
     "" means any "employee pension benefit plan" (as such term is defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), other than a Multiemployer Plan, that is subject to Title IV of ERISA and is sponsored or maintained by Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate or to which Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate contributes or has an obligation to contribute, or in the case of a multiple employer plan (as described in Section 4064(a) of ERISA) has made contributions at any time during the immediately preceding five plan years.
Pension Plan
     "" means any permit, approval, consent, authorization, license, variance, or permission required from a Governmental Authority under an applicable Requirement of Law.
Permits
     "" means the Liens on any property of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter, in each case reflected on .
Permitted Existing Liens
Schedule 7.02(b)
     "" means any individual, trustee, corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated organization, bank, business association, firm, joint venture, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
     "" means an employee benefit plan defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA in respect of which either Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate is, or within the immediately preceding six (6) years was, an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Platform
Section 6.01
     "" means a professional market party as defined in the Dutch Financial Supervision Act ("").
PMP
Wet op het financieel toezicht
     "" means, at any time, the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by the Administrative Agent as its prime rate. Each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective as of the opening of business on the day such change in such prime rate occurs. The parties hereto acknowledge that the rate announced publicly by the Administrative Agent as its prime rate is an index or base rate and shall not necessarily be its lowest or best rate charged to its customers or other banks.
Prime Rate
     "" means, as to any Lender, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) that such Lender's Commitment comprises of the Aggregate Commitments, as such share may be adjusted as contemplated herein.
Pro Rata Share
 
     "" means with respect to any Person, any real or personal property, plant, building, facility, structure, equipment or unit, or other asset (tangible or intangible) owned, leased or operated by such Person.
Property
     "" means a special purpose entity that is a Subsidiary established for a Receivables Securitization Transaction.
Receivables Securitization SPV
     "" means any sale, assignment or other transfer by Anixter or any Subsidiary of accounts receivable, lease receivables or other payment obligations owing to Anixter or such Subsidiary or any interest in any of the foregoing, together in each case with any collections and other proceeds thereof, any collection or deposit accounts related thereto, and any collateral, guaranties or other property or claims in favor of Anixter or such Subsidiary supporting or securing payment by the obligor thereon of, or otherwise related to, any such receivables.
Receivables Securitization Transaction
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Register
Section 10.06(c)
     "" means Regulation T, U or X, respectively, of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System as from time to time in effect and any successor to all or a portion thereof.
Regulation T, U or X
     "" means, with respect to any Person, such Person's Affiliates and the partners, directors, officers, employees, agents, representatives and advisors of such Person and of such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
     "" means any release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, injection, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration from any Property into the indoor or outdoor environment, including the movement of Contaminants through or in the air, soil, surface water, groundwater or Property.
Release
     "" means any action required to (a) clean up, remove, treat or in any other way address Contaminants in the indoor or outdoor environment; (b) prevent a Release or threat of Release or minimize the further Release of Contaminants so they do not migrate or endanger or threaten to endanger public health or welfare or the indoor or outdoor environment; or (c) perform pre-remedial studies and investigations or post-remedial monitoring and care.
Remedial Action
     "" means, for any period, the total rental expense for Operating Leases of the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Rental Expense
     "" means any of the events set forth in Section 4043 of ERISA (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived).
Reportable Event
     "" means as of any date of determination, Lenders whose Voting Percentages aggregate more than 50%; that the Voting Percentages held or deemed held by each Defaulting Lender shall be excluded for purposes of determining Required Lenders at any time.
Required Lenders
provided
     "" means, as to any Person, the Organization Documents or other organizational or governing documents of such Person, and any law, rule or regulation, Permit, or determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to or binding upon such Person or any of its Property or to which such Person or any of its property is subject, including, without limitation, the Securities Act, the Securities Exchange Act, Regulation T, Regulation U
Requirements of Law
 
and Regulation X, and any certificate of occupancy, zoning ordinance, building, environmental or land use, law, rule, regulation, ordinance or Permit or occupational safety or health law, rule or regulation.
     "" means the president, chief financial officer, treasurer or assistant treasurer of a Loan Party or such other person designated as such by any of the foregoing officers or competent corporate body(ies) of such Loan Party. Any document delivered hereunder that is signed by a Responsible Officer of a Loan Party shall be conclusively presumed to have been authorized by all necessary corporate, partnership and/or other action on the part of such Loan Party and such Responsible Officer shall be conclusively presumed to have acted on behalf of such Loan Party.
Responsible Officer
     "" means (a) with respect to any Loan, each of the following: (i) each date of a Borrowing of a Loan denominated in a Foreign Currency, (ii) each date of a continuation of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan denominated in a Foreign Currency pursuant to , and (iii) such additional dates as the Administrative Agent shall determine or the Required Lenders shall require, and (b) with respect to any Letter of Credit, each of the following: (i) each date of issuance of a Letter of Credit denominated in a Foreign Currency, (ii) each date of an amendment of any such Letter of Credit having the effect of increasing the amount thereof (solely with respect to the increased amount), (iii) each date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under any Letter of Credit denominated in a Foreign Currency, and (iv) such additional dates as the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer shall determine or the Required Lenders shall require.
Revaluation Date
Section 2.02
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Revolving Commitment Increase
Section 2.17(a)
     "" means the demand promissory note from Anixter to AXE dated October 6, 2000, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented.
Revolving Subordinated Note
     "" means Standard & Poor's Financial Services, LLC and any successor thereto.
S&P
     "" means (a) with respect to disbursements and payments in US Dollars, immediately available funds and (b) with respect to disbursements and payments in a Foreign Currency, same day or other funds as may be determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, to be customary in the place of disbursement or payment for the settlement of international banking transactions in such Foreign Currency.
Same Day Funds
     "" means Samuel Zell or any of his affiliates (as such term is defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act) or associates (as such term is defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act), and his heirs and beneficiaries.
Samuel Zell Group
     "" means the Securities Act of 1933.
Securities Act
     "" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Securities Exchange Act
     "" means, when used with respect to any Person, that at the time of determination:
Solvent
     (a) the fair value of its assets (both at fair valuation and at present fair saleable value) is equal to or in excess of the total amount of its liabilities, including, without limitation, contingent liabilities; and
     (b) it is then able and expected to be able to pay its debts as they mature; and
 
     (c) it has capital sufficient to carry on its business as conducted and as proposed to be conducted.
     With respect to contingent liabilities (such as litigation, guarantees and pension plan liabilities), such liabilities shall be computed at the amount which, in light of all the facts and circumstances existing at the time, represent the amount which can reasonably be expected to become an actual or matured liability.
     "" for a currency means the rate determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as applicable, to be the rate quoted by the Person acting in such capacity as the spot rate for the purchase by such Person of such currency with another currency through its principal foreign exchange trading office at approximately 11:00 a.m. on the date two Business Days prior to the date as of which the foreign exchange computation is made; that the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer may obtain such spot rate from another financial institution designated by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer if the Person acting in such capacity does not have as of the date of determination a spot buying rate for any such currency; and that the L/C Issuer may use such spot rate quoted on the date as of which the foreign exchange computation is made in the case of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Available Currency (other than US Dollars).
Spot Rate
provided
provided
further
     "" of a Person means a corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other business entity of which a majority of the shares of securities or other interests having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body (other than securities or interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency) are at the time beneficially directly or indirectly owned by such Person. Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to a "Subsidiary" or to "Subsidiaries" shall refer to a Subsidiary or Subsidiaries of Anixter.
Subsidiary
     "" means a borrowing of a Swing Line Loan pursuant to .
Swing Line Borrowing
Section 2.03
     "" means Wells Fargo Bank in its capacity as provider of Swing Line Loans, or any successor swing line lender hereunder.
Swing Line Lender
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Swing Line Loan
Section 2.03(a)
     "" means a promissory note made by the Borrowers in favor of the Swing Line Lender evidencing Swing Line Loans made by such Swing Line Lender, substantially in the form of .
Swing Line Loan Note
Exhibit D-2
     "" means an amount equal to the lesser of (a) US$15,000,000 and (b) the Aggregate Commitments. The Swing Line Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Aggregate Commitments.
Swing Line Sublimit
     "" means the monetary obligation of a Person under (a) a so-called synthetic, off-balance sheet or tax retention lease, or (b) an agreement for the use or possession of property creating obligations that do not appear on the balance sheet of such Person but which, upon the insolvency or bankruptcy of such Person, would be characterized as the indebtedness of such Person (without regard to accounting treatment).
Synthetic Lease Obligation
     "" means any day on which the Trans-European Automated Real-time Gross Settlement Express Transfer (TARGET) payment system (or, if such payment system ceases to be operative, such other payment system (if any) determined by the Administrative Agent to be a suitable replacement) is open for the settlement of payments in Euro.
TARGET Day
 
     "" means a confirmation by a Lender that the person beneficially entitled to interest payable to that Lender in respect of an advance under a Loan Document is:
Tax Confirmation
     (a) a company resident in the UK for UK tax purposes; or
     (b) a partnership each member of which is (i) a company resident in the UK or (ii) a company not so resident in the UK which carries on a trade in the UK through a permanent establishment and which brings into account in computing its chargeable profits (within the meaning of section 19 of the Corporation Tax Act 2009) the whole of any share of interest payable in respect of that advance that falls to it by reason of Part 17 of the Corporation Tax Act 2009; or
     (c) a company not so resident in the UK which carries on a trade in the UK through a permanent establishment and which brings into account interest payable in respect of that advance in computing the chargeable profits (for the purposes of section 19 of the Corporation Tax Act 2009) of that company.
     "" means all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, withholdings, assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
     "" means a (a) Reportable Event with respect to any Benefit Plan; (b) the withdrawal of Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate from a Benefit Plan during a plan year in which Anixter or such ERISA Affiliate was a "substantial employer" as defined in Section 4001(a)(2) of ERISA; (c) the imposition of an obligation of Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate under Section 4041 of ERISA to provide affected parties written notice of intent to terminate a Benefit Plan in a distress termination described in Section 4041(c) of ERISA; (d) the institution by the PBGC or any similar foreign governmental authority of proceedings to terminate a Benefit Plan or a Foreign Pension Plan, (e) any event or condition which might constitute grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Benefit Plan; (f) a foreign governmental authority shall appoint or institute proceedings to appoint a trustee to administer any Foreign Pension Plan; or (g) the partial or complete withdrawal of Anixter of any ERISA Affiliate from a Multiemployer Plan or a Foreign Pension Plan.
Termination Event
     "" means at any time the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Committed Loans, all Swing Line Loans and all L/C Obligations.
Total Outstandings
     "" means the reasonable fees, costs and expenses payable by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant hereto or in connection herewith or in respect hereof or of the other Loan Documents.
Transaction Costs
     "" means the Loan Documents and the Revolving Subordinated Note.
Transaction Documents
     "" means a Lender that (a) is treated as a resident of a Treaty State for the purposes of the Treaty and (b) does not carry on business in the UK through a permanent establishment with which such Lender's Commitment or participation in any Loan is effectively connected.
Treaty Lender
     "" means a jurisdiction having a double taxation agreement (a "") with the UK that provides for full or reduced exemption from tax imposed by the UK on interest.
Treaty State
Treaty
     "" means (a) with respect to a Committed Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan, a Eurocurrency Rate Loan or a Loan bearing interest at the Canadian Prime Rate, and as a Loan in the same
Type
 
Available Currency and (b) with respect to a Swing Line Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan.
     "" means the United Kingdom.
UK
     "" means (a) any Borrower that is incorporated in the UK and (b) any Subsidiary with respect to which written notice is given (whether by Anixter or such Borrower) to the Administrative Agent prior to such Subsidiary becoming a Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder that such Subsidiary is resident in the UK for UK tax purposes.
UK Borrower
     "" has the meaning specified in .
UK Tax Deduction
Section 3.01(a)
     "" means the Income Tax Act 2007 of the UK.
UK Taxes Act
     "" means a Lender which is beneficially entitled to interest payable to that Lender in respect of an advance under a Loan Document and is:
UK Qualifying Lender
     (a) a Lender (i) which is a bank (as defined for the purpose of section 879 of the UK Taxes Act) making an advance under a Loan Document, or (ii) in respect of an advance made under a Loan Document by a Person that was a bank (as defined for the purpose of section 879 of the UK Taxes Act) at the time that such advance was made, and which, in either case, is within the charge to UK corporation tax as respects any payments of interest made in respect of that advance; or
     (b) a Lender which is (i) a company resident in the UK for UK tax purposes; (ii) a partnership each member of which is (A) a company resident in the UK or (B) a company not so resident in the UK which carries on a trade in the UK through a permanent establishment and which brings into account in computing its chargeable profits (within the meaning of section 19 of the Corporation Tax Act 2009) the whole of any share of interest payable in respect of that advance that falls to it by reason of Part 17 of the Corporation Tax Act 2009; or (iii) a company not so resident in the UK which carries on a trade in the UK through a permanent establishment and which brings into account interest payable in respect of that advance in computing the chargeable profits (for the purposes of section 19 of the Corporation Tax Act 2009) of that company; or
     (c) a Treaty Lender with respect to a UK Borrower; or
     (d) a building society (as defined for the purposes of the UK Taxes Act) making an advance under a Loan Document.
     "" or "" means the United States of America.
United States
US
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Unreimbursed Amount
Section 2.06(c)(i)
     "" means any Borrower that is a US Person.
US Borrower
     "" or "" means dollars constituting legal tender for the payment of public and private debts in the United States.
US Dollars
US$
     "" means any Person that is a "United States Person" as defined in section 7701(a)(30) of the Code.
US Person
 
     "" means, as to any Lender, (a) at any time when the Commitments are in effect, such Lender's Pro Rata Share and (b) at any time on or after the termination of the Commitments, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) of which (i) the sum of (A) the Outstanding Amount of such Lender's Committed Loans plus (B) such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of Swing Line Loans and L/C Obligations then constitutes of (ii) the Total Outstandings.
Voting Percentage
     "" means Wells Fargo Bank, National Association and its successors.
Wells Fargo Bank
     1.02 . With reference to this Agreement and each other Loan Document, unless otherwise specified herein or in such other Loan Document:
Other Interpretive Provisions
     (a) The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "," "" and "" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation." The word "" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "." Unless the context requires otherwise, (i) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document (including any Organization Document) shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein or in any other Loan Document), (ii) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (iii) the words "," "" and "," and words of similar import when used in any Loan Document, shall be construed to refer to such Loan Document in its entirety and not to any particular provision thereof, (iv) all references in a Loan Document to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, the Loan Document in which such references appear, (v) any reference to any law shall include all statutory and regulatory provisions consolidating, amending replacing or interpreting such law and any reference to any law or regulation shall, unless otherwise specified, refer to such law or regulation as amended, modified or supplemented from time to time, and (vi) the words "" and "" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
include
includes
including
will
shall
herein
hereof
hereunder
asset
property
     (b) The term "" includes any and all instruments, documents, agreements, certificates, notices, reports, financial statements and other writings, however evidenced.
documents
     (c) In the computation of periods of time from a specified date to a later specified date, the word "" means ""; the words "" and "" each mean ""; and the word "" means "."
from
from and including
to
until
to but excluding
through
to and including
     (d) Section headings herein and the other Loan Documents are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document.
     1.03 . All accounting terms not specifically or completely defined herein shall be construed in conformity with, and all financial data including financial ratios and other financial calculations required to be submitted pursuant to this Agreement shall be prepared in conformity with, GAAP applied on a consistent basis, as in effect from time to time, applied in a manner consistent with that used in preparing the Audited Financial Statements, except as otherwise specifically prescribed herein. Notwithstanding the foregoing and , for purposes of determining compliance with any covenant (including the computation of any financial covenant) contained herein, Indebtedness of the Borrowers and their respective Subsidiaries shall be deemed to be carried at 100% of
Accounting Terms
subject to Section 7.18
 
the outstanding principal amount thereof, and the effects of FASB ASC 825 and FASB ASC 470-20 on financial liabilities shall be disregarded.
     1.04 .
Exchange Rates; Currency Equivalents; Additional Foreign Currencies
     (a) . The Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as applicable, shall determine the Spot Rates as of each Revaluation Date to be used for calculating Dollar Equivalents of Credit Extensions and Outstanding Amounts denominated in Foreign Currencies. Such Spot Rates shall become effective as of such Revaluation Date and shall be the Spot Rates employed in converting any amounts between the applicable currencies until the next Revaluation Date to occur.
Exchange Rates
     (b) . For purposes of the Loan Documents (i) and for purposes of financial statements delivered by Loan Parties hereunder, of calculating financial covenants hereunder or as otherwise provided herein, the applicable amount of any currency (other than US Dollars) shall be such Dollar Equivalent as so determined by the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as applicable and (ii) in connection with a Credit Extension, conversion, continuation or prepayment of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan or the issuance, amendment or extension of a Letter of Credit, an amount, such as a required minimum or multiple amount, is expressed in US Dollars, but such Eurocurrency Rate Loan or Letter of Credit is denominated in a Foreign Currency, such amount shall be the relevant Foreign Currency Equivalent of such US Dollar amount, as determined by Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be.
Currency Equivalents
     (c) . (i) Anixter may from time to time request that Eurocurrency Rate Loans be made and/or Letters of Credit be issued in a currency other than those specifically listed in the definition of "Foreign Currency;" that such requested currency is a lawful currency (other than US Dollars) that is readily available, freely transferable and convertible into US Dollars. In the case of any such request with respect to the making of Eurocurrency Rate Loans, such request shall be subject to the approval of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, and in the case of any such request with respect to the issuance of Letters of Credit, such request shall be subject to the approval of the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer.
Additional Foreign Currencies
provided
     (ii) Any such request shall be made to the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., 20 Business Days prior to the date of the desired Credit Extension (or such other time or date as may be agreed by the Administrative Agent and, in the case of any such request pertaining to Letters of Credit, the L/C Issuer, in its or their sole discretion). In the case of any such request pertaining to Eurocurrency Rate Loans, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender thereof; and in the case of any such request pertaining to Letters of Credit, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the L/C Issuer thereof. Each Lender (in the case of any such request pertaining to Eurocurrency Rate Loans) or the L/C Issuer (in the case of a request pertaining to Letters of Credit) shall notify the Administrative Agent, not later than 11:00 a.m., ten Business Days after receipt of such request whether it consents, in its sole discretion, to the making of Eurocurrency Rate Loans or the issuance of Letters of Credit, as the case may be, in such requested currency.
     (iii) Any failure by a Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, to respond to such request within the time period specified in the preceding sentence shall be deemed to be a refusal by such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, to permit Eurocurrency Rate Loans to be made or Letters of Credit to be issued in such requested currency. If the Administrative Agent and all the Lenders consent to making Eurocurrency Rate Loans in such requested currency, the Administrative Agent shall so notify Anixter and such currency shall thereupon be deemed for all purposes to be a Foreign Currency hereunder for purposes of any Committed Borrowings of Eurocurrency Rate Loans; and if the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer consent to the issuance of Letters of Credit in such requested currency, the Administrative Agent shall so notify Anixter and such currency shall thereupon be deemed for all
 
purposes to be a Foreign Currency hereunder for purposes of any Letter of Credit issuances. If the Administrative Agent shall fail to obtain consent to any request for an additional currency under this Section, the Administrative Agent shall promptly so notify Anixter.
     1.05 .
Change of Currency
     (a) Each obligation of the Borrowers to make a payment denominated in the national currency unit of any member state of the European Union that adopts the Euro as its lawful currency after the date hereof shall be redenominated into Euro at the time of such adoption (in accordance with the EMU Legislation). If, in relation to the currency of any such member state, the basis of accrual of interest expressed in this Agreement in respect of that currency shall be inconsistent with any convention or practice in the London interbank market for the basis of accrual of interest in respect of the Euro, such expressed basis shall be replaced by such convention or practice with effect from the date on which such member state adopts the Euro as its lawful currency; that if any Eurocurrency Rate Loan in the currency of such member state is outstanding immediately prior to such date, such replacement shall take effect, with respect to such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, at the end of the then current Interest Period.
provided
     (b) Each provision of this Agreement shall be subject to such reasonable changes of construction as the Administrative Agent may from time to time specify to be appropriate to reflect the adoption of the Euro by any member state of the European Union and any relevant market conventions or practices relating to the Euro.
     (c) Each provision of this Agreement also shall be subject to such reasonable changes of construction as the Administrative Agent may from time to time specify to be appropriate to reflect a change in currency of any other country and any relevant market conventions or practices relating to the change in currency.
     1.06 . Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to times of day shall be references to Eastern time (daylight or standard, as applicable).
Times of Day
     1.07 . Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to the amount of a Letter of Credit at any time shall be deemed to mean the Dollar Equivalent of the stated amount of such Letter of Credit in effect at such time; , , that with respect to any Letter of Credit that, by its terms or the terms of any Issuer Document related thereto, provides for one or more automatic increases in the stated amount thereof, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be the Dollar Equivalent of the maximum face amount of such Letter of Credit after giving effect to all increases thereof contemplated by such Letter of Credit or the Issuer Documents related thereto, whether or not such maximum face amount is in effect at such time.
Letter of Credit Amounts
provided
however
     1.08 . Any financial ratios required to be maintained by the Borrowers pursuant to this Agreement shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number (with a rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
Rounding
     2.01 . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender severally agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") in (a) any Available Currency (other than Canadian Dollars) to the Borrowers and (b) Canadian Dollars to any Canadian Borrower from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date to the Maturity Date, in an
Committed Loans
Committed Loan
 
aggregate Dollar Equivalent not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of such Lender's Commitment; , , that after giving effect to any Committed Borrowing, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all Swing Line Loans and L/C Obligations, shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment, (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans shall not at any time exceed the British Pound Sterling Sublimit and (iv) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans shall not at any time exceed the Canadian Dollar Sublimit. Within the limits of each Lender's Commitment, the British Pound Sterling Sublimit and the Canadian Dollar Sublimit, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this , prepay under , and reborrow under this . Committed Loans (other than Canadian Dollar Loans) may be Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
provided
however
plus
Section 2.01
Section 2.07
Section 2.01
     2.02 .
Borrowings, Conversions and Continuations of Committed Loans
     (a) Each Committed Borrowing, each conversion of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, and each continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans shall be made upon the applicable Borrower's irrevocable notice to the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., (i) three Business Days prior to the requested date of (A) any Committed Borrowing of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan or a Canadian Dollar Loan, (B) any conversion to or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans and (C) any conversion of Eurocurrency Rate Loans denominated in US Dollars to Base Rate Loans and (ii) on the requested date of any Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans. Each such telephonic notice must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of such Borrower. Each Committed Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans denominated in any Available Currency shall be in a principal Dollar Equivalent of US$5,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$1,000,000 in excess thereof. Each Committed Borrowing of or conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$500,000 or a whole multiple of US$100,000 in excess thereof. Each Borrowing Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify (i) whether a Borrower is requesting a Committed Borrowing, a conversion of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, or a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type, (ii) the requested date of the Committed Borrowing, conversion or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day), (iii) the principal amount of Committed Loans to be borrowed, converted or continued, (iv) the Type (including currency) of Committed Loans to be borrowed or to which existing Committed Loans are to be converted, (v) if applicable, the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto and (vi) the applicable Borrower. If a Borrower fails to (x) specify a currency in a Borrowing Notice requesting a Committed Borrowing, then the Committed Loans so requested shall be made in US Dollars, (y) specify a Type of Committed Loan in a Borrowing Notice or (z) give a timely notice requesting a conversion or continuation, then the applicable Committed Loans, if in US Dollars, shall be made or continued as, or converted to, Base Rate Loans; that in the case of a failure to timely request a continuation of Committed Loans, such Loans shall be continued as Eurocurrency Rate Loans in their original currency with an Interest Period of one month. Any such automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be effective as of the last day of the Interest Period then in effect with respect to the applicable Eurocurrency Rate Loans. If a Borrower requests a Committed Borrowing of, conversion to, or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans in any such Borrowing Notice, but fails to specify an Interest Period, it will be deemed to have specified an Interest Period of one month. No Committed Loan may be converted into or continued as a Committed Loan denominated in a different currency, but instead must be prepaid in the original currency of such Committed Loan and reborrowed in the other currency.
provided
     (b) Following receipt of a Borrowing Notice, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of its Pro Rata Share and currency of the applicable Committed Loans, and if no timely
 
notice of a conversion or continuation is provided by a Borrower the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details of any automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans described in the preceding subsection. In the case of a Committed Borrowing, each applicable Lender shall make the amount of its Committed Loan available to the Administrative Agent in Same Day Funds in the Applicable Currency at the Administrative Agent's Office not later than 1:00 p.m. in the case of any Committed Loan denominated in US Dollars and not later than the Applicable Time specified by the Administrative Agent in the case of any Committed Loan denominated in a Foreign Currency, in each case on the Business Day specified in the applicable Borrowing Notice. Upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in (and, if such Borrowing is the initial Credit Extension, ), the Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received available to the applicable Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by crediting or wiring such funds to the deposit account of the applicable Borrower identified in the most recent Notice of Account Designation delivered by the Borrowers to the Administrative Agent or as may be otherwise agreed upon by the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent from time to time.
Section 4.02
Section 4.01
     (c) Except as otherwise provided herein, a Eurocurrency Rate Loan may be continued or converted only on the last day of the Interest Period for such Eurocurrency Rate Loan. During the existence of a Default or Event of Default, no Committed Loans may be requested as, converted to or continued as Eurocurrency Rate Loans without the consent of the Required Lenders, and the Required Lenders may demand that any or all of the then outstanding (i) Eurocurrency Rate Loans denominated in US Dollars be converted immediately to Base Rate Loans and (ii) Eurocurrency Rate Loans denominated in a Foreign Currency be prepaid or redenominated into US Dollars in the amount of the Dollar Equivalent thereof as Base Rate Loans on the last day of the then current Interest Period with respect thereto and (iii) Canadian Dollar Loans be prepaid or redenominated into US Dollars in the amount of the Dollar Equivalent thereof as Base Rate Loans.
     (d) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify Anixter and the Lenders of the interest rate applicable to any Eurocurrency Rate Loan upon determination of such interest rate. The determination of the Eurocurrency Rate and the Canadian Prime Rate by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error. The Administrative Agent shall notify Anixter and the Lenders of any change in the Prime Rate or the Canadian Prime Rate promptly following the public announcement of such change.
     (e) After giving effect to all Committed Borrowings, all conversions of Committed Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Committed Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than (i) ten Interest Periods in effect with respect to Committed Loans (other than British Pound Sterling Loans) and (ii) seven Interest Periods in effect with respect to British Pound Sterling Loans.
     (f) . For the purposes of the Interest Act (Canada), (i) whenever a rate of interest or fee rate with respect to any Canadian Dollar Loan is calculated on the basis of a year (the "deemed year") that contains fewer days than the actual number of days in the calendar year of calculation, such rate of interest or fee rate shall be expressed as a yearly rate by multiplying such rate of interest or fee rate by the actual number of days in the calendar year of calculation and dividing it by the number of days in the deemed year, (ii) the principle of deemed reinvestment of interest shall not apply to any interest calculation hereunder and (iii) the rates of interest stipulated herein are intended to be nominal rates and not effective rates or yields.
Interest Act (Canada)
     2.03 .
Swing Line Loans
     (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swing Line Lender agrees, in reliance upon the agreements of the other Lenders set forth in this , to make
The Swing Line
Section 2.03
 
loans in US Dollars or at the request of a Borrower, if the Swing Line Lender, in its sole discretion, approves, in any Foreign Currency (each such loan, a "") to the Borrowers from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period in an aggregate Dollar Equivalent not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of the Swing Line Sublimit, notwithstanding the fact that such Swing Line Loans, when aggregated with the Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of Committed Loans and L/C Obligations of the Lender acting as Swing Line Lender, may exceed the amount of such Lender's Commitment; , , that after giving effect to any Swing Line Loan, (i) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, and (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations and Swing Line Loans shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment. Within the foregoing limits, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrowers may borrow under this , prepay under , and reborrow under this . Each Swing Line Loan in US Dollars shall be a Base Rate Loan. Immediately upon the making of a Swing Line Loan, each Lender shall be deemed to, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees to, purchase from the Swing Line Lender a risk participation in such Swing Line Loan in an amount equal to the product of such Lender's Pro Rata Share times the amount of such Swing Line Loan.
Swing Line Loan
provided
however
plus
Section 2.03
Section 2.06
Section 2.03
     (b) . Each Swing Line Borrowing shall be made upon the applicable Borrower's irrevocable notice to the Swing Line Lender and the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Swing Line Lender and the Administrative Agent not later than (x) 1:00 p.m. on the requested borrowing date for all US Dollar Swing Line Loans and (y) the Applicable Time one Business Day prior to the requested date for all Foreign Currency Swing Line Loans, and shall specify (i) the amount to be borrowed, which shall be a minimum of US$500,000, and (ii) the requested borrowing date, which shall be a Business Day. Each such telephonic notice must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Swing Line Lender and the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of the applicable Borrower. Promptly after receipt by the Swing Line Lender of any telephonic Borrowing Notice, the Swing Line Lender will confirm with the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) that the Administrative Agent has also received such Borrowing Notice and, if not, the Swing Line Lender will notify the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) of the contents thereof. Unless the Swing Line Lender has received notice (by telephone or in writing) from the Administrative Agent (including at the request of any Lender) prior to 2:00 p.m. on the date of the proposed Swing Line Borrowing (A) directing the Swing Line Lender not to make such Swing Line Loan as a result of the limitations set forth in the proviso to the first sentence of , or (B) that one or more of the applicable conditions specified in is not then satisfied, then, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the Swing Line Lender will, not later than 3:00 p.m. on the borrowing date specified in such Borrowing Notice, make the amount of its Swing Line Loan available in Same Day Funds to the applicable Borrower either by crediting or wiring such proceeds to the deposit account of the applicable Borrower identified in the most recent Notice of Account Designation delivered by the Borrowers to the Administrative Agent or as may be otherwise agreed upon by the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent from time to time.
Borrowing Procedures
Section 2.03(a)
Article IV
     (c) .
Refinancing of Swing Line Loans
     (i) The Swing Line Lender at any time in its sole and absolute discretion may request, on behalf of the applicable Borrower (which hereby irrevocably authorizes the Swing Line Lender to so request on its behalf), that each Lender make a Base Rate Loan in an amount equal to such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Dollar Equivalent of Swing Line Loans then outstanding. Such request shall be made in writing (which written request shall be deemed to be a Borrowing Notice for purposes hereof) and in accordance with the requirements of , without regard to the minimum and multiples specified therein for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the unutilized portion of the Aggregate Commitments and the conditions set forth in . The Swing Line Lender shall furnish the
Section 2.02
Section 4.02
 
applicable Borrower with a copy of the applicable Borrowing Notice promptly after delivering such notice to the Administrative Agent. Each Lender shall make an amount equal to its Pro Rata Share of the amount specified in such Borrowing Notice available to the Administrative Agent in Same Day Funds for the account of the Swing Line Lender at the Administrative Agent's Office for US Dollar-denominated payments not later than 1:00 p.m. on the day specified in such Borrowing Notice, whereupon, subject to , each Lender that so makes funds available shall be deemed to have made a Base Rate Loan to the applicable Borrower in such amount. The Administrative Agent shall remit the funds so received to the Swing Line Lender.
Section 2.03(c)(ii)
     (ii) If for any reason any Swing Line Loan cannot be refinanced by such a Committed Borrowing in accordance with , the request for Base Rate Loans submitted by the Swing Line Lender as set forth herein shall be deemed to be a request by the Swing Line Lender that each of the Lenders fund its risk participation in the relevant Swing Line Loan and each Lender's payment to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swing Line Lender pursuant to shall be deemed payment in respect of such participation.
Section 2.03(c)(i)
Section 2.03(c)(i)
     (iii) If any Lender fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swing Line Lender any amount required to be paid by such Lender pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this by the time specified in , the Swing Line Lender shall be entitled to recover from such Lender (acting through the Administrative Agent), on demand, such amount with interest thereon for the period from the date such payment is required to the date on which such payment is immediately available to the Swing Line Lender at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect. A certificate of the Swing Line Lender submitted to any Lender (through the Administrative Agent) with respect to any amounts owing under this clause (iii) shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Section 2.03(c)
Section 2.03(c)(i)
     (iv) Each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans or to purchase and fund risk participations in Swing Line Loans pursuant to this shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance, including (A) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against the Swing Line Lender, the applicable Borrower or any other Person for any reason whatsoever, (B) the occurrence or continuance of a Default, or (C) any other occurrence, event or condition, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing; , , that each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans pursuant to this is subject to the conditions set forth in . No such funding of risk participations shall relieve or otherwise impair the obligation of the applicable Borrower to repay Swing Line Loans, together with interest as provided herein.
Section 2.03(c)
provided
however
Section 2.03(c)
Section 4.02
     (d) .
Repayment of Participations
     (i) At any time after any Lender has purchased and funded a risk participation in a Swing Line Loan, if the Swing Line Lender receives any payment on account of such Swing Line Loan, the Swing Line Lender will distribute to such Lender its Pro Rata Share of such payment (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's risk participation was funded) in the same funds as those received by the Swing Line Lender.
     (ii) If any payment received by the Swing Line Lender in respect of principal or interest on any Swing Line Loan is required to be returned by the Swing Line Lender under any of the circumstances described in (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the Swing Line Lender in its discretion), each Lender shall pay to the Swing Line Lender its Pro Rata Share thereof on demand of the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the
Section 10.05
 
date of such demand to the date such amount is returned, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate. The Administrative Agent will make such demand upon the request of the Swing Line Lender. The obligations of the Lenders under this clause shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Agreement.
     (e) . The Swing Line Lender shall be responsible for invoicing the applicable Borrower for interest on the Swing Line Loans. Until each Lender funds its Base Rate Loan or risk participation pursuant to this to refinance such Lender's Pro Rata Share of any Swing Line Loan, interest in respect of such Pro Rata Share shall be solely for the account of the Swing Line Lender.
Interest for Account of Swing Line Lender
Section 2.03
     (f) . The applicable Borrower shall make all payments of principal and interest in respect of the Swing Line Loans directly to the Swing Line Lender.
Payments Directly to Swing Line Lender
     2.04 .
[Intentionally Omitted]
     2.05 .
[Intentionally Omitted]
     2.06 .
Letters of Credit
     (a) .
The Letter of Credit Commitment
     (i) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, (A) the L/C Issuer agrees, in reliance upon the agreements of the Lenders set forth in this , (1) from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date until the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, to issue Letters of Credit denominated in US Dollars or in one or more other Available Currencies for the account of Anixter or its Subsidiaries, and to amend or extend Letters of Credit previously issued by it, in accordance with subsection (b) below, and (2) to honor drawings under the Letters of Credit; and (B) the Lenders severally agree to participate in Letters of Credit issued for the account of Anixter or its Subsidiaries and any drawings thereunder; that after giving effect to any L/C Credit Extension with respect to any Letter of Credit, (x) the Total Outstandings shall not exceed the Aggregate Commitments, (y) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Committed Loans of any Lender, plus such Lender's Pro Rata Share of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations and all Swing Line Loans shall not exceed such Lender's Commitment, and (z) the Outstanding Amount of the L/C Obligations shall not exceed the Letter of Credit Sublimit. Each request by Anixter for the issuance or amendment of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a representation by Anixter that the L/C Credit Extension so requested complies with the conditions set forth in the proviso to the preceding sentence. Within the foregoing limits, and subject to the terms and conditions hereof, Anixter's ability to obtain Letters of Credit shall be fully revolving, and accordingly Anixter may, during the foregoing period, obtain Letters of Credit to replace Letters of Credit that have expired or that have been drawn upon and reimbursed. As of the Closing Date, each of the Existing Letters of Credit shall constitute, for all purposes of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, a Letter of Credit issued and outstanding hereunder.
Section 2.06
provided
     (ii) The L/C Issuer shall not issue any Letter of Credit, if:
     (A) subject to , the expiry date of such requested Letter of Credit would occur more than twelve months after the date of issuance or last extension, unless the Required Lenders have approved such expiry date; or
Section 2.06(b)(iii)
 
     (B) the expiry date of such requested Letter of Credit would occur after the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, unless all the Lenders have approved such expiry date.
          (iii) The L/C Issuer shall not be under any obligation to issue any Letter of Credit if:
     (A) any order, judgment or decree of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator shall by its terms purport to enjoin or restrain the L/C Issuer from issuing such Letter of Credit, or any Law applicable to the L/C Issuer or any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) from any Governmental Authority with jurisdiction over the L/C Issuer shall prohibit, or request that the L/C Issuer refrain from, the issuance of letters of credit generally or such Letter of Credit in particular or shall impose upon the L/C Issuer with respect to such Letter of Credit any restriction, reserve or capital requirement (for which the L/C Issuer is not otherwise compensated hereunder) not in effect on the Closing Date, or shall impose upon the L/C Issuer any unreimbursed loss, cost or expense which was not applicable on the Closing Date and which the L/C Issuer in good faith deems material to it;
     (B) the issuance of such Letter of Credit would violate one or more policies of the L/C Issuer;
     (C) except as otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, such Letter of Credit is in an initial face amount less than US$100,000;
     (D) except as otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, such Letter of Credit is to be denominated in a currency other than US Dollars or another Available Currency;
     (E) the L/C Issuer does not as of the issuance date of such requested Letter of Credit issue Letters of Credit in the requested currency; or
     (F) any other Lender is at such time a Defaulting Lender hereunder, unless the L/C Issuer has entered into satisfactory arrangements (which may include the delivery of Cash Collateral) with Anixter or such Defaulting Lender to eliminate the L/C Issuer's Fronting Exposure (after giving effect to ) with respect to such Defaulting Lender.
Section 3.08(a)(iv)
     (iv) The L/C Issuer shall not amend any Letter of Credit if the L/C Issuer would not be permitted at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its amended form under the terms hereof.
     (v) The L/C Issuer shall be under no obligation to amend any Letter of Credit if (A) the L/C Issuer would have no obligation at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its amended form under the terms hereof, or (B) the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit does not accept the proposed amendment to such Letter of Credit.
     (vi) The L/C Issuer shall act on behalf of the Lenders with respect to any Letters of Credit issued by it and the documents associated therewith, and the L/C Issuer shall have all of the benefits and immunities (A) provided to the Administrative Agent in with respect to any acts taken or omissions suffered by the L/C Issuer in connection with Letters of Credit issued by it or proposed to be issued by it and Issuer Documents pertaining to such Letters of Credit as fully as if the term "Administrative Agent" as used in included the L/C Issuer
Article IX
Article IX
 
with respect to such acts or omissions, and (B) as additionally provided herein with respect to the L/C Issuer.
     (b) .
Procedures for Issuance and Amendment of Letters of Credit; Auto-Extension Letters of Credit
     (i) Each Letter of Credit shall be issued or amended, as the case may be, upon the request of Anixter delivered to the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) in the form of a Letter of Credit Application, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of Anixter. Such Letter of Credit Application must be received by the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent (A) not later than 11:00 a.m. at least two Business Days prior to the proposed issuance date or date of amendment, as the case may be, of any Letter of Credit denominated in US Dollars, and (B) not later than the Applicable Time at least ten Business Days prior to the proposed issuance date or date of amendment, as the case may be, of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Available Currency (other than US Dollars); or in each case such later date and time as the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer may agree in a particular instance in their sole discretion. In the case of a request for an initial issuance of a Letter of Credit, such Letter of Credit Application shall specify in form and detail satisfactory to the L/C Issuer: (A) the proposed issuance date of the requested Letter of Credit (which shall be a Business Day); (B) the amount and currency thereof; (C) the expiry date thereof; (D) the name and address of the beneficiary thereof; (E) the documents to be presented by such beneficiary in case of any drawing thereunder; (F) the full text of any certificate to be presented by such beneficiary in case of any drawing thereunder; and (G) such other matters as the L/C Issuer may require. In the case of a request for an amendment of any outstanding Letter of Credit, such Letter of Credit Application shall specify in form and detail satisfactory to the L/C Issuer (A) the Letter of Credit to be amended; (B) the proposed date of amendment thereof (which shall be a Business Day); (C) the nature of the proposed amendment; and (D) such other matters as the L/C Issuer may require. Additionally, Anixter shall furnish to the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent such other documents and information pertaining to such requested Letter of Credit issuance or amendment, including any Issuer Documents, as the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent may require.
     (ii) Promptly after receipt of any Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer will confirm with the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) that the Administrative Agent has received a copy of such Letter of Credit Application from Anixter and, if not, the L/C Issuer will provide the Administrative Agent with a copy thereof. Unless the L/C Issuer has received written notice from any Lender, the Administrative Agent or any Loan Party, at least one Business Day prior to the requested date of issuance or amendment of the applicable Letter of Credit, that one or more applicable conditions contained in shall not then be satisfied, then, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the L/C Issuer shall, on the requested date, issue a Letter of Credit for the account of Anixter (or the applicable Subsidiary) or enter into the applicable amendment, as the case may be, in each case in accordance with the L/C Issuer's usual and customary business practices. Immediately upon the issuance of each Letter of Credit, each Lender shall be deemed to, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees to, purchase from the L/C Issuer a risk participation in such Letter of Credit in an amount equal to the product of such Lender's Pro Rata Share times the amount of such Letter of Credit.
Article IV
     (iii) If Anixter so requests in any applicable Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer may, in its sole and absolute discretion, agree to issue a Letter of Credit that has automatic extension provisions (each, an ""); that any such Auto-Extension Letter of Credit must permit the L/C Issuer to prevent any such extension at least once in each twelve-month period (commencing with the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit) by
Auto-Extension Letter of Credit
provided
 
giving prior notice to the beneficiary thereof not later than a day (the "") in each such twelve-month period to be agreed upon at the time such Letter of Credit is issued. Unless otherwise directed by the L/C Issuer, Anixter shall not be required to make a specific request to the L/C Issuer for any such extension. Once an Auto-Extension Letter of Credit has been issued, the Lenders shall be deemed to have authorized (but may not require) the L/C Issuer to permit the extension of such Letter of Credit at any time to an expiry date not later than the Letter of Credit Expiration Date; , , that the L/C Issuer shall not permit any such extension if (A) the L/C Issuer has determined that it would not be permitted, or would have no obligation, at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its revised form (as extended) under the terms hereof (by reason of the provisions of clauses (ii) or (iii) of or otherwise), or (B) it has received notice (which may be by telephone or in writing) on or before the day that is five Business Days before the Non-Extension Notice Date (1) from the Administrative Agent that the Required Lenders have elected not to permit such extension or (2) from the Administrative Agent, any Lender or Anixter that one or more of the applicable conditions specified in is not then satisfied, and in each such case directing the L/C Issuer not to permit such extension.
Non-Extension Notice Date
provided
however
Section 2.06(a)
Section 4.02
     (iv) If Anixter so requests in any applicable Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer may, in its sole and absolute discretion, agree to issue a Letter of Credit that permits the automatic reinstatement of all or a portion of the stated amount thereof after any drawing thereunder (each, an ""). Unless otherwise directed by the L/C Issuer, Anixter shall not be required to make a specific request to the L/C Issuer to permit such reinstatement. Once an Auto-Reinstatement Letter of Credit has been issued, except as provided in the following sentence, the Lenders shall be deemed to have authorized (but may not require) the L/C Issuer to reinstate all or a portion of the stated amount thereof in accordance with the provisions of such Letter of Credit. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if such Auto-Reinstatement Letter of Credit permits the L/C Issuer to decline to reinstate all or any portion of the stated amount thereof after a drawing thereunder by giving notice of such non-reinstatement within a specified number of days after such drawing (the ""), the L/C Issuer shall not permit such reinstatement if it has received a notice (which may be by telephone or in writing) on or before the day that is five Business Days before the Non-Reinstatement Deadline (A) from the Administrative Agent that the Required Lenders have elected not to permit such reinstatement or (B) from the Administrative Agent, any Lender or Anixter that one or more of the applicable conditions specified in is not then satisfied (treating such reinstatement as an L/C Credit Extension for purposes of this clause) and, in each case, directing the L/C Issuer not to permit such reinstatement.
Auto-Reinstatement Letter of Credit
Non-Reinstatement Deadline
Section 4.02
     (v) Promptly after its delivery of any Letter of Credit or any amendment to a Letter of Credit to an advising bank with respect thereto or to the beneficiary thereof, the L/C Issuer will also deliver to Anixter and the Administrative Agent a true and complete copy of such Letter of Credit or amendment.
     (c) .
Drawings and Reimbursements; Funding of Participations
     (i) Upon receipt from the beneficiary of any Letter of Credit of any notice of a drawing under such Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent thereof. In the case of a Letter of Credit denominated in an Available Currency other than US Dollars, Anixter shall reimburse the L/C Issuer in such Available Currency, unless (A) the L/C Issuer (at its option) shall have specified in such notice that it will require reimbursement in US Dollars, or (B) in the absence of any such requirement for reimbursement in US Dollars, Anixter shall have notified the L/C Issuer promptly following receipt of the notice of drawing that
 
Anixter will reimburse the L/C Issuer in US Dollars. In the case of any such reimbursement in US Dollars of a drawing under a Letter of Credit denominated in another Available Currency, the L/C Issuer shall notify Anixter of the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of the drawing promptly following the determination thereof. Not later than 11:00 a.m. on the date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under a Letter of Credit to be reimbursed in US Dollars, or the Applicable Time on the date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under a Letter of Credit to be reimbursed in any other Available Currency (each such date, an ""), Anixter shall reimburse the L/C Issuer through the Administrative Agent in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing and in such Available Currency. If Anixter fails to so reimburse the L/C Issuer by such time, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the Honor Date, the amount of the unreimbursed drawing (expressed in US Dollars in the amount of the Dollar Equivalent thereof in the case of a Letter of Credit denominated in an Available Currency other than US Dollars) (the ""), and the amount of such Lender's Pro Rata Share thereof. In such event, Anixter shall be deemed to have requested a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans to be disbursed on the Honor Date in an amount equal to the Unreimbursed Amount, without regard to the minimum and multiples specified in for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the amount of the unutilized portion of the Aggregate Commitments and the conditions set forth in (other than the delivery of a Borrowing Notice). Any notice given by the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent pursuant to this may be given by telephone if immediately confirmed in writing; that the lack of such an immediate confirmation shall not affect the conclusiveness or binding effect of such notice.
Honor Date
Unreimbursed Amount
Section 2.02
Section 4.02
Section 2.06(c)(i)
provided
     (ii) Each Lender shall upon any notice pursuant to make funds available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer, in US Dollars, at the Administrative Agent's Office for Dollar-denominated payments in an amount equal to its Pro Rata Share of the Unreimbursed Amount not later than 1:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified in such notice by the Administrative Agent, whereupon, subject to the provisions of , each Lender that so makes funds available shall be deemed to have made a Base Rate Loan to Anixter in such amount. The Administrative Agent shall remit the funds so received to the L/C Issuer in US Dollars, or if requested by the L/C Issuer, the Foreign Currency Equivalent (determined as of such funding date) thereof in another Available Currency as determined by the Administrative Agent.
Section 2.06(c)(i)
Section
2.06(c)(iii)
     (iii) With respect to any Unreimbursed Amount that is not fully refinanced by a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans because the conditions set forth in cannot be satisfied or for any other reason, Anixter shall be deemed to have incurred from the L/C Issuer an L/C Borrowing in the amount of the Unreimbursed Amount that is not so refinanced, which L/C Borrowing shall be due and payable on demand (together with interest) and shall bear interest at the Default Rate. In such event, each Lender's payment to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer pursuant to shall be deemed payment in respect of its participation in such L/C Borrowing and shall constitute an L/C Advance from such Lender in satisfaction of its participation obligation under this .
Section 4.02
Section 2.06(c)(ii)
Section 2.06
     (iv) Until each Lender funds its Committed Loan or L/C Advance pursuant to this to reimburse the L/C Issuer for any amount drawn under any Letter of Credit, interest in respect of such Lender's Pro Rata Share of such amount shall be solely for the account of the L/C Issuer.
Section 2.06(c)
     (v) Each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans or L/C Advances to reimburse the L/C Issuer for amounts drawn under Letters of Credit, as contemplated by this , shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any
Section 2.06(c)
 
circumstance, including (A) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against the L/C Issuer, Anixter, any Subsidiary or any other Person for any reason whatsoever; (B) the occurrence or continuance of a Default; or (C) any other occurrence, event or condition, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing; , , that each Lender's obligation to make Committed Loans pursuant to this is subject to the conditions set forth in (other than delivery by Anixter of a Borrowing Notice). No such making of an L/C Advance shall relieve or otherwise impair the obligation of Anixter to reimburse the L/C Issuer for the amount of any payment made by the L/C Issuer under any Letter of Credit, together with interest as provided herein.
provided
however
Section 2.06(c)
Section 4.02
     (vi) If any Lender fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer any amount required to be paid by such Lender pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this by the time specified in , the L/C Issuer shall be entitled to recover from such Lender (acting through the Administrative Agent), on demand, such amount with interest thereon for the period from the date such payment is required to the date on which such payment is immediately available to the L/C Issuer at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect, plus any administrative, processing or similar fees customarily charged by the L/C Issuer in connection with the foregoing. If such Lender pays such amount (with interest and fees as aforesaid), the amount so paid shall constitute such Lender's Committed Loan included in the relevant Committed Borrowing or L/C Advance in respect of the relevant L/C Borrowing, as the case may be. A certificate of the L/C Issuer submitted to any Lender (through the Administrative Agent) with respect to any amounts owing under this clause (vi) shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Section 2.06(c)
Section 2.06(c)(ii)
     (d) .
Repayment of Participations
     (i) At any time after the L/C Issuer has made a payment under any Letter of Credit and has received from any Lender such Lender's L/C Advance in respect of such payment in accordance with , if the Administrative Agent receives for the account of the L/C Issuer any payment in respect of the related Unreimbursed Amount or interest thereon (whether directly from Anixter or otherwise, including proceeds of Cash Collateral applied thereto by the Administrative Agent), the Administrative Agent will distribute to such Lender its Pro Rata Share thereof (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's L/C Advance was outstanding) in US Dollars and in the same funds as those received by the Administrative Agent.
Section 2.06(c)
     (ii) If any payment received by the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer pursuant to is required to be returned under any of the circumstances described in (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the L/C Issuer in its discretion), each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer its Pro Rata Share thereof on demand of the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such amount is returned by such Lender, at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect. The obligations of the Lenders under this clause shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 2.06(c)(i)
Section 10.05
     (e) . The obligation of Anixter to reimburse the L/C Issuer for each drawing under each Letter of Credit and to repay each L/C Borrowing shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under all circumstances, including the following:
Obligations Absolute
 
     (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of such Letter of Credit, this Agreement, or any other Loan Document;
     (ii) the existence of any claim, counterclaim, set-off, defense or other right that Anixter or any Subsidiary may have at any time against any beneficiary or any transferee of such Letter of Credit (or any Person for whom any such beneficiary or any such transferee may be acting), the L/C Issuer or any other Person, whether in connection with this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby or by such Letter of Credit or any agreement or instrument relating thereto, or any unrelated transaction;
     (iii) any draft, demand, certificate or other document presented under such Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, invalid or insufficient in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect; or any loss or delay in the transmission or otherwise of any document required in order to make a drawing under such Letter of Credit;
     (iv) any payment by the L/C Issuer under such Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or certificate that does not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit; or any payment made by the L/C Issuer under such Letter of Credit to any Person purporting to be a trustee in bankruptcy, debtor-in-possession, assignee for the benefit of creditors, liquidator, receiver or other representative of or successor to any beneficiary or any transferee of such Letter of Credit, including any arising in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law;
     (v) any adverse change in the relevant exchange rates or in the availability of the relevant Foreign Currency to Anixter or any Subsidiary or in the relevant currency markets generally; or
     (vi) any other circumstance or happening whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, including any other circumstance that might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, Anixter or any Subsidiary.
     Anixter shall promptly examine a copy of each Letter of Credit and each amendment thereto that is delivered to it and, in the event of any claim of noncompliance with Anixter's instructions or other irregularity, Anixter will immediately notify the L/C Issuer. Anixter shall be conclusively deemed to have waived any such claim against the L/C Issuer and its correspondents unless such notice is given as aforesaid.
     (f) . Each Lender and Anixter agree that, in paying any drawing under a Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall not have any responsibility to obtain any document (other than any sight draft, certificates and documents expressly required by the Letter of Credit) or to ascertain or inquire as to the validity or accuracy of any such document or the authority of the Person executing or delivering any such document. None of the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, any of their respective Related Parties nor any correspondent, participant or assignee of the L/C Issuer shall be liable to any Lender for (i) any action taken or omitted in connection herewith at the request or with the approval of the Lenders or the Required Lenders, as applicable; (ii) any action taken or omitted in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct; or (iii) the due execution, effectiveness, validity or enforceability of any document or instrument related to any Letter of Credit or Issuer Document. Anixter hereby assumes all risks of the acts or omissions of any beneficiary or transferee with respect to its use of any Letter of Credit; , , that this assumption is not intended to, and shall not, preclude Anixter's pursuing such rights and remedies as it may have against the beneficiary or transferee at law or under any other agreement. None of the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, any of their respective Related Parties nor any correspondent, participant or assignee of the L/C Issuer shall be liable or responsible for any of the
Role of L/C Issuer
provided
however
 
matters described in clauses (i) through (vi) of ; , , that anything in such clauses to the contrary notwithstanding, Anixter may have a claim against the L/C Issuer, and the L/C Issuer may be liable to Anixter, to the extent, but only to the extent, of any direct, as opposed to consequential or exemplary, damages suffered by Anixter which Anixter proves were caused by the L/C Issuer's willful misconduct or gross negligence or the L/C Issuer's willful failure to pay under any Letter of Credit after the presentation to it by the beneficiary of a sight draft and certificate(s) strictly complying with the terms and conditions of a Letter of Credit. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, the L/C Issuer may accept documents that appear on their face to be in order, without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, and the L/C Issuer shall not be responsible for the validity or sufficiency of any instrument transferring or assigning or purporting to transfer or assign a Letter of Credit or the rights or benefits thereunder or proceeds thereof, in whole or in part, which may prove to be invalid or ineffective for any reason.
Section 2.06(e)
provided
however
     (g) .
Cash Collateral
     (i) Upon the request of the Administrative Agent, (A) if the L/C Issuer has honored any full or partial drawing request under any Letter of Credit and such drawing has resulted in an L/C Borrowing, or (B) if, as of the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, any L/C Obligation for any reason remains outstanding, Anixter shall, in each case, immediately Cash Collateralize the then Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations.
     (ii) In addition, if the Administrative Agent notifies Anixter at any time that the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations at such time exceeds 105% of the Letter of Credit Sublimit then in effect, then, within two Business Days after receipt of such notice, Anixter shall Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations in an amount equal to the amount by which the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations exceeds the Letter of Credit Sublimit.
     (iii) The Administrative Agent may, at any time and from time to time after the initial deposit of Cash Collateral, request that additional Cash Collateral be provided in order to protect against the results of exchange rate fluctuations.
     (iv) sets forth certain additional requirements to deliver Cash Collateral hereunder. For purposes of this and , "Cash Collateralize" means to pledge and deposit with or deliver to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the L/C Issuer and the Lenders, as collateral for the L/C Obligations, cash or deposit account balances pursuant to documentation in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer (which documents are hereby consented to by the Lenders). Derivatives of such term have corresponding meanings. Anixter hereby grants to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the L/C Issuer and the Lenders, a security interest in all such cash, deposit accounts and all balances therein and all proceeds of the foregoing. Cash Collateral shall be maintained in blocked, non-interest bearing deposit accounts at Wells Fargo Bank.
Section 8.02(c)
Section 2.06
Section 8.02(c)
     (h) . Unless otherwise expressly agreed by the L/C Issuer and Anixter when a Letter of Credit is issued, the rules of the ISP shall apply to each Letter of Credit.
Applicability of ISP
     (i) . Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender in accordance with its Pro Rata Share, in US Dollars, a Letter of Credit fee (the " ") for each Letter of Credit equal to the Applicable Margin times the Dollar Equivalent of the actual daily maximum amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit (whether or not such maximum amount is then in effect under such Letter of Credit). For purposes of computing the actual daily maximum amount available to be drawn under any Letter of Credit, the amount of such Letter of
Letter of Credit Fees
Letter of
Credit Fee
 
Credit shall be determined in accordance with . Letter of Credit Fees shall be (i) computed on a quarterly basis in arrears and (ii) due and payable on the first Business Day after the end of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the issuance of such Letter of Credit, on the Letter of Credit Expiration Date and thereafter on demand. If there is any change in the Applicable Margin during any quarter, the daily maximum amount of each Letter of Credit shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Margin separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Margin was in effect. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, upon the request of the Required Lenders, while any Event of Default exists, all Letter of Credit Fees shall accrue at the Default Rate.
Section 1.07
     (j) . Anixter shall pay directly to the L/C Issuer for its own account, in US Dollars, a fronting fee with respect to each Letter of Credit, at the rate per annum specified in the Agent Fee Letter, computed on the Dollar Equivalent of the actual daily maximum amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit (whether or not such maximum amount is then in effect under such Letter of Credit) and on a quarterly basis in arrears, and due and payable on the first Business Day after the end of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the issuance of such Letter of Credit, on the Letter of Credit Expiration Date and thereafter on demand. In addition, Anixter shall pay directly to the L/C Issuer for its own account, in US Dollars, the customary issuance, presentation, amendment and other processing fees, and other standard costs and charges, of the L/C Issuer relating to letters of credit as from time to time in effect. Such customary fees and standard costs and charges are due and payable on demand and are nonrefundable.
Fronting Fee and Documentary and Processing Charges Payable to L/C Issuer
     (k) . In the event of any conflict between the terms hereof and the terms of any Issuer Document, the terms hereof shall control.
Conflict with Issuer Documents
     (l) . Notwithstanding that a Letter of Credit issued or outstanding hereunder is in support of any obligations of, or is for the account of, a Subsidiary, Anixter shall be obligated to reimburse the L/C Issuer hereunder for any and all drawings under such Letter of Credit. Anixter hereby acknowledges that the issuance of Letters of Credit for the account of Subsidiaries inures to the benefit of Anixter, and that Anixter's business derives substantial benefits from the businesses of such Subsidiaries.
Letters of Credit Issued for Subsidiaries
     2.07 .
Prepayments
     (a) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Committed Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty; that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (or the Applicable Time with respect to any prepayment to be made in a Foreign Currency), (A) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Loans or Canadian Dollar Loans, and (B) on the date of prepayment of Base Rate Loans; (ii) any prepayment of Eurocurrency Rate Loans or Canadian Dollar Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$5,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$1,000,000 in excess thereof; and (iii) any prepayment of Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of US$1,000,000 or a whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof or, in each case, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Type(s) of Committed Loans to be prepaid and, if Eurocurrency Rate Loans are to be prepaid, the Interest Period(s) of such Loans. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of each such notice and of such Lender's Pro Rata Share of such prepayment. If such notice is given by the Borrowers, the Borrowers shall make such prepayment, and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest thereon, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to
provided
 
. Each such prepayment shall be applied to the Loans of the Lenders in accordance with their respective Pro Rata Shares.
Section 3.05
     (b) The Borrowers may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent and the Swing Line Lender, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Swing Line Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty; that (i) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent and the Swing Line Lender not later than (A) 11:00 a.m. on the date of prepayment of Swing Line Loans denominated in US Dollars and (B) not later than the Applicable Time specified by the Administrative Agent on the date of prepayment of Foreign Currency Swing Line Loans, in each case such prepayment date shall be a Business Day; and (ii) any prepayment of Swing Line Loans shall be in a Dollar Equivalent minimum principal amount of at least US$500,000.
provided
     (c) If for any reason and at any time (other than as set forth in subsection (d) below) (i) the Total Outstandings exceed the Aggregate Commitments then in effect, (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans exceeds the British Pound Sterling Sublimit or (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans exceeds the Canadian Dollar Sublimit, the Borrowers shall immediately prepay the applicable Loans in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
     (d) If on any Revaluation Date the Administrative Agent shall have determined that the then outstanding Dollar Equivalent principal amount of (i) the Total Outstandings exceeds the Aggregate Commitments then in effect, (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all British Pound Sterling Loans exceeds the British Pound Sterling Sublimit or (iii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Canadian Dollar Loans exceeds the Canadian Dollar Sublimit, in each case due to a change in applicable rates of exchange between US Dollars, on the one hand, and any Applicable Currency, on the other hand by a Dollar Equivalent equal to or in excess of US$2,000,000, then the Administrative Agent may (or, at the request of the Required Lenders, shall) give notice to Anixter that a prepayment is required under this Section, and the Borrowers agree thereupon to make prepayments in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
     2.08 . Anixter may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, terminate the Aggregate Commitments, or permanently reduce the Aggregate Commitments to an amount not less than the then Total Outstandings; that (a) any such notice shall be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m., five Business Days prior to the date of termination or reduction and (b) any such partial reduction shall be in an aggregate amount of US$1,000,000 or any whole multiple of US$500,000 in excess thereof. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of any such notice of reduction or termination of the Aggregate Commitments. Once reduced in accordance with this Section, the Commitments may not be increased. Any reduction of the Aggregate Commitments shall be applied to the Commitment of each Lender according to its Pro Rata Share. All related Commitment Fees accrued until the effective date of any termination of the Aggregate Commitments shall be paid on the effective date of such termination.
Reduction or Termination of Commitments
provided
     2.09 .
Repayment of Loans
     (a) The applicable Borrower shall repay to the Lenders on the Maturity Date the aggregate principal amount of each Committed Loan of such Borrower outstanding on such date.
     (b) The applicable Borrower shall repay each Swing Line Loan upon demand of the Swing Line Lender and on the Maturity Date. The applicable Borrower shall repay each Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan within 30 days after such Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan is made (or at such later date, not later than the Maturity Date as the Swing Line Lender may in its discretion otherwise agree).
 
     2.10 .
Interest
     (a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) below, (i) each Eurocurrency Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to the Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period the Applicable Margin in the case of a Loan of any Lender which is lent from a Lending Office in the UK or a Participating Member State, the Mandatory Cost; (ii) each Base Rate Loan and each US Dollar Swing Line Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Margin; (iii) each Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan (other than any Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan denominated in Canadian Dollars) shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof at a rate per annum specified by the Swing Line Lender at the time of borrowing for such Swing Line Loan the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Rate Loans any Mandatory Cost; and (iv) each Canadian Dollar Loan and each Foreign Currency Swing Line Loan denominated in Canadian Dollars shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Canadian Prime Rate the Applicable Margin.
plus
plus
plus
plus
plus
plus
     (b) While any Event of Default exists or after acceleration, the Borrowers shall pay interest on the principal amount of all outstanding Obligations at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law. Accrued and unpaid interest on past due amounts (including interest on past due interest) shall be due and payable upon demand.
     (c) Interest on each Loan shall be due and payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date applicable thereto and at such other times as may be specified herein. Interest hereunder shall be due and payable in accordance with the terms hereof before and after judgment, and before and after the commencement of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law.
     2.11 .
Fees
     (a) . Commencing on the Closing Date, subject to , Anixter shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of each Lender (other than a Defaulting Lender) in accordance with its Pro Rata Share, a non-refundable commitment fee (the "") equal to the Applicable Margin the average daily unused portion of the Aggregate Commitments of the Lenders (other than the Defaulting Lenders, if any); that the amount of outstanding Swing Line Loans shall not be considered usage of the Aggregate Commitments for the purpose of calculating the Commitment Fee. The Commitment Fee shall accrue at all times (including at any time during which one or more of the conditions in is not met) from the Closing Date until the Maturity Date and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date and ending on the Maturity Date. The Commitment Fee shall be calculated quarterly in arrears, and if there is any change in the Applicable Margin during any quarter, the actual daily amount shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Margin separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Margin was in effect.
Commitment Fee
Section 3.08
Commitment Fee
times
provided
Article IV
     (b) . Anixter shall pay to each Joint Lead Arranger and the Administrative Agent, for their own respective accounts, fees in the amounts and at the times specified in the Joint Fee Letter and the Agent Fee Letter. Anixter shall pay to the Lenders such fees as shall have been separately agreed upon in writing in the amounts and at the times so specified. Such fees shall be fully earned when paid and shall be nonrefundable for any reason whatsoever.
Other Fees
 
     2.12 . Computation of interest on Base Rate Loans computed based on the Prime Rate and Canadian Dollar Loans computed based on the Canadian Prime Rate shall be calculated on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and the actual number of days elapsed. Computation of interest on Loans in British Pound Sterling shall be calculated on the basis of a year of 365 days, and the actual number of days elapsed. Computation of all other types of interest and all fees shall be calculated on the basis of a year of 360 days and the actual number of days elapsed, which results in a higher yield to the payee thereof than a method based on a year of 365 or 366 days. Interest shall accrue on each Loan for the day on which the Loan is made, and shall not accrue on a Loan, or any portion thereof, for the day on which the Loan or such portion is paid, provided that any Loan that is repaid on the same day on which it is made shall bear interest for one day.
Computation of Interest and Fees
     2.13 .
Evidence of Debt
     (a) The Credit Extensions made by each Lender shall be evidenced by one or more accounts or records maintained by such Lender and by the Administrative Agent in the ordinary course of business. The accounts or records maintained by the Administrative Agent and each Lender shall be conclusive absent manifest error of the amount of the Credit Extensions made by the Lenders to the Borrowers and the interest and payments thereon. Any failure so to record or any error in doing so shall not, however, limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Borrowers hereunder to pay any amount owing with respect to the Loans. In the event of any conflict between the accounts and records maintained by any Lender and the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent in respect of such matters, the accounts and records of such Lender shall control. Upon the request of any Lender made through the Administrative Agent, such Lender's Loans may be evidenced by Notes in addition to such accounts or records. Each Lender may attach schedules to its Note(s) and endorse thereon the date, Type (if applicable), amount and maturity of the applicable Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     (b) In addition to the accounts and records referred to in subsection (a), each Lender and the Administrative Agent shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice accounts or records evidencing the purchases and sales by such Lender of participations in Letters of Credit and Swing Line Loans. In the event of any conflict between the accounts and records maintained by the Administrative Agent and the accounts and records of any Lender in respect of such matters, the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent shall control in the absence of manifest error.
     2.14 .
Payments Generally
     (a) All payments to be made by the Borrowers shall be made without condition or deduction for any counterclaim, defense, recoupment or set-off. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by the Borrowers hereunder to be made in US Dollars shall be made to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the respective Lenders to which such payment is owed, at the applicable Administrative Agent's Office in US Dollars and in Same Day Funds not later than 12:00 noon, on the date specified herein. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by the Borrowers hereunder to be made in a Foreign Currency shall be made to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the respective Lenders to which such payment is owed, at the applicable Administrative Agent's Office in such Foreign Currency, as the case may be, and in Same Day Funds not later than the Applicable Time specified by the Administrative Agent on the dates specified herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent may require that any payments due under this Agreement be made in the United States. If, for any reason, any Borrower is prohibited by any Law from making any required payment hereunder in a Foreign Currency, such Borrower shall make such payment in US Dollars in the Dollar Equivalent of such Foreign Currency payment amount. The Administrative Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its Pro Rata Share (or other applicable share as provided herein) of such payment in like funds as received by wire transfer to such Lender's Lending Office. All payments
 
received by the Administrative Agent after 12:00 noon, in the case of payment in US Dollars or by the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, after the Applicable Time specified by the Administrative Agent in the case of payments in a Foreign Currency shall be deemed received on the next succeeding Business Day and any applicable interest or fee shall continue to accrue.
     (b) Subject to the definition of "Interest Period," if any payment to be made by a Borrower shall come due on a day other than a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next following Business Day, and such extension of time shall be reflected in computing interest or fees, as the case may be.
     (c) (i) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing (or, in the case of any Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, prior to 12:00 noon on the date of such Borrowing) that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with (or, in the case of a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, that such Lender has made such share available in accordance with and at the time required by ) and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the applicable Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount in Same Day Funds with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to such Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (A) in the case of a payment to be made by such Lender, the Overnight Rate, plus any administrative, processing or similar fees customarily charged by the Administrative Agent in connection with the foregoing, and (B) in the case of a payment to be made by such Borrower, the interest rate applicable to Base Rate Loans. If such Borrower and such Lender shall pay such interest to the Administrative Agent for the same or an overlapping period, the Administrative Agent shall promptly remit to such Borrower the amount of such interest paid by such Borrower for such period. If such Lender pays its share of the applicable Borrowing to the Administrative Agent, then the amount so paid shall constitute such Lender's applicable Loan included in such Borrowing. Any payment by such Borrower shall be without prejudice to any claim such Borrower may have against a Lender that shall have failed to make such payment to the Administrative Agent.
Funding by Lenders; Presumption by the Administrative Agent
Section 2.02
Section 2.02
     (ii) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the L/C Issuer hereunder that such Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if such Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, in Same Day Funds with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the Overnight Rate.
Payments by Borrowers; Presumptions by the Administrative Agent
     A notice of the Administrative Agent to any Lender or Borrower with respect to any amount owing under this subsection (c) shall be conclusive, absent manifest error.
     (d) If any Lender makes available to the Administrative Agent funds for any Loan to be made by such Lender to any Borrower as provided in the foregoing provisions of this , and such
Article II
 
funds are not made available to such Borrower by the Administrative Agent because the conditions to the applicable Credit Extension set forth in are not satisfied or waived in accordance with the terms hereof, the Administrative Agent shall promptly return such funds (in like funds as received from such Lender) to such Lender, without interest.
Article IV
     (e) The obligations of the Lenders hereunder to make Committed Loans and to fund participations in Swing Line Loans and Letters of Credit and to make payments pursuant to are several and not joint. The failure of any Lender to make any Committed Loan or to fund any such participation or to make any payment under on any date required hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender of its corresponding obligation to do so on such date, and no Lender shall be responsible for the failure of any other Lender to so make its Committed Loan, purchase its participation or to make its payment under .
Section 10.04(c)
Section 10.04(c)
Section 10.04(c)
     (f) Nothing herein (subject to ) shall be deemed to obligate any Lender to obtain the funds for any Loan in any particular place or manner or to constitute a representation by any Lender that it has obtained or will obtain the funds for any Loan in any particular place or manner.
Section 10.13
     2.15 . If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of the Committed Loans made by it, or the participations in L/C Obligations or in Swing Line Loans held by it resulting in such Lender's receiving payment of a proportion of the aggregate amount of such Committed Loans or participations and accrued interest thereon greater than its pro rata share thereof as provided herein, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall (a) notify the Administrative Agent of such fact, and (b) purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Committed Loans and subparticipations in L/C Obligations and Swing Line Loans of the other Lenders, or make such other adjustments as shall be equitable, so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Committed Loans and other amounts owing them, that:
Sharing of Payments by Lenders
provided
     (i) if any such participations or subparticipations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations or subparticipations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest; and
     (ii) the provisions of this Section shall not be construed to apply to (x) any payment made by a Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement (including the application of funds arising from the existence of a Defaulting Lender) or (y) any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Committed Loans or subparticipations in L/C Obligations or Swing Line Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to Anixter or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this Section shall apply).
     Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable Law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
     2.16 .
Borrowing Subsidiaries
     (a) Anixter may at any time, upon not less than 15 Business Days' notice from Anixter to the Administrative Agent (or such shorter period as may be agreed by the Administrative Agent in its sole
 
discretion), designate any Foreign Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary with the consent of the Administrative Agent. Upon the receipt by the Administrative Agent of (i) a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement in the form of executed by such Foreign Subsidiary, Anixter and the Administrative Agent, (ii) all documents as shall reasonably demonstrate the existence of such Foreign Subsidiary, the corporate power and authority of such Borrowing Subsidiary to enter into and the validity with respect to such Foreign Subsidiary of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and any other matters relevant hereto (including an opinion of counsel), all in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, and (iii) any governmental and third party approvals necessary or advisable in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by such Foreign Subsidiary, such Subsidiary shall be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement. If the Administrative Agent agrees that such Foreign Subsidiary shall be entitled to receive Loans hereunder, then promptly following receipt of all such requested resolutions, incumbency certificates, opinions of counsel and other documents or information, the Administrative Agent shall send a notice to Anixter and the Lenders specifying the effective date upon which such Foreign Subsidiary shall constitute a Borrowing Subsidiary for purposes hereof, whereupon each of the Lenders agrees to permit such Borrowing Subsidiary to receive Loans hereunder, on the terms and conditions set forth herein, and each of the parties agrees that such Borrowing Subsidiary otherwise shall be a Borrower for all purposes of this Agreement; that no Borrowing Notice or Letter of Credit Application may be submitted by or on behalf of such Borrowing Subsidiary until the date five Business Days after such effective date.
Exhibit C-1
provided
     (b) The obligation of any Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of the first Borrowing from such Lender by a Borrowing Subsidiary is subject to the Administrative Agent's receipt of and satisfaction with the documents and other deliverables described in clause (a) above and a Note (if required by such Lender) in the applicable form payable to such Lender signed by such Borrowing Subsidiary.
     (c) The Obligations of all Foreign Subsidiaries that are Borrowing Subsidiaries shall be several in nature.
     (d) Each Borrowing Subsidiary hereby irrevocably appoints Anixter as its agent for all purposes relevant to this Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents, including (i) the giving and receipt of notices, (ii) the execution and delivery of all documents, instruments and certificates contemplated herein and all modifications hereto, and (iii) the receipt of the proceeds of any Loans made by the Lenders to any such Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder. Any acknowledgment, consent, direction, certification or other action which might otherwise be valid or effective only if given or taken by all Borrowers, or by each Borrower acting singly, shall be valid and effective if given or taken only by Anixter, whether or not any such other Borrower joins therein. Any notice, demand, consent, acknowledgement, direction, certification or other communication delivered to Anixter in accordance with the terms of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been delivered to each Borrowing Subsidiary.
     (e) Any Foreign Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder at such time as no Credit Extensions shall be outstanding to such Foreign Subsidiary, and such Foreign Subsidiary and Anixter shall have executed and delivered to the Administrative Agent a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination in the form of . The Administrative Agent will promptly notify the Lenders of any such termination of a Borrowing Subsidiary's status. Upon a Borrowing Subsidiary's liquidation, dissolution or disposal of to a person other than Anixter or any Subsidiary, all Credit Extensions outstanding to any Borrowing Subsidiary shall be due and payable and such Subsidiary shall no longer be entitled to obtain any Credit Extensions hereunder.
Exhibit C-2
     2.17 .
Incremental Commitments
 
     (a) . At any time and from time to time, Anixter may by written notice to the Administrative Agent (who shall promptly notify the Lenders) request (i) one or more increases in the Aggregate Commitments (any such increase, a "") or (ii) one or more incremental term loan commitments (any such incremental term loan commitment, an "" and, together with any Revolving Commitment Increases, the "") to make incremental term loans (any such incremental term loan, an ""); that (i) the total aggregate principal amount for all such Incremental Commitments shall not exceed US$200,000,000; (ii) any such request for an Incremental Commitment shall be in a minimum amount of US$15,000,000; and (iii) Anixter may request up to two Incremental Commitments during any calendar year.
Request for Incremental Commitments
Revolving Commitment Increase
Incremental Term Loan Commitment
Incremental Commitments
Incremental Term Loan
provided
     (b) . To achieve the full amount of a requested Incremental Commitment and subject to the approval (which approvals shall not be unreasonably withheld) of the Administrative Agent and, in connection with a request for a Revolving Commitment Increase, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender, Anixter may invite existing Lenders to increase their respective Commitments or provide an Incremental Term Loan Commitment and/or any Affiliate of any Lender, any Approved Fund or any other Person reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent to become a Lender (any such Lender, an "") pursuant to a joinder agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel. Any Lender or any Incremental Lender offered or approached to provide all or a portion of any Incremental Commitment may elect or decline, in its sole discretion, to provide such Incremental Commitment. Any Incremental Commitment of any Person becoming a new Lender under this shall be in a minimum principal amount of at least US$15,000,000.
Lenders
Incremental Lender
Section 2.17
     (c) . Incremental Term Loans shall become Loans under this Agreement pursuant to an amendment (an "") to this Agreement and, as appropriate, the other Loan Documents, executed by each Borrower, each Lender agreeing to provide such Incremental Term Loan, if any, each Incremental Lender, if any, and the Administrative Agent. The Incremental Term Loan Amendment may effect such amendments to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as may be necessary or appropriate, in the reasonable opinion of the Administrative Agent and the Borrowers, to effect the provisions of this .
Incremental Term Loan Amendment
Incremental Term Loan Amendment
Section 2.17
     (d) . The Administrative Agent and Anixter shall determine the effective date (each, an "") for each Incremental Commitment and the final allocation of such Incremental Commitment. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify Anixter and the Lenders of the final allocations of such Incremental Commitment and the Increase Effective Date. The Borrowers shall prepay any Committed Loans outstanding on the Increase Effective Date (and pay any additional amounts required pursuant to ) to the extent necessary to keep the outstanding Committed Loans ratable with any revised Pro Rata Shares arising from any nonratable increase in the Commitments under this Section. Each Revolving Commitment Increase (and the Loans made thereunder) shall (i) constitute Obligations of the Borrowers, (ii) be guaranteed with the other Credit Extensions on a pari passu basis, (iii) mature on the Maturity Date and (iv) be subject to the same terms and conditions as the Commitments as in effect prior to such Increase Effective Date. Each Incremental Term Loan Commitment (and the Incremental Term Loans made thereunder) shall (i) constitute Obligations of the Borrowers, (ii) be guaranteed with the other Credit Extensions on a pari passu basis, (iii) mature on or after the Maturity Date and (iv) be on such other terms (including pricing and amortization relating thereto) reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders providing such Incremental Term Loan Commitment and Anixter.
Effective Date and Allocations
Increase Effective Date
Section 3.05
     (e) . Each Incremental Commitment shall become effective as of the applicable Increase Effective Date; that on or before such Increase Effective Date, Anixter shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of each Loan Party dated as of
Conditions to Effectiveness of Increase
provided
 
the Increase Effective Date signed by a Responsible Officer of such Loan Party (i) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party, approving or consenting to such Incremental Commitment, and (ii) in the case of Anixter, certifying that, both before and after giving effect to such Incremental Commitment, (A) the representations and warranties contained in and the other Loan Documents are true and correct on and as of such Increase Effective Date (except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and except that for purposes of this , the representations and warranties contained in subsections (a) and (b) of shall be deemed to refer to the most recent statements furnished pursuant to clauses (a) and (b), respectively, of ), and (B) no Default or Event of Default exists as of such Increase Effective Date before or after giving effect to any Incremental Commitment and the making of any Loans pursuant thereto.
Article V
Section 2.17
Section 5.07
Section 6.01
     (f) . This Section shall supersede any provisions in or to the contrary.
Conflicting Provisions
Sections 2.15
10.01
     3.01 .
Taxes
     (a) . Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the respective Loan Parties hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without reduction or withholding for any Taxes, that if any applicable Laws require the deduction or withholding of any Tax from any such payment, then the Loan Party shall make such deduction and timely pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law and, if such Tax is an Indemnified Tax, then the sum payable by the Loan Party shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or L/C Issuer, as the case may be, receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a payment shall not be required to be increased pursuant to this where any UK Taxes are required to be deducted or withheld (a "") from a payment of interest hereunder or under any other Loan Document if, on the date on which the payment falls due:
Payments Free of Taxes
provided
Section 3.01(a)
UK Tax Deduction
     (i) the payment could have been made to the relevant Lender without a UK Tax Deduction if it was a UK Qualifying Lender, but on that date that Lender is not or has ceased to be a UK Qualifying Lender other than as a result of any change after the date it became a Lender under this Agreement in (or in the interpretation, administration, or application of) any Law or Treaty, or any published practice or concession of any relevant taxing authority; or
     (ii) the relevant Lender is a UK Qualifying Lender solely by virtue of clause (b) of the definition of UK Qualifying Lender and that relevant Lender has not given a Tax Confirmation to Anixter where the payment could have been made to the relevant Lender without a UK Tax Deduction if that Lender had given a Tax Confirmation to Anixter or the relevant UK Borrower, on the basis that the Tax Confirmation would have enabled that UK Borrower to have formed a reasonable belief that the payment was an "excepted payment" for the purpose of section 930 of the UK Taxes Act; or
     (iii) the relevant Lender is a UK Qualifying Lender solely under clause (b) of the definition of UK Qualifying Lender and an officer of HM Revenue and Customs ("") has given (and not revoked) a direction (a "") under section 931 of the UK Taxes Act (as that provision has effect on the date on which the relevant Lender became a Lender) which relates
HMRC
Direction
 
to that payment and that Lender has received from a UK Borrower or Anixter a certified copy of that Direction; and the payment could have been made to the Lender without any UK Tax Deduction in the absence of that Direction.
     (b) . Without limiting the provisions of subsection (a) above, each Borrower shall timely pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable Laws.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Borrowers
     (c) . Each Loan Party shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the L/C Issuer, within 30 days after demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) withheld in respect of payments to, or paid by, the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to a Loan Party by a Lender or the L/C Issuer (with copies to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the L/C Issuer, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification by the Borrowers
     (d) . As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by any Loan Party to a Governmental Authority, such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payments
     (e) .
Status of Lenders
     (i) Any Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding Tax with respect to payments made under any Loan Document shall deliver to Anixter and the Administrative Agent, at the time or times reasonably requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent, such documentation (properly completed and executed by such Lender) reasonably requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding, and in delivering such completed and executed documentation to Anixter, each such Lender shall be deemed to have complied with its obligations as set forth in this sentence. Anixter shall timely file such documentation with the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with and as required by applicable Law. In addition, any Lender, if requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by Anixter or the Administrative Agent as will enable Anixter or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, the completion, execution and submission of such documentation (other than such documentation set forth in , and below and ) shall not be required if in the Lender's judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Lender.
Section 3.01(e)(ii)(A)
(ii)(B)
(ii)(C)
Section 3.01(h)
     (ii) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, in the event that any Borrower is a US Borrower,
 
     (A) any Lender that is a US Person shall deliver to such Borrower and the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the request of such Borrower or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of IRS Form W-9 certifying, to the extent such Lender is legally entitled to do so, that such Lender is exempt from US Federal backup withholding tax; and
     (B) any Non-US Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to such Borrower and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Non-US Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the request of such Borrower or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
     (i) in the case of a Non-US Lender claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (x) with respect to payments of interest under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, US federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "interest" article of such tax treaty and (y) with respect to any other applicable payments under any Loan Document, IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, US federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "business profits" or "other income" article of such tax treaty;
     (ii) executed originals of IRS Form W-8ECI;
     (iii) in the case of a Non-US Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under Section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate to the effect that (A) such Non-US Lender is not a "bank" within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, a "10 percent shareholder" of such Borrower within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or a "controlled foreign corporation" described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code and (B) the interest payments in question are not effectively connected with a US trade or business conducted by such Non-US Lender (a "") and (y) executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN;
US Tax Compliance Certificate
     (iv) to the extent a Non-US Lender is not the beneficial owner (for example, where the Non-US Lender is a partnership or participating Lender granting a typical participation), executed originals of IRS Form W-8IMY, accompanied by a Form W-8ECI, W-8BEN, US Tax Compliance Certificate, Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each Beneficial Owner, as applicable; that if the Non-US Lender is a partnership (and not a participating Lender) and one or more beneficial owners of such Non-US Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Non-US Lender may provide a US Tax Compliance Certificate on behalf of each such beneficial owner; or
provided
     (v) executed originals of any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in US federal withholding Tax, duly completed, together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit such Borrower
 
or the Administrative Agent to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made.
     (C) If a payment made to a Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to US federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to such Borrower and the Administrative Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by such Borrower or the Administrative Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by such Borrower or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for such Borrower and the Administrative Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lender's obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this clause (C), "FATCA" shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
     Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall update such form or certification or promptly notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
     Additionally, each of the Borrowers shall promptly deliver to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, as the Administrative Agent or such Lender shall reasonably request, on or prior to the Closing Date, and in a timely fashion thereafter, such documents and forms required by any relevant taxing authorities under the Laws of any jurisdiction, duly executed and completed by such Borrower, as are required to be furnished by such Lender or the Administrative Agent under such Laws in connection with any payment by the Administrative Agent or any Lender of Taxes or Other Taxes, or otherwise in connection with the Loan Documents, with respect to such jurisdiction.
     (f) . If the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund or credit in lieu of a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by any Borrower or with respect to which any Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section, it shall pay to such Borrower an amount equal to such refund or credit in lieu of a refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by such Borrower under this Section with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund or credit in lieu of a refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses (including Taxes) of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund or credit in lieu of a refund), that each Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, agrees to repay the amount paid over to such Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer is required to repay such refund or credit in lieu of a refund to such Governmental Authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph (f), in no event will the indemnified party be required to pay any amount to an indemnifying party pursuant to this paragraph (f) the payment of which would place the indemnified party in a less favorable net after-Tax position than the indemnified party would have been in if the indemnification payments or additional amounts giving rise to such refund or credit in lieu of a refund had never been paid. This subsection shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes that it deems confidential) to any Borrower or any other Person.
Treatment of Certain Refunds and Credits
provided
 
     (g) . Each Lender and L/C Issuer shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after demand therefor, for any Taxes (but, with respect to Indemnified Taxes, only to the extent that the Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Loan Party to do so) attributable to such Lender or L/C Issuer that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender or L/C Issuer by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Each Lender and L/C Issuer hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender or L/C Issuer under any Loan Document or otherwise payable by the Administrative Agent to the Lender or L/C Issuer from any other source against any amount due to the Administrative Agent under this paragraph (g). The agreements in this paragraph (g) shall survive the resignation and/or replacement of the Administrative Agent.
Indemnification by the Lenders
     (h) .
United Kingdom Taxes
     (i) Nothing in or this shall require a Treaty Lender receiving payments hereunder or under any other Loan Document from a UK Borrower, to (A) register under the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme; or (B) apply the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme to any Loan if it has so registered; or (C) file any forms or documentation pursuant to or this if it has (1) included an indication that it wishes the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme to apply to this Agreement in accordance with clauses (ii) or (vii) below or (2) notified Anixter and the Administrative Agent of its scheme reference number and its jurisdiction of tax residence pursuant to clauses (iv) or (v) below, and the applicable Borrower making that payment has not complied with its obligations under clauses (iii), (iv) or (vii) below.
Section 3.01(e)
Section 3.01(h)
Section 3.01(e)
Section 3.01(h)
     (ii) A Treaty Lender that is a Lender as of the Closing Date and holds a passport under the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme and wishes that scheme to apply to this Agreement, shall make an indication to that effect (for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and without any liability to any Borrower) by providing its scheme reference number and its jurisdiction of residence to the Administrative Agent and Anixter on or before the Closing Date.
     (iii) Upon a Lender providing the indication described in clause (ii) above, each Borrower that is a UK Borrower as of the Closing Date (or promptly upon becoming a UK Borrower after the Closing Date) shall, to the extent such Lender is providing a Commitment to such Borrower, (A) file a duly completed form DTTP2 in respect of such Lender with HMRC within 30 days of the Closing Date and (B) promptly provide such Lender with a copy of that filing; and
     (iv) A Treaty Lender that has not provided the indication referred to in clause (ii) above but that holds a passport under the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme and subsequently wishes that scheme to apply to this Agreement shall notify (for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and without liability to any Borrower) Anixter and the Administrative Agent of its scheme number and its jurisdiction of tax residence. Thereafter, each Person that is a UK Borrower hereunder as of, or becomes a UK Borrower after, the date on which such notice becomes effective (determined in accordance with ) shall, to the extent that such Lender provides a Commitment to such Borrower, (A) file a duly completed form DTTP2 in respect of such Lender with HMRC within 30 days of such effective date (or, with respect to any new UK
Section 10.02
 
Borrower, 30 days of such Person becoming a UK Borrower hereunder) and (B) promptly provide such Lender with a copy of that filing.
     (v) A Person that becomes a Treaty Lender on a date (such date, the "") after the Closing Date that holds a passport under the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme and wishes for that scheme to apply to this Agreement shall include an indication to that effect (for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and without liability to any Borrower) by including its scheme reference number and its jurisdiction of tax residence in the joinder documents such Person shall execute and deliver to become a Lender. Thereafter, each Person that is a UK Borrower hereunder as of, or becomes a UK Borrower after, such Relevant Date shall, to the extent such Lender provides a Commitment to such Borrower, (A) file a duly completed form DTTP2 with HMRC within 30 days of that Relevant Date (or, with respect to any new UK Borrower, 30 days of such Person becoming a UK Borrower hereunder) and (B) promptly provide the Lender with a copy of that filing.
Relevant Date
     (vi) A Lender that is a party to this Agreement as of the Closing Date that is a UK Qualifying Lender solely by virtue of clause (b) of the definition of UK Qualifying Lender gives a Tax Confirmation to Anixter by entering into this Agreement. Such a Lender shall promptly notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent if there is any change in the position from that set out in the Tax Confirmation. A Person that hereafter becomes a party to this Agreement as a Lender pursuant to that is a UK Qualifying Lender solely by virtue of clause (b) of the definition of UK Qualifying Lender shall provide a Tax Confirmation in the forms and certificates provided in accordance with this which it executes by including whether it falls within clause (b)(i), (ii) or (iii) of the definition of UK Qualifying Lender. Such a Lender shall promptly notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent if there is any change in the position from that set out in the Tax Confirmation.
Section 10.06
Section 3.01
     (vii) If a Lender has not (A) included an indication to the effect that it wishes the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme to apply to this Agreement in accordance with clauses (ii) or (v) above or (B) notified Anixter or Administrative Agent of its scheme reference number and its jurisdiction of tax residence pursuant to clause (iv) above, then no Borrower shall have any obligation to file any form relating to the HMRC DT Treaty Passport scheme in respect of such Lender's Commitment(s) or its participation in any Loan.
     (i) Any amount (including costs and expenses) payable hereunder or under any Loan Document by any Borrower is exclusive of any value added tax or any other Taxes of a similar nature which might be chargeable in connection with that amount. If any such Taxes are chargeable, upon receipt of a valid invoice of any value added tax or any other Taxes of a similar nature, the applicable Borrower must pay to the relevant recipient (in addition to and at the same time as paying that amount) an amount equal to the amount of such Taxes.
     (j) . Each party's obligations under this shall survive any assignment of rights by, or the replacement of, a Lender, the termination of the Commitments and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all obligations under any Loan Document.
Survival
Section 3.01
     3.02 . If any Lender determines that any Law has made it unlawful, or that any Governmental Authority has asserted that it is unlawful, for any Lender or its applicable Lending Office to make, maintain or fund Eurocurrency Rate Loans in any Available Currency, or materially restricts the authority of such Lender to purchase or sell, or to take deposits of, any Available Currency in the applicable interbank market, or to determine or charge interest rates based upon the Eurocurrency Rate, then, on notice thereof by such Lender to Anixter through the Administrative Agent, any obligation of
Illegality
 
such Lender to make or continue Eurocurrency Rate Loans or to convert Base Rate Loans to Eurocurrency Rate Loans shall be suspended until such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and Anixter that the circumstances giving rise to such determination no longer exist. Upon receipt of such notice, the Borrowers shall, upon demand from such Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), prepay or, if applicable and such Loans are denominated in US Dollars, convert all Eurocurrency Rate Loans of such Lender to Base Rate Loans, either on the last day of the Interest Period thereof, if such Lender may lawfully continue to maintain such Eurocurrency Rate Loans to such day, or immediately, if such Lender may not lawfully continue to maintain such Eurocurrency Rate Loans. Upon any such prepayment or conversion, the Borrowers shall also pay interest on the amount so prepaid or converted. Each Lender agrees to designate a different Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for such notice and will not, in the good faith judgment of such Lender, otherwise be materially disadvantageous to such Lender.
     3.03 . If the Administrative Agent determines (or in the case of clause (c) below, the Required Lenders determine) in connection with any request for a Eurocurrency Rate Loan or a conversion to or continuation thereof that (a) deposits in the applicable currency are not being offered to banks in the applicable interbank market for the applicable amount and Interest Period of such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, (b) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for determining the Eurocurrency Rate for such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, or (c) the Eurocurrency Rate for such Eurocurrency Rate Loan does not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to the Required Lenders of funding such Eurocurrency Rate Loan, the Administrative Agent will promptly notify Anixter and all Lenders. Thereafter, the obligation of the Lenders to make or maintain Eurocurrency Rate Loans in the affected currency or currencies shall be suspended until the Administrative Agent revokes such notice. Upon receipt of such notice, any Borrower may revoke any pending request for a Committed Borrowing, conversion or continuation of Eurocurrency Rate Loans or, failing that, will be deemed to have converted such request into a request for a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans in the amount specified therein.
Inability to Determine Rates
     3.04 .
Increased Costs and Reduced Return; Capital Adequacy; Reserves on Eurocurrency Rate Loans
     (a) . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs Generally
     (i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, any Lender (except (A) any reserve requirement contemplated by and (B) the requirements of the Bank of England and the Financial Services Authority or the European Central Bank reflected in the Mandatory Cost, other than as set forth below) or the L/C Issuer;
Section 3.04(e)
     (ii) subject the Administrative Agent, Lender or L/C Issuer to any Taxes on its loans, loan principal, letters of credit, commitments, or other obligations, or its deposits, reserves, other liabilities or capital attributable thereto (except for Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of, any Excluded Tax payable by the Administrative Agent, Lender or the L/C Issuer);
Section 3.01
     (iii) result in the Mandatory Cost, as calculated hereunder, not representing the cost to any Lender of complying with the requirements of the Bank of England and/or the Financial Services Authority or the European Central Bank in relation to its making, funding or maintaining Eurocurrency Rate Loans; or
 
     (iv) impose on any Lender or the L/C Issuer or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Agreement or Eurocurrency Rate Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
     and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making, converting to, continuing or maintaining any Eurocurrency Rate Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan), or to increase the cost to such Lender or the L/C Issuer of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit (or of maintaining its obligation to participate in or to issue any Letter of Credit), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the L/C Issuer hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, upon request of such Lender or the L/C Issuer, Anixter will pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
     (b) . If any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines that any Change in Law affecting such Lender or the L/C Issuer or any Lending Office of such Lender or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company, if any, regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit or Swing Line Loans held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the L/C Issuer, to a level below that which such Lender or the L/C Issuer or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time Anixter will pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
     (c) . A certificate of a Lender or the L/C Issuer setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in subsection (a) or (b) of this Section and delivered to Anixter shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Anixter shall pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Certificates for Reimbursement
     (d) . Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the L/C Issuer to demand compensation pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's right to demand such compensation, provided that no Borrower shall be required to compensate a Lender or the L/C Issuer pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section for any increased costs incurred or reductions suffered more than nine months prior to the date that such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, notifies Anixter of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's intention to claim compensation therefor (except that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the nine-month period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Delay in Requests
     (e) . Anixter shall pay (or cause the applicable Borrower to pay) to each Lender, as long as such Lender shall be required to maintain reserves with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency funds or deposits (currently known as "Eurocurrency liabilities"), additional interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Eurocurrency Rate Loan equal to the actual costs of such reserves allocated to such Loan by such Lender (as determined
Reserves on Eurocurrency Rate Loans
 
by such Lender in good faith, which determination shall be conclusive), which shall be due and payable on each date on which interest is payable on such Loan, Anixter shall have received at least 10 days' prior notice (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) of such additional interest from such Lender. If a Lender fails to give notice 10 days prior to the relevant Interest Payment Date, such additional interest shall be due and payable 10 days from receipt of such notice.
provided
     3.05 . Upon written demand of any Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) from time to time, each Borrower shall promptly compensate such Lender for and hold such Lender harmless from any loss, cost or expense incurred by it as a result of:
Funding Losses
     (a) any continuation, conversion, payment or prepayment of any Loan of such Borrower other than a Base Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan (whether voluntary, mandatory, automatic, by reason of acceleration, or otherwise);
     (b) any failure by such Borrower (for a reason other than the failure of such Lender to make a Loan) to prepay, borrow, continue or convert any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on the date or in the amount notified by such Borrower;
     (c) any failure by any Borrower to make payment of any Loan or drawing under any Letter of Credit (or interest due thereon) denominated in a Foreign Currency on its scheduled due date or any payment thereof in a different currency; or
     (d) any assignment of a Eurocurrency Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period therefor as a result of a request by such Borrower pursuant to ;including any loss of anticipated profits, any foreign exchange losses and any loss or expense arising from the liquidation or reemployment of funds obtained by it to maintain such Loan, from fees payable to terminate the deposits from which such funds were obtained or from the performance of any foreign exchange contract. The Borrowers shall pay each Lender the amount shown as due on any certificate delivered by such Lender claiming such compensation within ten (10) Business Days after the Borrowers' receipt of the same. Such Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by such Lender in connection with the foregoing.
Section 10.13(b)
     For purposes of calculating amounts payable by any Borrower to the Lenders under this , each Lender shall be deemed to have funded each Eurocurrency Rate Loan made by it at the Eurocurrency Rate for such Loan by a matching deposit or other borrowing in the applicable interbank market for such currency for a comparable amount and for a comparable period, whether or not such Eurocurrency Rate Loan was in fact so funded.
Section
3.05
     3.06 .
Matters Applicable to all Requests for Compensation
     (a) A certificate of the Administrative Agent or any Lender claiming compensation under this and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error. Such certificate shall provide in reasonable detail the amount payable and the calculations used to determine such amount. In determining such amount, the Administrative Agent or such Lender may use any reasonable averaging and attribution methods.
Article III
     (b) Upon any Lender's making a claim for compensation under or , Anixter may remove or replace such Lender in accordance with .
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 10.13(b)
     (c) Any Lender claiming any additional amounts payable pursuant to or , or exercising its rights under , shall use reasonable efforts (consistent with legal and
Section 3.01
Section
3.04
Section 3.02
 
regulatory restrictions) to file any certificate or document reasonably requested by Anixter or to change the jurisdiction of its Lending Office if the making of such a filing or change would avoid the need for or reduce the amount of any such additional amounts which may thereafter accrue or avoid the circumstances giving rise to such exercise and would not, in the sole determination of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.
     (d) If any Lender fails to notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent within 120 days of its actual knowledge of any such additional amount payable by a Borrower pursuant to or or (the ""), the Borrowers shall not be obligated to pay such additional amounts accruing during the period from the Notice Date until the date of delivery of such notice, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect any Borrower's obligation to pay such additional amounts accrued prior to the Notice Date or after delivery of such notice.
Section 3.01
3.04(a)
(b)
Notice Date
provided
     3.07 . All of the Borrowers' obligations under this shall survive termination of the Commitments and payment in full of all the other Obligations.
Survival
Article III
     3.08 .
Defaulting Lenders
     (a) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then, until such time as such Lender is no longer a Defaulting Lender, to the extent permitted by applicable law:
Defaulting Lender Adjustments
     (i) . Such Defaulting Lender's right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent with respect to this Agreement shall be restricted as set forth in the definition of Required Lenders.
Waivers and Amendments
     (ii) . Any payment of principal, interest, fees or other amounts received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Defaulting Lender (whether voluntary or mandatory, at maturity, pursuant to or otherwise) or received by the Administrative Agent from a Defaulting Lender pursuant to shall be applied at such time or times as may be determined by the Administrative Agent as follows: , to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Administrative Agent hereunder; , to the payment on a pro rata basis of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender hereunder; , if so determined by the Administrative Agent or requested by the L/C Issuer, to be held as Cash Collateral for the L/C Issuer's Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender; , as Anixter may request (so long as no Default or Event of Default exists), to the funding of any Loan in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has failed to fund its portion thereof as required by this Agreement, as determined by the Administrative Agent; , if so determined by the Administrative Agent and Anixter, to be held in a deposit account and released pro rata in order to (x) satisfy such Defaulting Lender's potential future funding obligations with respect to Loans under this Agreement and (y) Cash Collateralize the L/C Issuer's future Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender with respect to future Letters of Credit issued under this Agreement; , to the payment of any amounts owing to the Lenders, the L/C Issuer, the Swing Line Lender as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by any Lender, the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lender's breach of its obligations under this Agreement; , so long as no Default or Event of Default exists, to the payment of any amounts owing to Anixter as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by any Borrower against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lender's breach of its obligations under this Agreement; and , to such Defaulting Lender or as otherwise directed by a court of
Defaulting Lender Waterfall
Article VIII
Section 10.08
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
 
competent jurisdiction; that if (x) such payment is a payment of the principal amount of any Loans or L/C Obligations in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has not fully funded its appropriate share, and (y) such Loans were made or the related Letters of Credit were issued at a time when the conditions set forth in were satisfied or waived, such payment shall be applied solely to pay the Loans of, and L/C Obligations owed to, all Non-Defaulting Lenders on a pro rata basis prior to being applied to the payment of any Loans of, or L/C Obligations owed to, such Defaulting Lender until such time as all Loans and funded and unfunded participations in L/C Obligations or Swing Line Loans are held by the Lenders pro rata in accordance with the Commitments without giving effect to . Any payments, prepayments or other amounts paid or payable to a Defaulting Lender that are applied (or held) to pay amounts owed by a Defaulting Lender or to post Cash Collateral pursuant to this Section shall be deemed paid to and redirected by such Defaulting Lender, and each Lender irrevocably consents hereto.
provided
Section 4.02
Section 3.08(a)(iv)
     (iii) .
Certain Fees
     (A) No Defaulting Lender shall be entitled to receive any Commitment Fee for any period during which that Lender is a Defaulting Lender (and Anixter shall not be required to pay any such fee that otherwise would have been required to have been paid to that Defaulting Lender).
     (B) Each Defaulting Lender shall be entitled to receive any Letter of Credit Fee for any period during which that Lender is a Defaulting Lender only to the extent allocable to its Pro Rata Share of the stated amount of Letters of Credit for which it has provided Cash Collateral.
     (C) With respect to any Letter of Credit Fee not required to be paid to any Defaulting Lender pursuant to clause (A) or (B) above, Anixter shall (x) pay to each Non-Defaulting Lender that portion of any such fee otherwise payable to such Defaulting Lender with respect to such Defaulting Lender's participation in L/C Obligations or Swing Line Loans that has been reallocated to such Non-Defaulting Lender pursuant to clause (iv) below, (y) pay to the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender, as applicable, the amount of any such fee otherwise payable to such Defaulting Lender to the extent allocable to the L/C Issuer's or the Swing Line Lender's Fronting Exposure to such Defaulting Lender, and (z) not be required to pay the remaining amount of any such fee.
     (iv) . All or any part of such Defaulting Lender's participation in L/C Obligations and Swing Line Loans shall be reallocated among the Non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Pro Rata Shares (calculated without regard to such Defaulting Lender's Commitment) but only to the extent that (x) the conditions set forth in are satisfied at the time of such reallocation (and, unless Anixter shall have otherwise notified the Administrative Agent at such time, Anixter shall be deemed to have represented and warranted that such conditions are satisfied at such time), and (y) such reallocation does not cause the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Loans of any Non-Defaulting Lender to exceed such Non-Defaulting Lender's Commitment. No reallocation hereunder shall constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder against a Defaulting Lender arising from that Lender having become a Defaulting Lender, including any claim of a Non-Defaulting Lender as a result of such Non-Defaulting Lender's increased exposure following such reallocation.
Reallocation of Participations to Reduce Fronting Exposure
Section 4.02
     (v) . If the reallocation described in clause (iv) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, Anixter shall, without prejudice to any
Repayment of Certain Loans; Cash Collateral
 
right or remedy available to it hereunder or under law, (x) , prepay Swing Line Loans in amounts equal to the applicable Lenders' Fronting Exposure and (y) , Cash Collateralize the L/C Issuer's Fronting Exposure.
first
second
     (b) . If Anixter, the Administrative Agent, the Swing Line Lender and the L/C Issuer agree in writing that a Lender is no longer a Defaulting Lender, the Administrative Agent will so notify the parties hereto, whereupon as of the effective date specified in such notice and subject to any conditions set forth therein (which may include arrangements with respect to any Cash Collateral), that Lender will, to the extent applicable, purchase at par that portion of outstanding Loans of the other Lenders or take such other actions as the Administrative Agent may determine to be necessary to cause the Loans and funded and unfunded participations in Letters of Credit and Swing Line Loans to be held pro rata by the Lenders in accordance with the Commitments (without giving effect to ), whereupon such Lender will cease to be a Defaulting Lender; that no adjustments will be made retroactively with respect to fees accrued or payments made by or on behalf of Anixter while that Lender was a Defaulting Lender; and , , that except to the extent otherwise expressly agreed by the affected parties, no change hereunder from Defaulting Lender to Lender will constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder arising from that Lender's having been a Defaulting Lender.
Defaulting Lender Cure
Section 3.08(a)(iv)
provided
provided
further
     (c) . So long as any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, (i) the Swing Line Lender shall not be required to fund any Swing Line Loan unless it is satisfied that it will have no Fronting Exposure after giving effect to such Swing Line Loan and (ii) the L/C Issuer shall not be required to issue, extend, renew or increase any Letter of Credit unless it is satisfied that it will have no Fronting Exposure after giving effect thereto.
New Loans/Letters of Credit
     4.01 . The effectiveness of this Agreement and the obligation of each Lender to make its initial Credit Extension hereunder are subject to satisfaction of the following conditions precedent:
Conditions of Closing and Initial Credit Extension
     (a) Unless waived by all the Lenders, the Administrative Agent's receipt of the following, each of which shall be originals or facsimiles (followed promptly by originals) unless otherwise specified, each properly executed by a Responsible Officer of the signing Loan Party, each dated the Closing Date (or, in the case of certificates of governmental officials, a recent date before the Closing Date) and each in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its legal counsel:
     (i) executed counterparts of (A) this Agreement and (B) the Guaranty;
     (ii) Committed Loan Notes executed by the Borrowers in favor of each Lender requesting such a Note, each in a principal amount equal to such Lender's Commitment;
     (iii) Swing Line Loan Notes executed by the Borrowers in favor of the Swing Line Lender in the principal amount of the Swing Line Loan Commitment;
     (iv) such certificates of resolutions or other action, incumbency certificates and/or other certificates of Responsible Officers of each Loan Party as the Administrative Agent may require to establish the identities of and verify the authority and capacity of each Responsible Officer thereof authorized to act as a Responsible Officer in connection with the Loan Documents
 
to which such Loan Party is a party and authorizing the execution, delivery and performance by such Loan Party of the Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party;
     (v) such evidence as the Administrative Agent may reasonably require to verify that each Loan Party is duly organized or formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation (to the extent applicable in such jurisdiction), including certified copies of each Loan Party's Organization Documents and certificate of good standing (if applicable) and tax clearance certificates;
     (vi) a certificate signed by a Responsible Officer of each Borrower (A) certifying (i) that the conditions specified in and have been satisfied and (ii) that there has been no event or circumstance since the date of the Audited Financial Statements which has or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect and (B) attaching a copy of the Revolving Subordinated Note certified by a Responsible Officer of Anixter as true and complete, together with all schedules and exhibits thereto;
Sections 4.02(a)
(b)
     (vii) opinion(s) of counsel to each Loan Party addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders with respect to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents and such other matters as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request; and
     (viii) such other assurances, certificates, documents or consents as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders reasonably may require.
     (b) Each of the Borrowers and each of the Guarantors shall have provided to the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers the documentation and other information requested in order to comply with requirements of the PATRIOT Act.
     (c) All existing Indebtedness (including all Indebtedness under the Existing Credit Agreement) of the Borrowers, other than the Existing Letters of Credit and any Existing Indebtedness, shall be repaid in full (and all commitments in respect thereof shall be terminated, all guaranties made in connection therewith shall be released), and the Administrative Agent shall have received pay-off letters in form and substance satisfactory to it evidencing such repayment, termination and release.
     (d) Any fees required to be paid on or before the Closing Date shall have been paid (including, without limitation, (i) the fees to be paid pursuant to to the Administrative Agent, the Joint Lead Arrangers and the Lenders and any other accrued and unpaid fees or commissions due hereunder and (ii) all fees, charges and disbursements of outside counsel to the Administrative Agent (directly to such counsel if requested by the Administrative Agent) to the extent accrued and unpaid prior to or on the Closing Date, plus such additional amounts of such fees, charges and disbursements as shall constitute its reasonable estimate of such fees, charges and disbursements incurred or to be incurred by it through the closing proceedings ( that such estimate shall not thereafter preclude a final settling of accounts between the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent)).
Section 2.11(b)
provided
     Without limiting the generality of the provisions or the last paragraph of , for purposes of determining compliance with the conditions specified in this , each Lender that has signed this Agreement shall be deemed to have consented to, approved or accepted or to be satisfied with, each document or other matter required thereunder to be consented to or approved by or acceptable or satisfactory to a Lender unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from such Lender prior to the proposed Closing Date specifying its objection thereto.
Section 9.03
Section 4.01
 
     4.02 . The obligation of each Lender to honor any Borrowing Notice (other than a Borrowing Notice requesting only a conversion of Committed Loans to the other Type, or a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type) or Letter of Credit Application is subject to the following conditions precedent:
Conditions to all Credit Extensions
     (a) The representations and warranties of the Borrowers contained in , or which are contained in any document furnished at any time under or in connection herewith, shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Credit Extension, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
Article V
     (b) No Default shall exist, or would result (including in respect of or as of the next succeeding end of a Fiscal Quarter) from, such proposed Credit Extension.
Section 7.16
7.17
     (c) The Administrative Agent shall have received a Borrowing Notice or Letter of Credit Application in accordance with the requirements hereof.
     (d) The Administrative Agent shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to it, such other assurances, certificates, documents or consents related to the foregoing as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders reasonably may require.
     Each Borrowing Notice (other than a Borrowing Notice requesting only a conversion of Committed Loans to the other Type, or a continuation of Committed Loans as the same Type) or Letter of Credit Application submitted by a Borrower shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty that the conditions specified in and have been satisfied on and as of the date of the applicable Credit Extension.
Sections 4.02(a)
(b)
     Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that:
     5.01 . Each of AXE, Anixter and the Subsidiaries of Anixter (a) is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, (b) is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction in which it owns or leases real property or in which the nature of its business requires it to be so qualified, except those jurisdictions where the failure to be in good standing or to so qualify has not had or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and (c) has all requisite corporate power and authority to own, operate and encumber its property and assets and to conduct its business as presently conducted and as proposed to be conducted in connection with and following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents.
Organization; Corporate Powers
     5.02 .
Authority
     (a) Each of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter party to any of the Transaction Documents has the requisite corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under each of the Transaction Documents executed by it, or to be executed by it.
     (b) The execution, delivery and performance (or filing or recording, as the case may be) by AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter of each Transaction Document to which such Person is
 
party and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action, and no other corporate proceedings on the part of any such Person are necessary to consummate such transactions.
     (c) Each of the Transaction Documents (i) has been duly executed and delivered (or filed or recorded, as the case may be) by AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter to the extent such Person is party thereto, (ii) constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligations of such Person, enforceable against such Person in accordance with its terms (except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by general equitable principles), and (iii) is in full force and effect (unless terminated in accordance with the terms thereof).
     5.03 . Anixter has no Subsidiaries other than those described in and those, if any, which are permitted by to be created after the Closing Date.
Subsidiaries
Schedule 5.03
Section 7.03
     5.04 . The execution, delivery and performance by each of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter of each Transaction Document to which it is party and each of the transactions contemplated thereby, do not and will not (a) conflict with any Contractual Obligation of any such Person, any liability resulting from which would have or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (b) conflict with or violate such Person's certificate or articles of incorporation or by-laws or similar charter and constituting documents, or (c) except as set forth on , conflict with, result in a breach of or constitute (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) a default under any Requirement of Law or Contractual Obligation of any such Person, or require termination of any Contractual Obligation of any such Person, or (d) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien whatsoever upon any of the properties or assets of any such Person (other than Liens permitted pursuant to ), or (e) require any approval of stockholders of any such Person, unless such approval has been obtained.
No Conflict
Schedule 5.04
Section 7.02(b)
     5.05 . The execution, delivery and performance by each of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter of each Transaction Document to which such Person is a party, and the transactions contemplated thereby do not and will not require any registration with, consent or approval of, or notice to, or other action with or by, any Governmental Authority, except filings, consents or notices which have been made, obtained or given and are in full force and effect.
Governmental Consents
     5.06 . Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any of Anixter's Subsidiaries is subject to regulation under the Federal Power Act, the Interstate Commerce Act, the Investment Company Act of 1940 or any other statute or regulation of any Governmental Authority such that its ability to incur indebtedness is limited or its ability to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby or by the other Transaction Documents is materially impaired.
Governmental Regulation
     5.07 .
Financial Position
     (a) As of the Closing Date, all quarterly and annual financial statements of Anixter or of Anixter and any of its Subsidiaries delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders (including the Audited Financial Statements) were prepared in conformity with GAAP (except as otherwise noted therein) and fairly present the financial position of Anixter or the consolidated financial position of Anixter and such Subsidiaries, as the case may be, as at the respective dates thereof and the results of operations and changes in cash flows for each of the periods covered thereby, subject, in the case of any unaudited interim financial statements, to changes resulting from audit and normal year-end adjustments.
 
     (b) All quarterly and annual financial statements of Anixter or of Anixter and any of its Subsidiaries delivered to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date this representation is made or deemed made were prepared in conformity with GAAP (except as otherwise noted there) and fairly present the financial position of Anixter or the consolidated financial position of Anixter and such Subsidiaries, as the case may be, as at the respective dates thereof and the results of operations and changes in cash flows for each of the periods covered thereby, subject, in the case of any unaudited interim financial statements, to changes resulting from audit and normal year-end adjustments.
     5.08 .
Litigation; Adverse Effects
     (a) Except as set forth in , there is no action, suit, proceeding, investigation of any Governmental Authority or arbitration at law or in equity, or before or by any Governmental Authority, pending, or, to the best knowledge of such Borrower, threatened against AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or any of their Property, which could be reasonably expected to result in any Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.08
     (b) Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter is (i) in violation of any applicable Law which violation has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (ii) subject to or in default with respect to any final judgment, writ, injunction, decree, order, rule or regulation of any court or Governmental Authority which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no action, suit, proceeding or investigation pending or, to the knowledge of such Borrower, threatened against or affecting AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter which challenges the validity or the enforceability of any of the Transaction Documents.
     5.09 . With respect to each of AXE, Anixter and Anixter and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, no event has occurred since December 31, 2010, which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
No Material Adverse Change
     5.10 . All United States Federal income and other material tax returns and reports of each Borrower and each Borrower's Subsidiaries required to be filed (including extensions) have been timely filed and all taxes, assessments, fees and other charges of Governmental Authorities thereupon and upon their respective properties, assets, income and franchises which are shown on such returns as being due and payable, have been paid when due and payable, except (a) taxes being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and that are reserved against in accordance with GAAP, (b) taxes which are not yet delinquent, (c) taxes which are payable in installments so long as paid before any penalty accrues with respect thereto and (d) other taxes, assessments, fees and other charges or Governmental Authorities which do not exceed US$500,000 in the aggregate. Except as set forth in clauses (a) through (d) above, such Borrower has no knowledge of any proposed tax assessment against Anixter or any of Anixter's Subsidiaries which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Taxes
     5.11 . Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter is in default in the performance, observance or fulfillment of any of the obligations, covenants or conditions contained in any Contractual Obligation applicable to it the effect of which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and no condition exists which, with the giving of notice or the lapse of time or both, would constitute a default under such Contractual Obligation, except where the consequences, direct or indirect, of such default or defaults, if any, would not have and could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Performance
 
     5.12 . Neither AXE nor Anixter nor any of Anixter's Subsidiaries (a) is engaged in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any Margin Stock or (b) will use, directly or indirectly, the proceeds of any Loan to purchase or carry Margin Stock.
Securities Activities
     5.13 . Subject to changes in facts or conditions which are required or permitted under this Agreement, the representations and warranties of AXE, each Borrower and each Subsidiary of each Borrower contained in the Transaction Documents, and all certificates and other documents delivered to the Administrative Agent in connection therewith, taken as a whole, do not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained herein or therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Disclosure
     5.14 . Each of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter is in compliance with all Requirements of Law (including, without limitation, the Securities Act and the Securities Exchange Act, the applicable rules and regulations thereunder, and state securities laws) applicable to it and its business, where the failure to so comply would have or could be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Requirements of Law
     5.15 . Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter owns, is licensed or otherwise has the lawful right to use, or has all permits and other approvals of Governmental Authorities, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes used in or necessary for the conduct of its business as currently conducted which are material to its financial condition, business, operations, assets and prospects, individually or taken as a whole. The use of such permits and other approvals of Governmental Authorities, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes by each Borrower or any such Subsidiary does not infringe on the rights of any Person, subject to such claims and infringements the existence of which do not have or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not impair the ownership of or rights under (or the license or other right to use, as the case may be) any permits and governmental approvals, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, technology, know-how or processes by Anixter or any such Subsidiary in any manner which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Patents, Trademarks, Permits, Etc
     5.16 . Except as disclosed in and except to the extent that a failure of any of the following representations to be true could not be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, (a) each of the operations of AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries comply in all respects with all applicable environmental, health and safety Requirements of Law; (b) each of AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries has obtained all environmental, health and safety Permits necessary for its operations, all such Permits are in good standing and AXE, Anixter and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with all terms and conditions of such Permits; and (c) (i) neither AXE, Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter, nor any of their present Property or operations and (ii) none of AXE's, Anixter's or its Subsidiaries' previously-owned Property or past operations is subject to any Remedial Action or other Liabilities and Costs arising from the Release or threatened Release of a Contaminant into the environment.
Environmental Matters
Schedule 5.16
     5.17 . No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. As of each date that this representation is made or deemed made, the present value of all "accumulated projected benefit obligations" (as determined for purposes of Anixter's Form 10-K) of all underfunded Pension Plans (based on the assumptions used by the Plans to determine benefit obligations on an ongoing basis) did
Employee Benefit Matters
 
not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than US$75,000,000 the fair market value of all of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
     5.18 . Each Loan Party is Solvent after giving effect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and the payment and accrual of all Transaction Costs with respect to any of the foregoing.
Solvency
     5.19 . Each of AXE, Anixter and each Subsidiary of Anixter (other than the Receivables Securitization SPV) has good title to all of the assets (tangible and intangible) owned by it, except for imperfections of title (including Liens to the extent permitted under ) which in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and all such assets are free and clear of all Liens, except as otherwise specifically permitted by the terms and provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. Substantially all of the assets and properties owned by, leased to or used by each Borrower or any Domestic Subsidiary of Anixter are in good repair, working order and condition, excepting ordinary wear and tear and are free and clear of any known defects except such defects as do not substantially interfere with the continued use thereof in the conduct of normal operations.
Assets and Properties
Section 7.02(b)
     5.20 . Except as set forth in or as otherwise permitted in this Agreement, neither AXE nor Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter is engaged in any material partnership or material joint venture with any other Person.
Joint Venture; Partnership
Schedule 5.20
     5.21 . No Default exists.
No Default
     5.22 . On or after the Closing Date, neither Anixter nor any Subsidiary of Anixter has directly or indirectly declared, ordered, paid or made or set apart any sum or property for any payment, distribution or contribution to or investment in AXE (whether in cash or otherwise) or agreed to do so, except to the extent permitted pursuant to .
Restricted Payments to AXE
Section 7.05
     5.23 . To induce each Lender and the Administrative Agent to enter into this Agreement and to make the Loans, each Borrower represents and warrants to each Lender and the Administrative Agent that the statements set forth in the preceding Sections of this (except to the extent that such statements expressly are made only as of the Closing Date), are true, correct and complete in all material respects on and as of the date of each Credit Extension after the Closing Date, except that the representations and warranties need not be true and correct to the extent that changes in the facts and conditions on which such representations and warranties are based are expressly required or permitted under this Agreement.
Subsequent Funding Representations and Warranties
Article V
     So long as any Lender shall have any Commitment hereunder or any Loan or other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied,
     6.01 . Each Borrower shall, and shall cause each of its material Subsidiaries to, maintain or cause to be maintained a system of accounting established and administered in accordance with sound business practices and consistent with past practice to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and, if required by the terms of this Agreement, in conformity with Agreement Accounting Principles, and each of the financial statements described below shall be prepared from such system and records. Anixter shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements
 
     (a) . As soon as practicable, and in any event within forty-five (45) days after the end of each Fiscal Quarter, on a consolidated basis for the Consolidated Group, each of the following:
Quarterly Reports
     (i) a balance sheet as of the end of such Fiscal Quarter and as of the end of the previous Fiscal Year; and
     (ii) an income statement and a cash flow statement of such Fiscal Quarter and for the period from the beginning of the current Fiscal Year to the end of such Fiscal Quarter, setting forth in each case in comparative form and in reasonable detail the figures for the corresponding periods of the previous Fiscal Year;
     all prepared by Anixter, together with a certification by one of Anixter's Financial Officers that they fairly represent the financial condition of the Persons covered thereby as at the dates indicated in accordance with GAAP, subject to changes resulting from audit and normal year-end adjustments and the absence of footnotes.
     (b) . As soon as practicable, and in any event within ninety (90) days after the end of each Fiscal Year on a consolidated basis for the Consolidated Group, annual financial statements consisting of a balance sheet, income statement and cash flow statement, setting forth in comparative form in each case the consolidated figures for the previous Fiscal Year all in reasonable detail, and accompanied by an opinion (unqualified as to scope or going concern and which is not adverse) thereon of Ernst & Young LLP or other firm of independent certified public accountants of recognized national standing regularly retained by Anixter and acceptable to the Administrative Agent, which report shall state that such financial statements present fairly the financial position of the Persons covered thereby as at the dates indicated and the results of their operations and cash flow for the periods indicated in conformity with GAAP applied on a basis consistent with prior years (or, in the event of a change in accounting principles, such accountants' concurrence with such change) and that such firm's audit has been conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards.
Annual Reports
     (c) . As soon as practicable, but in any event not later than seventy-five (75) days after the end of each Fiscal Year, on a consolidated basis for the Consolidated Group, a copy of the operating budget by Anixter of the income statement, balance sheet and cash flow of the Consolidated Group, taken as a whole, for the next succeeding Fiscal Year of Anixter, all in form customarily prepared by Anixter's management, such operating budget to be accompanied by a certificate of one of Anixter's Financial Officers to the effect that such operating budget has been prepared on the basis believed by Anixter to be reasonable.
Budget and Business Plan
     (d) . Together with each delivery of the financial statements pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) above, (i) an Officers' Certificate of Anixter stating that the signers have reviewed the terms of this Agreement and the Loan Documents, and have made, or caused to be made under their supervision, a review in reasonable detail of the transactions and condition of Anixter and its Subsidiaries, during the accounting period covered by such financial statements, and that such review has not disclosed the existence during or at the end of such accounting period, and that the signers do not have knowledge of the existence, as at the date of the Officers' Certificate, of any condition or event which constitutes a Default, or, if any such condition or event existed or exists, specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action Anixter has taken, is taking and proposes to take with respect thereto; (ii) a Compliance Certificate (A) demonstrating in reasonable detail compliance during and at the end of such accounting periods with the provisions set forth in and and (B) reporting the Debt Ratings; and (iii) a written discussion and analysis by the management of Anixter of such financial statements.
Compliance Certificate; MD&A
Section 7.16
Section
7.17
 
     (e) . Simultaneously with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in subsection (b) above, a statement of the firm of independent certified public accountants which reported on such financial statements whether anything has come to their attention to cause them to believe that there existed on the date of such statements any Default.
Accountant's Compliance Certificate
     (f) . Promptly upon Anixter obtaining knowledge (i) of any condition or event which constitutes a Default, or (ii) of any condition or event which has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, an Officers' Certificate specifying the nature and period of existence of any such condition or event and what action Anixter has taken, is taking and proposes to take with respect thereto.
Report of Material Events
     (g) . (i) Promptly after learning thereof, notice of the institution of any action, suit, proceeding, governmental investigation or arbitration against or affecting Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter involving claims in excess of US$25,000,000 except where the same is fully covered (other than any applicable co-insurance or deductible) by insurance (other than insurance in the nature of retro-premium insurance or other self insurance programs); and (ii) promptly upon learning thereof, notice of any investigation or proceeding before or by any Governmental Authority, the effect of which might limit, prohibit or restrict materially the manner in which Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter currently conducts its business or to declare any substance contained in the products manufactured or distributed by it to be dangerous, if such investigation or proceeding has or could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Notice of Claims and Proceedings
     (h) . Prompt written notice of the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, such written notice to describe such ERISA Event or Events and the action, if any, which Anixter or such ERISA Affiliate has taken, is taking and proposes to take with respect thereto.
ERISA Matters
     (i) . On a timely basis, copies of all financial statements, reports and notices, if any, sent or made available generally by AXE or Anixter to the holders of its publicly-held securities, if any, or filed with the Commission, concerning developments in the business of AXE, Anixter or any of Anixter's Subsidiaries that individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Publicly Distributed Information
     (j) . Promptly after learning thereof, (i) notice of any change in any Debt Ratings for Anixter and (ii) a copy of each notice or other written communication received by Anixter from S&P, Moody's or Fitch relating to any of the Debt Ratings.
Debt Ratings
     (k) . Commencing December 1, 2014 and every two weeks thereafter until the 2015 Senior Notes have been repaid, refinanced or defeased, an Officers' Certificate of Anixter, setting forth in reasonable detail calculations demonstrating that (i) the Leverage Ratio (determined as of the Fiscal Quarter most recently ended for which financial statements have been provided) is less than or equal to 2.75 to 1.00 and (ii) the sum of unrestricted domestic cash the unused portion of the Aggregate Commitments the amount available to be drawn under the ARS Facility (provided that the ARS Facility does not mature prior to May 30, 2015) as of the date of such certificate is equal to or greater than US$175,000,000.
2015 Senior Notes Certificate
plus
plus
     (l) . Such other information respecting the financial condition of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter, or their respective business, operations, assets, performance or prospects, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender through the Administrative Agent may from time to time reasonably request, including, without limitation, financial projections, business plans and any information such Person's accountants may have prepared with respect to such Person's financial
Other Information
 
condition, its business, operations, assets, performance and prospects. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall treat any non-public information so obtained as confidential in accordance with hereof.
Section 10.07
     Each Borrower hereby acknowledges that (a) the Administrative Agent and/or the Joint Lead Arrangers will make available to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer materials and/or information provided by or on behalf of such Borrower hereunder (collectively, "") by posting the Borrower Materials on SyndTrak Online or another similar electronic system (the "") and (b) certain of the Lenders (each, a "") may have personnel who do not wish to receive material non-public information with respect to any of the Borrowers or their respective Affiliates, or the respective securities of any of the foregoing, and who may be engaged in investment and other market-related activities with respect to such Persons' securities. Each Borrower hereby agrees that (w) all Borrower Materials that are to be made available to Public Lenders shall be clearly and conspicuously marked "PUBLIC" which, at a minimum, shall mean the word "PUBLIC" shall appear prominently on the first page thereof; that any Borrower Materials not conspicuously marked as "" shall be assumed by all parties to be private and confidential and shall be made available only to those Lenders that are not Public Lenders until further written notice from the Borrowers; (x) by marking Borrower Materials "PUBLIC," the Borrowers shall be deemed to have authorized the Administrative Agent, the Joint Lead Arrangers, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders to treat such Borrower Materials as not containing any material non-public information with respect to the Borrowers or their respective securities for purposes of United States Federal and state securities laws (, , that to the extent such Borrower Materials constitute Information, they shall be treated as set forth in the ); (y) all Borrower Materials marked "PUBLIC" are permitted to be made available through a portion of the Platform designated "Public Investor;" and (z) the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers shall be entitled to treat any Borrower Materials that are not marked "PUBLIC" as being suitable only for posting on a portion of the Platform not designated "Public Investor."
Borrower Materials
Platform
Public Lender
provided
PUBLIC
provided
however
Section 10.07
     6.02 . Anixter shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender in writing, promptly upon Anixter's learning thereof, of any of the following which, in each case or together, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect:
Environmental Notices
     (a) notice that any Property of Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter is subject to an Environmental Lien; or
     (b) notice to Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter or awareness by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter of a condition which could reasonably be expected to result in (i) a notice of violation of any environmental health or safety Requirement of Law or (ii) any Liabilities and Costs with respect to any Release or threatened Release of any Contaminant into the environment.
     6.03 Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, at all times, maintain its corporate existence and preserve and keep in full force and effect its rights and franchises, except as otherwise expressly permitted in and except with respect to any Subsidiary which has no material assets or liabilities. Following the end of each Fiscal Quarter, Anixter shall promptly provide the Administrative Agent and each of the Lenders with a complete list of its Subsidiaries, including any changes in the list set forth on hereto with respect to Subsidiaries having assets in excess of US$1,000,000 individually or US$5,000,000 in the aggregate.
Corporate Existence, Etc.
Section 7.08
Schedule 5.03
     6.04 Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, qualify and remain qualified to do business in each jurisdiction in which the nature of its business requires it to be so qualified, except in those jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify does not have or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Corporate Powers, Etc.
 
     6.05 . Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Requirements of Law, and all material Contractual Obligations affecting it or its business, properties, assets or operations, except where the failure so to comply does not have or could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws
     6.06 . Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay (a) all material taxes, assessments and other governmental charges imposed upon it or on any of its properties or assets or in respect of any of its franchises, business, income or property before any penalty or interest accrues thereon, and (b) all material claims (including, without limitation, claims for labor, services, materials and supplies) for sums which have become due and payable and which by law have or may become a Lien (other than a Customary Permitted Lien) upon any of its properties or assets, prior to the time when any penalty or fine shall be incurred with respect thereto no such taxes, assessments and governmental charges referred to in clause (a) above or claims referred to in clause (b) above need to be paid if being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and if such reserve or other appropriate provision, if any, as shall be required in conformity with GAAP shall have been made therefor.
Payment of Taxes and Claims
; provided that
     6.07 . Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain or cause to be maintained in good repair, working order and condition, excepting ordinary wear and tear and damage, due to casualty or condemnation, all Property material to its operations and will make or cause to be made all appropriate repairs, renewals and replacements thereof. Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain with financially sound insurance companies, the insurance policies and programs, including, self-insurance retention levels, listed on hereto (or substantially similar programs or policies and amounts or other programs, policies and amounts acceptable to the Required Lenders) insuring all Property and other assets material to the operations of Anixter and its Subsidiaries against loss or damage by fire, theft, burglary, pilferage and loss in transit and business interruption, together with such other hazards as are reasonably consistent with prudent industry practice, and maintain product and other liability insurance consistent with prudent industry practice with financially sound insurance companies licensed to do business in the states where such Property is located. Not later than sixty (60) days after the renewal, replacement or material modification of any policy or program, Anixter shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent (in sufficient quantity for each of the Lenders, which the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to each Lender) a detailed schedule setting forth for each such policy or program: (a) the amount of such policy, (b) the risks insured against by such policy, (c) the name of the insurer, and (d) the policy number of such policy.
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
Schedule 6.07
     6.08 . Each Borrower shall permit, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to permit, any authorized representative(s) designated by any Lender, the Administrative Agent to visit and inspect any of its properties, including financial and accounting records, and to make copies and take extracts therefrom, and to discuss its affairs, finances and accounts with its officers or independent certified public accountants, all upon reasonable notice and at such reasonable time and as often as may be reasonably requested. Each such visitation and inspection made by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent shall be at the Borrowers' expense. Any visitation and inspection made by or on behalf any Lender shall be at such Lender's expense.
Inspection of Property; Books and Records; Discussions
     6.09 . Each Borrower shall obtain and maintain, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to obtain and maintain, in full force and effect all licenses, franchises, Permits or other rights necessary for the operation of its business, except where the failure to obtain or maintain such licenses, franchises, Permits or rights does not have and could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Maintenance of Permits
 
     6.10 . Each Borrower shall establish, maintain and operate, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to establish, maintain and operate, all Plans in all material respects in compliance with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Code and all other applicable Laws, and the regulations and interpretations thereunder, and the respective requirements of the governing documents for such Plans. Each Borrower shall, and Anixter shall cause each of its Subsidiaries and other ERISA Affiliates to, establish, maintain and operate all Foreign Employee Benefit Plans to comply in all material respects with all laws, regulations and rules applicable thereto and the respective requirements of the governing documents for such Foreign Employee Benefit Plans.
Employee Benefit Matters
     6.11 . Upon the request of the Administrative Agent and/or the Required Lenders, Anixter will promptly cause each material Subsidiary that shall not then be a Guarantor under the Guaranty (other than (a) any Foreign Subsidiary (except as provided below), (b) any Receivables Securitization SPV or (c) any Subsidiary with no significant assets or operations) to execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent: an instrument satisfactory in form and substance to the Administrative Agent under which it shall undertake the obligations of a Guarantor, together with such evidence as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request as to the corporate power and authority of such Subsidiary to execute the foregoing instrument and perform its obligations thereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if at any time the Administrative Agent, in its reasonable judgment, determines that the assets or operations of Anixter Puerto Rico, Inc., Anixter Philippines Inc., Anixter Thailand Inc. or Anixter Venezuela Inc. have become material, such Subsidiary shall execute and deliver the aforementioned documents to the Administrative Agent.
Additional Guarantors
     6.12 . The proceeds of the Credit Extensions may be used to (a) repay, refinance or defease, as applicable, certain Indebtedness of the Borrowers (including, without limitation, Indebtedness under the Existing Credit Agreement) in accordance with the terms hereof and pay any fees, commissions and expenses incurred in connection with any of the foregoing, (b) make certain payments to AXE in accordance with and (c) provide ongoing working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and for other general corporate purposes of the Borrowers and their respective Subsidiaries.
Use of Proceeds
Section 7.05
     6.13 . (a) Commencing December 1, 2014 and at all times thereafter until the date on which Anixter refinances, repays or defeases in full the 2015 Senior Notes (the ""), the Borrowers shall maintain (i) a Leverage Ratio of less than or equal to 2.75 to 1.00 (determined as of the Fiscal Quarter most recently ended for which financial statements have been provided) and (ii) unrestricted domestic cash the unused portion of the Aggregate Commitments the amount available to be drawn under the ARS Facility (provided that the ARS Facility does not mature prior to May 30, 2015) in an amount equal to or greater than US$175,000,000; and (b) at least five Business Days (or such shorter period agreed to by the Administrative Agent) prior to the Repayment Date, Anixter shall deliver an Officer's Certificate, in form and substance reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, demonstrating compliance with clauses (a)(i) and (a)(ii) above, in each case calculated on a pro forma basis as of such Repayment Date and giving effect to such repayment, refinancing or defeasance.
2015 Senior Notes
Repayment Date
plus
plus
     So long as any Lender shall have any Commitment hereunder, any Loan or other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied:
     7.01 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any member of the Consolidated Group to, directly or indirectly create, incur, assume or otherwise become or remain directly or indirectly liable with respect to any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness
 
     (a) the Obligations;
     (b) the Existing Indebtedness;
     (c) Indebtedness in respect of Accommodation Obligations permitted by
     ;
Section 7.04
     (d) Indebtedness of any Subsidiary to Anixter or any other Subsidiary;
     (e) Indebtedness of Anixter to any Subsidiary;
     (f) other unsecured Indebtedness of Anixter pari passu or subordinated in right of payment with the Obligations;
     (g) other unsecured Indebtedness of Anixter's Subsidiaries that are Guarantors pari passu or subordinated in right of payment with the Obligations;
     (h) unsecured Indebtedness of Anixter's Subsidiaries that are not Guarantors, the principal amount of which does not exceed in the aggregate US$200,000,000 at any one time outstanding;
     (i) Indebtedness arising under Receivables Securitization Transactions in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding not to exceed US$400,000,000; and
     (j) Indebtedness under Hedging Contracts permitted under ;
Section 7.14
that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of all Subsidiaries that are not Guarantors owing to Persons other than to Anixter or another Subsidiary at any time (other than Indebtedness (A) in respect of the Obligations or (B) arising under Receivables Securitization Transactions) shall not exceed US$200,000,000.
provided
     7.02 .
Sales of Assets; Liens
     (a) . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly sell, assign, transfer, lease, convey or otherwise Dispose of any properties or assets, including, without limitation, any capital stock of any Subsidiary, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, or any income or profits therefrom, except for:
Limitation on Sales
     (i) sales of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
     (ii) the Disposition of obsolete equipment in the ordinary course of business;
     (iii) sales by Anixter of stock of a Subsidiary held by it, in any transaction or series of related transactions not constituting a Material Transaction, individually or taken together;
     (iv) sales, assignments, transfers, leases, conveyances or other dispositions of other assets, other than the stock of any Subsidiary, for cash consideration and for not less than fair market value which do not constitute a Material Transaction individually or in the aggregate (together with all sales of stock of any Subsidiary under clause (iii) above);
     (v) sales, assignments, transfers, leases, conveyances or other Dispositions of assets to Anixter or a Subsidiary;
 
     (vi) transfers of assets to any Affiliate for less than fair market value to the extent such transfer constitutes a permitted Investment pursuant to ; and
Section 7.03
     (vii) Receivables Securitization Transactions as to which the outstanding aggregate investments and principal amount of claims held at any time by all purchasers, assignees and other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables and other rights to payment in all Receivables Securitization Transactions shall not at any time exceed in the aggregate US$400,000,000.
     (b) . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on or with respect to any of its Property (including all capital stock of any Subsidiary of Anixter) except:
Liens
     (i) Customary Permitted Liens;
     (ii) Permitted Existing Liens;
     (iii) Liens on assets of any joint venture described in ;
Section 7.03(f)
     (iv) (A) Liens on Property existing at the time of acquisition thereof by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries and not created in contemplation of such acquisition; and (B) Liens securing purchase money Indebtedness for Property to the extent the aggregate outstanding principal amount of such Indebtedness does not exceed US$50,000,000, is permitted under and the value of the Property securing such Indebtedness approximates the amount of such Indebtedness;
Section 7.01
     (v) Liens with respect to judgments or attachments which do not result in an Event of Default or Default hereunder;
     (vi) Liens on the assets of Foreign Subsidiaries which are not Borrowers; the aggregate amount of Indebtedness secured by such Liens shall not exceed the Dollar Equivalent of US$50,000,000;
provided
     (vii) Liens arising in connection with Receivables Securitization Transactions; that the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held at any time by all purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables and other rights to payment in all Receivables Securitization Transactions shall not at any time exceed in the aggregate US$400,000,000; and
provided
     (viii) Liens not otherwise permitted hereunder in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $5,000,000 at any time outstanding.
     7.03 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly make or commit to make any advance, loan, extension of credit or capital contribution, or purchase of any stock, bonds, notes, debentures or other securities or evidences of indebtedness of, or make any other investment in, any Person, including, without limitation, any Affiliate of Anixter (all such transactions being referred to as "") except:
Investments
Investments
     (a) Investments by Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries in Cash Equivalents;
     (b) Investments made prior to the date hereof and set forth on ;
Schedule 7.03
 
     (c) Investments arising from sales in the ordinary course of business on customary trade terms;
     (d) Investments constituting loans by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter to its employees not in excess of an aggregate amount of US$10,000,000 outstanding at any one time;
     (e) Investments in connection with the acquisition by Anixter or any Subsidiary of substantially all of the assets or all of the capital stock of any Person so long as no Default exists or would result therefrom;
     (f) Investments in any joint ventures and Investments in connection with the purchase of any other Person's interest in any such joint ventures, which do not exceed US$50,000,000 in the aggregate outstanding at any one time;
     (g) Investments (other than those set forth on ) in notes receivable received in connection with transactions permitted pursuant to ; , the aggregate amount of such Investments at any one time outstanding shall not exceed US$300,000,000;
Schedule 7.03
Section 7.02(a)(vii)
provided
     (h) Investments by Anixter in any Subsidiary of Anixter;
     (i) Investments by any Subsidiary of Anixter in Anixter or in any other Subsidiary of Anixter;
     (j) Investments constituting loans permitted by or Accommodation Obligations permitted under ; and
Section 7.01(d)
Section 7.04
     (k) other Investments not to exceed US$50,000,000 in the aggregate outstanding at any time.
     7.04 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly, create or become or be liable with respect to any Accommodation Obligation involving Indebtedness of AXE or any Affiliate of AXE which is not a Subsidiary of Anixter. In addition, no Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, create or become or be liable with respect to any Accommodation Obligation except:
Accommodation Obligations
     (a) guaranties resulting from endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business;
     (b) Accommodation Obligations arising in connection with the Transaction Documents;
     (c) Accommodation Obligations by Anixter with respect to lessees' obligations to third-party lessors under leases of Property purchased from Anixter and its Subsidiaries, in an aggregate amount not to exceed US$5,000,000;
     (d) Accommodation Obligations of Anixter and its Subsidiaries arising in connection with Hedging Contracts entered into with any of the Lenders; and
 
     (e) other Accommodation Obligations by Anixter and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount outstanding at any time not to exceed US$175,000,000; , , that no such Accommodation Obligations shall be entered into or incurred after the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default or Default.
provided
however
     7.05 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary of Anixter to, directly or indirectly declare or make any payment, distribution or contribution to or investment in AXE (whether in cash or otherwise), that:
Payments to AXE
provided
     (a) so long as no Event of Default or Default exists or would result from such payment, Anixter may make cash payments to AXE if either (i) the proceeds of such payment are immediately used by AXE to pay dividends or repurchase shares of its stock (or warrants, options or other rights in respect of such shares) the aggregate amount of all such payments made after the Closing Date does not exceed the sum of (A) US$175,000,000 and (B) 50% of cumulative Consolidated Net Income for all Fiscal Quarters ending after the Closing Date; or (ii) the proceeds of such payment are immediately used by AXE to prepay, purchase or redeem outstanding Indebtedness of AXE so long as (A) the Leverage Ratio shall be less than or equal to 2.75 to 1.00 (calculated on a pro forma basis as of such prepayment date and after giving effect to such prepayment, purchase or redemption) and (B) the unrestricted domestic cash of the Borrowers the unused portion of the Aggregate Commitments the amount available to be drawn under the ARS Facility (provided that such ARS Facility does not mature prior to the date that is 90 days after the maturity of the 1% senior convertible notes due February 15, 2013, issued by AXE pursuant to that certain Indenture dated as of February 16, 2007 between AXE and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as trustee) shall be equal to or greater than US$175,000,000 (calculated on a pro forma basis as of such prepayment date and after giving effect to such prepayment, purchase or redemption);
and
plus
plus
     (b) Anixter and its Subsidiaries may make declare and make payments to AXE so that AXE may pay any directors' fees and reasonable allocated expenses in an aggregate amount not to exceed US$5,000,000 during any Fiscal Year; and
     (c) Anixter and its Subsidiaries may make payments to AXE (i) that are applied by AXE to pay its actual income tax liabilities in respect of income earned by Anixter and its Subsidiaries, (ii) that are in repayment of intercompany loans made by AXE to Anixter or such Subsidiary or (iii) that are applied by AXE to make any cash settlements to management or employees under equity awards consistent with its past practice not in excess of US$5,000,000 in the aggregate during any calendar year.
     7.06 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly engage in any business other than the business engaged in by Anixter and all of its Subsidiaries on the date hereof and any business activities substantially similar or related thereto.
Conduct of Business
     7.07 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any other Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly enter into or permit to exist any transaction (including, without limitation, the purchase, sale, lease or exchange of any property or the rendering of any service) with any of its Affiliates that are not Subsidiaries of Anixter on terms that are less favorable to it than those fair and reasonable terms that might be obtained in a comparable arms-length transaction at the time (other than payments to AXE permitted pursuant to ).
Transactions with Affiliates
Section 7.05
 
     7.08 .
Restriction on Fundamental Changes
     (a) No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly enter into any merger or consolidation, or liquidate, wind-up or dissolve (or suffer any liquidation or dissolution), discontinue its business or convey, lease, sell, transfer or otherwise Dispose of, in one transaction or series of transactions, all or any substantial part of its business or Property, whether now or hereafter acquired, except:
     (i) as otherwise permitted under ;
Section 7.02(a)
     (ii) any Subsidiary may merge into or convey, sell, lease or transfer all or substantially all of its assets to Anixter or any other Subsidiary of Anixter; and
     (iii) Anixter may reorganize as an Illinois corporation; that (A) the Administrative Agent has received written notice of such reorganization not less than fifteen days (or such shorter period as agreed to by the Administrative Agent) prior thereto and (B) concurrently with the completion of such reorganization, the Administrative Agent shall have received such documentation as reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent, including, without limitation, an assumption agreement, certified organizational documents, resolutions and legal opinions, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
provided
     (b) No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit its Subsidiaries to, acquire by purchase or otherwise any property or assets of, or stock or other evidence of beneficial ownership of, any Person, except in the ordinary course of its business or to the extent permitted pursuant to .
Section 7.03
     7.09 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its ERISA Affiliates to do any of the following which, individually, or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect:
Employee Benefit Matters
     (a) Engage in any prohibited transaction described in Section 406 of ERISA or 4975 of the Code for which a statutory or class exemption is not available or a private exemption has not been previously obtained from the United States Department of Labor;
     (b) permit any failure to make "minimum required contributions" (as defined in Sections 302 of ERISA and 412 of the Code), whether or not waived;
     (c) fail to pay timely required contributions or annual installments due with respect to any waived funding deficiency to any Benefit Plan;
     (d) terminate any Benefit Plan in a distress termination under Section 4041(c) of ERISA which would result in any liability to Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate;
     (e) fail to make any contribution or payment to any Multiemployer Plan which Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate may be required to make under any agreement relating to such Multiemployer Plan, or any law pertaining thereto;
     (f) fail to pay any required installment or any other payment required under Section 412 or 430 of the Code on or before the due date for such installment or other payment;
 
     (g) amend a Plan resulting in an increase in the "adjusted funding target attainment percentage" (as defined in Section 436 of the Code) for the plan year such that Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate is required to provide security to such Plan under Section 436 of the Code;
     (h) permit any unfunded liabilities with respect to any Foreign Pension Plan to exist; or
     (i) fail to pay any required contribution or payment to a Foreign Pension Plan on or before the date for such required installment or payment.
     7.10 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, become subject to any Liabilities and Costs which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect and which arise out of or are related to (a) the Release or threatened Release at any location of any Contaminant into the environment, or any Remedial Action in response thereto or (b) any violation of any environmental, health and safety Requirements of Law.
Environmental Liabilities
     7.11 . No portion of the proceeds of any credit extended under this Agreement shall be used (a) in any manner which might cause the extension of credit or the application of such proceeds to violate Regulation T, Regulation U or Regulation X or any other regulation of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States or to violate the Securities Exchange Act or the Securities Act, in each case as in effect on the date or dates of such Borrowing and the use of such proceeds or (b) in breach of any financial assistance prohibition under any applicable Law.
Margin Regulations; Breach of Financial Assistance
     7.12 . No member of the Consolidated Group shall change its fiscal year, except that any Subsidiary of Anixter may conform its fiscal year to Anixter's Fiscal Year.
Change of Fiscal Year
     7.13 . Anixter shall not amend, modify or supplement the Revolving Subordinated Note without five Business Days' prior written notice to the Administrative Agent or in any manner materially adverse to the Lenders.
Modification of the Revolving Subordinated Note
     7.14 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any interest rate, commodity, or foreign currency exchange, swap, collar, cap, option, forward, futures or similar agreements other than any Hedging Contract in the ordinary course of its business to hedge actual interest rate, foreign currency or commodity exposure.
Hedging Contracts
     7.15 . No Borrower shall, and Anixter shall not permit any Subsidiary to, permit the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in connection with Receivables Securitization Transactions to exceed a Dollar Equivalent of US$400,000,000.
Receivables Securitization Transactions
     7.16 . No Borrower shall permit the Leverage Ratio as of the last day of any Fiscal Quarter to be greater than 3.25 to 1.00.
Maximum Leverage Ratio
     7.17 . No Borrower shall permit the Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio calculated at the end of each Fiscal Quarter for the period of the immediately preceding four Fiscal Quarters to be less than (a) 2.50 to 1.00 for any period ending after the Closing Date but on or prior to the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011 and (b) 3.00 to 1.00 for any period ending after the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011.
Minimum Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
     7.18 . All financial covenants in this shall be calculated after the elimination of the minority interest in any Subsidiaries which are not wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
Calculation of Financial Covenants
Article VII
     8.01 . Any of the following shall constitute an Event of Default:
Events of Default
     (a) . Any Borrower shall fail (i) to pay when due any principal of any Obligation, or (ii) to pay when due any interest on any Obligation, or any fee or other amount payable under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents and such failure under this clause (ii) shall continue for three (3) Business Days.
Failure to Make Payments When Due
     (b) . Any Borrower or any Subsidiary of any Borrower shall fail duly and punctually to perform or observe any agreement, covenant or obligation under (other than clauses (c), (e), (h), and (i) thereof), , , or under (other than thereof).
Breach of Certain Covenants
Sections 6.01
6.03
6.07
6.12
Article VII
Section
7.09
     (c) . Any representation or warranty made or deemed made by any Borrower or any Guarantor to the Administrative Agent or any Lender herein or by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter in any of the other Loan Documents or in any written statement or certificate at any time given by Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter pursuant to any of the Loan Documents shall be false or misleading in any material respect on the date as of which made or deemed made.
Breach of Representation or Warranty
     (d) Other Defaults. Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter shall fail duly and punctually to perform or observe any agreement, covenant or obligation arising under this Agreement (except those described in , and ) or under any of the other Loan Documents, and such failure shall continue for fifteen (15) days (or, in the case of Loan Documents other than this Agreement, any longer period of grace expressly set forth therein).
Sections 8.01(a)
(b)
(c)
     (e) . AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter shall fail to make any payment when due (whether by scheduled maturity, required prepayment, acceleration, demand or otherwise) on any Indebtedness of such Person, other than any of the Obligations, if the aggregate outstanding amount of all such Indebtedness owed by all such parties (without duplication) is US$50,000,000 or more, or any breach, default or event of default shall occur, or any other event shall occur or condition shall exist, under any instrument, agreement or indenture pertaining thereto, if the effect thereof is to accelerate, or permit the holder(s) of such Indebtedness to accelerate, the maturity of any such Indebtedness, or any such Indebtedness shall be declared to be due and payable or required to be prepaid or mandatorily redeemed (other than by a regularly scheduled required prepayment prior to the stated maturity thereof); or the holder of any Lien, in any amount, shall commence foreclosure of such Lien upon property of AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter having a book or fair market value in excess of US$50,000,000 in the aggregate.
Default as to Other Indebtedness
     (f) 
Involuntary Bankruptcy; Appointment of Receiver, Etc.
     (i) An involuntary case shall be commenced against AXE, Anixter or any Borrowing Subsidiary, or against any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, and the petition shall not be dismissed within sixty (60) days after commencement of the case, or a court having jurisdiction in the premises shall enter a decree or order for relief in respect of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of
 
Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 in an involuntary case, under any applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereinafter in effect, or any other similar relief shall be granted under any applicable federal, state or foreign law.
     (ii) A decree or order of a court having jurisdiction in the premises for the appointment of a receiver, liquidator, sequestrator, trustee, custodian or other officer having similar powers over any of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, or over all or a substantial part of the property of any such Person, shall be entered, or an interim receiver, trustee or other custodian of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, or of all or a substantial part of any such Person's Property, shall be appointed or a warrant of attachment, execution or similar process against any substantial part of the Property of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000, shall be issued and any such event shall not be stayed, vacated, dismissed, bonded or discharged within sixty (60) days of entry, appointment or issuance.
     (g)  AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall have an order for relief entered with respect to it or commence a voluntary case under any applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, or other similar law now or hereafter in effect, or shall consent to the entry of an order for relief in an involuntary case, or to the conversion of an involuntary case to a voluntary case, under any such law, or shall consent to the appointment of or taking of possession by a receiver, trustee or other custodian for all or a substantial part of its property. AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall make any assignment for the benefit of creditors or shall be unable or generally fail, or admit in writing its inability, to pay its debts as such debts become due, or the board of directors (or any committee thereof) of AXE, Anixter, any Borrowing Subsidiary or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall adopt any resolution to authorize or approve any of the foregoing.
Voluntary Bankruptcy; Appointment of Receiver, Etc.
     (h) . (i) An Enforceable Judgment (other than an Enforceable Judgment described in the proviso contained in the definition of Enforceable Judgment) for the payment of money in excess of US$25,000,000 shall be rendered against Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter and such Enforceable Judgment shall continue unsatisfied or unstayed for a period of thirty (30) days or action shall have been commenced to foreclose on such Enforceable Judgment, or (ii) an Enforceable Judgment described in the proviso contained in the definition of Enforceable Judgment shall be rendered against any Borrower.
Judgments
     (i) . Any order, judgment or decree shall be entered against AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 decreeing its involuntary dissolution or split-up and such order shall remain undischarged and unstayed for a period in excess of thirty (30) days, or AXE, Anixter or any Subsidiary of Anixter with assets in excess of US$25,000,000 shall otherwise dissolve or cease to exist, in each case except as expressly permitted pursuant to .
Dissolution
Section 7.08
     (j) . (i) Any Change of Control occurs; (ii) Anixter shall cease to own directly or indirectly all of the capital stock of the Borrowing Subsidiaries, (other than director's qualifying shares); (iii) except as permitted in , Anixter shall cease to own at least 51% of each class of the capital stock of each Subsidiary of Anixter; or (iv) AXE shall cease to own at least 51% of each class of the capital stock of Anixter.
Change of Control
Section 7.02(a)
     (k) . (i) Any one or more Termination Events occur which could reasonably be expected to subject Anixter or an ERISA Affiliate to a liability to pay more than US$75,000,000 in the aggregate, or (ii) the plan administrator of any Plan applies under Section
Employee Benefit Related Liabilities
 
412(c) of the Code for a waiver of the minimum funding standards of Section 412(a) of the Code and the substantial business hardship upon which the application for the waiver is based could reasonably be expected to subject either Anixter or any ERISA Affiliate to a liability of more than US$75,000,000 in the aggregate.
     (l) . Any breach or other violation by any holder of the Revolving Subordinated Note of the subordination or enforcement restrictions shall occur.
Subordination Default
     (m) . Any party to the Guaranty, or any Person on behalf of such party, shall terminate or revoke any of its obligations thereunder or breach any of the terms thereof, or the Guaranty shall otherwise become unenforceable for any reason.
Guaranty Default
     (n) . Any Loan Document, at any time after its execution and delivery and for any reason other than as expressly permitted hereunder or satisfaction in full of all the Obligations, ceases to be in full force and effect; or any Loan Party contests in any manner the validity or enforceabilty of any Loan Document; or any Loan Party denies that it has any or further liability or obligation under any Loan Document, or purports to revoke, terminate or rescind any Loan Document.
Invalidity of Loan Documents
     For purposes of this Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents, an Event of Default shall be deemed "continuing" until cured or waived in writing in accordance with .
Section 10.01
     8.02 . If any Event of Default occurs, the Administrative Agent shall, at the request of, or may, with the consent of, the Required Lenders,
Remedies Upon Event of Default
     (a) declare the commitment of each Lender to make Loans and any obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions to be terminated, whereupon such commitments and obligation shall be terminated;
     (b) declare the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Loans, all interest accrued and unpaid thereon, and all other amounts owing or payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document to be immediately due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Borrower;
     (c) require that Anixter Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations (in an amount equal to the then Outstanding Amount thereof); and
     (d) exercise on behalf of itself and the Lenders all rights and remedies available to it and the Lenders under the Loan Documents or applicable Law;
, , that upon the occurrence of any event specified in subsection (f) or (g) of , the obligation of each Lender to make Loans and any obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions shall automatically terminate, the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Loans and all interest and other amounts as aforesaid shall automatically become due and payable, and the obligation of Anixter to Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations as aforesaid shall automatically become effective, in each case without further act of the Administrative Agent or any Lender or notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived.
provided
however
Section
8.01
     8.03 . After the exercise of remedies provided for in (or after the Loans have automatically become immediately due and payable and the L/C Obligations have automatically been required to be Cash Collateralized as set forth in the proviso to ), any
Application of Funds
Section 8.02
Section 8.02
 
amounts received on account of the Obligations shall be applied by the Administrative Agent in the following order:
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting fees, indemnities, expenses and other amounts (including reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the Administrative Agent and amounts payable under ) payable to the Administrative Agent in its capacity as such;
First
Article III
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting fees, indemnities and other amounts (other than principal and interest) payable to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer (including reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the respective Lenders and the L/C Issuer (including fees and time charges for attorneys who may be employees of any Lender or the L/C Issuer) and amounts payable under ), ratably among them in proportion to the amounts described in this clause payable to them;
Second
Article III
Second
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans, L/C Borrowings and other Obligations, ratably among the Lenders and the L/C Issuer in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause payable to them;
Third
Third
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting unpaid principal of the Loans and L/C Borrowings, ratably among the Lenders and the L/C Issuer in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause held by them;
Fourth
Fourth
     , to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer, to Cash Collateralize that portion of L/C Obligations comprised of the aggregate undrawn amount of Letters of Credit; and
Fifth
     , the balance, if any, after all of the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full, to Anixter or as otherwise required by Law.
Last
Subject to , amounts used to Cash Collateralize the aggregate undrawn amount of Letters of Credit pursuant to clause above shall be applied to satisfy drawings under such Letters of Credit as they occur. If any amount remains on deposit as Cash Collateral after all Letters of Credit have either been fully drawn or expired, such remaining amount shall be applied to the other Obligations, if any, in the order set forth above.
Section 2.06(g)
Fifth
     9.01 . Each of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer hereby irrevocably appoints Wells Fargo Bank to act on its behalf as the Administrative Agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof or thereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The provisions of this Article are solely for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, and no Borrower shall have any rights as a third party beneficiary of any of such provisions.
Appointment and Authority
     9.02 . The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent and the term "Lender" or "Lenders" shall, unless otherwise expressly indicated or unless the context otherwise requires, include the Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder in its individual capacity. Such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, act as the financial advisor or in any other advisory capacity for and
Rights as a Lender
 
generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrowers or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if such Person were not the Administrative Agent hereunder and without any duty to account therefor to the Lenders.
     9.03 . The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent:
Exculpatory Provisions
     (a) shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing;
     (b) shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby or by the other Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise as directed in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be expressly provided for herein or in the other Loan Documents), that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action that, in its opinion or the opinion of its counsel, may expose the Administrative Agent to liability or that is contrary to any Loan Document or applicable Law; and
provided
     (c) shall not, except as expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents, have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to any of the Borrowers or any of their respective Affiliates that is communicated to or obtained by the Person serving as the Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.
     The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith shall be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in and ) or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed to have any knowledge of any Default unless and until notice describing such Default is given to the Administrative Agent by Anixter, a Lender or the L/C Issuer.
Sections 10.01
8.02
     The Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or thereunder or in connection herewith or therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein or therein or the occurrence of any Default, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Article IV
     9.04 . The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing (including any electronic message, Internet or intranet website posting or other distribution) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed, sent or otherwise authenticated by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to have been made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. In determining compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan, or the issuance of a Letter of Credit, that by its terms must be fulfilled to the satisfaction of a Lender or the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent may presume that such condition is satisfactory to
Reliance by the Administrative Agent
 
such Lender or the L/C Issuer unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice to the contrary from such Lender or the L/C Issuer prior to the making of such Loan or the issuance of such Letter of Credit. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for Anixter), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
     9.05 . The Administrative Agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise its rights and powers hereunder or under any other Loan Document by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of this Article shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as the Administrative Agent.
Delegation of Duties
     9.06 . The Administrative Agent may at any time give notice of its resignation to the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and Anixter. If the Administrative Agent resigns under this Agreement, the Required Lenders shall appoint from among the Lenders a successor administrative agent for the Lenders, which successor administrative agent shall be consented to by Anixter at all times other than during the existence of an Event of Default (which consent of Anixter shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed). If no such successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may on behalf of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, appoint a successor Administrative Agent meeting the qualifications set forth above; that if the Administrative Agent shall notify Anixter and the Lenders that no qualifying Person has accepted such appointment, then such resignation shall nonetheless become effective in accordance with such notice and (1) the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents (except that in the case of any cash collateral held by the retiring Administrative Agent on behalf of the Lenders or the L/C Issuer under any of the Loan Documents, the retiring Administrative Agent shall continue to hold such cash collateral until such time as a successor Administrative Agent is appointed) and (2) all payments, communications and determinations provided to be made by, to or through the Administrative Agent shall instead be made by or to each Lender and the L/C Issuer directly until such time as the Required Lenders appoint a successor Administrative Agent as provided for above in this Section. Upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring (or retired) Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from all of its duties and obligations hereunder or under the other Loan Documents (if not already discharged therefrom as provided above in this Section). The fees payable by Anixter to a successor Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between Anixter and such successor. After the retiring Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, the provisions of this Article and shall continue in effect for the benefit of the retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while the retiring Administrative Agent was acting as Administrative Agent.
Resignation of the Administrative Agent
provided
Section 10.04
     Any resignation by Wells Fargo Bank as Administrative Agent pursuant to this Section may also, at Wells Fargo Bank's option, constitute its resignation as L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender. In that case, upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder, (a) such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and such duties of the retiring L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender, (b) the retiring L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender shall be discharged from all of their respective duties and obligations hereunder or under the other Loan
 
Documents, and (c) the successor L/C Issuer shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession or make other arrangements satisfactory to the retiring L/C Issuer to effectively assume the obligations of the retiring L/C Issuer with respect to such Letters of Credit.
     9.07 . Each Lender and the L/C Issuer acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender or any of their Related Parties and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender and the L/C Issuer also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender or any of their Related Parties and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
Non-Reliance on the Administrative Agent and Other Lenders
     9.08 Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, none of the Joint Lead Arrangers, the co-syndication agents or the co-documentation agents listed on the cover page hereof shall have any powers, duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, except in its capacity, as applicable, as the Administrative Agent, a Lender or L/C Issuer hereunder.
No Other Duties, Etc.
     9.09 . In case of the pendency of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law or any other judicial proceeding relative to any Loan Party, the Administrative Agent (irrespective of whether the principal of any Loan or L/C Obligation shall then be due and payable as herein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Administrative Agent shall have made any demand on any Borrower) shall be entitled and empowered, by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise:
Administrative Agent May File Proofs of Claim
     (a) to file and prove a claim for the whole amount of the principal and interest owing and unpaid in respect of the Loans, L/C Obligations and all other Obligations that are owing and unpaid and to file such other documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent (including any claim for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent and their respective agents and counsel and all other amounts due the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent under and , and ) allowed in such judicial proceeding; and
Sections 2.06(i)
(j)
2.11
10.04
     (b) to collect and receive any monies or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same;
and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or other similar official in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Lender and the L/C Issuer to make such payments to the Administrative Agent and, in the event that the Administrative Agent shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, to pay to the Administrative Agent any amount due for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Administrative Agent and its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Administrative Agent under and .
Sections 2.11
10.04
     Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to authorize the Administrative Agent to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Lender or the L/C Issuer any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition affecting the Obligations or the rights of any Lender or the L/C
 
Issuer or to authorize the Administrative Agent to vote in respect of the claim of any Lender or the L/C Issuer in any such proceeding.
     9.10 . The Lenders and the L/C Issuer irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its discretion, to release any Subsidiary that is a Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty if such Person ceases to be a Subsidiary as a result of a transaction permitted hereunder. Upon request by the Administrative Agent at any time, the Required Lenders will confirm in writing the Administrative Agent's authority to release any Subsidiary Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty pursuant to this .
Guaranty Matters
Section 9.10
     10.01 No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, and no consent to any departure by any Borrower or any other Loan Party therefrom, shall be effective unless in writing signed by the Required Lenders and the applicable Borrowers or the applicable Loan Party, as the case may be, and acknowledged by the Administrative Agent, and each such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given; , , that no such amendment, waiver or consent shall:
Amendments, Etc.
provided
however
     (i) extend or increase the Commitment of any Lender (or reinstate any Commitment terminated pursuant to ) without the written consent of such Lender;
Section 8.02
     (ii) postpone any date fixed by this Agreement or any other Loan Document for any payment of principal, interest, fees or other amounts due to the Lenders (or any of them) hereunder or under any other Loan Document without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby;
     (iii) reduce the principal of, or the rate of interest specified herein on, any Loan or L/C Borrowing, or (subject to clause (ii) of the second proviso below) any fees or other amounts payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby; , , that only the consent of the Required Lenders shall be necessary to amend the definition of "Default Rate" or to waive any obligation of a Borrower to pay interest or Letter of Credit Fees at the Default Rate;
provided
however
     (iv) change or in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby without the written consent of each Lender;
Section 2.15
Section 8.03
     (v) amend the definition of "Available Currency" or "Foreign Currency" without the written consent of each Lender and the L/C Issuer;
     (vi) change any provision of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to amend, waive or otherwise modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender; or
     (vii) release any material Guarantor from the Guaranty without the consent of each Lender;
and, , that (i) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the L/C Issuer in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the L/C Issuer under
provided
further
 
this Agreement or any Issuer Document relating to any Letter of Credit issued or to be issued by it; (ii) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Swing Line Lender in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the Swing Line Lender under this Agreement; (iii) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Administrative Agent in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent under this Agreement or any other Loan Document; (iv) may not be amended, waived or otherwise modified without the consent of each Granting Lender all or any part of whose Loans are being funded by an SPC at the time of such amendment, waiver or other modification; and (v) neither the Agent Fee Letter nor the Joint Fee Letter may be amended, or rights or privileges thereunder waived, in a writing executed only by the parties thereto. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, no Defaulting Lender shall have any right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent hereunder, except that (w) the Commitment of such Lender may not be increased or extended, (x) the principal of any Loan made by such Lender may not be reduced, (y) any date fixed by this Agreement or any other Loan Document for any payment of principal, interest, fees or other amounts due to such Lender hereunder or under any other Loan Document may not be postponed and (z) this may not be changed in a manner directly adverse to such Lender, in each case without the consent of such Lender.
Section 10.06(h)
Section 10.01
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, each Lender hereby irrevocably authorizes the Administrative Agent on its behalf, and without further consent, to enter into amendments or modifications to this Agreement (including, without limitation, amendments to this ) or any of the other Loan Documents or to enter into additional Loan Documents as the Administrative Agent reasonably deems appropriate in order to effectuate the terms of (including, without limitation, as applicable, (1) to permit the Incremental Term Loan Commitments and the Revolving Commitment Increases to share ratably in the benefits of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (2) to include the Incremental Term Loan Commitments and the Revolving Commitment Increases, as applicable, or outstanding Incremental Term Loans and outstanding Revolving Commitment Increases, as applicable, in any determination of (i) Required Lenders or (ii) similar required lender terms applicable thereto); that no amendment or modification shall result in any increase in the amount of any Lender's Commitment or any increase in any Lender's Pro Rata Share, in each case, without the written consent of such affected Lender.
Section 10.01
Section 2.17
provided
     10.02 .
Notices and Other Communications; Facsimile Copies
     (a) . Unless otherwise expressly provided herein, all notices and other communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing (including by facsimile transmission) and mailed by certified or registered mail, faxed or delivered by hand or overnight courier service, to the address, facsimile number or (subject to subsection (c) below) electronic mail address specified for notices on or, in the case of a Lender, its Administrative Questionnaire; or, in the case of the Borrowers or the Administrative Agent, to such other address as shall be designated by such party in a notice to the other parties, and in the case of any other party, to such other address as shall be designated by such party in a notice to Anixter and the Administrative Agent. All such notices and other communications shall be deemed to be given upon (i) if sent by hand or by courier or mailed by certified or registered mail, when received; (ii) if sent by facsimile, when sent (except that, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient); and (iii) if sent through electronic communications (which form of delivery is subject to the provisions of subsection (c) below), as provided in subsection (c) below. Any notice or other communication permitted to be given, made or confirmed by telephone hereunder shall be given, made or confirmed by means of a telephone call to the intended recipient at the number specified on .
General
Schedule 10.02
Schedule 10.02
 
     (b) . Loan Documents may be transmitted and/or signed by facsimile. The effectiveness of any such documents and signatures shall, subject to applicable Law, have the same force and effect as manually-signed originals and shall be binding on all Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. The Administrative Agent may also require that any such documents and signatures be confirmed by a manually-signed original thereof; , , that the failure to request or deliver the same shall not limit the effectiveness of any facsimile document or signature.
Effectiveness of Facsimile Documents and Signatures
provided
however
     (c) . Notices and other communications to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communication (including e mail and Internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent, that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Lender or the L/C Issuer pursuant to if such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as applicable, has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication. The Administrative Agent or Anixter may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it, that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
Electronic Communications
provided
Article II
provided
     Unless the Administrative Agent otherwise prescribes, (i) notices and other communications sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the "return receipt requested" function, as available, return e-mail or other written acknowledgement) and (ii) notices or communications posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor; that, for both clauses (i) and (ii) above, if such notice, e-mail or other communication is not sent during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been sent at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient.
provided
     (d) . THE PLATFORM IS PROVIDED "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE." THE AGENT PARTIES (AS DEFINED BELOW) DO NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF THE BORROWER MATERIALS OR THE ADEQUACY OF THE PLATFORM, AND EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM LIABILITY FOR ERRORS IN OR OMISSIONS FROM THE BORROWER MATERIALS. NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS OR FREEDOM FROM VIRUSES OR OTHER CODE DEFECTS, IS MADE BY ANY AGENT PARTY IN CONNECTION WITH THE BORROWER MATERIALS OR THE PLATFORM. In no event shall the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties (collectively, the "") have any liability to any Borrower, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other Person for losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses of any kind (whether in tort, contract or otherwise) arising out of any Borrower's or the Administrative Agent's transmission of Borrower Materials through the Internet, except to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Administrative Agent Party; , , that in no event shall any Agent Party have any liability to any Borrower, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other Person for indirect, special, incidental, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages).
The Platform
Agent Parties
provided
however
     (e)  Each of the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender may change its address, telecopier or telephone number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. Each other Lender may change its
Change of Address, Etc.
 
address, telecopier or telephone number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the Company, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender. In addition, each Lender agrees to notify the Administrative Agent from time to time to ensure that the Administrative Agent has on record (i) an effective address, contact name, telephone number, telecopier number and electronic mail address to which notices and other communications may be sent and (ii) accurate wire instructions for such Lender.
     (f) . The Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders shall be entitled to rely and act upon any notices (including telephonic Borrowing Notices) purportedly given by or on behalf of any Borrower even if (i) such notices were not made in a manner specified herein, were incomplete or were not preceded or followed by any other form of notice specified herein, or (ii) the terms thereof, as understood by the recipient, varied from any confirmation thereof. The Borrowers shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, each Lender and the Related Parties of each of them from all losses, costs, expenses and liabilities resulting from the reliance by such Person on each notice purportedly given by or on behalf of any Borrower. All telephonic notices to and other communications with the Administrative Agent may be recorded by the Administrative Agent, and each of the parties hereto hereby consents to such recording.
Reliance by Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Lenders
     10.03 . No failure by any Lender or the Administrative Agent to exercise, and no delay by any such Person in exercising, any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, remedy, power or privilege. The rights, remedies, powers and privileges herein provided are cumulative and not exclusive of any rights, remedies, powers and privileges provided by law.
No Waiver; Cumulative Remedies; Enforcement
     Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein or in any other Loan Document, the authority to enforce rights and remedies hereunder and under the other Loan Documents against the Loan Parties or any of them shall be vested exclusively in, and all actions and proceedings at law in connection with such enforcement shall be instituted and maintained exclusively by, the Administrative Agent in accordance with for the benefit of all the Lenders and the L/C Issuer; that the foregoing shall not prohibit (a) the Administrative Agent from exercising on its own behalf the rights and remedies that inure to its benefit (solely in such capacity, as the case may be) hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, (b) the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender from exercising the rights and remedies that inure to its benefit (solely in such capacity, as the case may be) hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, (c) any Lender from exercising setoff rights in accordance with (subject to the terms of ), or (d) any Lender from filing proofs of claim or appearing and filing pleadings on its own behalf during the pendency of a proceeding relative to any Loan Party under any Debtor Relief Law; and , , that if at any time there is no Person acting as Administrative Agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, then (i) the Required Lenders shall have the rights otherwise ascribed to the Administrative Agent pursuant to and (ii) in addition to the matters set forth in clauses (b), (c) and (d) of the preceding proviso and subject to , any Lender may, with the consent of the Required Lenders, enforce any rights and remedies available to it and as authorized by the Required Lenders.
Section 8.02
provided
Section 10.08
Section 2.15
provided
further
Section 8.02
Section 2.15
     10.04 .
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
     (a) . Anixter shall pay (i) all reasonable out of pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent), in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation, negotiation, execution, delivery and administration of this
Costs and Expenses
 
Agreement and the other Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out of pocket expenses incurred by the L/C Issuer in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out of pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any outside counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer (which shall be limited to a single outside counsel and any necessary local counsel in each appropriate jurisdiction; that in the case of an actual or perceived conflict of interest as reasonably determined by the Person affected by such conflict where such Person informs Anixter of such conflict, separate counsel for such Person shall be included)), and shall pay all fees and time charges for attorneys who may be employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights (A) in connection with this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or (B) in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out of pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. The Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer shall promptly notify Anixter when it intends to incur fees and time charges for attorneys who are employees of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, that Anixter will reimburse under this Agreement.
provided
     (b) . The Borrowers jointly and severally shall indemnify the Administrative Agent (and any sub-agent thereof), each Lender and the L/C Issuer, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any external counsel for any Indemnitee), and shall indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnitee from all fees and time charges and disbursements for attorneys who may be employees of any Indemnitee, incurred by any Indemnitee or asserted against any Indemnitee by any third party or by any Borrower or any other Loan Party arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or thereunder or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use or proposed use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the L/C Issuer to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or Release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by any Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to any Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or any Borrower or any other Loan Party, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, in all cases, whether or not caused by or arising, in whole or in part, out of the negligence of the Indemnitee; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available (x) to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or (y) for any loss asserted against such Indemnitee by another Indemnitee (excluding (1) any claims against any Joint Lead Arranger in such capacity or in fulfilling its role as an arranger or any similar role under the Loan Documents and (2) any claims arising out of any act or omission on the part of Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries).
Indemnification by the Borrowers
Indemnitee
provided
     (c) . To the extent that any Borrower for any reason fails to indefeasibly pay any amount required under subsection (a) or (b) of this Section to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), the L/C Issuer, the Swing Line Lender or any Related Party of any of the foregoing, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent (or any
Reimbursement by Lenders
 
such sub-agent), the L/C Issuer, the Swing Line Lender or such Related Party, as the case may be, such Lender's Pro Rata Share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount, that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of any of the foregoing acting for the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender in connection with such capacity. The obligations of the Lenders under this subsection (c) are subject to the provisions of .
provided
Section 2.14(e)
     (d)  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, no Borrower shall assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof. No Indemnitee referred to in subsection (b) above shall be liable for any damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, Etc.
     (e) . All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than ten Business Days after demand therefor.
Payments
     (f) . The indemnity and reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers under this to the Indemnitees, shall not include Taxes (other than Taxes resulting from payments made under this ), in that the Borrowers are obligated to the Indemnitees in respect of Taxes under to the extent provided therein.
Taxes
Section 10.04
Section 10.04
Article III
     (g) . The agreements in this Section shall survive the resignation of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender, the replacement of any Lender, the termination of the Aggregate Commitments and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all the other Obligations.
Survival
     10.05 . To the extent that a Borrower makes a payment to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender, or the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender exercises its right of set-off, and such payment or the proceeds of such set-off or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside or required (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender in its discretion) to be repaid to a trustee, receiver or any other party, in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law or otherwise, then (a) to the extent of such recovery, the obligation or part thereof originally intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect as if such payment had not been made or such set-off had not occurred, and (b) each Lender and the L/C Issuer severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent upon demand its applicable share of any amount so recovered from or repaid by the Administrative Agent, interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such payment is made at a rate per annum equal to the applicable Overnight Rate from time to time in effect, in the Applicable Currency of such recovery or payment. The obligations of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Agreement.
Payments Set Aside
plus
     10.06 .
Successors and Assigns
 
     (a) . The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that no Borrower may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Section, (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Section, (iii) by way of pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of subsection (f) of this Section, or (iv) to an SPC in accordance with the provisions of subsection (h) of this Section (and any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void). Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in subsection (d) of this Section and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns Generally
     (b) . Any Lender may at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans (including for purposes of this subsection (b), participations in L/C Obligations and in Swing Line Loans) at the time owing to it); that any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
Assignments by Lenders
provided
     (i) .
Minimum Amounts
     (A) in the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and
     (B) in any case not described in subsection (b)(i)(A) of this Section, the aggregate amount of the Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans outstanding thereunder) or, if the Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment, determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if "Trade Date" is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the Trade Date, shall not be less than US$5,000,000 unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, Anixter otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed);
     (ii) . Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loans or the Commitment assigned, except that this clause (ii) shall not apply to the Swing Line Lender's rights and obligations in respect of Swing Line Loans;
Proportionate Amounts
     (iii) . No consent shall be required for any assignment except to the extent required by paragraph (b)(i)(B) of this Section and, in addition:
Required Consents
     (A) the consent of Anixter (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required unless (x) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such assignment, or (y) such assignment is to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; that Anixter shall be deemed to have consented to
provided
 
any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within 5 Business Days after having received notice thereof; and
     (B) the consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender shall be required for assignments in respect of any Commitment if such assignment is to a Person that is not a Lender, an Affiliate of such Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to such Lender; and
     (iv) . The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of US$3,500 for each assignment; that only one such fee will be payable in connection with simultaneous assignments to two or more Approved Funds by a Lender, and the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
Assignment and Assumption
provided
     (v) . No such assignment shall be made to (A) any Borrower or any Affiliates or Subsidiaries of any Borrower, (B) to any Defaulting Lender or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries, or any Person who, upon becoming a Lender hereunder, would constitute any of the foregoing Persons described in this clause (B) or (C) a natural Person.
No Assignment to Certain Persons
     (vi) . No such assignment shall be made to any Person that, through its Lending Offices or its Applicable Designee, is not capable of lending the applicable Available Currencies to the relevant Borrowers.
Currencies
     (vii) . In connection with any assignment of rights and obligations of any Defaulting Lender hereunder, no such assignment shall be effective unless and until, in addition to the other conditions thereto set forth herein, the parties to the assignment shall make such additional payments to the Administrative Agent in an aggregate amount sufficient, upon distribution thereof as appropriate (which may be outright payment, purchases by the assignee of participations or subparticipations, or other compensating actions, including funding, with the consent of Anixter and the Administrative Agent, the applicable pro rata share of Loans previously requested but not funded by the Defaulting Lender, to each of which the applicable assignee and assignor hereby irrevocably consent), to (x) pay and satisfy in full all payment liabilities then owed by such Defaulting Lender to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, the Swing Line Lender and each other Lender hereunder (and interest accrued thereon), and (y) acquire (and fund as appropriate) its full pro rata share of all Loans and participations in Letters of Credit and Swing Line Loans in accordance with its Pro Rata Share. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that any assignment of rights and obligations of any Defaulting Lender hereunder shall become effective under applicable Law without compliance with the provisions of this paragraph, then the assignee of such interest shall be deemed to be a Defaulting Lender for all purposes of this Agreement until such compliance occurs.
Certain Additional Payments
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to subsection (c) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption, the Eligible Assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of ,
Sections 3.01
 
, , and with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment; that except to the extent otherwise expressly agreed by the affected parties, no assignment by a Defaulting Lender will constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder arising from that Lender's having been a Defaulting Lender. Upon request, each Borrower shall execute and deliver a Note to the assignee Lender at such assignee Lender's expense. Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this subsection shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with subsection (d) of this Section.
3.04
3.05
10.04
provided
     (c) . The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at the Administrative Agent's Office a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of (and stated interest on) the Loans and L/C Obligations owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by each of the Borrowers, the L/C Issuer and any Lender (but only to the extent of entries in the Register that are applicable to such Lender) at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
Register
     (d) . Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, or notice to, any Borrower or the Administrative Agent, sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or Anixter or any of Anixter's Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and/or obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and/or the Loans (including such Lender's participations in L/C Obligations and/or Swing Line Loans) owing to it); that (i) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement.
Participations
Participant
provided
     Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, waiver or other modification described in the first proviso to that affects such Participant. Subject to subsection (e) of this Section, each Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of as though it were a Lender, such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender.
provided
Section 10.01
Sections 3.01
3.04
3.05
Section 10.08
provided
Section 2.15
     Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under the Loan Documents (the ""); provided that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register to any Person (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participant's interest in any commitments, loans, letters of credit or its other obligations under any Loan Document) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such commitment, loan, letter of credit or other obligation is in registered form
Participant Register
 
under Section 5f. 103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary.
     (e) . A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless (i) the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with Anixter's prior written consent or (ii) such entitlement to receive a greater payment results from a Change in Law that occurs after the Participant acquired the applicable participation. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of unless Anixter is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrowers, to comply with as though it were a Lender.
Limitation upon Participant Rights
Section 3.01
3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.01(e)
     (f) . Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement (including under its Note(s), if any) to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank; that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
     (g) . The words "execution," "signed," "signature," and words of like import in any Assignment and Assumption shall be deemed to include electronic signatures or the keeping of records in electronic form, each of which shall be of the same legal effect, validity or enforceability as a manually executed signature or the use of a paper-based recordkeeping system, as the case may be, to the extent and as provided for in any applicable Law, including the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, the New York State Electronic Signatures and Records Act, or any other similar state Laws based on the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
Electronic Execution of Assignments
     (h) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a "") may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and Anixter (an "") the option to provide all or any part of any Committed Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make pursuant to this Agreement; that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPC to fund any Committed Loan, and (ii) if an SPC elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to make all or any part of such Committed Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Committed Loan pursuant to the terms hereof or, if it fails to do so, to make such payment to the Administrative Agent as is required under . Each party hereto hereby agrees that (i) neither the grant to any SPC nor the exercise by any SPC of such option shall increase the costs or expenses or otherwise increase or change the obligations of the Borrowers under this Agreement (including its obligations under and ), (ii) no SPC shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement for which a Lender would be liable (all such liabilities being the obligation of the Granting Lender), and (iii) the Granting Lender shall for all purposes, including the approval of any amendment, waiver or other modification of any provision of any Loan Document, remain the lender of record hereunder. The making of a Committed Loan by an SPC hereunder shall utilize the Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Committed Loan were made by such Granting Lender. In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior debt of any SPC, it will not institute against, or join any other Person in instituting against, such SPC any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency, or liquidation proceeding under the laws of the
Special Purpose Funding Vehicles
Granting Lender
SPC
provided
Section 2.14(c)(ii)
Sections 3.01
3.04
 
United States or any state thereof. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any SPC may (i) with notice to, but without prior consent of Anixter and the Administrative Agent and with the payment of a processing fee of US$3,500 assign all or any portion of its right to receive payment with respect to any Committed Loan to the Granting Lender and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its funding of Committed Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety or guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPC.
     (i) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, if at any time Wells Fargo Bank assigns all of its Commitment and Loans pursuant to subsection (b) above, Wells Fargo Bank may, (i) upon 30 days' notice to Anixter and the Lenders, resign as L/C Issuer and/or (ii) upon 30 days' notice to Anixter, resign as Swing Line Lender. In the event of any such resignation as L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender, Anixter shall be entitled to appoint from among the Lenders a successor L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender hereunder; , , that no failure by Anixter to appoint any such successor shall affect the resignation of Wells Fargo Bank as L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender, as the case may be. If Wells Fargo Bank resigns as L/C Issuer, it shall retain all the rights and obligations of the L/C Issuer hereunder with respect to all Letters of Credit outstanding as of the effective date of its resignation as L/C Issuer and all L/C Obligations with respect thereto (including the right to require the Lenders to make Base Rate Loans or fund risk participations in Unreimbursed Amounts pursuant to ) and Anixter shall provide cash collateral satisfactory to Wells Fargo Bank to secure its obligations with respect to such Letters of Credit and L/C Obligations. Upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as L/C Issuer hereunder, (x) such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and such duties of the retiring L/C Issuer, (y) Wells Fargo Bank shall be discharged from all of its duties and obligations as L/C Issuer hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, and (z) the successor L/C Issuer shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession (in which case Wells Fargo Bank shall release any cash collateral provided by Anixter pursuant to the preceding sentence) or make other arrangement satisfactory to the retiring L/C Issuer to effectively assume the obligations of the retiring L/C Issuer with respect to such Letters of Credit. If Wells Fargo Bank resigns as Swing Line Lender, it shall retain all the rights of the Swing Line Lender provided for hereunder with respect to Swing Line Loans made by it and outstanding as of the effective date of such resignation, including the right to require the Lenders to make Base Rate Loans or fund risk participations in outstanding Swing Line Loans pursuant to .
Resignation as L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender after Assignment
provided
however
Section 2.06(c)
Section 2.03(c)
     10.07 . Each of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its Affiliates and its Related Parties (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential); (b) to the extent required or requested by any regulatory authority purporting to have jurisdiction over such Person or its Related Parties (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners); (c) to the extent required by applicable Laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process; (d) to any other party to this Agreement; (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder; (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective party (or its Related Parties) to any swap, derivative or other transaction under which payments are to be made by reference to any Borrower and its obligations, this Agreement or payments hereunder; (g) with the consent of any Borrower; (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than any Borrower; or (i) on a confidential basis to the CUSIP
Confidentiality
 
Service Bureau or any similar agency in connection with the issuance and monitoring of any CUSIP number. For purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from any Borrower or any of its respective Subsidiaries relating to any Borrower or any of its respective Subsidiaries or any of their respective businesses, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by any Borrower or any of its respective Subsidiaries; that, in the case of information received from any Borrower or any of their respective Subsidiaries after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Information
provided
     10.08 . In addition to any rights and remedies of the Lenders provided by law, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, each Lender, the L/C Issuer and each of their respective Affiliates is authorized at any time and from time to time to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final, in whatever currency) at any time held by, and other obligations (in whatever currency) at any time owing by, such Lender, the L/C Issuer or any such Affiliate, to or for the credit or the account of the respective Loan Parties against any and all Obligations owing to such Lender, now or hereafter existing under this Agreement or any other Loan Document to such Lender or the L/C Issuer or their respective Affiliates, irrespective of whether or not such Lender, L/C Issuer or Affiliate shall have made demand under this Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations of such Loan Party may be contingent or unmatured or are owed to a branch, office or Affiliate of such Lender or the L/C Issuer different from the branch, office or Affiliate holding such deposit or obligated on such indebtedness; that in the event that any Defaulting Lender shall exercise any such right of setoff, (x) all amounts so set off shall be paid over immediately to the Administrative Agent for further application in accordance with the provisions of and, pending such payment, shall be segregated by such Defaulting Lender from its other funds and deemed held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders, and (y) the Defaulting Lender shall provide promptly to the Administrative Agent a statement describing in reasonable detail the Obligations owing to such Defaulting Lender as to which it exercised such right of setoff. The rights of each Lender, the L/C Issuer and their respective Affiliates under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) that such Lender, the L/C Issuer or their respective Affiliates may have. Each Lender and L/C Issuer agrees promptly to notify Anixter and the Administrative Agent after any such set-off and application made by such Lender; that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such set-off and application.
Set-off
provided
Section 3.08(a)(ii)
provided
     10.09 . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any Loan Document, the interest paid or agreed to be paid under the Loan Documents shall not exceed the maximum rate of non-usurious interest permitted by applicable Law (the ""). If the Administrative Agent or any Lender shall receive interest in an amount that exceeds the Maximum Rate, the excess interest shall be applied to the principal of the Loans or, if it exceeds such unpaid principal, refunded to the applicable Borrower. In determining whether the interest contracted for, charged, or received by the Administrative Agent or a Lender exceeds the Maximum Rate, such Person may, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, (a) characterize any payment that is not principal as an expense, fee, or premium rather than interest, (b) exclude voluntary prepayments and the effects thereof, and (c) amortize, prorate, allocate, and spread in equal or unequal parts the total amount of interest throughout the contemplated term of the Obligations.
Interest Rate Limitation
Maximum Rate
 
     10.10 . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts (and by different parties hereto in different counterparts), each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.
Counterparts
     (a) . This Agreement, together with the other Loan Documents, constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and thereof and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, on such subject matter. In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this Agreement and those of any other Loan Document, the provisions of this Agreement shall control; that the inclusion of supplemental rights or remedies in favor of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders in any other Loan Document shall not be deemed a conflict with this Agreement. Each Loan Document was drafted with the joint participation of the respective parties thereto and shall be construed neither against nor in favor of any party, but rather in accordance with the fair meaning thereof. Except as provided in , this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by all of the parties hereto, including the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof that, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or in electronic (i.e., "pdf" or "tif") format shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Integration; Effectiveness
provided
Section 4.01
     10.11 . All representations and warranties made hereunder and in any other Loan Document or other document delivered pursuant hereto or thereto or in connection herewith or therewith shall survive the execution and delivery hereof and thereof. Such representations and warranties have been or will be relied upon by the Administrative Agent and each Lender, regardless of any investigation made by the Administrative Agent or any Lender or on their behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or Event of Default at the time of any Credit Extension, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as any Loan or any other Obligation shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied.
Survival of Representations and Warranties
     10.12 . Any provision of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which any Borrower is a party that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions thereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction. The parties shall endeavor in good faith negotiations to replace the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provisions.
Severability
     10.13 .
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
     (a) If any Lender requests compensation under , or requires Anixter to pay additional amounts to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , then such Lender shall (at the request of Anixter) use reasonable efforts to designate a different Lending Office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to or , as the case may be, in the future, and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. Each Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
 
     (b) If any Lender requests compensation under , or if any Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to and, in each case, such Lender has declined or is unable to designate a different Lending Office in accordance with , or if any Lender is a Defaulting Lender or a Non-Consenting Lender, then Anixter may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in, and consents required by, ), all of its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement and the related Loan Documents to an Eligible Assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that:
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
Section 10.14(a)
Section 10.06
provided
     (i) Anixter shall have paid (or caused to be paid) to the Administrative Agent the assignment fee specified in ;
Section 10.06(b)
     (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in L/C Advances, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder and under the other Loan Documents (including any amounts under ) from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or Anixter or applicable Borrowing Subsidiary (in the case of all other amounts);
Section 3.05
     (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under or payments required to be made pursuant to , such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments thereafter;
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
     (iv) such assignment does not conflict with applicable Laws; and
     (v) in the case of any assignment resulting from a Lender becoming a Non-Consenting Lender, the applicable assignee shall have consented to the applicable amendment, waiver or consent.
     A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment or delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling Anixter to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
     10.14 . If for the purposes of obtaining judgment in any court it is necessary to convert a sum due from a Borrower hereunder or any other Loan Document in the currency expressed to be payable herein or therein (the "") into another currency, the parties hereto agree, to the fullest extent that they may effectively do so, that the rate of exchange used shall be that at which in accordance with normal banking procedures the Administrative Agent could purchase the specified currency with such other currency at the Administrative Agent's applicable office on the Business Day preceding that on which final judgment is given. The obligation of any Borrower in respect of any sum due to any Lender or the Administrative Agent hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall, notwithstanding any judgment in a currency (the "") other than that in which such sum is denominated in accordance with the applicable provisions of the applicable Loan Document, be discharged only to the extent that on the Business Day following receipt by such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, of any sum adjudged to be so due in the judgment currency, such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, may in accordance with normal banking procedures purchase the specified currency with the judgment currency. If the amount of the specified currency so purchased is less than the sum originally due to such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, in the specified currency, the applicable Borrower shall, to the fullest extent that it may
Judgment Currency
specified currency
judgment currency
 
effectively do so, as a separate obligation and notwithstanding any such judgment, indemnify such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, against such loss, and if the amount of the specified currency so purchased exceeds the total of (a) the sum originally due to such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, in the specified currency and (b) any amount shared with other Lenders as a result of allocations of such excess as a disproportionate payment to such Lender under , such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, agrees to remit such excess to the applicable Borrower.
Section 2.15
     10.15 . Each Borrower hereby irrevocably appoints and authorizes Anixter to take such action and deliver and receive notices hereunder as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement as delegated to it by the terms hereof, together with all such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In furtherance of and not in limitation of the foregoing, for administrative convenience of the parties hereto, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall send all notices and communications to be sent to any Borrower solely to Anixter and may rely solely upon Anixter to receive all such notices and other communications for and on behalf of each Borrower. Neither Anixter nor any of its respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be liable to any other Borrower for any action taken or not taken by it in connection herewith (a) with the consent or at the request of such Borrower or (b) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. No Person other than Anixter (and its authorized officers and employees) may act as agent for the Borrowers hereunder without the written consent of the Administrative Agent.
Borrowers' Agent
     10.16 . Anixter hereby designates this Agreement to AXE as a "Credit Agreement" as referred to in and for purposes of the Revolving Subordinated Note.
Credit Agreement
     10.17 .
Governing Law; Jurisdiction, Waiver of Venue; Service of Process
     (a) . This Agreement and the other Loan Documents and any claims, controversy or, dispute or cause of action (whether in contract or tort or otherwise) based upon, arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document (except, as to any other Loan Document, as expressly set forth therein) and the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York (without regard to conflicts of law principals that would require the application of another State's law).
Governing Law
     (b) . Anixter and each other Loan Party irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that it will not commence any action, litigation or proceeding of any kind or description, whether in law or equity, whether in contract or in tort or otherwise, against the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any Related Party of the foregoing in any way relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the transactions relating hereto or thereto, in any forum other than the courts of the State of New York sitting in New York County, and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, and each of the parties hereto irrevocably and unconditionally submits to the jurisdiction of such courts and agrees that all claims in respect of any such action, litigation or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, in such federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action, litigation or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or in any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against Anixter or any other Loan Party or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Jurisdiction
 
     (c) . Anixter and each other Loan Party irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
Waiver of Venue
     (d) . Each party hereto irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in . Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party hereto to serve process in any other manner permitted by applicable Law.
Service of Process
Section 10.02
     10.18 . EACH PARTY TO THIS AGREEMENT HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PERSON HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PERSON WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
Waiver of Right to Trial by Jury
     10.19 . Each Lender that is subject to the Act (as hereinafter defined) and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ""), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers and the Guarantors, which information includes the name and address of each Borrower and each Guarantor and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify such Borrower or such Guarantor, as applicable, in accordance with the Act.
USA PATRIOT Act Notice
Act
     10.20 . Each Lender represents that it is a PMP and that it is aware that a Dutch Borrower may be in breach of Dutch law and regulations if such representation is untrue.
Each Lender a PMP
     10.21 . In connection with all aspects of each transaction contemplated hereby (including in connection with any amendment, waiver or other modification hereof or of any other Loan Document), each Borrower acknowledges and agrees, and acknowledges its Affiliates' understanding, that: (a) (i) the arranging and other services regarding this Agreement provided by the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers, are arm's-length commercial transactions between such Borrower and its Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers, on the other hand, (ii) such Borrower has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it has deemed appropriate, and (iii) such Borrower is capable of evaluating, and understands and accepts, the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the other Loan Documents; (b)(i) each of the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers is and has been acting solely as a principal and, except as expressly agreed in writing by the relevant parties, has not been, is not, and will not be acting as an advisor, agent or fiduciary for such Borrower or any of its Affiliates, or any other Person and (ii) none of the Administrative Agent or the Joint Lead Arrangers has any obligation to such Borrower or any of its
No Advisory or Fiduciary Responsibility
 
Affiliates with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby except those obligations expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents; and (c) the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers and their respective Affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of such Borrower and its Affiliates, and none of the Administrative Agent or the Joint Lead Arrangers has any obligation to disclose any of such interests to any Borrower or its Affiliates. To the fullest extent permitted by law, each of the Borrowers hereby waives and releases any claims that it may have against the Administrative Agent or any Joint Lead Arrangers with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty in connection with any aspect of any transaction contemplated hereby.
     10.22 . Each Lender party hereto that is also party to the Existing Credit Agreement hereby waives any prior notice requirement of the Borrowers under the Existing Credit Agreement with respect to the termination of the commitments and the making of any prepayment thereunder.
Waiver of Notice of Termination and Prepayment
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
Credit Agreement  Anixter Inc.
 
None
 
ARTICLE XI The Mandatory Cost (to the extent applicable) is an addition to the interest rate to compensate Lenders for the cost of compliance with:
ARTICLE XII On the first day of each Interest Period (or as soon as possible thereafter) the Administrative Agent shall calculate, as a percentage rate, a rate (the "") for each Lender, in accordance with the paragraphs set out below. The Mandatory Cost will be calculated by the Administrative Agent as a weighted average of the Lenders' Additional Cost Rates (weighted in proportion to the percentage participation of each Lender in the relevant Loan) and will be expressed as a percentage rate per annum. The Administrative Agent will, at the request of Anixter or any Lender, deliver to Anixter or such Lender as the case may be, a statement setting forth the calculation of any Mandatory Cost.
Additional Cost Rate
ARTICLE XIII The Additional Cost Rate for any Lender lending from a Lending Office in a Participating Member State will be the percentage notified by that Lender to the Administrative Agent. This percentage will be certified by such Lender in its notice to the Administrative Agent to be its reasonable determination of the cost (expressed as a percentage of such Lender's participation in all Loans made from such Lending Office) of complying with the minimum reserve requirements of the European Central Bank in respect of Loans made from that Lending Office.
ARTICLE XIV The Additional Cost Rate for any Lender lending from a Lending Office in the United Kingdom will be calculated by the Administrative Agent as follows:
Where:
 
ARTICLE XV For the purposes of this Schedule:
ARTICLE XVI In application of the above formulae, A, B, C and D will be included in the formulae as percentages (
i.e.
5% will be included in the formula as 5 and not as 0.05). A negative result obtained by subtracting D from B shall be taken as zero. The resulting figures shall be rounded to four decimal places.
ARTICLE XVII If requested by the Administrative Agent or Anixter, each Lender with a Lending Office in the United Kingdom or a Participating Member State shall, as soon as practicable after publication by the Financial Services Authority, supply to the Administrative Agent and Anixter, the rate of charge payable by such Lender to the Financial Services Authority pursuant to the Fees Rules in respect of the relevant financial year of the Financial Services Authority (calculated for this purpose by such Lender as being the average of the Fee Tariffs applicable to such Lender for that financial year) and expressed in pounds per 1,000,000 of the Tariff Base of such Lender.
ARTICLE XVIII Each Lender shall supply any information required by the Administrative Agent for the purpose of calculating its Additional Cost Rate. In particular, but without limitation, each Lender shall supply the following information in writing on or prior to the date on which it becomes a Lender:
 
ARTICLE XIX The percentages of each Lender for the purpose of A and C above and the rates of charge of each Lender for the purpose of E above shall be determined by the Administrative Agent based upon the information supplied to it pursuant to
and
paragraphs 7
above and on the assumption that, unless a Lender notifies the Administrative Agent to the contrary, each Lender's obligations in relation to cash ratio deposits and Special Deposits are the same as those of a typical bank from its jurisdiction of incorporation with a Lending Office in the same jurisdiction as its Lending Office.
8
ARTICLE XX The Administrative Agent shall have no liability to any Person if such determination results in an Additional Cost Rate which over- or under-compensates any Lender and shall be entitled to assume that the information provided by any Lender pursuant to
paragraphs 3
,
and
7
above is true and correct in all respects.
8
ARTICLE XXI The Administrative Agent shall distribute the additional amounts received as a result of the Mandatory Cost to the Lenders on the basis of the Additional Cost Rate for each Lender based on the information provided by each Lender pursuant to
paragraphs 3
,
and
7
above.
8
ARTICLE XXII Any determination by the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Schedule in relation to a formula, the Mandatory Cost, an Additional Cost Rate or any amount payable to a Lender shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
ARTICLE XXIII The Administrative Agent may from time to time, after consultation with Anixter and the Lenders, determine and notify to all parties any amendments which are required to be made to this Schedule in order to comply with any change in law, regulation or any requirements from time to time imposed by the Bank of England, the Financial Services Authority or the European Central Bank (or, in any case, any other authority which replaces all or any of its functions) and any such determination shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto
 
 
1.
Addresses for the Borrowers and the Guarantors
:
Anixter Inc. 2301 Patriot Blvd Glenview, Illinois 60026 Attention: Rod Shoemaker Telephone: (224) 521-8205 Facsimile: (224) 521-8990 E-mail: rod.shoemaker@anixter.com
:
With copies to
Sean Maloney, Esq. Schiff Hardin LLP 233 South Wacker Drive Suite 6600 Chicago, IL 60606 Telephone: (312) 258-5505 Facsimile: (312) 258-5600 E-mail: SMaloney@schiffhardin.com
2.
Addresses for the Administrative Agent
:
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association MAC D1109-019 1525 West W.T. Harris Blvd. Charlotte, North Carolina 28262 Attention: Syndication Agency Services Telephone: (704) 590-2703 Facsimile: (704) 590-3481
Wells Fargo NA, London Branch One Plantation Place 30 Fenchurch Street London EC3M 3BD
:
With copies to
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association 230 West Monroe, Suite 2900 Chicago, IL 60606 Attention: Charles Reed Telephone: (312) 845-4333 Facsimile: (312) 553-4783 E-mail: reedcw@wellsfargo.com
3.
Addresses for any Lender
:
To the address set forth on such Lender's Administrative Questionnaire.
 
To: Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 8, 2011 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
     The undersigned hereby requests (select one):
          The Borrowing requested herein complies with the proviso to the first sentence of [] [] of the Agreement.
Section
2.01
2.03(a)
 
 
To: Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 8, 2011 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., certain Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, Swing Line Lender and L/C Issuer. This Notice of Account Designation is delivered to you pursuant to , and of the Agreement.
Agreement
Sections 2.02(b)
2.03(b)
2.06(b)(ii)
     1. Each of the Borrowers hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to disburse all proceeds of Committed Borrowings and Swing Line Borrowings into the following account:
3
Account Name:_______________ Bank Name:__________________ ABA Routing Number:_________ Swift Code:__________________ Account Number:_____________ Reference:___________________
     2. This authorization shall remain in effect until revoked or until a subsequent Notice of Account Designation is provided to the Administrative Agent.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each undersigned has executed this Notice of Account Designation as of the day and year first written above.
 
Attention: Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     The undersigned, Anixter Inc. (""), refers to the Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 8, 2011 (as it may hereafter be amended, modified, extended or restated from time to time, the ""), among Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries named therein, the financial institutions from time to time party thereto as Lenders and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement. Pursuant to of the Credit Agreement:
Anixter
Credit Agreement
Section 2.16
     1. Anixter and _______________ (the "") (a) confirm that the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary is a Foreign Subsidiary and (b) make, on and as of the date hereof, the representations and warranties as to the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary contained in of the Credit Agreement. The Designated Borrowing Subsidiary agrees to be bound in all respects by the terms of the Credit Agreement, including, without limitation, all of the conditions, representations, warranties and covenants, and to perform all of the obligations of a Borrowing Subsidiary thereunder. Each reference to a Borrowing Subsidiary in the Credit Agreement shall be deemed to include the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary, and each reference to Loan Documents shall hereafter include this Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement.
Designated Borrowing Subsidiary
Article V
     2. Each Guarantor ratifies and confirms the provisions of the Guaranty with respect to all Loans made by any Lender to the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary.
     3. The Designated Borrowing Subsidiary hereby represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary's (a) legal name and jurisdiction of formation are as set forth on the signature pages hereto and (b) taxpayer identification number is as follows: [______________].
     4. The address to which communications to the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary under the Credit Agreement should be directed is the address for all Loan Parties set forth on to the Credit Agreement or such other address as the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary may designate in writing to the Administrative Agent.
Schedule 10.02
     5. Upon the execution of this Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement by Anixter, the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary and each Guarantor, and acceptance hereof by the Administrative Agent, the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary shall become a Borrowing Subsidiary under the Credit Agreement as though it were an original party thereto and shall be entitled to borrow under the Credit Agreement upon the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in of the Credit Agreement.
Section 4.02
 
     6. .
General Provisions
          (a) . Except as expressly provided herein, the Credit Agreement and each other Loan Document shall continue to be, and shall remain, in full force and effect. This Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement shall not be deemed (i) to be a waiver of, or consent to, or a modification or amendment of, any other term or condition of the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or (ii) to prejudice any right or rights which any Agent or any Lender may now have or may have in the future under or in connection with the Credit Agreement or the other Loan Documents or any of the instruments or agreements referred to therein, as the same may be amended or modified from time to time.
Limited Effect
          (b) . Anixter, the Designated Borrowing Subsidiary and each other Loan Party, jointly and severally, shall pay or reimburse the Administrative Agent for all of its out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, negotiation and execution of this Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, including, without limitation, the reasonable fees and disbursements of outside counsel.
Costs and Expenses
          (c) . This Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement may be executed by one or more of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts and all of said counterparts taken together shall be deemed to constitute one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement by facsimile or in electronic (i.e., "pdf" or "tif") format shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts
          (d) . THIS BORROWING SUBSIDIARY AGREEMENT AND ANY CLAIMS, CONTROVERSY, DISPUTE OR CAUSE OF ACTION (WHETHER IN CONTRACT OR TORT OR OTHERWISE) BASED UPON, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS BORROWING SUBSIDIARY AGREEMENT AND THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK (WITHOUT REGARD TO CONFLICT OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THAT WOULD REQUIRE THE APPLICATION OF ANOTHER STATE'S LAW).
GOVERNING LAW
 
 
 
Accepted as of the date first above written.
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
 
To: Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Anixter Inc. (""), refers to the Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 8, 2011 (as it may hereafter be amended, modified, extended or restated from time to time, the ""), among Anixter, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the financial institutions from time to time party thereto as Lenders and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
Anixter
Credit Agreement
     Anixter elects to terminate the status of _______________ (the "") as a Borrowing Subsidiary for purposes of the Credit Agreement. Anixter and the Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary represent and warrant that no Loans made to the Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary are outstanding as of the date hereof and that all principal and interest on all Loans payable by the Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to the Credit Agreement have been paid in full on or prior to the date hereof.
Terminated Borrowing Subsidiary
     This Borrowing Subsidiary Termination and any claims, controversy, dispute or cause of action (whether in contract or tort or otherwise) based upon, arising out of or relating to this Borrowing Subsidiary Termination and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York (without regard to conflict of laws principles that would require the application of another State's law).
 
_______________________
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, each of the Borrowers hereby promises to pay to the order of _____________________________ (the ""), on the Maturity Date (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below) the principal amount of all Committed Loans (as defined in such Credit Agreement) made by the Lender to the Borrowers under that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 8, 2011 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., the Borrowing Subsidiaries (together with Anixter, the ""), the Lenders from time to time party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Lender
Agreement
Borrowers
     Each Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Committed Loan from the date of such Committed Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates, and at such times as are specified in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lender in immediately available funds in the Applicable Currency at the Administrative Agent's Office. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
     This Note is one of the Committed Loan Notes referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and is subject to optional and mandatory prepayment in whole or in part as provided therein. This Note is also entitled to the benefits of the Guaranty. Upon the occurrence of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. Committed Loans made by the Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by the Lender in the ordinary course of business. The Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its Committed Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     Each Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
 
     THIS COMMITTED LOAN NOTE AND ANY CLAIMS, CONTROVERSY, DISPUTE OR CAUSE OF ACTION (WHETHER IN CONTRACT OR TORT OR OTHERWISE) BASED UPON, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS COMMITTED LOAN NOTE AND THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK (WITHOUT REGARD TO CONFLICT OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THAT WOULD REQUIRE THE APPLICATION OF ANOTHER STATE'S LAW).
 
 
 
 
     FOR VALUE RECEIVED, each of the Borrowers hereby promises to pay to the order of Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (the "") on the dates provided in the Agreement (as defined below) the principal amount of each Swing Line Loan from time to time made by the Swing Line Lender to the Borrowers under that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 8, 2011 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc., the Borrowing Subsidiaries (together with Anixter, the ""), the Lenders from time to time party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Swing Line Lender
Agreement
Borrowers
     Each Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Swing Line Loan from the date of such Swing Line Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates and at such times as provided in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swing Line Lender in the Applicable Currency of such Swing Line Loan in Same Day Funds at the Administrative Agent's Office. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
     This Note is one of the Swing Line Loan Notes referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and may be prepaid in whole or in part subject to the terms and conditions provided therein. This Note is also entitled to the benefits of the Guaranty. Upon the occurrence of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. Swing Line Loans made by the Swing Line Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by the Swing Line Lender in the ordinary course of business. The Swing Line Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its Swing Line Loans and payments with respect thereto.
     Each Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
 
     THIS SWING LINE LOAN NOTE AND ANY CLAIMS, CONTROVERSY, DISPUTE OR CAUSE OF ACTION (WHETHER IN CONTRACT OR TORT OR OTHERWISE) BASED UPON, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS SWING LINE LOAN NOTE AND THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK (WITHOUT REGARD TO CONFLICT OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THAT WOULD REQUIRE THE APPLICATION OF ANOTHER STATE'S LAW).
 
 
 
 
To: Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Reference is made to that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of April 8, 2011 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ""; the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined), among Anixter Inc. (""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
Agreement
Anixter
     The undersigned Financial Officer of Anixter hereby certifies as of the date hereof that he/she is the __________________________ of Anixter, and that, as such, he/she is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate to the Administrative Agent on the behalf of Anixter, and that:
[]
Use following for fiscal
year-end
financial statements
     1. Attached hereto as are the year-end audited financial statements required by of the Agreement for the Fiscal Year of Anixter ended as of the above date, together with the report and opinion of an independent certified public accountant required by such section.
Schedule 1
Section 6.01(b)
[]
Use following for fiscal
quarter-end
financial statements
     1. Attached hereto as are the unaudited financial statements required by of the Agreement for the Fiscal Quarter of Anixter ended as of the above date. Such financial statements fairly present the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP as at such date and for such period, subject only to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes.
Schedule 1
Section 6.01(a)
     2. The undersigned has reviewed and is familiar with the terms of the Agreement and has made, or has caused to be made under his/her supervision, a detailed review of the transactions and condition (financial or otherwise) of the Loan Parties during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements.
     3. A review of the activities of the Loan Parties during such fiscal period has been made under the supervision of the undersigned with a view to determining whether during such fiscal period the Loan Parties performed and observed all their Obligations under the Loan Documents, and
 
[select one:]
     
[to the best knowledge of the undersigned during such fiscal period, the Borrowers performed and observed each covenant and condition of the Loan Documents applicable to them.]
     
[the following covenants or conditions have not been performed or observed and the following is a list of each such Default or Event of Default and its nature and status:]
     4. The financial covenant analyses and information set forth on attached hereto are true and accurate on and as of the date of this Compliance Certificate.
Schedule 2
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed this Compliance Certificate as of the date set forth above.
 
 
I. Section 7.14  Receivables Securitization Transactions.
II. Section 7.16  Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
 
III. Section 7.15  Leverage Ratio.
 
     This Assignment and Assumption (this "") is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [] (the "") and the parties identified on the Schedules hereto and [the] [each] Assignee identified on the Schedules hereto as "Assignee" or as "Assignees" (collectively, the "Assignees" and each an "Assignee"). [It is understood and agreed that the rights and obligations of [the Assignees] [the Assignors] hereunder are several and not joint.] Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below (the ""), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by the Assignee. The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in Annex 1 attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
Insert name of Assignor
Assignor
8
9
10
Credit Agreement
     For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to [the Assignee] [the respective Assignees], and [the] [each] Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below (i) all of the Assignor's rights and obligations as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto to the extent related to the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of such outstanding rights and obligations of the Assignor under the respective facilities identified below (including, without limitation, the Letters of Credit and the Swing Line Loans included in such facilities) and (ii) to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims, suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor (in its capacity as a Lender) against any Person, whether known or unknown, arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby or in any way based on or related to any of the foregoing, including, but not limited to, contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity related to the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clause (i) above (the rights and obligations sold and assigned to [the] [any] Assignee pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) above being referred to herein collectively as, [the] [an] ""). Each such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
Effective Date: __________________, 20__ [TO BE INSERTED BY ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER IN THE REGISTER THEREFOR.]
 
 
 
 
By its execution of this Schedule, the Assignee identified on the signature block below agrees to the terms set forth in the attached Assignment and Assumption.
Assigned Interests:
 
 
     1. Representations and Warranties.
     1.1. . The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by Anixter, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
     1.2. . [The] [Each] Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement, (ii) it meets all requirements of an Eligible Assignee under the Credit Agreement (subject to receipt of such consents, if any, as may be required under the Credit Agreement), (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of [the] [the relevant] Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it is sophisticated with respect to decisions to acquire assets of the type represented by the Assigned Interest and either it, or the person exercising discretion in making its decision to acquire the Assigned Interest, is experienced in acquiring assets of such type, (v) it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, and has received or has been accorded the opportunity to receive copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to Section 6.01 thereof, as applicable, and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase [the] [such] Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase [the] [such] Assigned Interest, and (vi) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached hereto is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement, duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, [the] [any] Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender. The Assignee represents that it is a PMP and that it is aware that a Dutch Borrower may be in breach of Dutch law and regulations if this representation is untrue.
Assignee[s]
 
     2. . From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of [the] [each] Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignor for amounts which have accrued to but excluding the Effective Date and to [the] [the relevant] Assignee for amounts which have accrued from and after the Effective Date.
Payments
     3. . This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts, which together shall constitute one instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption. This Assignment and Assumption shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York.
General Provisions

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today announced that its wholly-owned operating subsidiary, Anixter Inc., refinanced its senior unsecured revolving credit facility on April 8, 2011.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 11, 2011 
The following key changes have been made to the prior revolving credit agreement:
All other material terms and conditions of the revolving credit agreement, which is guaranteed by Anixter International Inc., are similar to the prior credit agreement.
Commenting on the amendment to the revolving credit facility, Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President  Finance, said, "The increased size and extension of the credit agreement to 2016 solidifies Anixter's already-strong financial position, ensuring that we have the borrowing capacity to meet increased working capital requirements if higher sales growth is achieved as the global economy continues to recover. Our consistent financial results and strong cash flow, coupled with the expanded credit facility, allow us to both meet scheduled debt maturities and further execute on our strategic initiatives going forward, which includes strategic acquisition opportunities."
 
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1.0 billion in inventory, 3) 228 warehouses with approximately 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 263 cities in 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110426142633.txt.gz
TIME:20110426142633
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On April 26, 2011, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended April 1, 2011. The Company's press release, dated April 26, 2011, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended April 1, 2011.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 26, 2011 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
     
Financial Highlights
First Quarter Highlights
 
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "The stronger-than-expected pace of this recovery not only fueled higher sales growth than we anticipated, but it also was strong enough to overcome the historical patterns that typically produce relatively flat sequential sales from the fourth quarter to the first quarter. In addition to the better-than-expected year-on-year sales increase of 19 percent, we also experienced a nearly six percent sequential increase in sales, which included $29.5 million of sales from our December 2010 acquisition of Clark Security Products. Consistent with the trends we have experienced in the last few quarters, higher copper prices added approximately $25.2 million or approximately two percent of revenues in the first quarter compared to the prior year quarter. The continued strengthening of foreign currencies also accounted for an additional $20.0 million or approximately two percent of revenues."
"We are very pleased with the well-balanced sales performance across all reporting segments with North America, Europe and Emerging Markets all delivering excellent year-on-year sales increases ranging between 15 and 27 percent," continued Eck. "Sales growth by end market was also robust, with the biggest improvement coming from the Electrical Wire & Cable end market.
 
In that end market, new project bookings continue to be strong while the benefit of the project activity booked over the past couple of quarters helped produce first quarter billings that were up 31 percent year-on-year. The OEM Supply end market increased by 21 percent during the first quarter while the Enterprise Cabling and Security end market grew by 12 percent, with approximately one-third of that growth coming from the Clark acquisition."
First Quarter Operating Results
"Strong momentum in year-on-year operating profit growth was driven by the fifth sequential quarter of sales growth coupled with a favorable mix and prudent gross margin management," commented Eck. "Specifically, first quarter operating margin reached its highest level since 2008. Excluding the previously mentioned European restructuring charge, a 40 basis point improvement in gross margin combined with a strong 90 basis point improvement in operating expense leverage due to higher sales, driving operating margin to 5.8 percent, its highest level in ten quarters. An improvement in overall sales mix by end market largely drove the higher gross margin while the increased volume drove improved fixed cost leverage. As expected, incremental operating profit of 13 percent on the increased year-on-year sales, excluding the restructuring charge, is indicative of our disciplined balance between investing for growth while delivering productivity in our cost structure."
"First quarter operating expenses of $264.3 million, excluding the above-mentioned restructuring charge, represented 17.4 percent of sales compared to 18.3 percent in the prior year quarter," continued Eck. "Excluding the impact of the Clark acquisition, exchange rates and the restructuring item, year-on-year operating expenses increased by only $19.6 million or 8 percent, on a 13 percent organic increase in sales, demonstrating the leverage in our operating structure. Expense increases were primarily volume related."
operating margin improved to 5.5 percent from 4.5 percent in the year ago quarter. However, excluding the restructuring charge the current quarter, operating margin improved by 130 basis points to 5.8 percent in the current quarter. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 10 basis points, excluding the restructuring charge in the current quarter and the unfavorable arbitration award in the previous quarter. Both year-on-year and sequential improvements benefited from a stronger sales mix coupled with sales-driven operating leverage from the company's cost structure.
Company-wide
operating margin improved from 5.7 percent in the year ago quarter to 7.1 percent in the current quarter. This 140 basis point improvement was driven by a richer sales mix and operating expense leverage on higher sales volumes, with a 70 basis point improvement in gross margin and a 70 basis point improvement in operating expenses as a percent of sales. This resulted in a 14.4 percent incremental operating profit on the increased year-on-year sales. Sequentially, operating profit margin was flat, excluding the arbitration award in the previous quarter.
North America
operating profit was break-even for the quarter, including the restructuring charge, compared to a profit of $0.5 million in the year ago quarter. Excluding the restructuring charge to rationalize the European cost structure, operating profit in the current quarter was $5.3 million, which was its highest level in ten quarters. The operating margin in the current quarter, excluding this charge, was 1.8 percent compared to 0.2 percent in the year ago quarter. This improvement in operating margin was driven by the 40 basis point improvement in gross margin year-on-year combined with the 120 basis point improvement in operating expense as a percent of sales.
Europe
 
Excluding the restructuring charge in the current quarter, operating profit margin improved by 180 basis points on a sequential basis.
operating margin of 4.6 percent in the current quarter was flat year-on-year. Sequentially, operating margin declined from 6.4 percent to 4.6 percent. Consistent with prior years, this decline was primarily driven by the normal sales seasonality in this segment from the fourth quarter to the first quarter as well as continued investments in the Electrical Wire & Cable end market and the addition of new Emerging Markets locations.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Due to the incremental working capital requirements to support 19 percent sales growth in the current quarter, net cash used in operations was $5.5 million," commented Dennis Letham, Executive Vice President-Finance. "In the prior year quarter, cash flow generated from operations was $74.7 million, but that was in the context of flat sales and continuing working capital reductions. Going forward, we expect to see lower year-on-year cash flow generation as we continue to fund the working capital requirements of a growing business."
"During the most recent quarter we retired $21.2 million in accreted value of our 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes," said Letham. "We refinanced our revolving credit agreement in early April, increasing the size of the facility to $400 million with a new maturity date of April 2016. The financial leverage of 47.4 percent at the end of the current quarter is comfortably in our longstanding target range of 45 to 50 percent. Our strong balance sheet allows us the flexibility to further reduce the outstanding amount of the 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes utilizing available capacity in our bank revolving lines of credit while enabling us to pursue strategic acquisition opportunities when they arise."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the first quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "The strong first quarter sales results position us very well to continue to leverage the improving economy with our enhanced competitive position. The moderately improving economic fundamentals seen globally over the past few quarters provide both opportunities and challenges for the balance of 2011. Assuming there are no major shocks to the macro economy within the U.S. or international markets, we believe that we should continue to
 
drive growth at both the top and bottom line, albeit at somewhat lower year-on-year growth rates as we begin to experience more difficult growth comparisons starting with the second quarter. Nevertheless, we believe that a combination of improving economic conditions and our own strategic growth initiatives positions us well to achieve both strong sales growth and operating leverage in the coming year."
"Overall, our strategic growth initiatives should continue to improve our market share positions across all end markets and geographic segments while maintaining or improving gross margin. Specifically, we expect our growth to be fueled by adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate; developing an end market presence in either Electrical Wire & Cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited primarily to the Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions end market; and selectively expanding our geographic presence in countries such as Brazil and China, where our current presence is largely confined to the capital or the principal business city. We are also excited about both the strong sales synergies and operating leverage opportunities that we are experiencing as we continue to integrate the Clark Security Products acquisition into our growing Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions business, providing another business driver in the quarters ahead," Eck concluded.
First Quarter Earnings Report
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, April 26, 2011. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1.0 billion in inventory, 3) 226 warehouses with approximately 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 266 cities in 51 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110516171641.txt.gz
TIME:20110516171641
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
The annual meeting of stockholders was held May 12, 2011. In connection with the meeting, proxies were solicited pursuant to the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934. The following are the voting results on proposals considered and voted upon at the meeting, all of which were described in the Company's 2011 Proxy Statement filed on April 6, 2011.
(1) The Directors of the Company were elected as follows:
(2) An advisory proposal on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers was approved by a vote of 29,978,638 shares "for" and 551,488 shares "against" with 159,325 shares abstaining. There were 1,955,655 broker non-votes.
(3) An advisory proposal on the frequency with which stockholders preferred to vote on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers received 16,182,018 shares voted in favor of one year, 1,647,163 shares voted in favor of two years and 12,663,047 shares voted in favor of three years. There were 197,223 shares abstaining and 1,955,655 broker non-votes. The Company will hold another advisory vote on the compensation of its named executive officers next year in accordance with the frequency receiving the most votes.
(4) The stockholders ratified the appointment of Ernst & Young LLP as the Company's independent auditors for the fiscal year 2011 by a vote of 32,182,246 shares "for" and 450,835 shares "against" with 12,025 shares abstaining.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110602161550.txt.gz
TIME:20110602161550
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
          On May 31, 2011, Anixter International Inc.'s operating subsidiary Anixter Inc. (the "Company") amended the agreements governing its accounts receivable securitization program. The following key changes have been made to the program:
          All other material terms and conditions remain unchanged. The Second Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement between the Company and Anixter Receivables Corporation ("ARC") and the Second Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, among ARC, the Company, the Conduits and the Financial Institutions party thereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. ("JPMCB") and SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. ("SunTrust") as Managing Agents, and JPMCB, as agent, each dated as of May 31, 2011, are attached as Exhibit 10.1 and Exhibit 10.2, respectively.
          JPMCB and an affiliate of SunTrust serve as lenders under the Company's Five Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 10.1
 
 
Exhibits and Schedules
 
          THIS SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES SALE AGREEMENT, dated as of May 31, 2011, is by and between ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation, (" "), and ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (" "). Unless defined elsewhere herein, capitalized terms used in this Agreement shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in .
Seller
Buyer
Exhibit I
          Reference is hereby made to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement dated as of October 3, 2002 by and between Seller and Buyer (the " ").
Earlier Receivables Sale Agreement
          Seller and Buyer have agreed to amend and restate the Earlier Receivables Sale Agreement on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein.
          Seller now owns, and from time to time hereafter will own, Receivables (including Receivables transferred pursuant to the Accu-Tech Transfer Agreement). Seller wishes to sell and assign to Buyer, and Buyer wishes to purchase from Seller, all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to such Receivables, together with the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto.
          Seller and Buyer intend the transactions contemplated hereby to be true sales of the Receivables from Seller to Buyer, providing Buyer with the full benefits of ownership of the Receivables, and Seller and Buyer do not intend these transactions to be, or for any purpose to be characterized as, loans from Buyer to Seller.
          Following the purchase of Receivables from Seller, Buyer will sell undivided interests therein and in the associated Related Security and Collections pursuant to that certain Second Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement dated as of May 31, 2011 (as the same may from time to time hereafter be amended, supplemented, restated or otherwise modified, the " ") among Buyer, Seller, as Servicer, Falcon Asset Securitization Company LLC and Three Pillars Funding LLC, as Conduit Purchasers, the financial institutions from time to time party thereto (" " and, together with the Conduit Purchasers, the " "), JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (" ") and SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., as managing agents (collectively, the " ")
Purchase Agreement
Financial Institutions
Purchasers
JPMCB
Managing Agents
 
and JPMCB, or any successor agent appointed pursuant to the terms of the Purchase Agreement, as agent for the Purchasers (in such capacity, the " ").
Agent
     Section 1.1 .
Purchase of Receivables
          (a) Pursuant to the Earlier Receivables Sale Agreement, Seller has sold to Buyer, without recourse (except to the extent expressly provided therein), all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to all Receivables existing as of the close of business on the day immediately prior to the closing date of the Earlier Receivables Sale Agreement and all Receivables arising thereafter, in each case, with all Related Security relating thereto and all Collections thereof. Seller and Buyer hereby reaffirm that purchase and sale, and, in consideration for the Purchase Price and upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, Seller does hereby sell, assign, transfer, set-over and otherwise convey to Buyer, without recourse (except to the extent expressly provided herein), and Buyer does hereby purchase from Seller, all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to all Receivables existing today and hereafter arising through and including the Amortization Date, together with all Related Security relating thereto and all Collections thereof; Buyer shall be obligated to pay the Purchase Price therefor in accordance with . In connection with the payment of the Purchase Price for any Receivables purchased hereunder, Buyer may request that Seller deliver, and Seller shall deliver, such approvals, opinions, information, reports or documents as Buyer may reasonably request.
provided
that
Section 1.2
          (b) It is the intention of the parties hereto that the Purchase of Receivables made hereunder shall constitute a "sale of accounts" (as such term is used in Article 9 of the UCC), which sale is absolute and irrevocable and provides Buyer with the full benefits of ownership of the Receivables. Except for the Purchase Price Credits owed pursuant to , the sale of Receivables hereunder is made without recourse to Seller; , , that (i) Seller shall be liable to Buyer for all representations, warranties and covenants made by Seller pursuant to the terms of the Transaction Documents to which Seller is a party, and (ii) such sale does not constitute and is not intended to result in an assumption by Buyer or any assignee thereof of any obligation of Seller or any other Person arising in connection with the Receivables, the related Contracts and/or other Related Security or any other obligations of Seller. In view of the intention of the parties hereto that the Purchase of Receivables made hereunder shall constitute a sale of such Receivables rather than loans secured thereby, Seller agrees that it will, on or prior to the date hereof and in accordance with , cause all Receivable reports relating to the Receivables to bear a legend acceptable to Buyer and to the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees, evidencing that Buyer has purchased such Receivables as provided in this Agreement and note in its financial statements that its Receivables have been sold to Buyer. Upon the request of Buyer or the Agent or any Managing
Section 1.3
provided
however
Section 4.1(e)(ii)
 
Agent, as Buyer's assignees, Seller will execute and file such financing or continuation statements, or amendments thereto or assignments thereof, and such other instruments or notices, as may be necessary or appropriate to perfect and maintain the perfection of Buyer's ownership interest in the Receivables and the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto, or as Buyer or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees, may reasonably request.
     Section 1.2 .
Payment for the Purchase
          (a) The Purchase Price for each Receivable coming into existence after the date hereof shall be due and owing in full by Buyer to Seller or its designee on the date each such Receivable came into existence (except that Buyer may, with respect to any such Purchase Price, offset against such Purchase Price any amounts owed by Seller to Buyer hereunder and which have become due but remain unpaid) and shall be paid to Seller in the manner provided in the following paragraphs (b), (c), (d) and (e).
          (b) With respect to any Receivables coming into existence after the date hereof, on each Settlement Date, Buyer shall pay the Purchase Price therefor in accordance with and and in the following manner:
Section 1.2(d)
(e)
          (i) , by delivery of immediately available funds, to the extent of funds available to Buyer from (i) its subsequent sale of an interest in the Receivables to each Managing Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers under the Purchase Agreement, (ii) Collections arising from any Receivables previously sold to Buyer in which Buyer has retained an interest, or (iii) other cash on hand;
first
          (ii) , by delivery of the proceeds of a subordinated revolving loan from Seller to Buyer (a " "), that the making of any such Subordinated Loan shall be subject to the provisions set forth in below; and
second
Subordinated Loan
provided
          (iii) , unless the Seller has declared the Amortization Date to have occurred pursuant to , by accepting a contribution to its capital pursuant to the Subscription Agreement in an amount equal to the remaining unpaid balance of such Purchase Price.
third
Section 5.2
The maximum amount of any Subordinated Loan that can be borrowed by Buyer pursuant to clause (ii) above is limited to the maximum Subordinated Loan that could be borrowed without rendering Buyer's Net Worth less than the Required Capital Amount. The Seller is hereby authorized by Buyer to endorse on the schedule attached to the Subordinated Note an appropriate notation evidencing the date and amount of each advance thereunder, as well as the date of each payment with respect thereto, provided that the failure to make such notation shall not affect any obligation of Buyer thereunder. Subject to the limitations set forth in the second preceding sentence, Seller irrevocably agrees to advance each Subordinated Loan requested by Buyer on or
 
prior to the Amortization Date. The Subordinated Loans shall be evidenced by, and shall be payable in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Subordinated Note and shall be payable solely from funds which Buyer is not required under the Purchase Agreement to set aside for the benefit of, or otherwise pay over to, the Purchasers, the Agent, the Managing Agents or any other Person then entitled to any amounts as specified in the Purchase Agreement.
          (c) From and after the Amortization Date, Seller shall not sell Receivables to Buyer.
          (d) On each day prior to the Amortization Date (unless Buyer or the Agent shall otherwise direct), Buyer may permit any Originator to retain all or a specified portion of the Collections received in respect of Receivables theretofore transferred by the Seller to Buyer hereunder, it being understood that in the event Buyer shall have sold, assigned or otherwise transferred an interest in such Receivables to the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers under the Purchase Agreement, such Collections in the possession of such Originator or Buyer are made available to Buyer at the discretion of the Agent and the Managing Agents. Any such Collections so retained by any Originator (" ") shall, on and as of the date of receipt thereof, be (i) deemed applied toward the Purchase Price of any Receivables of such Originator arising on such date and then being transferred to Buyer pursuant to the terms hereof, to the extent of any such Purchase Price, (ii) then, in respect of any balance remaining, deemed applied toward the Purchase Price of any other Receivables of such Originator arising during such Accrual Period and in respect of which the Purchase Price shall not theretofore have been paid, to the extent of any such Purchase Price, and (iii) in respect of any balance remaining, held in trust by such Originator for the benefit of Buyer until the earlier to occur of (A) application toward the Purchase Price for any Purchase occurring on any later date and (B) the next following Settlement Date, in which case such amount shall be remitted to Buyer.
Applied Collections
          (e) Although the Purchase Price for each Receivable coming into existence after the date hereof shall be due and payable in full by Buyer to Seller on the date such Receivable came into existence, and payment of such Purchase Price shall be made from Applied Collections, to the extent available, as provided in , final settlement of the Purchase Price between Buyer and Seller shall be effected on a monthly basis on Settlement Dates with respect to all Receivables coming into existence during the same Calculation Period and based on the information contained in the Monthly Report delivered by the Servicer pursuant to of the Purchase Agreement for the Calculation Period then most recently ended. On each Settlement Date, Buyer and Seller shall cause a reconciliation to be made in respect of all Purchases that shall have been made during the Calculation Period then most recently ended. To the extent that the aggregate amount of Applied Collections retained by Seller during such Calculation Period shall have been less than the aggregate Purchase Price in respect of all Purchases made by Buyer from Seller during such month, Buyer shall pay the balance due in respect of such aggregate Purchase Price in the manner described in . To the extent that the aggregate amount of Applied Collections retained by Seller during such
Section 1.2(d)
Article VIII
Section 1.2(a)
 
Calculation Period shall have been greater than the aggregate Purchase Price in respect of all Purchases made by Buyer from Seller during such Calculation Period, Seller shall turn over such excess to Buyer either by remitting such excess in immediately available funds to Buyer or by directing that a reduction in the outstanding balance of the Subordinated Loan occur in an amount equal to such excess, or a combination of both. Although settlement shall be effected on Settlement Dates, increases or decreases in the amount owing under the Subordinated Note made pursuant to and any contribution of capital by Seller to Buyer made pursuant to shall be deemed to have occurred and shall be effective as of the last Business Day of the Calculation Period to which such settlement relates.
Section 1.2(b)
Section 1.2(b)
          (f) At all times prior to the occurrence of the Amortization Date, notwithstanding any delay in the making of any payment of the Purchase Price in respect of any Purchase, all right, title and interest of Seller in and to each Receivable shall be sold, assigned and otherwise transferred to Buyer effective immediately and automatically upon the creation of such Receivable, without any further action of any type or kind being required on the part of any Person. The monthly settlement and reconciliation contemplated in this has been devised solely for the administrative convenience of the parties hereto. Buyer and Seller may at any time, as may agreed between themselves, elect to effect settlement and reconciliation on a more (but not less) frequent basis.
Section 1.2
     Section 1.3 . If on any day:
Purchase Price Credit Adjustments
          (a) the Outstanding Balance of a Receivable is:
          (i) reduced as a result of any defective or rejected goods or services, any discount or any adjustment or otherwise by any Originator (other than cash Collections on account of the Receivables or as a result of the insolvency, bankruptcy or lack of creditworthiness of the relevant Obligor); or
          (ii) reduced or canceled as a result of a setoff in respect of any claim by any Person (whether such claim arises out of the same or a related transaction or an unrelated transaction); or
          (b) any of the representations and warranties set forth in and of are no longer true with respect to any Receivable;
paragraphs (i)
(s)
Section 2.1
then, in such event, Buyer shall be entitled to a credit (each, a " ") against the Purchase Price otherwise payable hereunder equal to the Outstanding Balance of such Receivable. If such Purchase Price Credit exceeds the Original Balance of the Receivables coming into existence on any day, then Seller shall pay the remaining amount of such Purchase Price Credit in cash within three (3) Business Days thereafter, if the Amortization Date has not occurred, Seller shall be allowed to deduct the remaining amount of such Purchase
Purchase Price Credit
provided
that
 
Price Credit from any indebtedness owed to it under the Subordinated Note on the next Settlement Date.
     Section 1.4 . All amounts to be paid or deposited by Buyer hereunder shall be paid or deposited in accordance with the terms hereof on the day when due in immediately available funds to the account of Seller designated from time to time by Seller or as otherwise directed by Seller. In the event that any payment owed by any Person hereunder becomes due on a day that is not a Business Day, then such payment shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day. If any Person fails to pay any amount hereunder when due, such Person agrees to pay, on demand, the Default Fee in respect thereof until paid in full; , , that such Default Fee shall not at any time exceed the maximum rate permitted by applicable law. All computations of interest payable hereunder shall be made on the basis of a year of 360 days for the actual number of days (including the first but excluding the last day) elapsed.
Payments and Computations, Etc
provided
however
     Section 1.5 .
Transfer of Records
          (a) In connection with the Purchase of Receivables hereunder, Seller hereby sells, transfers, assigns and otherwise conveys to Buyer all of Seller's right and title to and interest in the Records relating to all Receivables sold hereunder, without the need for any further documentation in connection with the Purchase. In connection with such transfer, Seller hereby grants to each of Buyer, the Agent and the Servicer, an irrevocable, non-exclusive license to use, without royalty or payment of any kind, all software used by Seller to account for the Receivables, to the extent necessary to administer the Receivables, whether such software is owned by Seller or is owned by others and used by Seller under license agreements with respect thereto, should the consent of any licensor of Seller to such grant of the license described herein be required, Seller hereby agrees that upon the request of Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent as Buyer's assignees), Seller will use its reasonable efforts to obtain the consent of such third-party licensor. The license granted hereby shall be irrevocable, and shall terminate on the date this Agreement terminates in accordance with its terms.
provided
that
          (b) Seller (i) shall take such action requested by Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent as Buyer's assignees), from time to time hereafter, that may be necessary or appropriate to ensure that Buyer and its assigns under the Purchase Agreement have an enforceable ownership interest in the Records relating to the Receivables purchased from Seller hereunder, and (ii) shall use its reasonable efforts to ensure that each of the Buyer, the Agent and the Servicer has an enforceable right (whether by license, sublicense or otherwise) to use all of the computer software used by Seller to account for the Receivables and/or to recreate such Records.
     Section 1.6 . If, notwithstanding the intention of the parties expressed in , any sale or contribution by Seller to Buyer of Receivables hereunder
Characterization
Section 1.1(b)
 
shall be characterized as a secured loan and not a sale or such sale shall for any reason be ineffective or unenforceable (any of the foregoing being a " "), then this Agreement shall be deemed to constitute a security agreement under the UCC and other applicable law. For this purpose and without being in derogation of the parties' intention that the sale of Receivables hereunder shall constitute a true sale thereof, Seller hereby grants to Buyer a duly perfected security interest in all of Seller's right, title and interest in, to and under all Receivables now existing and hereafter arising, all Collections, Related Security and Records with respect thereto, each Lock-Box and Collection Account and all proceeds of the foregoing, which security interest shall be prior to all other Adverse Claims thereto. After the occurrence of an Amortization Event, Buyer and its assigns shall have, in addition to the rights and remedies which they may have under this Agreement, all other rights and remedies provided to a secured creditor after default under the UCC and other applicable law, which rights and remedies shall be cumulative. In the case of any Recharacterization, each of the Seller and the Buyer represents and warrants as to itself that each remittance of Collections by the Seller to the Buyer hereunder will have been (i) in payment of a debt incurred by the Seller in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the Seller and the Buyer and (ii) made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the Seller and the Buyer.
Recharacterization
     Section 2.1 . Seller hereby represents and warrants to Buyer, as of the date hereof and as of the date of each purchase hereunder, that:
Representations and Warranties of Seller
          (a) . Seller is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, is a "registered organization" as defined in the UCC in such jurisdiction, and is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing as a foreign corporation, and has and holds all corporate power and all governmental licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals required to carry on its business in each jurisdiction in which its business is conducted, except where the failure to so qualify could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Corporate Existence and Power
          (b) . The execution and delivery by Seller of this Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which it is a party, and the performance of its obligations hereunder and thereunder and, Seller's use of the proceeds of the Purchase made hereunder, are within its corporate powers and authority and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on its part. This Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which Seller is a party has been duly executed and delivered by Seller.
Power and Authority; Due Authorization Execution and Delivery
          (c) . The execution and delivery by Seller of this Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which it is a party, and the performance of its obligations
No Conflict
 
hereunder and thereunder do not contravene or violate (i) its certificate or articles of incorporation or by-laws, (ii) any law, rule or regulation applicable to it, (iii) any restrictions under any agreement, contract or instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound, or (iv) any order, writ, judgment, award, injunction or decree binding on or affecting it or its property, and do not result in the creation or imposition of any Adverse Claim on assets of Seller or its Subsidiaries (except as created hereunder), except, in any case, where such contravention or violation could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and no transaction contemplated hereby requires compliance with any bulk sales act or similar law.
          (d) . Other than the filing of the financing statements required hereunder, no authorization or approval or other action by, and no notice to or filing with, any governmental authority or regulatory body is required for the due execution and delivery by Seller of this Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which it is a party and the performance of its obligations hereunder and thereunder.
Governmental Authorization
          (e) . There are no actions, suits or proceedings pending, or to the best of Seller's knowledge, threatened, against or affecting Seller, or any of its properties, in or before any court, arbitrator or other body, that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Seller is not in default with respect to any order of any court, arbitrator or governmental body, which defaults, individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Actions, Suits
          (f) . This Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which Seller is a party constitute the legal, valid and binding obligations of Seller enforceable against Seller in accordance with their respective terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar laws relating to or limiting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is sought in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Binding Effect
          (g) . All information heretofore furnished by Seller or any of its Affiliates to Buyer (or to the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) for purposes of or in connection with this Agreement, any of the other Transaction Documents or any transaction contemplated hereby or thereby is, and all such information hereafter furnished by Seller or any of its Affiliates to Buyer (or to the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) will be, true and accurate in every material respect on the date such information is stated or certified and does not and will not contain any material misstatement of fact or omit to state a material fact or any fact necessary to make the statements contained therein not misleading.
Accuracy of Information
          (h) . No proceeds of the Purchase hereunder will be used (i) for a purpose that violates, or would be inconsistent with, Regulations T, U or X promulgated by
Use of Proceeds
 
the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System from time to time or (ii) to acquire any security in any transaction which is subject to or of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Section 13
14
          (i) . Immediately prior to each purchase of a Receivable hereunder, Seller shall be the legal and beneficial owner of each such Receivable and Related Security with respect thereto, free and clear of any Adverse Claim, except as created by the Transaction Documents.
Good Title
          (j) . This Agreement, together with the filing of the financing statements contemplated hereby, is effective to transfer to Buyer (and Buyer shall acquire from Seller) legal and equitable title to, with the right to sell and encumber each Receivable existing and hereafter arising, together with the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto, free and clear of any Adverse Claim, except as created by the Transactions Documents. There have been duly filed all financing statements or other similar instruments or documents necessary under the UCC (or any comparable law) of all appropriate jurisdictions to perfect Buyer's ownership interest in the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections.
Perfection
          (k) . The principal places of business and chief executive office of Seller and the offices where it keeps all of its Records are located at the address(es) listed on or such other locations of which Buyer has been notified in accordance with in jurisdictions where all action required by has been taken and completed. Seller's state of organization, organizational identification number (if any), and Federal Employer Identification Number are correctly set forth on .
Places of Business
Exhibit II
Section 4.2(a)
Section 4.2(a)
Exhibit II
          (l) . The conditions and requirements set forth in Section 4.1(j) have at all times been satisfied and duly performed. The names and addresses of all Collection Banks, together with the account numbers of the Collection Accounts of Seller at each Collection Bank and the post office box number of each Lock-Box, are listed on .
Collections
Exhibit III
          (m) . Since December 31, 2010 no event has occurred that would have a Material Adverse Effect.
Material Adverse Effect
          (n) . Except for those listed on , in the past five (5) years, Seller has not used any corporate names, trade names or assumed names other than the name in which it has executed this Agreement.
Names
Exhibit II
          (o) . Seller owns, directly or indirectly, 100% of the issued and outstanding capital stock of Buyer, free and clear of any Adverse Claim. Such capital stock is validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and there are no options, warrants or other rights to acquire securities of Buyer.
Ownership of Buyer
 
          (p) . Seller is not an " " within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or any successor statute.
Not an Investment Company
investment company
          (q) . Seller has complied in all respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders, writs, judgments, injunctions, decrees or awards to which it may be subject, except where the failure to so comply could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each Receivable, together with the Contract related thereto, does not contravene any laws, rules or regulations applicable thereto (including, without limitation, laws, rules and regulations relating to truth in lending, fair credit billing, fair credit reporting, equal credit opportunity, fair debt collection practices and privacy), and no part of such Contract is in violation of any such law, rule or regulation, except where such contravention or violation could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Law
          (r) . Seller has complied in all material respects with the Credit and Collection Policy with regard to each Receivable and the related Contract, and has not made any change to such Credit and Collection Policy except such material change as to which the Agent has been notified in accordance with .
Compliance with Credit and Collection Policy
Section 4.1(a)(vii)
          (s) . Each Contract with respect to each Receivable is effective to create, and has created, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the related Obligor to pay the Outstanding Balance of the Receivable created thereunder and any accrued interest thereon, enforceable against the Obligor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar laws relating to or limiting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is sought in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Enforceability of Contracts
          (t) . As of the date of this Agreement, each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance under the Earlier Agreement is an "Eligible Receivable" as defined under the Purchase Agreement as of the date of this Agreement. Each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance as an Eligible Receivable on the date it came into existence was an Eligible Receivable on such date.
Eligible Receivables
          (u) . The manner in which Seller accounts for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement does not jeopardize the true sale analysis.
Accounting
     Section 3.1 . The effectiveness of this Agreement is subject to the condition precedent that Buyer shall have received on or before the date of such purchase those documents listed on .
Conditions Precedent to Purchase
Schedule A
 
     Section 3.2 . Buyer's obligation to pay for Receivables coming into existence after the date hereof shall be subject to the further conditions precedent that (a) the Facility Termination Date shall not have occurred; and (b) Buyer shall have received such other approvals, opinions or documents as it may reasonably request. Seller represents and warrants that the representations and warranties set forth in are true and correct on and as of the date each Receivable came into existence as though made on and as of such date.
Conditions Precedent to Subsequent Payments
Article II
     Section 4.1 . Until the date on which this Agreement terminates in accordance with its terms, Seller hereby covenants as set forth below:
Affirmative Covenants of Seller
          (a) . Seller will maintain, for itself and each of its Subsidiaries, a system of accounting established and administered in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and furnish to Buyer (and to the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees):
Financial Reporting
          (i) g. Within 90 days after the close of each of its respective fiscal years, audited financial statements (which shall include balance sheets, statements of income and retained earnings and a statement of cash flows) for Seller for such fiscal year certified in a manner acceptable to Buyer (and to the Agent and the Managing Agents, as Buyer's assignees) by Ernst & Young or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing.
Annual Reportin
          (ii) . Within 45 days after the close of the first three (3) quarterly periods of each of its respective fiscal years, balance sheets of Seller as at the close of each such period and statements of income and retained earnings and a statement of cash flows for Seller for the period from the beginning of such fiscal year to the end of such quarter, all certified by its chief financial officer or treasurer.
Quarterly Reporting
          (iii) . Together with the financial statements required hereunder, a compliance certificate in substantially the form of signed by Seller's Authorized Officer on behalf of Seller and dated the date of such annual financial statement or such quarterly financial statement, as the case may be.
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit IV
          (iv) . Promptly upon the furnishing thereof to the shareholders of Seller copies of all financial statements, reports and proxy statements so furnished.
Shareholders Statements and Reports
 
          (v) . Promptly upon the filing thereof, copies of all registration statements and annual, quarterly, monthly or other regular reports which Seller or any of its Subsidiaries files with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
S.E.C. Filings
          (vi) . Promptly upon its receipt of any notice, request for consent, financial statements, certification, report or other communication under or in connection with any Transaction Document from any Person other than Buyer, the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers, copies of the same.
Copies of Notices
          (vii) . At least thirty (30) days prior to the effectiveness of any material change in or material amendment to the Credit and Collection Policy, a notice (A) indicating such change or amendment, and (B) if such proposed change or amendment would be reasonably likely to adversely affect the collectibility of the Receivables or decrease the credit quality of any newly created Receivables, requesting the consent of each Managing Agent thereto; provided that if such change or amendment was required pursuant to any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation, the Seller shall only be required to give notice of such change or amendment and shall not be required to request the consent of the Managing Agents.
Change in Credit and Collection Policy
          (viii) . Promptly, from time to time, such other information, documents, records or reports relating to the Receivables or the condition or operations, financial or otherwise, of Seller as Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may from time to time reasonably request in order to protect the interests of Buyer (and its assigns) under or as contemplated by this Agreement.
Other Information
          (b) . Seller will notify the Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) in writing of any of the following promptly upon learning of the occurrence thereof, describing the same and, if applicable, the steps being taken with respect thereto:
Notices
          (i) . The occurrence of each Amortization Event and each Potential Amortization Event, by a statement of an Authorized Officer of Seller.
Amortization Events or Potential Amortization Events
          (ii) . (A) The entry of any judgment or decree against Seller or any of its Subsidiaries if the aggregate amount of all judgments and decrees then outstanding against Seller and its Subsidiaries exceeds $25,000,000, or (B) the institution of any litigation, arbitration proceeding or governmental proceeding against Seller, which individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or which seeks to enjoin performance of or otherwise relates to the Transaction Documents.
Judgment and Proceedings
 
          (iii) . The occurrence of any event or condition that has, or could reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect.
Material Adverse Effect
          (iv) . The occurrence of a default or an event of default under any other financing arrangement or arrangements governing indebtedness, individually or in the aggregate for all such arrangements, in a principal amount greater than or equal to $50,000,000, pursuant to which Seller is a debtor or an obligor.
Defaults Under Other Agreements
          (v) . Any downgrade in the rating of any Indebtedness of the Seller by Standard and Poor's Ratings Group or by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., setting forth the Indebtedness affected and the nature of such change.
Downgrade of the Seller
          (c) . Seller will comply in all respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders, writs, judgments, injunctions, decrees or awards to which it may be subject except where the failure to comply could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Seller will preserve and maintain its corporate existence, rights, franchises and privileges in the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and qualify and remain qualified in good standing as a foreign corporation in each jurisdiction where its business is conducted, except where the failure to maintain or qualify could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws and Preservation of Corporate Existence
          (d) . Seller will furnish to Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) from time to time such information with respect to it and the Receivables as Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may reasonably request. Seller will, from time to time during regular business hours as requested by Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees), upon reasonable notice and at the sole cost of Seller except as provided below, permit Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) or their respective agents or representatives (and shall cause each other Originator to permit Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) or their respective agents or representatives), (i) to examine and make copies of and abstracts from all Records in the possession or under the control of such Person relating to the Receivables and the Related Security, including, without limitation, the related Contracts, and (ii) to visit the offices and properties of such Person for the purpose of examining such materials described in clause (i) above, and to discuss matters relating to such Person's financial condition or the Receivables and the Related Security or such Person's performance under any of the Transaction Documents or such Person's performance under the Contracts and, in each case, with any of the officers or employees of such Person having knowledge of such matters. So long as no Potential Amortization Event or Amortization Event exists, the visits under this that are at the sole cost of the Seller and that are requested by the Agent or any Managing Agent shall be limited to one per calendar year.
Audits
Section 4.1(d)
 
          (e) .
Keeping and Marking of Records and Books
          (i) Seller will (and will cause each other Originator to) maintain and implement administrative and operating procedures (including, without limitation, an ability to recreate records evidencing Receivables in the event of the destruction of the originals thereof), and keep and maintain all documents, books, records and other information reasonably necessary or advisable for the collection of all Receivables (including, without limitation, records adequate to permit the immediate identification of each new Receivable and all Collections of and adjustments to each existing Receivable). Seller will give Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) notice of any material change in the administrative and operating procedures referred to in the previous sentence.
          (ii) Seller will (and will cause each other Originator to) (A) on or prior to the date hereof, cause all reports relating to the Receivables to bear a legend, acceptable to Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees), describing Buyer's ownership interests in the Receivables and further describing the Purchaser Interests of the Purchasers under the Purchase Agreement and (B) from and after the occurrence of an Amortization Event, (x) mark each Contract with a legend describing Buyer's ownership interests in the Receivables and further describing the Purchaser Interests of the Purchasers and (y) deliver to Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) all Contracts (including, without limitation, all multiple originals of any such Contract) relating to the Receivables.
          (f) . Seller will (and will cause each other Originator to) timely and fully (i) perform and comply with all provisions, covenants and other promises required to be observed by it under the Contracts related to the Receivables, and (ii) comply in all respects with the Credit and Collection Policy in regard to each Receivable and the related Contract. Seller will pay when due any taxes payable in connection with the Receivables, exclusive of taxes on or measured by income or gross receipts of Buyer and its assigns.
Compliance with Contracts and Credit and Collection Policy
          (g) . Seller will and will require each other Originator to, perform each of their respective obligations and undertakings under and pursuant to the applicable Transfer Agreement, will purchase Receivables thereunder in strict compliance with the terms thereof and will vigorously enforce the rights and remedies accorded to Seller under each Transfer Agreement. Seller will take all actions to perfect and enforce its rights and interests (and the rights and interests of Buyer as assignee of Seller) under each Transfer Agreement as Buyer (or its assigns) may from time to time reasonably request, , , making claims to which it may be entitled under any indemnity, reimbursement or similar provision contained in such Transfer Agreement. Seller will not, and will not permit any other Originator to, amend or otherwise modify any
Performance and Enforcement of Transfer Agreements
including
without limitation
 
Transfer Agreement without the prior written consent of each Managing Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers.
          (h) . Seller will take all necessary action to (and will cause each other Originator to) establish and maintain, irrevocably in Buyer, legal and equitable title to the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections, free and clear of any Adverse Claims other than Adverse Claims in favor of Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) (including, without limitation, the filing of all financing statements or other similar instruments or documents necessary under the UCC (or any comparable law) of all appropriate jurisdictions to perfect Buyer's interest in such Receivables, Related Security and Collections and such other action to perfect, protect or more fully evidence the interest of Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) as Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may reasonably request).
Ownership
          (i) . Seller acknowledges that the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers are entering into the transactions contemplated by the Purchase Agreement in reliance upon Buyer's identity as a legal entity that is separate from Seller and any Affiliates thereof. Therefore, from and after the date of execution and delivery of this Agreement, Seller shall take all reasonable steps including, without limitation, all steps that Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may from time to time reasonably request to maintain Buyer's identity as a separate legal entity and to make it manifest to third parties that Buyer is an entity with assets and liabilities distinct from those of Seller and any Affiliates thereof and not just a division of Seller. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and in addition to the other covenants set forth herein, Seller (i) will not hold itself out to third parties as liable for the debts of Buyer nor purport to own the Receivables and other assets acquired by Buyer from Seller, (ii) will take all other actions necessary on its part to ensure that Buyer is at all times in compliance with the covenants set forth in of the Purchase Agreement and (iii) will cause all tax liabilities arising in connection with the transactions contemplated herein or otherwise to be allocated between Seller and Buyer on an arm's-length basis and in a manner consistent with the procedures set forth in U.S. Treasury Regulations 1.1502-33(d) and 1.1552-1.
Purchasers' Reliance
Section 7.1(i)
          (j) . Seller will cause (1) all proceeds from all Lock-Boxes to be directly deposited by a Collection Bank into a Collection Account and (2) each Lock-Box and Collection Account to be subject at all times to a Collection Account Agreement that is in full force and effect. In the event any payments relating to Receivables are remitted directly to Seller or any Affiliate of Seller, Seller will remit (or will cause all such payments to be remitted) directly to a Collection Bank for deposit into a Collection Account within two (2) Business Days following receipt thereof and, at all times prior to such remittance, Seller will itself hold or, if applicable, will cause such payments to be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees). Seller will transfer exclusive ownership, dominion and control of each Lock-Box and Collection Account to Buyer and, will
Collections
 
not grant the right to take dominion and control of any Lock-Box or Collection Account at a future time or upon the occurrence of a future event to any Person, except to Buyer (or the Agent, as Buyer's assignee) as contemplated by this Agreement and the Purchase Agreement. The Seller shall instruct the Obligors with the customer prefixes SIE and SG. to pay all amounts due with respect to their Receivables to an account which is not a Lock-Box or Collection Account.
          (k) . Seller will file all tax returns and reports required by law to be filed by it and promptly pay all taxes and governmental charges at any time owing , except any such taxes which are not yet delinquent or are being diligently contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which adequate reserves in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles shall have been set aside on its books, the failure to make any such payment (1) shall give rise to an immediate right to foreclosure on an Adverse Claim securing such amounts, or (2) could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes
unless
          (l) . Seller will maintain in effect, or cause to be maintained in effect, at Seller's own expense, such casualty and liability insurance as Seller deems appropriate in its good faith business judgement. Seller will pay or cause to be paid, the premiums therefor and deliver to Buyer and each Managing Agent evidence satisfactory to Buyer and each Managing Agent of such insurance coverage. Copies of each policy shall be furnished to Buyer, each Managing Agent, the Agent and any Purchaser in certificated form upon Buyer's, any Managing Agent's, the Agent's or such Purchaser's request. The foregoing requirements shall not be construed to negate, reduce or modify, and are in addition to, Seller's obligations hereunder.
Insurance
          (m) . With respect to any Receivable purchased by Seller from any other Originator, such sale shall be effected under, and in strict compliance with the terms of, the applicable Transfer Agreement, including, without limitation, the terms relating to amount and timing of payments to be made to the applicable Originator in respect of the purchase price for such Receivable.
Payment to the Originators
     Section 4.2 . Until the date on which this Agreement terminates in accordance with its terms, Seller hereby covenants that:
Negative Covenants of Seller
          (a) . Seller will not change its name, identity, state of incorporation or corporate structure (within the meaning of of Revised Article 9 of the UCC) or relocate its chief executive office or any office where Records are kept unless it shall have: (i) given Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) at least forty-five (45) days' prior written notice thereof and (ii) delivered to Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) all financing statements, instruments and other documents requested by Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) in connection with such change or relocation.
Name Change, Offices and Records
Section 9-507(c)
 
          (b) . Except as may be required by the Agent pursuant to of the Purchase Agreement, Seller will not add or terminate any bank as a Collection Bank, or make any change in the instructions to Obligors regarding payments to be made to any Lock-Box or Collection Account, unless Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) shall have received, at least ten (10) days before the proposed effective date therefor, (i) written notice of such addition, termination or change and (ii) with respect to the addition of a Collection Bank or a Collection Account or Lock-Box, an executed Collection Account Agreement with respect to the new Collection Account or Lock-Box; , , that Seller may make changes in instructions to Obligors regarding payments if such new instructions require such Obligor to make payments to another existing Collection Account.
Change in Payment Instructions to Obligors
Section 8.2(b)
provided
however
          (c) . Seller will not, and will not permit any other Originator to, make any change to the Credit and Collection Policy that could reasonably be expected to adversely affect the collectibility of the Receivables or decrease the credit quality of any newly created Receivables unless required to do so by any applicable law, rule or regulation. Except as otherwise permitted in its capacity as Servicer pursuant to of the Purchase Agreement, Seller will not, and will not permit any other Originator to, extend, amend or otherwise modify the terms of any Receivable or any Contract related thereto other than in accordance with the Credit and Collection Policy.
Modifications to Contracts and Credit and Collection Policy
Section 8.2(d)
          (d) . Seller will not sell, assign (by operation of law or otherwise) or otherwise dispose of, or grant any option with respect to, or create or suffer to exist any Adverse Claim upon (including, without limitation, the filing of any financing statement) or with respect to, any Receivable, Related Security or Collections, or upon or with respect to any Contract under which any Receivable arises, or any Lock-Box or Collection Account, or assign any right to receive income with respect thereto (other than, in each case, the creation of the interests therein in favor of Buyer provided for herein), and Seller will defend the right, title and interest of Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) in, to and under any of the foregoing property, against all claims of third parties claiming through or under Seller or any other Originator. Seller shall not create or suffer to exist any mortgage, pledge, security interest, encumbrance, lien, charge or other similar arrangement on any of its inventory.
Sales, Liens
          (e) . Seller will not, and will not permit any Affiliate to, account for or treat (whether in financial statements or otherwise) the transactions contemplated hereby in any manner other than the sale of the Receivables and the Related Security by Seller to Buyer or in any other respect account for or treat the transactions contemplated hereby in any manner other than as a sale of the Receivables and the Related Security by Seller to Buyer except to the extent that such transactions are not recognized on account of consolidated financial reporting in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Accounting for Purchase
 
     Section 5.1 . The occurrence of any one or more of the following events shall constitute an Amortization Event:
Amortization Events
          (a) Seller shall fail (i) to make any payment or deposit required hereunder when due, or (ii) to perform or observe any term, covenant or agreement hereunder (other than as referred to in clause (i) of this paragraph (a)) or any other Transaction Document to which it is a party and such failure shall continue for three (3) consecutive Business Days.
          (b) Any representation, warranty, certification or statement made by Seller in this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or in any other document delivered pursuant hereto or thereto shall prove to have been incorrect when made or deemed made; , , that any breach of the representations and warranties set forth in , or shall not constitute an Amortization Event unless such breach or breaches apply in the aggregate to a material portion of the Receivables.
provided
however
Sections 2.1(i)
(s)
(t)
          (c) Failure of Seller to pay when due any Indebtedness having an outstanding principal balance in excess of $50,000,000; or the default by Seller in the performance of any term, provision or condition contained in any agreement under which any such Indebtedness was created or is governed, the effect of which is to cause, or to permit the holder or holders of such Indebtedness to cause, such Indebtedness to become due prior to its stated maturity; or any such Indebtedness of Seller shall be declared to be due and payable or required to be prepaid (other than by a regularly scheduled payment) prior to the date of maturity thereof.
          (d) (i) Seller or any of its Significant Subsidiaries shall generally not pay its debts as such debts become due or shall admit in writing its inability to pay its debts generally or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; or (ii) any proceeding shall be instituted by or against Seller or any of its Significant Subsidiaries seeking to adjudicate it bankrupt or insolvent, or seeking liquidation, winding up, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, protection, relief or composition of it or its debts under any law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization or relief of debtors, or seeking the entry of an order for relief or the appointment of a receiver, trustee or other similar official for it or any substantial part of its property; provided that in the event any such proceedings shall have been instituted against Seller or any Significant Subsidiary, such proceedings shall have continued undismissed or unstayed and in effect for a period of sixty (60) consecutive days or an order for relief shall have been entered in such proceedings; or (iii) Seller or any of its Significant Subsidiaries shall take any corporate action to authorize any of the actions set forth in the foregoing clause (i) or (ii) of this subsection (d).
 
          (e) A Change of Control shall occur.
          (f) One or more final judgments for the payment of money in an amount in excess of $25,000,000, individually or in the aggregate, shall be entered against Seller, and such judgment shall continue unsatisfied and in effect for thirty (30) consecutive days without a stay of execution.
     Section 5.2 . Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Amortization Event, Buyer may take any of the following actions: (i) declare the Amortization Date to have occurred, whereupon the Amortization Date shall forthwith occur, without demand, protest or further notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by Seller; , , that upon the occurrence of Amortization Event described in , or of an actual or deemed entry of an order for relief with respect to Seller under the Federal Bankruptcy Code, the Amortization Date shall automatically occur, without demand, protest or any notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by Seller and (ii) to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, declare that the Default Fee shall accrue with respect to any amounts then due and owing by Buyer to Seller. The aforementioned rights and remedies shall be in addition to all other rights and remedies of Buyer and its assigns available under this Agreement, by operation of law, at equity or otherwise, all of which are hereby expressly preserved, including, without limitation, all rights and remedies provided under the UCC, all of which rights shall be cumulative.
Remedies
provided
however
Section 5.1(d)(ii)
     Section 6.1 . Without limiting any other rights that Buyer may have hereunder or under applicable law, Seller hereby agrees to indemnify Buyer and its assigns, officers, directors, agents and employees (each an " ") from and against any and all damages, losses, claims, taxes, liabilities, costs, expenses and for all other amounts payable, including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements (all of the foregoing being collectively referred to as " ") awarded against or incurred by any of them arising out of or as a result of this Agreement or the acquisition, either directly or indirectly, by Buyer of an interest in the Receivables, excluding, however:
Indemnities by Seller
Indemnified Party
Indemnified Amounts
          (i) Indemnified Amounts to the extent a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction holds that such Indemnified Amounts resulted from gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Indemnified Party seeking indemnification;
          (ii) Indemnified Amounts to the extent the same includes losses in respect of Receivables that are uncollectible on account of the insolvency, bankruptcy or lack of creditworthiness of the related Obligor; or
 
          (iii) taxes imposed by the jurisdiction in which such Indemnified Party's principal executive office is located, on or measured by the overall net income of such Indemnified Party to the extent that the computation of such taxes is consistent with the Intended Characterization.
          Without limiting the generality of the foregoing indemnification, Seller shall indemnify Buyer for Indemnified Amounts relating to or resulting from:
     (1) any representation or warranty made by Seller or any other Originator (or any officers of any such Person) under or in connection with this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or any other information or report delivered by any such Person pursuant hereto or thereto, which shall have been false or incorrect when made or deemed made;
     (2) the failure by Seller or any other Originator to comply with any applicable law, rule or regulation with respect to any Receivable or Contract related thereto, or the nonconformity of any Receivable or Contract included therein with any such applicable law, rule or regulation or any failure of Seller or any other Originator to keep or perform any of its obligations, express or implied, with respect to any Contract;
     (3) any failure of Seller or any other Originator to perform its duties, covenants or other obligations in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement or any other Transaction Document;
     (4) any products liability, personal injury or damage suit or similar claim arising out of or in connection with merchandise, insurance or services that are the subject of any Contract or any Receivable;
     (5) any dispute, claim, offset or defense (other than discharge in bankruptcy of the Obligor) of the Obligor to the payment of any Receivable (including, without limitation, a defense based on such Receivable or the related Contract not being a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Obligor enforceable against it in accordance with its terms), or any other claim resulting from the sale of the merchandise or service related to such Receivable or the furnishing or failure to furnish such merchandise or services;
     (6) the commingling of Collections of Receivables at any time with other funds;
     (7) any investigation, litigation or proceeding related to or arising from this Agreement or any other Transaction Document, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, the use of the proceeds of a Purchase, the ownership of the Receivables, or any other investigation, litigation or proceeding relating to Buyer, Seller or any other
 
     Originator in which any Indemnified Party becomes involved as a result of any of the transactions contemplated hereby;
     (8) any inability to litigate any claim against any Obligor in respect of any Receivable as a result of such Obligor being immune from civil and commercial law and suit on the grounds of sovereignty or otherwise from any legal action, suit or proceeding;
     (9) any Amortization Event described in ;
Section 5.1(d)
     (10) any failure of Seller to acquire and maintain legal and equitable title to, and ownership of any Receivable and the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto from any other Originator, free and clear of any Adverse Claim (other than as created hereunder); or any failure of Seller to give reasonably equivalent value to the applicable Originator under the applicable Transfer Agreement in consideration of the transfer by the applicable Originator of any Receivable, or any attempt by any Person to void such transfer under statutory provisions or common law or equitable action;
     (11) any failure to vest and maintain vested in Buyer, or to transfer to Buyer, legal and equitable title to, and ownership of, the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections, free and clear of any Adverse Claim;
     (12) the failure to have filed, or any delay in filing, financing statements or other similar instruments or documents under the UCC of any applicable jurisdiction or other applicable laws with respect to any Receivable, the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto, and the proceeds of any thereof, whether at the time of the Purchase or at any subsequent time;
     (13) any action or omission by Seller which reduces or impairs the rights of Buyer with respect to any Receivable or the value of any such Receivable; and
     (14) any attempt by any Person to void any Purchase hereunder under statutory provisions or common law or equitable action.
     Section 6.2 . Seller shall pay to Buyer on demand all costs and out-of-pocket expenses in connection with the preparation, execution, delivery and administration of this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby and the other documents to be delivered hereunder. Seller shall pay to Buyer on demand any and all costs and expenses of Buyer, if any, including reasonable counsel fees and expenses in connection with the enforcement of this Agreement and the other documents delivered hereunder and in connection with any restructuring or workout of this Agreement or such documents, or the administration of this Agreement following an Amortization Event.
Other Costs and Expenses
 
     Section 7.1 . No failure or delay on the part of Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) in exercising any power, right or remedy under this Agreement shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such power, right or remedy preclude any other further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other power, right or remedy. The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and nonexclusive of any rights or remedies provided by law. Any waiver of this Agreement shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given. No provision of this Agreement may be amended, supplemented, modified or waived except in writing signed by Seller and Buyer and, to the extent required under the Purchase Agreement, the Agent and the Financial Institutions or the Required Financial Institutions.
Waivers and Amendments
     Section 7.2 . Except as provided below, all communications and notices provided for hereunder shall be in writing (including bank wire, telecopy or electronic facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given to the other parties hereto at their respective addresses or telecopy numbers set forth on the signature pages hereof or at such other address or telecopy number as such Person may hereafter specify for the purpose of notice to each of the other parties hereto. Each such notice or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by telecopy, upon the receipt thereof, (ii) if given by mail, three (3) Business Days after the time such communication is deposited in the mail with first class postage prepaid or (iii) if given by any other means, when received at the address specified in this .
Notices
Section 7.2
     Section 7.3 .
Protection of Ownership Interests of Buyer
          (a) Seller agrees that from time to time, at its expense, it will promptly execute and deliver all instruments and documents, and take all actions, that may be necessary or desirable, or that Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may request, to perfect, protect or more fully evidence the Purchaser Interests, or to enable Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) to exercise and enforce their rights and remedies hereunder. At any time, Buyer (or following the occurrence of an Amortization Event, the Agent, or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may, at Seller's sole cost and expense, direct Seller to notify the Obligors of Receivables of the ownership interests of Buyer and its assigns under this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and may also direct that payments of all amounts due or that become due under any or all Receivables be made directly to Buyer or its designee (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignee).
          (b) If Seller fails to perform any of its obligations hereunder, Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) may (but shall not be required to) perform, or cause performance of, such obligation, and the costs and expenses incurred by Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) in connection therewith shall be payable by
 
Seller as provided in . Seller irrevocably authorizes Buyer (and the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) at any time and from time to time in the sole discretion of Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees), and appoints Buyer (and the Agent and each Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) as its attorney(s)-in-fact, to act on behalf of Seller (i) to execute on behalf of Seller as debtor and to file financing statements necessary or desirable in the sole discretion of Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) to perfect and to maintain the perfection and priority of the interest of Buyer in the Receivables and (ii) to file a carbon, photographic or other reproduction of this Agreement or any financing statement with respect to the Receivables as a financing statement in such offices as Buyer (or the Agent or any Managing Agent, as Buyer's assignees) in its sole discretion deems necessary or desirable to perfect and to maintain the perfection and priority of Buyer's interests in the Receivables. This appointment is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable.
Section 6.2
     Section 7.4 .
Confidentiality
          (a) Seller shall maintain and shall cause each of its employees and officers to maintain the confidentiality of this Agreement and the other confidential proprietary information with respect to the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers and their respective businesses obtained by it or them in connection with the structuring, negotiating and execution of the transactions contemplated herein, except that Seller and its officers and employees may disclose such information to Seller's external accountants and attorneys and as required by any applicable law or order of any judicial or administrative proceeding.
          (b) Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, Seller hereby consents to the disclosure of any nonpublic information with respect to it (i) to Buyer, the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers by each other, (ii) by Buyer, the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers to any prospective or actual assignee or participant of any of them or (iii) by the Agent or any Managing Agent to any rating agency, Commercial Paper dealer or provider of a surety, guaranty or credit or liquidity enhancement to the Conduits or any entity organized for the purpose of purchasing, or making loans secured by, financial assets for which any of the Managing Agents acts as the administrative agent and to any officers, directors, employees, outside accountants and attorneys of any of the foregoing, provided that each such Person is informed of the confidential nature of such information. In addition, the Purchasers, the Managing Agents and the Agent may disclose any such nonpublic information pursuant to any law, rule, regulation, direction, request or order of any judicial, administrative or regulatory authority or proceedings (whether or not having the force or effect of law), provided that such Purchaser, Managing Agent or the Agent, as applicable, shall, if practicable, notify Seller in advance prior to disclosure and will use reasonable efforts to cooperate with Seller at Seller's expense in obtaining any protective order for such information.
 
     Section 7.5 . Seller and Buyer each hereby covenants and agrees that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding senior Indebtedness of a Conduit, it will not institute against, or join any other Person in instituting against, such Conduit any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings or other similar proceeding under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States.
Bankruptcy Petition
     Section 7.6 . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, 735 ILCS SECTION 105/5-1 ET SEQ., BUT OTHERWISE WITHOUT REGARD TO THE CONFLICTS OF LAW PROVISIONS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
CHOICE OF LAW
     Section 7.7 . SELLER HEREBY IRREVOCABLY SUBMITS TO THE NON-EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF ANY UNITED STATES FEDERAL OR ILLINOIS STATE COURT SITTING IN CHICAGO, ILLINOIS IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY DOCUMENT EXECUTED BY SELLER PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT AND SELLER HEREBY IRREVOCABLY AGREES THAT ALL CLAIMS IN RESPECT OF SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING MAY BE HEARD AND DETERMINED IN ANY SUCH COURT AND IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY OBJECTION IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE AS TO THE VENUE OF ANY SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING BROUGHT IN SUCH A COURT OR THAT SUCH COURT IS AN INCONVENIENT FORUM. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL LIMIT THE RIGHT OF BUYER (OR THE AGENT OR ANY MANAGING AGENT, AS BUYER'S ASSIGNEES) TO BRING PROCEEDINGS AGAINST SELLER IN THE COURTS OF ANY OTHER JURISDICTION. ANY JUDICIAL PROCEEDING BY SELLER AGAINST BUYER (OR THE AGENT OR ANY MANAGING AGENT, AS BUYER'S ASSIGNEES) OR ANY AFFILIATE THEREOF INVOLVING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ANY MATTER IN ANY WAY ARISING OUT OF, RELATED TO, OR CONNECTED WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY DOCUMENT EXECUTED BY SELLER PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE BROUGHT ONLY IN A COURT IN CHICAGO, ILLINOIS.
CONSENT TO JURISDICTION
     Section 7.8 . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY JUDICIAL PROCEEDING INVOLVING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ANY MATTER (WHETHER SOUNDING IN TORT, CONTRACT OR OTHERWISE) IN ANY WAY ARISING OUT OF, RELATED TO, OR CONNECTED WITH THIS AGREEMENT, ANY DOCUMENT EXECUTED BY SELLER PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE RELATIONSHIP ESTABLISHED HEREUNDER OR THEREUNDER.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
     Section 7.9 .
Integration; Binding Effect; Survival of Terms
          (a) This Agreement, the Subordinated Note, the Subscription Agreement and each Collection Account Agreement contain the final and complete integration of all prior expressions by the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof and shall constitute the entire agreement among the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof superseding all prior oral or written understandings.
          (b) This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns (including any trustee in bankruptcy). This Agreement shall create and constitute the continuing obligations of the parties hereto in accordance with its terms and shall remain in full force and effect until terminated in accordance with its terms; , , that the rights and remedies with respect to (i) any breach of any representation and warranty made by Seller pursuant to , (ii) the indemnification and payment provisions of , and (iii) shall be continuing and shall survive any termination of this Agreement.
provided
however
Article II
Article VI
Section 7.5
     Section 7.10 . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Agreement. Any provisions of this Agreement which are prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction. Unless otherwise expressly indicated, all references herein to "Article," "Section," "Schedule" or "Exhibit" shall mean articles and sections of, and schedules and exhibits to, this Agreement.
Counterparts; Severability; Section References
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed and delivered by their duly authorized officers as of the date hereof.
 
          This is Exhibit I to the Agreement (as hereinafter defined). As used in the Agreement and the Exhibits, Schedules and Annexes thereto, capitalized terms have the meanings set forth in this Exhibit I (such meanings to be equally applicable to the singular and plural forms thereof). If a capitalized term is used in the Agreement, or any Exhibit, Schedule or Annex thereto, and not otherwise defined therein or in this Exhibit I, such term shall have the meaning assigned thereto in Exhibit I to the Purchase Agreement.
          "" means Accu-Tech Corporation, a Georgia corporation.
Accu-Tech
          "" means that certain Receivables Transfer Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, between Accu-Tech and Seller, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Accu-Tech Transfer Agreement
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statements to the Agreement.
Agent
          "" means this Second Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, dated as of May 31, 2011, between Seller and Buyer, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified.
Agreement
          "" means the earliest to occur of (i) the Facility Termination Date, (ii) any Business Day so designated by Seller and Buyer, (iii) the Business Day immediately prior to the occurrence of an Amortization Event set forth in , (iv) the Business Day specified in a written notice from Buyer to Seller following the occurrence of any other Amortization Event, and (v) the date which is thirty (30) days after Buyer's receipt of written notice from Seller that it wishes to terminate the facility evidenced by this Agreement.
Amortization Date
Section 5.1(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in of the Agreement.
Amortization Event
Section 5.1
          "" has the meaning set forth in of the Agreement.
Applied Collections
Section 1.2(d)
          "" means, with respect to Seller, its treasurer, corporate controller, chief financial officer or any vice president.
Authorized Officer
          "" means Title 11 of the United States Code entitled "Bankruptcy", as amended, and any successor statute thereto.
Bankruptcy Code
 
          "" means a rate per annum equal to the corporate base rate, prime rate or base rate of interest, as applicable, announced by JPMCB from time to time, changing when and as such rate changes.
Base Rate
          "" means any day on which banks are not authorized or required to close in New York, New York or Chicago, Illinois and The Depository Trust Company of New York is open for business.
Business Day
          "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to the Agreement.
Buyer
          "" means each calendar month or portion thereof which elapses during the term of the Agreement. The first Calculation Period shall commence on the date of the Purchase of Receivables hereunder and the final Calculation Period shall terminate on the Amortization Date.
Calculation Period
          "" means the acquisition by any Person, or two or more Persons acting in concert, of beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 of the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of 20% or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of Seller.
Change of Control
          "" means (i) Seller's credit and collection policies and practices relating to Contracts and Receivables existing on the date hereof and (ii) Accu-Tech's credit and collection policies and practices relating to Contracts and Receivables existing on the date hereof, as summarized in and as modified from time to time in accordance with the Agreement.
Credit and Collection Policy
Exhibit V
          "" means a per annum rate of interest equal to the sum of (i) the Base Rate, (ii) 2% per annum.
Default Fee
plus
          "" means, at any time, the aggregate amount of reductions or cancellations described in of the Agreement.
Dilutions
Section 1.3(a)
          "" means a percentage calculated to provide Buyer with a reasonable return on its investment in the Receivables after taking account of (i) the time value of money based upon the anticipated dates of collection of the Receivables and the cost to Buyer of financing its investment in the Receivables during such period and (ii) the risk of nonpayment by the Obligors. Seller and Buyer may agree from time to time to change the Discount Factor based on changes in one or more of the items affecting the calculation thereof, that any change to the Discount Factor shall take effect as of the commencement of a Calculation Period, shall apply only prospectively and shall not affect the Purchase Price payment in respect of Purchase which occurred during any Calculation Period ending prior to the Calculation Period during which Seller and Buyer agree to make such change.
Discount Factor
provided
 
          "" means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Seller, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Seller's Latin American export locations, (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Seller's "Pacer", "IMS" and "Pentacon" divisions which are not included in Seller's main subledger system, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by any of Seller's divisions which are acquired after July 24, 2009 which are not included in Seller's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer prefixes: N-N, NN+, SIE or SG. (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009), and thereafter, and (v) all accounts receivable existing at Seller's general corporate division coded WC (as such division is in effect or otherwise structured as of July 24, 2009).
Excluded Receivable
          "" means, for income tax purposes, the characterization of the acquisition by the Purchasers of Purchaser Interests under the Purchase Agreement as a loan or loans by the Purchasers to Buyer secured by the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections.
Intended Characterization
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statements to this Agreement.
Managing Agents
          "" means a material adverse effect on (i) the financial condition or operations of Seller and its Subsidiaries, (ii) the ability of Seller to perform its obligations under the Agreement or any other Transaction Document, (iii) the legality, validity or enforceability of the Agreement or any other Transaction Document, (iv) Seller's, Buyer's, the Agent's, any Managing Agent's or any Purchaser's interest in the Receivables generally or in any significant portion of the Receivables, the Related Security or Collections with respect thereto, or (v) the collectibility of the Receivables generally or of any material portion of the Receivables.
Material Adverse Effect
          "" means as of the last Business Day of each Calculation Period preceding any date of determination, the excess, if any, of (a) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of the Receivables at such time, (b) the sum of (i) the aggregate Capital outstanding at such time, (ii) the aggregate outstanding principal balance of the Subordinated Loans (including any Subordinated Loan proposed to be made on the date of determination).
Net Worth
over
plus
          "" means, with respect to any Receivable, the Outstanding Balance of such Receivable on the date it was purchased by Buyer.
Original Balance
          "" means (i) Seller, (ii) Accu-Tech or (iii) any other Person approved from time to time by the Managing Agents, in each case, in such Person's capacity as a "Seller" party to the Agreement or a Transfer Agreement.
Originator
 
          "" means an event which, with the passage of time or the giving of notice, or both, would constitute an Amortization Event.
Potential Amortization Event
          "" means the purchase under the Agreement by Buyer from Seller of the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections related thereto, together with all related rights in connection therewith.
Purchase
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statements to the Agreement.
Purchase Agreement
          "" means, with respect to any Purchase on any date, the aggregate price to be paid by Buyer to Seller for such Purchase in accordance with of the Agreement for the Receivables, Collections and Related Security being sold to Buyer on such date, which price shall equal (i) the product of (x) the Original Balance of such Receivables, (y) one minus the Discount Factor then in effect, minus (ii) any Purchase Price Credits to be credited against the Purchase Price otherwise payable in accordance with of the Agreement.
Purchase Price
Section 1.2
multiplied
by
Section 1.3
          "" has the meaning set forth in of the Agreement.
Purchase Price Credit
Section 1.3
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statements to the Agreement.
Purchasers
          "" means the indebtedness and other obligations owed to each Originator (without giving effect to any transfer or conveyance under the applicable Transfer Agreement or the Agreement) or Buyer (after giving effect to the transfers under the applicable Transfer Agreement and the Agreement) other than Excluded Receivables whether constituting an account, chattel paper, instrument or general intangible, arising in connection with the sale of goods or the rendering of services by such Originator and includes, without limitation, the obligation to pay any Finance Charges with respect thereto. Indebtedness and other rights and obligations arising from any one transaction, including, without limitation, indebtedness and other rights and obligations represented by an individual invoice, shall constitute a Receivable separate from a Receivable consisting of the indebtedness and other rights and obligations arising from any other transaction.
Receivable
          "" means, with respect to any Receivable:
Related Security
          (i) all of the applicable Originator's interest in the inventory and goods (including returned or repossessed inventory or goods), if any, the sale of which by such Originator gave rise to such Receivable, and all insurance contracts with respect thereto,
 
          (ii) all other security interests or liens and property subject thereto from time to time, if any, purporting to secure payment of such Receivable, whether pursuant to the Contract related to such Receivable or otherwise, together with all financing statements and security agreements describing any collateral securing such Receivable,
          (iii) all guaranties, letters of credit, insurance and other agreements or arrangements of whatever character from time to time supporting or securing payment of such Receivable whether pursuant to the Contract related to such Receivable or otherwise,
          (iv) all service contracts and other contracts and agreements associated with such Receivable,
          (v) all Records related to such Receivable,
          (vi) all of Seller's interest in, to and under the Transfer Agreements, and
          (vii) all proceeds of any of the foregoing.
          "" means, as of any date of determination, an amount equal to 3.5% of the Outstanding Balance of all Receivables at such time.
Required Capital Amount
          "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to the Agreement.
Seller
          "" means the seventeenth day of each calendar month, or if such day is not a Business Day, the next succeeding Business Day.
Settlement Date
          "" has the meaning set forth in of the Agreement.
Subordinated Loan
Section 1.2(a)
          "" means a promissory note in substantially the form of hereto as more fully described in of the Agreement, as the same may be amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Subordinated Note
Exhibit VII
Section 1.2
          "" means that certain Stockholder and Subscription Agreement, dated as of October 6, 2000, between Seller and Buyer, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit VI.
Subscription Agreement
          "" of a Person means (i) any corporation more than 50% of the outstanding securities having ordinary voting power of which shall at the time be owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by such Person or by one or more of its Subsidiaries or by such
Subsidiary
 
Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries, or (ii) any partnership, association, limited liability company, joint venture or similar business organization more than 50% of the ownership interests having ordinary voting power of which shall at the time be so owned or controlled.
          "" means, collectively, this Agreement, each Transfer Agreement, each Collection Account Agreement, the Subordinated Note, the Subscription Agreement and all other instruments, documents and agreements executed and delivered in connection herewith.
Transaction Documents
          "" means (a) the Accu-Tech Transfer Agreement and (b) each other receivables transfer agreement entered into from time to time between an Originator (other than Seller) approved by the Agent, and Seller, in form and substance satisfactory to the Agent, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Transfer Agreement
          "" means the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the State of Illinois.
UCC
          All accounting terms not specifically defined herein shall be construed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. All terms used in Article 9 of the UCC in the State of Illinois, and not specifically defined herein, are used herein as defined in such Article 9.

EXHIBIT 10.2
 
 
 
 
     This Second Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement dated as of May 31, 2011 is among ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (""), ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), as initial Servicer (Anixter, together with Seller, the "" and each a ""), FALCON ASSET SECURITIZATION COMPANY LLC ("") and THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (""), as conduits (collectively, the "" and each individually, a ""), the entities listed on to this Agreement (together with any of their respective successors and assigns hereunder, the ""), JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. ("") and SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC. (""), as managing agents (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and JPMCB, as agent for the Purchasers hereunder or any successor agent hereunder (together with its successors and assigns hereunder, the ""). Unless defined elsewhere herein, capitalized terms used in this Agreement shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in .
Seller
Anixter
Seller Parties
Seller Party
Falcon
Three Pillars
Conduits
Conduit
Schedule A
Financial Institutions
JPMCB
SunTrust
Managing Agents
Managing Agent
Agent
Exhibit I
     A. Reference is made to that certain Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement dated as of October 3, 2002 by and among the parties hereto (as heretofore amended, the "").
Earlier Purchase Agreement
     B. The Seller Parties, the Conduit, the Financial Institutions, the Managing Agents and the Agent have, on the terms and conditions set forth herein, agreed to amend and restate the Earlier Purchase Agreement in its entirety.
     (a) This Agreement amends and restates in its entirety the Earlier Purchase Agreement. Upon the effectiveness of this Agreement, the terms and provisions of the Earlier Purchase Agreement shall, subject to the following clauses (b) and (c), be superseded hereby.
     (b) Notwithstanding the amendment and restatement of the Earlier Purchase Agreement by this Agreement:
     (i) the Seller shall continue to be liable to the Purchasers, the Agent and the Managing Agents with respect to (A) all unpaid CP Costs, Yield, fees, expenses and other obligations of the Seller accrued under the Earlier Purchase Agreement prior to the effective date of this Agreement and (B) all agreements on the part of the Seller under the Earlier Purchase Agreement to indemnify the Purchasers, the Agent and the Managing Agents in connection with events or conditions arising or existing prior to the effective date of this Agreement, including, but not limited to, those events and conditions set forth in thereof;
Article X
 
     (ii) Each Purchaser shall continue to be liable in respect of each claim of the Agent or such Purchaser's Managing Agent against such Person arising under the Earlier Purchase Agreement prior to the effective date of this Agreement, including but not limited to, each claim arising under of the Earlier Purchase Agreement; and
Section 11.6
     (iii) The Purchasers, the Agent and the Managing Agents shall continue to be liable in respect of any claim against such Person in favor of the Seller arising under the Earlier Purchase Agreement prior to the effective date of this Agreement.
     (c) This Agreement is entered into in substitution for the Earlier Purchase Agreement and not as payment of any of the obligations of the Seller thereunder, and is in no way intended to constitute a novation of the Earlier Purchase Agreement. Nothing contained herein is intended to amend, modify or otherwise affect any obligation of, or grant of authority by, the Seller existing prior to the date hereof.
     (d) Upon the effectiveness of this Agreement, each reference to the Earlier Purchase Agreement in any other document, instrument or agreement executed and/or delivered in connection therewith shall mean and be a reference to this Agreement unless the context otherwise requires.
     (e) Upon the effectiveness of this Agreement, the terms of this Agreement shall govern all aspects of the facility contemplated herein, including, without limitation, the eligibility of Receivables purchased under the Earlier Purchase Agreement and any settlements to be made with respect thereto.
     Section 1.1 .
Purchase Facility
          (a) Upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereof, Seller may, at its option, sell and assign Purchaser Interests to the Agent, for the benefit of the Purchasers, in all of its Receivables, Related Security, Collections, and proceeds of any of the foregoing, in each case, whether now owned or hereafter arising. In accordance with the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Conduit may, at its option, instruct the related Managing Agent to purchase on its behalf through the Agent, or if any such Conduit shall decline to purchase, the applicable Managing Agent shall purchase, on behalf of the applicable Financial Institutions through the Agent, Purchaser Interests from time to time in an aggregate amount not to exceed the Purchase Limit, and for each Purchase Group, in an aggregate amount not to exceed the Group Purchase Limit for such Purchase Group, during the period from the date hereof to but not including the Facility Termination Date. Notwithstanding the foregoing, at no time shall a Purchaser Interest be purchased for a Financial Institution pursuant to this if the Capital allocated to the Financial Institution with respect to such Purchaser Interest would exceed such Financial Institution's Unused Back-up Commitment at such time.
Section 1.1(a)
          (b) Seller may, upon at least 30 days' notice to the Agent and each Managing Agent, terminate in whole or reduce in part, ratably among the Financial Institutions based on the
 
     amount of their Back-Up Commitments, the Unused Purchase Limit; provided that each partial reduction of the Purchase Limit shall be in an amount equal to $5,000,000 or an integral multiple thereof. Each Financial Institution's Back-Up Commitment shall be reduced by its Pro Rata Share of each reduction in the Purchase Limit, and each Financial Institution's Liquidity Commitment shall be reduced by its Pro Rata Share of 102% of each such reduction in the Purchase Limit.
     Section 1.2 . Seller shall provide each Managing Agent with at least three (3) Business Days' prior notice in a form set forth as hereto of each Incremental Purchase (collectively, a ""). Each Purchase Notice shall be subject to hereof and, except as set forth below, shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested (i) Purchase Price (which shall not be less than $500,000 per Purchase Group) and (ii) in the event a Conduit declines to make an Incremental Purchase and such Incremental Purchase is to be funded by the related Financial Institutions, the type of Discount Rate and Tranche Period. Following receipt of a Purchase Notice, each Managing Agent will determine whether the Conduit in its Purchase Group agrees to make the purchase. If any Conduit declines to make a proposed purchase, its Managing Agent shall promptly notify the Agent and the Seller, and the Seller may cancel the Purchase Notice in its entirety or, in the absence of such a cancellation, the Incremental Purchase of the Purchaser Interest will be made by the Financial Institutions in such Conduit's Purchase Group. Each Incremental Purchase to be made hereunder shall be made ratably among the Purchase Groups in accordance with their Group Purchase Limits. On the date of each Incremental Purchase, upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions precedent set forth in , each Conduit or the applicable Financial Institutions, as applicable, shall make available to the related Managing Agent at its address listed beneath its signature on its signature page to this Agreement, for deposit to such account as the Seller designates from time to time, in immediately available funds, no later than 12:00 Noon (Chicago time), an amount equal to (i) in the case of a Conduit, such Conduit's Pro Rata Share of the aggregate Purchase Price of the Purchaser Interests then being purchased, which amount shall not exceed such Conduit's Pro Rata Share of the Unused Purchase Limit, or (ii) in the case of a Financial Institution, such Financial Institution's Pro Rata Share of the aggregate Purchase Price of the Purchaser Interests then being purchased, such amount not to exceed such Financial Institution's Unused Back-Up Commitment.
Increases
Exhibit II
Purchase Notice
Section 6.2
Article VI
     Section 1.3 . Seller shall provide each Managing Agent with at least three (3) Business Days' prior written notice of any proposed reduction of Aggregate Capital from Collections (a ""). Such Reduction Notice shall designate (i) the date (the "") upon which any such reduction of Aggregate Capital shall occur, and (ii) the amount of Aggregate Capital to be reduced which shall be applied by the Managing Agents ratably to the Purchaser Interests of the Purchasers in accordance with the amount of Capital (if any) owing to such Purchaser (ratably, based on such Purchaser's Capital Pro Rata Share) (the ""). Only one (1) Reduction Notice shall be outstanding at any time.
Decreases
Reduction Notice
Proposed Reduction Date
Aggregate Reduction
     Section 1.4 . All amounts to be paid or deposited by any Seller Party pursuant to any provision of this Agreement shall be paid or deposited in accordance with the terms hereof no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) on the day when due in immediately available funds, and if not received before 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) shall be deemed to be
Payment Requirements
 
received on the next succeeding Business Day. If such amounts are payable to a Purchaser they shall be paid to the related Managing Agent, for the account of such Purchaser, at its address listed beneath its signature on its signature page to this Agreement until otherwise notified in writing by such Managing Agent. Upon notice to Seller, the Agent may debit the Facility Account for all amounts due and payable hereunder. All computations of Yield, per annum fees hereunder and per annum fees under the Fee Letter shall be made on the basis of a year of 360 days for the actual number of days elapsed. If any amount hereunder shall be payable on a day which is not a Business Day, such amount shall be payable on the next succeeding Business Day. All payments to Three Pillar Funding LLC must be made by 12:00 p.m. (New York time) in order to comply with Section B(1)(a) of the DTC Operational Arrangements and the DTC Notice (B#2078-07) dated September 11, 2007.
     Section 2.1 . Notwithstanding any limitation on recourse contained in this Agreement, Seller shall immediately pay to each Managing Agent when due, for the account of the related Purchaser or Purchasers on a full recourse basis, (i) such fees as set forth in the Fee Letter (which fees shall be sufficient to pay all fees owing to the Financial Institutions), (ii) all amounts payable as Yield, (iii) all amounts payable as Deemed Collections (which shall be immediately due and payable by Seller and applied to reduce outstanding Aggregate Capital hereunder in accordance with and hereof), (iv) all amounts payable pursuant to , (v) all amounts payable pursuant to , if any, (vi) all Servicer costs and expenses, including the Servicing Fee, in connection with servicing, administering and collecting the Receivables, (vii) all Broken Funding Costs and (viii) all Default Fees (collectively, the ""). If any Person fails to pay any of the Obligations when due, such Person agrees to pay, on demand, the Default Fee in respect thereof until paid. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no provision of this Agreement or the Fee Letter shall require the payment or permit the collection of any amounts hereunder in excess of the maximum permitted by applicable law. If at any time any Seller Party receives any Collections or is deemed to receive any Collections, such Seller Party shall immediately pay such Collections or Deemed Collections to the Servicer for application in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof and, at all times prior to such payment, such Collections or Deemed Collections shall be held in trust by such Seller Party for the exclusive benefit of the Purchasers, the Managing Agents and the Agent.
Payments
Sections 2.2
2.3
Section 2.6
Article X
Obligations
     Section 2.2 Prior to the Amortization Date, any Collections and/or Deemed Collections received by the Servicer shall be set aside and held in trust by the Servicer for the payment of any accrued and unpaid Aggregate Unpaids or for a Reinvestment or an Aggregate Reduction as provided in this . If at any time any Collections are received by the Servicer prior to the Amortization Date, (i) the Servicer shall set aside the Termination Percentage (as hereinafter defined) of Collections evidenced by the Purchaser Interests of each Terminating Financial Institution and (ii) Seller hereby requests and the Purchasers (other than any Terminating Financial Institutions) hereby agree to make, simultaneously with such receipt, a reinvestment of funds (each a "") with a portion of the balance of each and every Collection received by the Servicer or Deemed Collection that is part of any Purchaser Interest (other than any Purchaser Interests of Terminating Financial
Collections Prior to Amortization.
Section 2.2
Reinvestment
 
Institutions), such that after giving effect to such Reinvestment, the amount of Aggregate Capital immediately after such receipt and corresponding Reinvestment shall be equal to the amount of Aggregate Capital immediately prior to such receipt. On each Settlement Date prior to the occurrence of the Amortization Date, the Servicer shall remit to the Managing Agents' respective accounts in accordance with the applicable Group Pro Rata Share of its Purchase Group, the amounts set aside during the preceding Settlement Period that have not been subject to a Reinvestment and apply such amounts (if not previously paid in accordance with ) , to reduce unpaid Obligations and , to reduce the Capital of all Purchaser Interests of Terminating Financial Institutions, applied ratably to each such Terminating Financial Institution according to its respective Termination Percentage. If such Terminating Financial Institution's Capital and other Obligations shall be reduced to zero, any additional Collections received by the Servicer shall (i) if applicable, be remitted to the Managing Agents' respective accounts in accordance with the applicable Pro Rata Shares of the related Purchasers no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) to the extent required to fund any Aggregate Reduction on such Settlement Date and (ii) thereafter, be remitted from the Servicer to Seller on such Settlement Date. Each Terminating Financial Institution shall be allocated a ratable portion of Collections from the date on which it became a Terminating Financial Institution (the "") until such Terminating Financing Institution's Capital shall be paid in full. This ratable portion shall be calculated on the Termination Date of each Terminating Financial Institution as a percentage equal to (i) Capital of such Terminating Financial Institution outstanding on its Termination Date, (ii) the Aggregate Capital outstanding on such Termination Date (the ""). Each Terminating Financial Institution's Termination Percentage shall remain constant prior to the Amortization Date. On and after the Amortization Date, each Termination Percentage shall be disregarded, and each Terminating Financial Institution's Capital shall be reduced ratably with all Financial Institutions in accordance with .
Section 2.1
first
second
Termination Date
divided
by
Termination Percentage
Section 2.3
     Section 2.3 . On the Amortization Date and on each day thereafter, the Servicer shall set aside and hold in trust, for the holder of each Purchaser Interest, all Collections received on such day and an additional amount of funds of the Seller for the payment of any accrued and unpaid Aggregate Capital and other accrued and unpaid Obligations owed by Seller and not previously paid by Seller in accordance with . On and after the Amortization Date, the Servicer shall, at any time upon the request from time to time by (or pursuant to standing instructions from) the Agent (i) remit to the Managing Agents' respective accounts established for the benefit of the related Purchasers, in accordance with the applicable Capital Pro Rata Shares, the amounts set aside pursuant to the preceding sentence, and (ii) apply such amounts to reduce the Aggregate Capital and any other Aggregate Unpaids.
Collections Following Amortization
Section 2.1
     Section 2.4 . If there shall be insufficient funds on deposit for the Servicer to distribute funds in payment in full of the aforementioned amounts pursuant to or (as applicable), the Servicer shall distribute funds:
Application of Collections
Section 2.2
2.3
          (i) , to the payment of the Servicer's reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses in connection with servicing, administering and collecting the Receivables, including the Servicing Fee, if Seller or one of its Affiliates is not then acting as the Servicer,
first
 
          (ii) , to the reimbursement of the reasonable costs of collection and enforcement of this Agreement incurred by the Agent or any Managing Agent,
second
          (iii) , ratably to the payment of all accrued and unpaid fees under the Fee Letter and Yield,
third
          (iv) , (if applicable) to the ratable reduction of the Aggregate Capital (without regard to any Termination Percentage),
fourth
          (v) , for the ratable payment of all other unpaid Obligations, provided that to the extent such Obligations relate to the payment of Servicer costs and expenses, including the Servicing Fee, when Seller or one of its Affiliates is acting as the Servicer, such costs and expenses will not be paid until after the payment in full of all other Obligations, and
fifth
          (vi) , after the Aggregate Unpaids have been indefeasibly reduced to zero, to Seller.
sixth
Collections applied to the payment of Aggregate Unpaids shall be distributed in accordance with the aforementioned provisions, and, giving effect to each of the priorities set forth in this above, shall be shared ratably (within each priority) among the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers in accordance with the amount of such Aggregate Unpaids owing to each of them in respect of each such priority.
Section 2.4
     Section 2.5 . No payment of any of the Aggregate Unpaids shall be considered paid or applied hereunder to the extent that, at any time, all or any portion of such payment or application is rescinded by application of law or judicial authority, or must otherwise be returned or refunded for any reason. Seller shall remain obligated for the amount of any payment or application so rescinded, returned or refunded, and shall promptly pay to the Agent (for application to the Person or Persons who suffered such recission, return or refund) the full amount thereof, plus the Default Fee from the date of any such recission, return or refunding.
Payment Recission
     Section 2.6 . Seller shall ensure that the Purchaser Interests of the Purchasers shall at no time exceed in the aggregate 100%. If the aggregate of the Purchaser Interests of the Purchasers exceeds 100%, Seller shall pay to the Managing Agent of each Purchase Group within one (1) Business Day of Seller's knowledge thereof, such Purchase Group's Group Pro Rata Share of an amount to be applied to reduce the Aggregate Capital, such that after giving effect to such payment the aggregate of the Purchaser Interests equals or is less than 100%.
Maximum Purchaser Interests
     Section 2.7 . In addition to Seller's rights pursuant to , Seller shall have the right (after providing three (3) Business Days' written notice to each Managing Agent), at any time, to repurchase from the Purchasers all, but not less than all, of the then outstanding Purchaser Interests. The purchase price in respect thereof shall be an amount equal to the Aggregate Unpaids through the date of such repurchase, payable in immediately available funds. Such repurchase shall be without representation, warranty or recourse of any kind by, on the part of, or against any Purchaser, any Managing Agent or the Agent.
Clean Up Call
Section 1.3
 
     Section 3.1 . Seller shall pay Yield at the applicable CP Rate with respect to the Capital associated with each Purchaser Interest of each Conduit for each day that any Capital in respect of such Purchaser Interest is outstanding; , that any Purchaser Interest, or portion thereof, which, or an undivided interest in which, is being funded by the Financial Institutions of such Conduit's Purchase Group pursuant to such Conduit's Liquidity Agreement shall accrue Yield pursuant to . Each Purchaser Interest funded by Falcon substantially with Pooled Commercial Paper will accrue Yield at the Falcon CP Rate each day on a pro rata basis, based upon the percentage share the Capital in respect of such Purchaser Interest represents in relation to all assets held by Falcon and funded substantially with Pooled Commercial Paper. Each Purchaser Interest funded by Three Pillars will accrue Yield at the Three Pillars CP Rate each day.
Yield
provided
Article IV
     Section 3.2 . On each Monthly Settlement Date, Seller shall pay to each Managing Agent (for the benefit of each Conduit in its Purchase Group) an aggregate amount equal to all accrued and unpaid Yield in respect of the Capital associated with all Purchaser Interests of such Conduit for the immediately preceding Accrual Period in accordance with .
Yield Payments
Article II
     Section 3.3 . On or before the third Business Day immediately preceding each Monthly Settlement Date, each Conduit shall calculate the aggregate amount of Yield in respect of the Capital associated with all Purchaser Interests of such Conduit for the immediately preceding Accrual Period and shall notify Seller of such aggregate amount.
Calculation of Yield
     Section 4.1 . Each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions shall accrue Yield for each day during its Tranche Period at either the LIBO Rate or the Base Rate in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof. Until Seller gives notice to the Managing Agents of another Discount Rate in accordance with , the initial Discount Rate for any Purchaser Interest transferred to the Financial Institutions pursuant to the terms and conditions hereof shall be the Base Rate. If any Financial Institution acquires by assignment from the Conduit in its Purchase Group all or any portion of a Purchaser Interest (or an undivided interest therein) pursuant to such Conduit's Liquidity Agreement, each Purchaser Interest so assigned shall each be deemed to have a new Tranche Period commencing on the date of any such assignment.
Financial Institution Funding
Section 4.4
     Section 4.2 . On the Settlement Date for each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions, Seller shall pay to each Managing Agent (for the benefit of the Financial Institutions) an aggregate amount equal to the accrued and unpaid Yield for the entire Tranche Period of such Purchaser Interest in accordance with .
Yield Payments
Article II
 
     Section 4.3 .
Selection and Continuation of Tranche Periods
          (a) With consultation from (and approval by) each related Managing Agent, Seller shall from time to time request Tranche Periods for the Purchaser Interests of the Financial Institutions. Seller shall select Tranche Periods such that (i) each Purchase Group shall have Purchaser Interests with an amount of Capital allocated to each Tranche Period based on such Purchase Group's Group Pro Rata Share and (ii) at least one Tranche Period for each Purchase Group shall end on a Monthly Settlement Date.
          (b) The Seller or the Agent, with the consent or at the direction of the Managing Agent for the Purchasers holding such Purchaser Interest, may, upon notice to and consent by the other received at least three (3) Business Days prior to the last day of a Tranche Period (the "") for any Purchaser Interest, effective on such last day, (i) divide any such Purchaser Interest into multiple Purchaser Interests, or (ii) combine any such Purchaser Interest with one or more other Purchaser Interests which either have a Terminating Tranche ending on such day or are newly created on such day (subject to the Conduits' ability to accommodate such division or combination), that in no event may a Purchaser Interest of a Conduit be combined with a Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions.
Terminating Tranche
provided
     Section 4.4 . The Seller may, subject to the terms of this Agreement, select the LIBO Rate or the Base Rate for each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions. Seller shall by 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time): (i) at least three (3) Business Days prior to the expiration of any Terminating Tranche with respect to which the LIBO Rate is being requested as a new Discount Rate and (ii) at least one (1) Business Day prior to the expiration of any Terminating Tranche with respect to which the Base Rate is being requested as a new Discount Rate, give each related Managing Agent irrevocable notice of the new Discount Rate for the Purchaser Interest associated with such Terminating Tranche. Agent will, from time to time, at Seller's request make available non-binding indications of the LIBO Rate for a new Tranche Period with respect to any Terminating Tranche. Until Seller gives notice to the Managing Agents of another Discount Rate, the initial Discount Rate for any Purchaser Interest transferred to Financial Institutions pursuant to the terms and conditions hereof shall be the Base Rate.
Financial Institution Discount Rates
     Section 4.5 .
Suspension of the LIBO Rate
          (a) If any Financial Institution notifies its related Managing Agent that (i) it has determined that funding its Pro Rata Share of the Purchaser Interests of the Financial Institutions at a LIBO Rate would violate any applicable law, rule, regulation, or directive of any governmental or regulatory authority, whether or not having the force of law, or (ii) deposits of a type and maturity appropriate to match fund its Purchaser Interests at such LIBO Rate are not available, or (iii) such LIBO Rate does not accurately reflect the cost of acquiring or maintaining a Purchaser Interest at such LIBO Rate, then such Managing Agent shall notify the Agent and shall suspend the availability of such LIBO Rate at the end of any then current Tranche Period, provided that if required by any applicable law, rule, regulation or directive, any then current Tranche Period for such Purchaser Interest based on the LIBO Rate shall terminate immediately and a new Tranche Period based on the Base Rate shall commence.
 
          (b) If less than all of the Financial Institutions give a notice to the Managing Agents pursuant to , each Financial Institution which gave such a notice shall be obligated, at the request of Seller or such Financial Institution's Managing Agent (on behalf of the related Conduit or Conduits), to assign all of its rights and obligations hereunder to (i) another Financial Institution or (ii) another funding entity nominated by Seller that is acceptable to the related Conduit or Conduits and willing to participate in this Agreement and the related Liquidity Agreement through the Liquidity Termination Date in the place of such notifying Financial Institution; that (x) the notifying Financial Institution receives payment in full, pursuant to an Assignment Agreement, of an amount equal to such notifying Financial Institution's Capital Pro Rata Share of the Capital and Yield owing to all of the Financial Institutions and all accrued but unpaid fees and other costs and expenses payable in respect of its Capital Pro Rata Share of the Purchaser Interests of the Financial Institutions, and (y) the replacement Financial Institution otherwise satisfies the requirements of .
Section 4.5(a)
provided
Section 12.1(b)
     Section 5.1 . Each Seller Party hereby represents and warrants to the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers, as to itself, as of the date hereof and as of the date of each Incremental Purchase and the date of each Reinvestment that:
Representations and Warranties of The Seller Parties
          (a) . Such Seller Party is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, is a "registered organization" as defined in the UCC in effect in such jurisdiction and is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing as a foreign corporation, and has and holds all corporate power and all governmental licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals required to carry on its business in each jurisdiction in which its business is conducted, except where the failure to so qualify or so hold could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Corporate Existence and Power
          (b) . The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which it is a party, and the performance of its obligations hereunder and thereunder and, in the case of Seller, Seller's use of the proceeds of purchases made hereunder, are within its corporate powers and authority and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on its part. This Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which such Seller Party is a party has been duly executed and delivered by such Seller Party.
Power and Authority; Due Authorization, Execution and Delivery
          (c) . The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which it is a party, and the performance of its obligations hereunder and thereunder do not contravene or violate (i) its certificate of incorporation or by-laws, (ii) any law, rule or regulation applicable to it, (iii) any restrictions under any agreement, contract or instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound, or (iv) any order, writ, judgment, award, injunction or decree binding on or affecting it or its property, and do not result in the creation or imposition of any Adverse Claim
No Conflict
 
on assets of such Seller Party or its Subsidiaries (except as created hereunder), except, in any case, where such contravention or violation could not be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and no transaction contemplated hereby requires compliance with any bulk sales act or similar law.
          (d) . Other than the filing of the financing statements required hereunder, no authorization or approval or other action by, and no notice to or filing with, any governmental authority or regulatory body is required for the due execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which it is a party and the performance of its obligations hereunder and thereunder.
Governmental Authorization
          (e) . There are no actions, suits or proceedings pending, or to the best of such Seller Party's knowledge, threatened, against or affecting such Seller Party, or any of its properties, in or before any court, arbitrator or other body, that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Anixter is not in default with respect to any order of any court, arbitrator or governmental body, which defaults, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Seller is not in default with respect to any order of any court, arbitrator or governmental body.
Actions, Suits
          (f) . This Agreement and each other Transaction Document to which such Seller Party is a party constitute the legal, valid and binding obligations of such Seller Party enforceable against such Seller Party in accordance with their respective terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar laws relating to or limiting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is sought in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Binding Effect
          (g) . All information heretofore furnished by such Seller Party or any of its Affiliates to the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers for purposes of or in connection with this Agreement, any Report, any of the other Transaction Documents or any transaction contemplated hereby or thereby is, and all such information hereafter furnished by such Seller Party or any of its Affiliates to the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers will be, true and accurate in every material respect on the date such information is stated or certified and does not and will not contain any material misstatement of fact or omit to state a material fact or any fact necessary to make the statements contained therein not misleading.
Accuracy of Information
          (h) . No proceeds of any purchase hereunder will be used (i) for a purpose that violates, or would be inconsistent with, Regulation T, U or X promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System from time to time or (ii) to acquire any security in any transaction which is subject to Section 12, 13 or 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Use of Proceeds
          (i) . Immediately prior to each purchase hereunder, Seller shall be the legal and beneficial owner of the Receivables and Related Security with respect thereto, free and clear of any Adverse Claim, except as created by the Transaction Documents. There have been duly filed all financing statements or other similar instruments or documents necessary
Good Title
 
under the UCC (or any comparable law) of all appropriate jurisdictions to perfect Seller's ownership interest in each Receivable, its Collections and the Related Security.
          (j) . This Agreement, together with the filing of the financing statements contemplated hereby, is effective to, and shall, upon each purchase hereunder, transfer to the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers (and the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers shall acquire from Seller) a valid and perfected first priority undivided percentage ownership or security interest in each Receivable existing or hereafter arising and in the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto, free and clear of any Adverse Claim, except as created by the Transactions Documents. There have been duly filed all financing statements or other similar instruments or documents necessary under the UCC (or any comparable law) of all appropriate jurisdictions to perfect the Agent's (on behalf of the Purchasers) ownership or security interest in the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections.
Perfection
          (k) . The principal places of business and chief executive office of such Seller Party and the offices where it keeps all of its Records are located at the address(es) listed on or such other locations of which the Agent has been notified in accordance with in jurisdictions where all action required by has been taken and completed. Each Seller Party's state of organization, organizational identification number (if any) and Federal Employer Identification Number are correctly set forth on .
Places of Business and Locations of Records
Exhibit III
Section 7.2(a)
Section 13.4(a)
Exhibit III
          (l) . The conditions and requirements set forth in and have at all times been satisfied and duly performed. The names and addresses of all Collection Banks, together with the account numbers of the Collection Accounts of Seller at each Collection Bank and the post office box number of each Lock-Box, are listed on . Seller has not granted any Person, other than the Agent as contemplated by this Agreement, dominion and control of any Lock-Box or Collection Account, or the right to take dominion and control of any such Lock-Box or Collection Account at a future time or upon the occurrence of a future event.
Collections
Section 7.1(j)
Section 8.2
Exhibit IV
          (m) . (i) The initial Servicer represents and warrants that since December 31, 2010, no event has occurred that would have a material adverse effect on the financial condition or operations of the initial Servicer and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or the ability of the initial Servicer to perform its obligations under this Agreement, and (ii) Seller represents and warrants that since December 31, 2010, no event has occurred that would have a material adverse effect on (A) the financial condition or operations of Seller, (B) the ability of Seller to perform its obligations under the Transaction Documents, or (C) the collectibility of the Receivables generally or any material portion of the Receivables.
Material Adverse Effect
          (n) . In the past five (5) years, Seller has not used any corporate names, trade names or assumed names other than the name in which it has executed this Agreement.
Names
          (o) . Anixter owns, directly or indirectly, 100% of the issued and outstanding capital stock of Seller, free and clear of any Adverse Claim. Such capital
Ownership of Seller
 
stock is validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and there are no options, warrants or other rights to acquire securities of Seller.
          (p) . Such Seller Party is not an "" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or any successor statute.
Not an Investment Company
investment company
          (q) . Such Seller Party has complied in all material respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders, writs, judgments, injunctions, decrees or awards to which it may be subject, except where the failure to so comply could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each Receivable, together with the Contract related thereto, does not contravene any laws, rules or regulations applicable thereto (, , laws, rules and regulations relating to truth in lending, fair credit billing, fair credit reporting, equal credit opportunity, fair debt collection practices and privacy), and no part of such Contract is in violation of any such law, rule or regulation, except where such contravention or violation could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Law
including
without limitation
          (r) . Such Seller Party has complied in all material respects with the Credit and Collection Policy with regard to each Receivable and the related Contract, and has not made any change to such Credit and Collection Policy, except such material change as to which the Agent has been notified in accordance with .
Compliance with Credit and Collection Policy
Section 7.1(a)(vii)
          (s) . Each Contract with respect to each Receivable is effective to create, and has created, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the related Obligor to pay the Outstanding Balance of the Receivable created thereunder and any accrued interest thereon, enforceable against the Obligor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar laws relating to or limiting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is sought in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Enforceability of Contracts
          (t) . (i) As of the date of this Agreement, each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance under the Earlier Agreement is an "Eligible Receivable" as defined hereunder as of the date of this Agreement. (ii) Each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance as an Eligible Receivable on the date of its purchase under the Receivables Sale Agreement was an Eligible Receivable on such purchase date, and, as of the date of each Report and any other report delivered pursuant to , each Receivable included in the Net Receivables Balance on each such Report or other report was an Eligible Receivable.
Eligible Receivables
Section 8.5
          (u) . Seller has determined that, immediately after giving effect to each Incremental Purchase hereunder, the Net Receivables Balance is at least equal to the sum of (i) the Aggregate Capital, (ii) the Aggregate Reserves.
Net Receivables Balance
plus
          (v) . The manner in which each Seller Party accounts for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the Receivables Sale Agreement does not jeopardize true sale analysis.
Accounting
 
          (w) . Each remittance of Collections by the Seller to any Purchaser, any Managing Agent or the Administrative Agent (each, a "") under this Agreement will have been (i) in payment of a debt incurred by the Seller in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the Seller and such Transferee and (ii) made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the Seller and such Transferee.
Remittances of Collections
Transferee
     Section 6.1 (a) The effectiveness of this Agreement and the initial Incremental Purchase under this Agreement are subject to the conditions precedent that (i) the Agent and each Managing Agent shall have received on or before the Closing Date those documents listed on and (b) the Agent and each Managing Agent shall have received all fees and expenses required to be paid on or prior to the Closing Date pursuant to the terms of this Agreement and the Fee Letters.
Conditions Precedent to Initial Incremental Purchase.
Schedule B
     Section 6.2 Each Incremental Purchase of a Purchaser Interest and each Reinvestment shall be subject to the further conditions precedent that (a) in the case of each such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment, the Servicer shall have delivered to the Managing Agents on or prior to the date of such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment, in form and substance satisfactory to the Managing Agents, (i) all Reports and other reports as and when due under and (ii) upon the Agent's or any Managing Agent's request, the Servicer shall have delivered to the Managing Agents at least three (3) Business Days prior to any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment an interim report the form of a Monthly Report showing the amount of Eligible Receivables; (b) the Facility Termination Date shall not have occurred; (c) the Agent and each Managing Agent shall have received such other approvals, opinions or documents as it may reasonably request; and (d) on the date of each such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment, the following statements shall be true (and acceptance of the proceeds of such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment shall be deemed a representation and warranty by Seller that such statements are then true):
Conditions Precedent to All Purchases and Reinvestments.
Section 8.5
          (i) the representations and warranties set forth in are true and correct on and as of the date of such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment as though made on and as of such date;
Section 5.1
          (ii) no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment, that will constitute an Amortization Event, and no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment, that would constitute a Potential Amortization Event; and
          (iii) the Aggregate Capital does not exceed the Purchase Limit and the aggregate Purchaser Interests do not exceed 100%.
It is expressly understood that each Reinvestment shall, unless otherwise directed by any Managing Agent or any Purchaser, occur automatically on each day that the Servicer shall receive any Collections without the requirement that any further action be taken on the part of any Person and notwithstanding the failure of Seller to satisfy any of the foregoing conditions
 
precedent in respect of such Reinvestment. The failure of Seller to satisfy any of the foregoing conditions precedent in respect of any Reinvestment shall give rise to a right of the Agent, which right may be exercised at any time on demand of the Agent (with the consent or at the direction of the Required Financial Institutions), to rescind the related purchase and direct Seller to pay to the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers an amount equal to the Collections prior to the Amortization Date that shall have been applied to the affected Reinvestment.
     Section 7.1 . Until the date on which the Aggregate Unpaids have been indefeasibly paid in full and this Agreement terminates in accordance with its terms, each Seller Party hereby covenants, as to itself, as set forth below:
Affirmative Covenants of The Seller Parties
          (a) . Such Seller Party will maintain, for itself and each of its Subsidiaries, a system of accounting established and administered in accordance with GAAP, and furnish or cause to be furnished to the Agent and each Managing Agent:
Financial Reporting
          (i) g. Within 90 days after the close of each of its respective fiscal years, audited financial statements (which shall include balance sheets, statements of income and retained earnings and a statement of cash flows) for Anixter and its consolidated Subsidiaries for such fiscal year certified in a manner acceptable to each Managing Agent by Ernst & Young or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing.
Annual Reportin
          (ii) . Within 45 days after the close of the first three (3) quarterly periods of each of its respective fiscal years, balance sheets of Anixter and its consolidated Subsidiaries as at the close of each such period and statements of income and retained earnings and a statement of cash flows for Anixter and its consolidated Subsidiaries for the period from the beginning of such fiscal year to the end of such quarter, all certified by its respective chief financial officer or treasurer.
Quarterly Reporting
          (iii) . Together with the financial statements required hereunder, a compliance certificate in substantially the form of signed by such Seller Party's Authorized Officer on behalf of such Seller Party and dated the date of such annual financial statement or such quarterly financial statement, as the case may be.
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit V
          (iv) . Promptly upon the furnishing thereof to the shareholders of such Seller Party copies of all financial statements, reports and proxy statements so furnished.
Shareholders Statements and Reports
          (v) . Promptly upon the filing thereof, copies of all registration statements and annual, quarterly, monthly or other regular reports which Anixter or any of its Subsidiaries files with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
S.E.C. Filings
 
          (vi) . Promptly upon its receipt of any notice, request for consent, financial statements, certification, report or other communication under or in connection with any Transaction Document from any Person other than the Agent, any Managing Agent or any Purchaser, copies of the same.
Copies of Notices
          (vii) . At least thirty (30) days prior to the effectiveness of any material change in or material amendment to the Credit and Collection Policy, a notice (A) indicating such change or amendment, and (B) if such proposed change or amendment would be reasonably likely to adversely affect the collectibility of the Receivables or decrease the credit quality of any newly created Receivables, requesting the consent of the Managing Agents to such proposed change or amendment; provided that if such change or amendment was required pursuant to any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation, such Seller Party shall only be required to give notice of such change or amendment and shall not be required to request the consent of the Managing Agents.
Change in Credit and Collection Policy
          (viii) . Promptly, from time to time, such other information, documents, records or reports relating to the Receivables or the condition or operations, financial or otherwise, of such Seller Party as either Managing Agent may from time to time reasonably request in order to protect the interests of the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers under or as contemplated by this Agreement.
Other Information
          (ix) . No less frequently than annually, an updated list of fiscal months.
Fiscal Months
          (b) . Such Seller Party will notify each Managing Agent in writing of any of the following promptly upon learning of the occurrence thereof, describing the same and, if applicable, the steps being taken with respect thereto:
Notices
          (i) . The occurrence of each Amortization Event and each Potential Amortization Event, by a statement of an Authorized Officer of such Seller Party.
Amortization Events or Potential Amortization Events
          (ii) . (A) (1) The entry of any judgment or decree against the Servicer or any of its respective Subsidiaries if the aggregate amount of all judgments and decrees then outstanding against the Servicer and its Subsidiaries exceeds $25,000,000 and (2) the institution of any litigation, arbitration proceeding or governmental proceeding against the Servicer which, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or which seeks to enjoin performance of or otherwise relates to the Transaction Documents; and (B) the entry of any judgment or decree or the institution of any litigation, arbitration proceeding or governmental proceeding against Seller.
Judgment and Proceedings
          (iii) . The occurrence of any event or condition that has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect.
Material Adverse Effect
          (iv) . The occurrence of the "Amortization Date" under and as defined in the Receivables Sale Agreement.
Termination Date
 
          (v) . (A) The occurrence of a default or an event of default under any other financing arrangement pursuant to which Seller is a debtor or an obligor and (B) the occurrence of any default or event of default under any other financing arrangement or arrangements governing Indebtedness, individually or in the aggregate, in a principal amount greater than or equal to $50,000,000 pursuant to which Servicer is a debtor or obligor.
Defaults Under Other Agreements
          (vi) . Any downgrade in the rating of any Indebtedness of Anixter by S&P or by Moody's, setting forth the Indebtedness affected and the nature of such change.
Downgrade of Anixter
          (vii) . The decision to appoint a new director of Seller as the "Independent Director" for purposes of this Agreement, such notice to be issued not less than ten (10) days prior to the effective date of such appointment and to certify that the designated Person satisfies the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director.
Appointment of Independent Director
          (c) . Such Seller Party will comply in all respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders, writs, judgments, injunctions, decrees or awards to which it may be subject, except where the failure to so comply could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Such Seller Party will preserve and maintain its corporate existence, rights, franchises and privileges in the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and qualify and remain qualified in good standing as a foreign corporation in each jurisdiction where its business is conducted, except where the failure to preserve and maintain or qualify could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws and Preservation of Corporate Existence
          (d) . Such Seller Party will furnish to each Managing Agent from time to time such information with respect to it and the Receivables as either Managing Agent may reasonably request. Such Seller Party will, from time to time during regular business hours as requested by either Managing Agent upon reasonable notice and at the sole cost of such Seller Party (except as provided below), permit each Managing Agent, or its respective agents or representatives, (i) to examine and make copies of and abstracts from all Records in the possession or under the control of such Person relating to the Receivables and the Related Security, including, without limitation, the related Contracts, and (ii) to visit the offices and properties of such Person for the purpose of examining such materials described in clause (i) above, and to discuss matters relating to such Person's financial condition or the Receivables and the Related Security or any Person's performance under any of the Transaction Documents or any Person's performance under the Contracts and, in each case, with any of the officers or employees of Seller or the Servicer having knowledge of such matters. So long as no Potential Amortization Event or Amortization Event exists, the visits under this that are at the sole cost of the applicable Seller Party shall be limited to once per calendar year.
Audits
Section 7.1(d)
          (e) .
Keeping and Marking of Records and Books
          (i) The Servicer will maintain and implement administrative and operating procedures (including, without limitation, an ability to recreate records
 
evidencing Receivables in the event of the destruction of the originals thereof), and keep and maintain all documents, books, records and other information reasonably necessary or advisable for the collection of all Receivables (including, without limitation, records adequate to permit the immediate identification of each new Receivable and all Collections of and adjustments to each existing Receivable). The Servicer will give each Managing Agent notice of any material change in the administrative and operating procedures referred to in the previous sentence.
          (ii) Such Seller Party will (A) on or prior to the date hereof, cause all Receivable reports relating to the Purchaser Interests to bear a legend, acceptable to each Managing Agent, describing the Purchaser Interests and (B) from and after the occurrence of an Amortization Event (x) mark each Contract with a legend describing the Purchaser Interests and (y) deliver to the Agent all Contracts (including, without limitation, all multiple originals of any such Contract) relating to the Receivables.
          (f) . Such Seller Party will timely and fully (i) perform and comply with all provisions, covenants and other promises required to be observed by it under the Contracts related to the Receivables, and (ii) comply in all respects with the Credit and Collection Policy in regard to each Receivable and the related Contract.
Compliance with Contracts and Credit and Collection Policy
          (g) . Seller will, and will require Anixter to, perform each of their respective obligations and undertakings under and pursuant to the Receivables Sale Agreement, will purchase Receivables thereunder in strict compliance with the terms thereof and will vigorously enforce the rights and remedies accorded to Seller under the Receivables Sale Agreement. Seller will take all actions to perfect and enforce its rights and interests (and the rights and interests of the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers as assignees of Seller) under the Receivables Sale Agreement and each Transfer Agreement as either Managing Agent may from time to time reasonably request, , , making claims to which it may be entitled under any indemnity, reimbursement or similar provision contained in the Receivables Sale Agreement or any Transfer Agreement.
Performance and Enforcement of the Receivables Sale Agreement
including
without limitation
          (h) . Seller will (or will cause the applicable Originator to) take all necessary action to (i) vest legal and equitable title to the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections purchased by Anixter under each Transfer Agreement and by Seller under the Receivables Sale Agreement irrevocably in Seller, free and clear of any Adverse Claims other than Adverse Claims in favor of the Agent and the Purchasers (, , the filing of all financing statements or other similar instruments or documents necessary under the UCC (or any comparable law) of all appropriate jurisdictions to perfect Seller's interest in such Receivables, Related Security and Collections and such other action to perfect, protect or more fully evidence the interest of Seller therein as either Managing Agent may reasonably request), and (ii) establish and maintain, in favor of the Agent, for the benefit of the Purchasers, a valid and perfected first priority undivided percentage ownership interest (and/or a valid and perfected first priority security interest) in all Receivables, Related Security and Collections to the full extent contemplated herein, free and clear of any Adverse Claims other than Adverse Claims in favor of the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers (, , the filing of all
Ownership
including
without limitation
including
without limitation
 
financing statements or other similar instruments or documents necessary under the UCC (or any comparable law) of all appropriate jurisdictions to perfect the Agent's (for the benefit of the Purchasers) interest in such Receivables, Related Security and Collections and such other action to perfect, protect or more fully evidence the interest of the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers as either Managing Agent may reasonably request).
          (i) . Seller acknowledges that the Purchasers are entering into the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in reliance upon Seller's identity as a legal entity that is separate from each Originator. Therefore, from and after the date of execution and delivery of this Agreement, Seller shall take all reasonable steps, including, without limitation, all steps that either Managing Agent or any Purchaser may from time to time reasonably request, to maintain Seller's identity as a separate legal entity and to make it manifest to third parties that Seller is an entity with assets and liabilities distinct from those of each Originator and any Affiliates thereof and not just a division of any Originator or any such Affiliate. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and in addition to the other covenants set forth herein, Seller will:
Purchasers' Reliance
          (A) conduct its own business in its own name and require that all full-time employees of Seller, if any, identify themselves as such and not as employees of any Originator (including, without limitation, by means of providing appropriate employees with business or identification cards identifying such employees as Seller's employees);
          (B) compensate all employees, consultants and agents directly, from Seller's own funds, for services provided to Seller by such employees, consultants and agents and, to the extent any employee, consultant or agent of Seller is also an employee, consultant or agent of any Originator or any Affiliate thereof, allocate the compensation of such employee, consultant or agent between Seller and such Originator or such Affiliate, as applicable, on a basis that reflects the services rendered to Seller and such Originator or such Affiliate, as applicable;
          (C) clearly identify its offices (by signage or otherwise) as its offices and, if such office is located in the offices of any Originator, Seller shall lease such office at a fair market rent;
          (D) have a separate telephone number, which will be answered only in its name and separate stationery, invoices and checks in its own name;
          (E) conduct all transactions with each Originator (including, without limitation, any delegation of its obligations hereunder as Servicer) strictly on an arm's-length basis, allocate all overhead expenses (including, without limitation, telephone and other utility charges) for items shared between Seller and such Originator on the basis of actual use to the extent practicable and, to the extent such allocation is not practicable, on a basis reasonably related to actual use;
 
          (F) at all times have a Board of Directors consisting of three members, at least one member of which is an Independent Director;
          (G) observe all corporate formalities as a distinct entity, and ensure that all corporate actions relating to (A) the selection, maintenance or replacement of the Independent Director, (B) the dissolution or liquidation of Seller or (C) the initiation of, participation in, acquiescence in or consent to any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or similar proceeding involving Seller, are duly authorized by unanimous vote of its Board of Directors (including the Independent Director);
          (H) maintain Seller's books and records separate from those of each Originator and any Affiliate thereof and otherwise readily identifiable as its own assets rather than assets of such Originator and any Affiliate thereof;
          (I) prepare its financial statements separately from those of each Originator and insure that any consolidated financial statements of Anixter or any Affiliate thereof that include Seller and that are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission or any other governmental agency have notes clearly stating that Seller is a separate corporate entity and that its assets will be available first and foremost to satisfy the claims of the creditors of Seller;
          (J) except as herein specifically otherwise provided or in connection with collections in respect of Excluded Receivables, which Collections the Servicer has indicated are readily identifiable, maintain the funds or other assets of Seller separate from, and not commingled with, those of any Originator or any Affiliate thereof and only maintain bank accounts or other depository accounts to which Seller alone is the account party, into which Seller alone makes deposits and from which Seller alone (or the Agent or Managing Agents hereunder) has the power to make withdrawals;
          (K) pay all of Seller's operating expenses from Seller's own assets (except for certain payments by any Originator or other Persons pursuant to allocation arrangements that comply with the requirements of this );
Section 7.1(i)
          (L) operate its business and activities such that it does not engage in any business or activity of any kind, or enter into any transaction or indenture, mortgage, instrument, agreement, contract, lease or other undertaking, other than the transactions contemplated and authorized by this Agreement and the Receivables Sale Agreement; and does not create, incur, guarantee, assume or suffer to exist any indebtedness or other liabilities, whether direct or contingent, other than (1) as a result of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or
 
collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business, (2) the incurrence of obligations under this Agreement, (3) the incurrence of obligations, as expressly contemplated in the Receivables Sale Agreement, to make payment to Originators thereunder for the purchase of Receivables from the Originators under the Receivables Sale Agreement, and (4) the incurrence of operating expenses in the ordinary course of business of the type otherwise contemplated by this Agreement;
          (M) maintain its corporate charter in conformity with this Agreement, such that (1) it does not amend, restate, supplement or otherwise modify its Certificate of Incorporation or By-Laws in any respect that would impair its ability to comply with the terms or provisions of any of the Transaction Documents, including, without limitation, of this Agreement; and (2) its corporate charter, at all times that this Agreement is in effect, provides for not less than ten (10) days' prior written notice to the Agent of the replacement or appointment of any director that is to serve as an Independent Director for purposes of this Agreement and the condition precedent to giving effect to such replacement or appointment that Seller certify that the designated Person satisfied the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director" and the Agent's written acknowledgement that in its reasonable judgment the designated Person satisfies the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director;
Section 7.1(i)
          (N) maintain the effectiveness of, and continue to perform under the Receivables Sale Agreement, such that it does not amend, restate, supplement, cancel, terminate or otherwise modify the Receivables Sale Agreement, or give any consent, waiver, directive or approval thereunder (including, without limitation, any consent, waiver, directive or approval in connection with any Transfer Agreement) or waive any default, action, omission or breach under the Receivables Sale Agreement or any Transfer Agreement or otherwise grant any indulgence thereunder, without (in each case) the prior written consent of each Managing Agent;
          (O) maintain its corporate separateness such that it does not merge or consolidate with or into, or convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (whether in one transaction or in a series of transactions, and except as otherwise contemplated herein) all or substantially all of its assets (whether now owned or hereafter acquired) to, or acquire all or substantially all of the assets of, any Person, nor at any time create, have, acquire, maintain or hold any interest in any Subsidiary.
          (P) maintain at all times the Required Capital Amount (as defined in the Receivables Sale Agreement) and refrain from making any dividend, distribution, redemption of capital stock or payment of any
 
subordinated indebtedness which would cause the Required Capital Amount to cease to be so maintained; and
          (Q) take such other actions as are necessary on its part to ensure that the facts and assumptions set forth in the opinions issued by Schiff Hardin LLP (f/k/a Schiff Hardin & Waite), as counsel for Seller, in connection with the closing hereunder and under the Earlier Purchase Agreement and relating to substantive consolidation issues, and in the certificates accompanying such opinions, remain true and correct in all material respects at all times, it being acknowledged that the assumption set forth in the ninth paragraph of Section 1 of the opinion dated October 3, 2002 to the extent it indicated that the Seller would not be consolidated with Anixter for financial reporting purposes, is no longer true.
          (j) . Such Seller Party will cause (1) all proceeds from all Lock-Boxes to be directly deposited by a Collection Bank into a Collection Account and (2) each Lock-Box and Collection Account to be subject at all times to a Collection Account Agreement that is in full force and effect. In the event any payments relating to Receivables are remitted directly to Seller or any Affiliate of Seller, Seller will remit (or will cause all such payments to be remitted) directly to a Collection Bank and deposited into a Collection Account within two (2) Business Days following receipt thereof, and, at all times prior to such remittance, Seller will itself hold or, if applicable, will cause such payments to be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers. Seller will maintain exclusive ownership, dominion and control (subject to the terms of this Agreement and the applicable Collection Agreement) of each Lock-Box and Collection Account and shall not grant the right to take dominion and control of any Lock-Box or Collection Account at a future time or upon the occurrence of a future event to any Person, except to the Agent as contemplated by this Agreement (the parties hereto acknowledge that Receivables of the Seller are paid into Lock-Boxes to which certain Excluded Receivables of Anixter are paid). The Seller Parties shall instruct the Obligors with the customer prefixes SIE and SG. to pay all amounts due with respect to their Receivables to an account which is not a Lock-Box or Collection Account.
Collections
          (k) . Such Seller Party will file all tax returns and reports required by law to be filed by it and will promptly pay all taxes and governmental charges at any time owing; , , that no Seller Party shall be required to pay any such taxes which are not yet delinquent or are being diligently contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP shall have been set aside on its books, the failure to make any such payment (1) in the case of either Seller Party, shall give rise to an immediate right to foreclosure on an Adverse Claim securing such amounts, (2) in the case of the Seller, shall result in the attachment of an Adverse Claim securing such amounts, or (3) could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Seller will pay when due any taxes payable in connection with the Receivables, exclusive of taxes on or measured by income or gross receipts of any Purchaser, Managing Agent or the Agent.
Taxes
provided
however
unless
          (l) . Seller will maintain in effect, or cause to be maintained in effect, at Seller's own expense, such casualty and liability insurance as Seller shall deem appropriate in its good faith business judgment. Seller will pay or cause to be paid, the
Insurance
 
premiums therefor and deliver to each Managing Agent evidence satisfactory to such Managing Agent of such insurance coverage. Copies of each policy shall be furnished to each Managing Agent in certificated form upon such Managing Agent's request. The foregoing requirements shall not be construed to negate, reduce or modify, and are in addition to, Seller's obligations hereunder.
          (m) . With respect to any Receivable purchased by Seller from Anixter, such sale shall be effected under, and in strict compliance with the terms of, the Receivables Sale Agreement, , , the terms relating to the amount and timing of payments to be made to Anixter in respect of the purchase price for such Receivable. With respect to any Receivable purchased by Anixter from any Originator, such sale shall be effected under, and in strict compliance with the terms of, the applicable Transfer Agreement, , , the terms relating to the amount and timing of payments to be made to the applicable Originator in respect of the purchase price for such Receivable.
Payment to Originators
including
without
limitation
including
without
limitation
     Section 7.2 . Until the date on which the Aggregate Unpaids have been indefeasibly paid in full and this Agreement terminates in accordance with its terms, each Seller Party hereby covenants, as to itself, that:
Negative Covenants of the Seller Parties
          (a) . Such Seller Party will not change its name, identity, state of incorporation, corporate structure or organizational number, if any, or relocate its chief executive office or any office where Records are kept unless it shall have: (i) given each Managing Agent at least forty-five (45) days' prior written notice thereof and (ii) delivered to each Managing Agent all financing statements, instruments and other documents requested by such Managing Agent in connection with such change or relocation.
Name Change, Offices and Records
          (b) . Except as may be required by the Agent pursuant to , such Seller Party will not add or terminate any bank as a Collection Bank, or make any change in the instructions to Obligors regarding payments to be made to any Lock-Box or Collection Account, unless the Agent and each Managing Agent shall have received, at least ten (10) days before the proposed effective date therefor, (i) written notice of such addition, termination or change and (ii) with respect to the addition of a Collection Bank or a Collection Account or Lock-Box, an executed Collection Account Agreement with respect to the new Collection Account or Lock-Box; , , that the Servicer may make changes in instructions to Obligors regarding payments if such new instructions require such Obligor to make payments to another existing Collection Account.
Change in Payment Instructions to Obligors
Section 8.2(b)
provided
however
          (c) . Such Seller Party will not make any change to the Credit and Collection Policy that could reasonably be expected to adversely affect the collectibility of the Receivables or decrease the credit quality of any newly created Receivables, unless required to do so by a change in any applicable law, rule or regulation. Except as provided in , the Servicer will not extend, amend or otherwise modify the terms of any Receivable or any Contract related thereto other than in accordance with the Credit and Collection Policy.
Modifications to Contracts and Credit and Collection Policy
Section 8.2(d)
 
          (d) . Seller will not sell, assign (by operation of law or otherwise) or otherwise dispose of, or grant any option with respect to, or create or suffer to exist any Adverse Claim upon (including, without limitation, the filing of any financing statement) or with respect to, any Receivable, Related Security or Collections, or upon or with respect to any Contract under which any Receivable arises, or any Lock-Box or Collection Account, or assign any right to receive income with respect thereto (other than, in each case, the creation of the interests therein in favor of the Agent and the Purchasers provided for herein), and Seller will defend the right, title and interest of the Agent and the Purchasers in, to and under any of the foregoing property, against all claims of third parties claiming through or under Seller or any Originator. Seller will not create or suffer to exist any mortgage, pledge, security interest, encumbrance, lien, charge or other similar arrangement on any of its inventory, the sale or lease of which would give rise to a Receivable.
Sales, Liens
          (e) . At no time prior to the Amortization Date shall Seller permit the Net Receivables Balance to be less than an amount equal to the sum of (i) the Aggregate Capital (ii) the Aggregate Reserves.
Net Receivables Balance
plus
          (f) . Seller will not designate the "Amortization Date" (as defined in the Receivables Sale Agreement), or send any written notice to Anixter in respect thereof, without the prior written consent of each Managing Agent, except with respect to the occurrence of such Amortization Date arising pursuant to of the Receivables Sale Agreement. Seller will not, and will not permit Anixter to, designate the "Amortization Date" (as defined in each Transfer Agreement), or send any written notice to any Originator in respect thereof, without the prior written consent of each Managing Agent, except with respect to the occurrence of such Amortization Date arising pursuant to of such Transfer Agreement.
Amortization Date Determination
Section 5.1(d)
Section 5.1(d)
     Section 8.1 .
Designation of Servicer
          (a) The servicing, administration and collection of the Receivables shall be conducted by such Person (the "") so designated from time to time in accordance with this . Anixter is hereby designated as, and hereby agrees to perform the duties and obligations of, the Servicer pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. Anixter shall not resign as the Servicer without the prior written consent of each Managing Agent. The Managing Agent may at any time designate as Servicer any Person to succeed Anixter or any Successor Servicer. It is understood and agreed that, solely with respect to the Accu-Tech Receivables, Accu-Tech is hereby designated as sub-servicer and will perform all of the duties and obligations of the Servicer with respect to the Accu-Tech Receivables.
Servicer
Section 8.1
          (b) Without the prior written consent of the Managing Agents, Anixter shall not be permitted to delegate any of its duties or responsibilities as Servicer to any Person other than (i) Seller, (ii) Accu-Tech with respect to the Accu-Tech Receivables and (iii) with respect to certain Charged-Off Receivables, outside collection agencies in accordance with its customary
 
practices. Neither the Seller nor Accu-Tech shall be permitted to further delegate to any other Person any of the duties or responsibilities of the Servicer delegated to it by Anixter. If at any time the Managing Agents shall designate as Servicer any Person other than Anixter, all duties and responsibilities theretofore delegated by Anixter to Seller may, at the discretion of the Managing Agents, be terminated forthwith on notice given by the Agent to Anixter and to Seller.
          (c) Notwithstanding the foregoing , if Anixter shall have delegated its duties and responsibilities as Servicer to any Person, (i) Anixter shall be and remain primarily liable to the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers for the full and prompt performance of all duties and responsibilities of the Servicer (other than any Servicer appointed by the Managing Agents without Anixter's consent) hereunder, (ii) the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers shall be entitled to deal exclusively with Anixter in matters relating to the discharge by the Servicer (other than any Servicer appointed by the Managing Agents without Anixter's consent) of its duties and responsibilities hereunder and (iii) none of the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers shall be required to give notice, demand or other communication to any Person other than Anixter in order for communication to the Servicer (other than any Servicer appointed by the Managing Agents without Anixter's consent) and its sub-servicer or other delegate with respect thereto to be accomplished. Anixter, at all times that it is the Servicer, shall be responsible for providing any sub-servicer or other delegate of the Servicer with any notice given to the Servicer under this Agreement.
subsection (b)
     Section 8.2 .
Duties of Servicer
          (a) The Servicer shall take or cause to be taken all such actions as may be necessary or advisable to collect each Receivable from time to time, all in accordance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, with reasonable care and diligence, and in accordance with the Credit and Collection Policy.
          (b) The Servicer will instruct all Obligors to pay all Collections directly to a Lock-Box or Collection Account. The Servicer shall effect a Collection Account Agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Agent with each bank maintaining a Collection Account at any time. In the case of any remittances received in any Lock-Box or Collection Account that shall have been identified, to the satisfaction of the Servicer, to not constitute Collections or other proceeds of the Receivables or the Related Security, the Servicer shall promptly remit such items to the Person identified to it as being the owner of such remittances. From and after the date the Agent delivers to any Collection Bank a Collection Notice pursuant to , the Agent may request that the Servicer, and the Servicer thereupon promptly shall instruct all Obligors with respect to the Receivables, to remit all payments thereon to a new depositary account specified by the Agent and, at all times thereafter, Seller and the Servicer shall not deposit or otherwise credit, and shall not permit any other Person to deposit or otherwise credit to such new depositary account any cash or payment item other than Collections.
Section 8.3
          (c) The Servicer shall administer the Collections in accordance with the procedures described herein and in . The Servicer shall set aside and hold in trust for the account of Seller and the Purchasers their respective shares of the Collections in accordance with . The Servicer shall, upon the request of the Agent, in its discretion or at the
Article II
Article II
 
direction of the Required Financial Institutions, segregate, in a manner acceptable to the Agent and the Required Financial Institutions, all cash, checks and other instruments received by it from time to time constituting Collections from the general funds of the Servicer or Seller prior to the remittance thereof in accordance with . If the Servicer shall be required to segregate Collections pursuant to the preceding sentence, the Servicer shall segregate and deposit with a bank designated by the Agent such allocable share of Collections of Receivables set aside for the Purchasers on the first Business Day following receipt by the Servicer of such Collections, duly endorsed or with duly executed instruments of transfer.
Article II
          (d) The Servicer may, in accordance with the Credit and Collection Policy, extend the maturity of any Receivable or adjust the Outstanding Balance of any Receivable as the Servicer determines to be appropriate to maximize Collections thereof; , , that such extension or adjustment shall not alter the status of such Receivable as a Delinquent Receivable or Charged-Off Receivable or limit the rights of the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers under this Agreement. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, at any time that an Amortization Event is continuing, the Agent, in its discretion or at the direction of the Required Financial Institutions, shall have the absolute and unlimited right to direct the Servicer to commence or settle any legal action with respect to any Receivable or to foreclose upon or repossess any Related Security.
provided
however
          (e) The Servicer shall hold for Seller and the Purchasers all Records that (i) evidence or relate to the Receivables, the related Contracts and Related Security or (ii) are otherwise necessary or desirable to collect the Receivables and shall, as soon as practicable upon demand of the Agent, in its discretion or at the direction of the Required Financial Institutions, at any time following an Amortization Event or a Potential Amortization Event, deliver or make available to the Agent all such Records, at a place selected by the Agent, with the consent or at the direction of the Required Financial Institutions. The Servicer shall, from time to time at the request of any Managing Agent, furnish to such Managing Agent (promptly after any such request) a calculation of the amounts set aside for the Purchasers pursuant to .
Article II
     Section 8.3 . Upon the occurrence of and during the continuation of an Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event, the Agent is authorized at any time to date and to deliver to the Collection Banks the Collection Notices, and shall deliver such Collection Notices if directed to do so by the Required Financial Institutions. Seller hereby transfers to the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers, effective when the Agent delivers such notice, the exclusive ownership and control of each Lock-Box and the Collection Accounts. In case any authorized signatory of Seller whose signature appears on a Collection Account Agreement shall cease to have such authority before the delivery of such notice, such Collection Notice shall nevertheless be valid as if such authority had remained in force. Seller hereby authorizes the Agent, and agrees that the Agent shall be entitled to, following the delivery of the Collection Notice (i) endorse Seller's name on checks and other instruments representing Collections, (ii) enforce the Receivables, the related Contracts and the Related Security and (iii) take such action as shall be necessary or desirable to cause all cash, checks and other instruments constituting Collections of Receivables to come into the possession of the Agent rather than Seller.
Collection Notices
 
     Section 8.4 . Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the exercise by the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers of their rights hereunder shall not release the Servicer, any Originator or Seller from any of their duties or obligations with respect to any Receivables or under the related Contracts. None of the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers shall have any obligation or liability with respect to any Receivables or related Contracts, nor shall any of them be obligated to perform the obligations of Seller.
Responsibilities of Seller
     Section 8.5 . The Servicer shall prepare and forward to each Managing Agent:
Reports
          (a) on each Determination Date, a Monthly Report;
          (b) if (x) Rating Level II is in effect or (y) Rating Level I is in effect and the Servicer has notified the Managing Agents that it will deliver Reports as if Rating Level II were in effect, on the last Business Day of each calendar month, a Mid-Month Report containing information relating to the period from the first day of the related fiscal month to and including the Friday closest to the fifteenth day of such calendar month;
          (c) if Rating Level III is in effect, on the Tuesday of each week (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next succeeding Business Day), a Weekly Report containing information relating to the Weekly Period then most recently ended;
          (d) if Rating Level IV is in effect, on each Business Day, a Daily Report containing information relating to the period since the last delivery of any Report hereunder;
          (e) at such times as either Managing Agent shall reasonably request, a report in the form of a Monthly Report updating the information contained in the most recent Monthly Report; and
          (f) at such times as either Managing Agent shall request, a listing by Obligor of all Receivables together with an aging of such Receivables.
     Section 8.6 . In consideration of Anixter's agreement to act as Servicer hereunder, the Purchasers hereby agree that, so long as Anixter shall continue to perform as Servicer hereunder, Seller shall pay over to Anixter a fee (the "") on the first calendar day of each month, in arrears for the immediately preceding month, equal to 0.37% the Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during such immediately preceding calendar month, as compensation for its servicing activities.
Servicing Fees
Servicing Fee
times
     Section 9.1 . The occurrence of any one or more of the following events shall constitute an Amortization Event:
Amortization Events
          (a) Any Seller Party shall fail (i) to make any payment or deposit required hereunder when due, or (ii) to perform or observe any term, covenant or agreement hereunder
 
(other than as referred to in clause (i) of this paragraph (a) and ) and such failure shall continue for three (3) consecutive Business Days.
Section 9.1(e)
          (b) Any representation, warranty, certification or statement made by any Seller Party in this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or in any other document delivered pursuant hereto or thereto shall prove to have been incorrect when made or deemed made; , , that (i) any breach of the representations and warranties set forth in , or shall not constitute an Amortization Event unless such breach or breaches apply in the aggregate to a material portion of the Receivables and (ii) any breach of the representations and warranties set forth in with respect to the Accu-Tech Accounts shall not constitute an Amortization Event unless such breach occurs after the date that is thirty (30) days after the Closing Date.
provided
however
Sections 5.1(i)
(s)
(t)
Section 7.1(j)
          (c) Failure of Seller to pay any Indebtedness when due or the failure of any other Seller Party to pay when due any Indebtedness having an outstanding principal balance in excess of $50,000,000; or the default by any Seller Party in the performance of any term, provision or condition contained in any agreement under which any such Indebtedness was created or is governed, the effect of which is to cause, or to permit the holder or holders of such Indebtedness to cause, such Indebtedness to become due prior to its stated maturity; or any such Indebtedness of any Seller Party shall be declared to be due and payable or required to be prepaid (other than by a regularly scheduled payment) prior to the date of maturity thereof.
          (d) (i) Any Seller Party or any of its Significant Subsidiaries shall generally not pay its debts as such debts become due or shall admit in writing its inability to pay its debts generally or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; or (ii) any proceeding shall be instituted by or against any Seller Party or any of its Significant Subsidiaries seeking to adjudicate it bankrupt or insolvent, or seeking liquidation, winding up, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, protection, relief or composition of it or its debts under any law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization or relief of debtors, or seeking the entry of an order for relief or the appointment of a receiver, trustee or other similar official for it or any substantial part of its property, provided that in the event any such proceedings shall have been instituted against such Seller Party or Significant Subsidiary, such proceedings shall have continued undismissed or unstayed and in effect for a period of sixty (60) consecutive days or an order for relief shall have been entered in such proceedings, or (iii) any Seller Party or any of its Significant Subsidiaries shall take any corporate action to authorize any of the actions set forth in clauses (i) or (ii) above in this subsection (d).
          (e) Seller shall fail to comply with the terms of .
Section 2.6
          (f) As at the end of any Collection Period: (i) the average of the Delinquency Ratios as of the end of such Collection Period and the two preceding Collection Periods shall exceed 14.00%; (ii) the average of the Dilution Trigger Ratios as of the end of such Collection Period and the two preceding Collection Periods shall exceed 4.0%; or (iii) the average of the Loss-to-Liquidation Ratios as of the end of such Collection Period and the two preceding Collection Periods shall exceed 5.25%.
          (g) A Change of Control shall occur.
 
          (h) (i) One or more final judgments for the payment of money shall be entered against Seller or (ii) one or more final judgments for the payment of money in an amount in excess of $25,000,000, individually or in the aggregate, shall be entered against the Servicer, and such judgment shall continue unsatisfied and in effect for thirty (30) consecutive days without a stay of execution.
          (i) The "Amortization Date" under and as defined in the Receivables Sale Agreement or any Transfer Agreement shall occur under the Receivables Sale Agreement or any Transfer Agreement or Anixter or the applicable Originator, as applicable, shall for any reason cease to transfer, or cease to have the legal capacity to transfer, or otherwise be incapable of transferring Receivables to Seller or Anixter under the Receivables Sale Agreement or the applicable Transfer Agreement, as applicable.
          (j) This Agreement shall terminate in whole or in part (except in accordance with its terms), or shall cease to be effective or to be the legally valid, binding and enforceable obligation of Seller, or the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers shall cease to have a valid and perfected first priority security interest in the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections with respect thereto, and the Collection Accounts.
          (k) (i) The Accu-Tech Accounts shall not be re-titled in the name of the Seller on or before the date that is thirty (30) days after the Closing Date or (ii) the Seller shall fail to deliver, on or before the date that is thirty (30) days after the Closing Date, a fully-executed Collection Account Agreement (or another account control agreement that is reasonably satisfactory to the Agent) with respect to the Accu-Tech Accounts.
          (l) The Leverage Ratio as of the last day of any Fiscal Quarter shall be greater than 3.25 to 1.00.
          (m) The Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio calculated at the end of each Fiscal Quarter for the period of the immediately preceding four Fiscal Quarters shall be less than (a) 2.50 to 1.00 for any period ending after April 8, 2011 but on or prior to the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011 and (b) 3.00 to 1.00 for any period ending after the last day of the fourth Fiscal Quarter of 2011.
          (n) Any Person shall be appointed as an Independent Director of Seller without prior notice thereof having been given to the Agent in accordance with or without the written acknowledgement by the Agent that such Person conforms, to the satisfaction of the Agent, with the criteria set forth in the definition herein of "Independent Director".
Section 7.1(b)(vii)
     Section 9.2 . Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Amortization Event, the Agent may, and upon the direction of the Required Financial Institutions, shall, take any of the following actions: (i) replace the Person then acting as Servicer, (ii) declare the Amortization Date to have occurred, whereupon the Amortization Date shall forthwith occur, without demand, protest or further notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Seller Party; provided, however, that upon the occurrence of an Amortization Event described in , or of an actual or deemed entry of an order
Remedies
Section 9.1(d)(ii)
 
for relief with respect to any Seller Party under the Bankruptcy Code, the Amortization Date shall automatically occur, without demand, protest or any notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Seller Party, (iii) to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, declare that the Default Fee shall accrue with respect to any of the Aggregate Unpaids outstanding at such time, (iv) deliver the Collection Notices to the Collection Banks, and (v) notify Obligors of the Purchasers' interest in the Receivables. The aforementioned rights and remedies shall be without limitation, and shall be in addition to all other rights and remedies of the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers otherwise available under any other provision of this Agreement, by operation of law, at equity or otherwise, all of which are hereby expressly preserved, including, without limitation, all rights and remedies provided under the UCC, all of which rights shall be cumulative.
     Section 10.1 . Without limiting any other rights that the Agent, any Managing Agent or any Purchaser may have hereunder or under applicable law, (A) Seller hereby agrees to indemnify (and pay upon demand to) the Agent, the Managing Agents and each Purchaser and their respective assigns, officers, directors, agents and employees (each an "") from and against any and all damages, losses, claims, taxes, liabilities, costs, expenses and for all other amounts payable, including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements (all of the foregoing being collectively referred to as "") awarded against or incurred by any of them arising out of or as a result of this Agreement or the acquisition, either directly or indirectly, by a Purchaser of an interest in the Receivables, and (B) the Servicer hereby agrees to indemnify (and pay upon demand to) each Indemnified Party for Indemnified Amounts awarded against or incurred by any of them arising out of the Servicer's activities as Servicer hereunder excluding, however, in all of the foregoing instances under the preceding clauses (A) and (B):
Indemnities by the Seller Parties
Indemnified Party
Indemnified Amounts
          (a) Indemnified Amounts to the extent a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction holds that such Indemnified Amounts resulted from gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Indemnified Party seeking indemnification;
          (b) Indemnified Amounts to the extent the same includes losses in respect of Receivables that are uncollectible on account of the insolvency, bankruptcy or lack of creditworthiness of the related Obligor; or
          (c) taxes imposed by the jurisdiction in which such Indemnified Party's principal executive office is located, on or measured by the overall net income of such Indemnified Party to the extent that the computation of such taxes is consistent with the characterization for income tax purposes of the acquisition by the Purchasers of Purchaser Interests as a loan or loans by the Purchasers to Seller secured by the Receivables, the Related Security, the Collection Accounts and the Collections.
          Without limiting the generality of the foregoing indemnification, Seller shall indemnify the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers for Indemnified Amounts
 
(including, without limitation, losses in respect of uncollectible receivables, regardless of whether reimbursement therefor would constitute recourse to Seller) relating to or resulting from:
          (i) any representation or warranty made by any Seller Party or any Originator (or any officers of any such Person) under or in connection with this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or any other information or report delivered by any such Person pursuant hereto or thereto, which shall have been false or incorrect when made or deemed made;
          (ii) the failure by Seller, the Servicer or any Originator to comply with any applicable law, rule or regulation with respect to any Receivable or Contract related thereto, or the nonconformity of any Receivable or Contract included therein with any such applicable law, rule or regulation or any failure of any Originator to keep or perform any of its obligations, express or implied, with respect to any Contract;
          (iii) any failure of Seller, the Servicer or any Originator to perform its duties, covenants or other obligations in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement or any other Transaction Document;
          (iv) any products liability, personal injury or damage suit, or other similar claim arising out of or in connection with merchandise, insurance or services that are the subject of any Contract or any Receivable;
          (v) any dispute, claim, offset or defense (other than discharge in bankruptcy of the Obligor) of the Obligor to the payment of any Receivable (including, without limitation, a defense based on such Receivable or the related Contract not being a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Obligor enforceable against it in accordance with its terms), or any other claim resulting from the sale of the merchandise or service related to such Receivable or the furnishing or failure to furnish such merchandise or services;
          (vi) the commingling of Collections of Receivables at any time with other funds;
          (vii) any investigation, litigation or proceeding related to or arising from this Agreement or any other Transaction Document, the transactions contemplated hereby, the use of the proceeds of an Incremental Purchase or a Reinvestment, the ownership of the Purchaser Interests or any other investigation, litigation or proceeding relating to Seller, the Servicer or any Originator in which any Indemnified Party becomes involved as a result of any of the transactions contemplated hereby;
          (viii) any inability to litigate any claim against any Obligor in respect of any Receivable as a result of such Obligor being immune from civil and commercial law and suit on the grounds of sovereignty or otherwise from any legal action, suit or proceeding;
          (ix) any Amortization Event described in ;
Section 9.1(d)
 
          (x) any failure of Seller to acquire and maintain legal and equitable title to, and ownership of any Receivable and the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto from Anixter, free and clear of any Adverse Claim (other than as created hereunder); or any failure of Seller to give reasonably equivalent value to Anixter under the Receivables Sale Agreement in consideration of the transfer by Anixter of any Receivable, or any attempt by any Person to void such transfer under statutory provisions or common law or equitable action;
          (xi) any failure of Anixter to acquire and maintain legal and equitable title to, and ownership of any Receivable and the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto from the applicable Originator free and clear of any Adverse Claim (other than as created hereunder); or any failure of Anixter to give reasonably equivalent value to the applicable Originator under the applicable Transfer Agreement in consideration of the transfer by such Originator of any Receivable, or any attempt by any Person to void such transfer under statutory provisions or common law or equitable action;
          (xii) any failure to vest and maintain vested in the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers, or to transfer to the Agent for the benefit of the Purchasers, legal and equitable title to, and ownership of, a first priority perfected undivided percentage ownership interest (to the extent of the Purchaser Interests contemplated hereunder) or security interest in the Receivables, the Related Security and the Collections, free and clear of any Adverse Claim (except as created by the Transaction Documents);
          (xiii) the failure to have filed, or any delay in filing, financing statements or other similar instruments or documents under the UCC of any applicable jurisdiction or other applicable laws with respect to any Receivable, the Related Security and Collections with respect thereto, and the proceeds of any thereof, whether at the time of any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment or at any subsequent time;
          (xiv) any action or omission by any Seller Party which reduces or impairs the rights of the Agent or the Purchasers with respect to any Receivable or the value of any such Receivable;
          (xv) any attempt by any Person, other than a Purchaser, to void any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment hereunder under statutory provisions or common law or equitable action; and
          (xvi) the failure of any Receivable included in the calculation of the Net Receivables Balance as an Eligible Receivable to be an Eligible Receivable at the time so included.
Section 10.2 . (a) If any Regulatory Change (i) subjects any Purchaser or any Funding Source to any charge or withholding on or with respect to any Funding Agreement or a Purchaser's or Funding Source's obligations under a Funding Agreement, or on or with respect to the Receivables, or changes the basis of taxation of payments to any Purchaser or any Funding Source of any amounts payable under any Funding Agreement (except for changes in the rate of tax on the
Increased Cost and Reduced Return
 
overall net income of a Purchaser or Funding Source or taxes excluded by ) or (ii) imposes, modifies or deems applicable any reserve, assessment, fee, tax, insurance charge, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or liabilities of a Funding Source or a Purchaser, or credit extended by a Funding Source or a Purchaser pursuant to a Funding Agreement or (iii) imposes any other condition the result of which is to increase the cost to a Funding Source or a Purchaser of performing its obligations under a Funding Agreement, or to reduce the rate of return on a Funding Source's or Purchaser's capital as a consequence of its obligations under a Funding Agreement, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by a Funding Source or a Purchaser under a Funding Agreement, or to require any payment calculated by reference to the amount of interests or loans held or interest received by it, then, upon demand by the Agent or the relevant Managing Agent, Seller shall pay to the applicable Managing Agent, for the benefit of the relevant Funding Source or Purchaser, such amounts charged to such Funding Source or Purchaser or such amounts to otherwise compensate such Funding Source or such Purchaser for such increased cost or such reduction. The term "" shall mean (i) the adoption after the date hereof of any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy) or any change therein after the date hereof, (ii) any change after the date hereof in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency, or (iii) the compliance, whether commenced prior to or after the date hereof, by any Funding Source or Purchaser with the requirements of the final rule titled Risk-Based Capital Guidelines; Capital Adequacy Guidelines; Capital Maintenance: Regulatory Capital; Impact of Modifications to Generally Accepted Accounting Principles; Consolidation of Asset-Backed Commercial Paper Programs; and Other Related Issues, adopted by the United States bank regulatory agencies on December 15, 2009 (the ""), or any existing or future rules, regulations, guidance, interpretations or directives from the U.S. bank regulatory agencies relating to the FAS 166/167 Capital Guidelines (whether or not having the force of law).
Section 10.1
Regulatory Change
FAS 166/167 Capital Guidelines
     (b) A certificate of the applicable Purchaser or Funding Source setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Purchaser or Funding Source pursuant to paragraph (a) of this shall be delivered to Seller and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Seller shall pay such Purchaser or Funding Source the amount as due on any such certificate on the next Settlement Date following receipt of such notice.
Section 10.2
     (c) If any Purchaser or any Funding Source has or anticipates having any claim for compensation from the Seller pursuant to clause (iii) of the definition of Regulatory Change appearing in paragraph (a) of this , and such Purchaser or Funding Source believes that having the facility publicly rated by one credit rating agency would reduce the amount of such compensation by an amount deemed by such Purchaser or Funding Source to be material, such Purchaser or Funding Source shall provide written notice to Seller and the Servicer (a "") that such Purchaser or Funding Source intends to request a public rating of the facility from one credit rating agency
Section 10.2
Ratings Request
 
selected by such Purchaser or Funding Source and reasonably acceptable to Seller, of at least the equivalent of A by S&P and A2 by Moody's (the ""). Seller and the Servicer agree that they shall cooperate with such Purchaser's or Funding Source's efforts to obtain the Specified Rating, and shall provide the applicable credit rating agency (either directly or through distribution to the Agent, Purchaser or Funding Source), any information requested by such credit rating agency for purposes of providing and monitoring the Specified Rating. The Purchasers shall pay the initial fees payable to the credit rating agency for providing the rating and all ongoing fees payable to the credit rating agency for their continued monitoring of the rating. Nothing in this shall preclude any Purchaser or Funding Source from demanding compensation from Seller pursuant to hereof at any time and without regard to whether the Specified Rating shall have been obtained, or shall require any Purchaser or Funding Source to obtain any rating on the facility prior to demanding any such compensation from Seller.
Specified Rating
Section 10.2(c)
Section 10.2(a)
     Section 10.3 . Seller shall pay to the Agent, the Managing Agents and Purchasers on demand all reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses in connection with the preparation, execution, delivery and administration of this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby and the other documents to be delivered hereunder, including without limitation, the cost of any Purchaser's auditors auditing the books, records and procedures of Seller, reasonable fees and out-of-pocket expenses of legal counsel for the Purchasers, Managing Agents and the Agent with respect thereto and with respect to advising Purchasers, the Managing Agents and the Agent as to their respective rights and remedies under this Agreement. Seller shall pay to the Agent or the applicable Managing Agent on demand any and all costs and expenses of the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers, if any, including reasonable counsel fees and expenses in connection with the enforcement of this Agreement and the other documents delivered hereunder and in connection with any restructuring or workout of this Agreement or such documents, or the administration of this Agreement following an Amortization Event.
Other Costs and Expenses
     Section 11.1 . Each Purchaser hereby designates and appoints JPMCB to act as Agent hereunder and under each other Transaction Document, and authorizes the Agent and such Purchaser's related Managing Agent to take such actions as Agent or Managing Agent, as the case may be, on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Agent or such Managing Agent by the terms of this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. Neither the Agent nor any Managing Agent shall have any duties or responsibilities, except those expressly set forth herein or in any other Transaction Document, or any fiduciary relationship with any Purchaser, and no implied covenants, functions, responsibilities, duties, obligations or liabilities on the part of the Agent or the Managing Agents shall be read into this Agreement or any other Transaction Document or otherwise exist for the Agent or the Managing Agents. In performing their respective functions and duties hereunder and under the other Transaction Documents, (i) the Agent shall act solely as agent for the Purchasers, (ii) each Managing Agent shall act solely
Authorization and Action
 
as agent for the Conduits and Financial Institutions in the related Purchase Group and (iii) neither the Agent nor any Managing Agent shall be deemed to have assumed any obligation or relationship of trust or agency with or for any Seller Party or any of such Seller Party's successors or assigns. Neither the Agent nor any Managing Agent shall be required to take any action that exposes the Agent or the Managing Agents to personal liability or that is contrary to this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or applicable law. The appointment and authority of the Agent and the Managing Agents hereunder shall terminate upon the indefeasible payment in full of all Aggregate Unpaids. Each Purchaser hereby authorizes the Agent and the Managing Agent for its Purchase Group, as applicable, to execute each of the Uniform Commercial Code financing statements, this Agreement and such other Transaction Documents as may require the Agent's or such Managing Agent's signature on behalf of such Purchaser (the terms of which shall be binding on such Purchaser).
     Section 11.2 . The Agent and the Managing Agents may execute any of their respective duties under this Agreement and each other Transaction Document by or through agents or attorneys-in-fact and shall be entitled to advice of counsel concerning all matters pertaining to such duties. Neither the Agent nor any Managing Agent shall be responsible for the negligence or misconduct of any agents or attorneys-in-fact selected by it with reasonable care.
Delegation of Duties
     Section 11.3 . None of the Agent, the Managing Agents or any of their respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be (i) liable for any action lawfully taken or omitted to be taken by it or them under or in connection with this Agreement or any other Transaction Document (except for its, their or such Person's own gross negligence or willful misconduct), or (ii) responsible in any manner to any of the Purchasers for any recitals, statements, representations or warranties made by any Seller Party contained in this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or any certificate, report, statement or other document referred to or provided for in, or received under or in connection with, this Agreement, or any other Transaction Document or for the value, validity, effectiveness, genuineness, enforceability or sufficiency of this Agreement, or any other Transaction Document or any other document furnished in connection herewith or therewith, or for any failure of any Seller Party to perform its obligations hereunder or thereunder, or for the satisfaction of any condition specified in , or for the perfection, priority, condition, value or sufficiency of any collateral pledged in connection herewith. Neither the Agent nor any Managing Agent shall be under any obligation to any Purchaser to ascertain or to inquire as to the observance or performance of any of the agreements or covenants contained in, or conditions of, this Agreement or any other Transaction Document, or to inspect the properties, books or records of the Seller Parties. Neither the Agent nor any Managing Agent shall be deemed to have knowledge of any Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event unless the Agent or such Managing Agent has received notice from Seller or a Purchaser. No Managing Agent shall have any responsibility hereunder to any Purchaser other than the Purchasers in its Purchase Group.
Exculpatory Provisions
Article VI
     Section 11.4 . The Agent and the Managing Agents shall in all cases be entitled to rely, and shall be fully protected in relying, upon any document or conversation believed by it to be genuine and correct and to have been signed, sent or made by the proper Person or Persons and upon advice and statements of legal counsel (including, without limitation, counsel to Seller), independent accountants and other experts selected by the Agent or
Reliance by Agent
 
any Managing Agent. The Agent and the Managing Agents shall in all cases be fully justified in failing or refusing to take any action under this Agreement or any other Transaction Document unless it shall first receive such advice or concurrence of the Conduits or the Required Financial Institutions or all of the Purchasers, as applicable, as they deem appropriate and they shall first be indemnified to their satisfaction by the Purchasers, provided that unless and until the Agent or any Managing Agent shall have received such advice, or unless the Required Financial Institutions or each Managing Agent, as applicable, shall have directed the Agent to take or refrain from taking any action, the Agent or such Managing Agent may take or refrain from taking any action, as the Agent or such Managing Agent shall deem advisable and in the best interests of the Purchasers. The Agent and the Managing Agents shall in all cases be fully protected in acting, or in refraining from acting, in accordance with a request of the related Conduits or the Required Financial Institutions or all of the Purchasers, as applicable, and such request and any action taken or failure to act pursuant thereto shall be binding upon all the Purchasers.
     Section 11.5 . Each Purchaser expressly acknowledges that none of the Agent, the Managing Agents or any of their respective officers, directors, employees, agents, attorneys-in-fact or affiliates has made any representations or warranties to it and that no act by the Agent or any Managing Agent hereafter taken, including, without limitation, any review of the affairs of any Seller Party, shall be deemed to constitute any representation or warranty by the Agent or such Managing Agent. Each Purchaser represents and warrants to the Agent and the Managing Agents that it has and will, independently and without reliance upon the Agent, any Managing Agent or any other Purchaser and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own appraisal of and investigation into the business, operations, property, prospects, financial and other conditions and creditworthiness of Seller and made its own decision to enter into this Agreement, the other Transaction Documents and all other documents related hereto or thereto.
Non-Reliance on Agent and Other Purchasers
     Section 11.6 . The Financial Institutions agree to reimburse and indemnify the Agent, and the Financial Institutions in each Purchase Group agree to reimburse the Managing Agent for such Purchase Group, and their respective officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents ratably according to their Pro Rata Shares or Adjusted Pro Rata Shares, as applicable, to the extent not paid or reimbursed by the Seller Parties (i) for any amounts for which the Agent, acting in its capacity as Agent, or any Managing Agent, acting in its capacity as a Managing Agent, is entitled to reimbursement by the Seller Parties hereunder and (ii) for any other expenses incurred by the Agent, in its capacity as Agent, or any Managing Agent, acting in its capacity as a Managing Agent, and acting on behalf of the related Purchasers, in connection with the administration and enforcement of this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents. If there is a Terminating Financial Institution, for purposes of this Section, Pro Rata Share and Adjusted Pro Rata Share shall be calculated based on such Terminating Financial Institution's Back-up Commitment immediately prior to its becoming a Terminating Financial Institution; , , that no Terminating Financial Institution shall be required to reimburse or indemnify the Agent or any Managing Agent, or their respective officers, directors, employees, representatives or agents for any amounts referenced in this resulting from events occurring after such Terminating Financial Institution's Capital shall have been paid in full.
Reimbursement and Indemnification
provided
however
Section 11.6
 
     Section 11.7 . The Agent, each Managing Agent and each of its respective Affiliates may make loans to, accept deposits from and generally engage in any kind of business with any Seller Party or any Affiliate of any Seller Party as though it were not the Agent or a Managing Agent hereunder. With respect to the acquisition of Purchaser Interests pursuant to this Agreement, the Agent and each Managing Agent shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement in its individual capacity as any Purchaser and may exercise the same as though it were not the Agent or a Managing Agent, and the terms "Financial Institution," "Purchaser," "Financial Institutions" and "Purchasers" shall include the Agent and each Managing Agent in its individual capacity.
Agents in their Individual Capacities
     Section 11.8 . The Agent may, upon fifteen (15) days' notice to Seller and the Purchasers, and the Agent will, upon the direction of all of the Purchasers (other than such Agent, in its individual capacity) resign as Agent. Each Managing Agent may, upon fifteen (15) days' notice to Seller and the Purchasers in its Purchase Group, and a Managing Agent will, upon the direction of all the Purchasers in its Purchase Group (other than such Managing Agent in its individual capacity), resign as Managing Agent. If the Agent shall resign, then the Required Financial Institutions during such fifteen-day period shall appoint from among the Purchasers a successor agent. If a Managing Agent shall resign, then the Purchasers in the related Purchase Group shall appoint a successor agent during such fifteen-day period. If for any reason no successor agent is appointed by the Required Financial Institutions or the applicable Purchase Group, as applicable, during such fifteen-day period, then effective upon the termination of such fifteen-day period, the Purchasers shall perform all of the duties of the Agent, or the Purchasers in the related Purchase Group shall perform all of the duties of the applicable Managing Agent, as applicable, hereunder and under the other Transaction Documents and Seller and the Servicer (as applicable) shall make all payments in respect of the Aggregate Unpaids directly to the applicable Purchasers and for all purposes shall deal directly with the Purchasers. After the effectiveness of any retiring Agent's or Managing Agent's resignation hereunder as Agent or Managing Agent, as applicable, the retiring Agent or Managing Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and under the other Transaction Documents and the provisions of this and shall continue in effect for its benefit with respect to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Agent or Managing Agent under this Agreement and under the other Transaction Documents.
Successor Agent
Article XI
Article X
     Section 12.1 .
Assignments
          (a) The Seller, each Financial Institution and each other party hereto hereby agree and consent to the complete or partial assignment (or participation) by each Conduit of all or any portion of its rights under, interest in, title to and obligations under this Agreement to the Financial Institutions pursuant to a Liquidity Agreement, and upon such assignment, such Conduit shall be released from its obligations, if any, so assigned. Further, with the consent of the Seller (not to be unreasonably withheld), each Conduit may assign all of its rights and obligations hereunder to another commercial paper issuing conduit for which the Managing Agent of such assigning Conduit acts as administrator. Further, Seller and each Financial
 
Institution hereby agree that any assignee of a Conduit of this Agreement or all or any of the Purchaser Interests of such Conduit shall have all of the rights and benefits under this Agreement as if the term "Conduit" explicitly referred to such party, and no such assignment shall in any way impair the rights and benefits of the Conduits hereunder. Neither the Seller nor the Servicer shall have the right to assign its rights or obligations under this Agreement.
          (b) Any Financial Institution may at any time and from time to time, assign to one or more Persons ("Purchasing Financial Institutions") all or any part of its rights and obligations under this Agreement and its Liquidity Agreement pursuant to an assignment agreement, substantially in the form set forth in hereto (the "Assignment Agreement") executed by such Purchasing Financial Institution and such selling Financial Institution. The consent of the Conduit or Conduits in such Financial Institution's Purchase Group and the Agent shall be required prior to the effectiveness of any such assignment. Each assignee of a Financial Institution must have a short-term debt rating of A-1 or better by S&P and P-1 by Moody's (the "Required Ratings") and must agree to deliver to the Agent, promptly following any request therefor by the Managing Agent for its Purchase Group or the affected Conduit or Conduits, an enforceability opinion in form and substance satisfactory to such Managing Agent and such Conduit or Conduits. Upon delivery of the executed Assignment Agreement to the Agent (with a copy to the Seller), such selling Financial Institution shall be released from its obligations hereunder to the extent of such assignment. Thereafter the Purchasing Financial Institution shall for all purposes be a Financial Institution party to this Agreement and shall have all the rights and obligations of a Financial Institution under this Agreement to the same extent as if it were an original party hereto and no further consent or action by Seller, the Purchasers or the Agent shall be required.
Exhibit VII
          (c) Each of the Financial Institutions agrees that in the event that it shall cease to have the Required Ratings (an "Affected Financial Institution"), such Affected Financial Institution shall be obliged, at the request of the Conduits in such Financial Institution's Purchase Group or the applicable Managing Agent, to assign all of its rights and obligations hereunder and under its Liquidity Agreement to (x) another Financial Institution or (y) another funding entity nominated by such Managing Agent and acceptable to the affected Conduit or Conduits that has the Required Ratings, and willing to participate in this Agreement through the Liquidity Termination Date in the place of such Affected Financial Institution; provided that the Affected Financial Institution receives payment in full, pursuant to an Assignment Agreement, of an amount equal to such Financial Institution's Pro Rata Share of the Capital and Yield owing to the Financial Institutions and all accrued but unpaid fees and other costs and expenses payable in respect of its Pro Rata Share of the Purchaser Interests of the Financial Institutions. In the event and on the date that an Affected Financial Institution becomes a Terminating Financial Institution, the Purchase Limit shall be reduced by an amount equal to such Affected Financial Institution's Back-up Commitment.
     Section 12.2 . Any Financial Institution may, in the ordinary course of its business at any time sell to one or more Persons (each a "") participating interests in its Pro Rata Share of the Purchaser Interests of the Financial Institutions, its obligation to purchase Purchaser Interests from the applicable Conduits under a Liquidity Agreement or any other interest of such Financial Institution hereunder. Notwithstanding any such sale by a Financial Institution of a participating interest to a Participant, such Financial Institution's rights
Participations
Participant
 
and obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, such Financial Institution shall remain solely responsible for the performance of its obligations hereunder, and Seller, the Conduits, the Managing Agents and the Agent shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Financial Institution in connection with such Financial Institution's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Each Financial Institution agrees that any agreement between such Financial Institution and any such Participant in respect of such participating interest shall not restrict such Financial Institution's right to agree to any amendment, supplement, waiver or modification to this Agreement, except for any amendment, supplement, waiver or modification described in .
Section 13.1(b)(i)
     Section 12.3 . The Seller may advise any Managing Agent in writing of its desire to extend the Liquidity Termination Date for an additional 364 days, provided such request is made not more than 60 days prior to, and not less than 40 days prior to, the then current Liquidity Termination Date. Each Managing Agent so advised by the Seller shall promptly notify each Financial Institution in its related Purchase Group of any such request and each such Financial Institution shall notify its related Managing Agent, the Agent and the Seller of its decision to accept or decline the request for such extension no later than 30 days prior to the then current Liquidity Termination Date (it being understood that each Financial Institution may accept or decline such request in its sole discretion and on such terms as it may elect, and the failure to so notify its Managing Agent, the Agent and the Seller shall be deemed an election not to extend by such Financial Institution and, with respect to SunTrust and JPMCB, their respective Conduits; it being further understood that SunTrust's or JPMCB's decision to decline an extension request shall also constitute the decision of its related Conduit to decline such extension request). In the event that at least one Financial Institution and the Conduit in its Purchase Group agree to extend the Liquidity Termination Date, the Seller Parties, the Agent, the applicable Conduit or Conduits, the extending Financial Institutions and the applicable Managing Agent or Agents shall enter into such documents as such extending Financial Institutions may deem necessary or appropriate to reflect such extension, and all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by such Financial Institutions, such Conduit or Conduits, such Managing Agent or Agents and the Agent (including reasonable attorneys' fees) shall be paid by the Seller. In the event that any Financial Institution (a) declines the request to extend the Liquidity Termination Date or (b) is in a Purchase Group with respect to which the Seller did not seek an extension of the Liquidity Termination Date (each such Financial institution being referred to herein as a ""), and, in the case of a Non-Renewing Financial Institution described in clause (a), the Back-up Commitment and Liquidity Commitment of such Non-Renewing Financial Institution are not assigned to another Person in accordance with the terms of this prior to the then current Liquidity Termination Date, the Purchase Limit shall be reduced by an amount equal to each such Non-Renewing Financial Institution's Back-up Commitment on the then current Liquidity Termination Date.
Extension of Liquidity Termination Date
Non-Renewing Financial Institution
Article XII
     Section 12.4 . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement to the contrary, any Financial Institution may at any time pledge or grant a security interest in all or any portion of its rights (including, without limitation, any Purchaser Interest and any rights to payment of Capital and Yield) under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Financial Institution to a Federal Reserve Bank, without notice to or consent of the Seller, any Managing Agent or the Administrative Agent; that no such pledge or grant of a security interest
Federal Reserve
provided
 
shall release a Financial Institution from any of its obligations hereunder, or substitute any such pledgee or grantee for such Financial Institution as a party hereto.
     Section 13.1 .
Waivers and Amendments
          (a) No failure or delay on the part of the Agent, any Managing Agent or any Purchaser in exercising any power, right or remedy under this Agreement shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such power, right or remedy preclude any other further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other power, right or remedy. The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and nonexclusive of any rights or remedies provided by law. Any waiver of this Agreement shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given.
          (b) No provision of this Agreement may be amended, supplemented, modified or waived except in writing in accordance with the provisions of this ; it being understood that notwithstanding anything in this to the contrary, no material amendment to this Agreement shall become effective with respect to any Conduit unless, if required by the documents governing such Conduit's commercial paper program, such Conduit (or the applicable Managing Agent on its behalf) shall have received written confirmation from each of the Rating Agencies that such amendment shall not result in the reduction or withdrawal of the rating of such Conduit's Commercial Paper. The Conduits, the Seller, the Servicer, the Managing Agents and the Agent, at the direction of the Required Financial Institutions, may enter into written modifications or waivers of any provisions of this Agreement, provided, however, that no such modification or waiver shall:
Section 13.1(b)
Section 13.1(b)
          (i) without the consent of each affected Purchaser, (A) extend the Liquidity Termination Date or the date of any payment or deposit of Collections by Seller or the Servicer, (B) reduce the rate or extend the time of payment of Yield (or any component thereof), (C) reduce any fee payable to the Agent or the Managing Agents for the benefit of the Purchasers, (D) except pursuant to hereof, change the amount of the Capital of any Purchaser, any Financial Institution's Pro Rata Share (except as may be required pursuant to a Conduit's Liquidity Agreement) or any Financial Institution's Back-up Commitment or Liquidity Commitment, (E) amend, modify or waive any provision of the definition of Required Financial Institutions, this , (F) consent to or permit the assignment or transfer by Seller of any of its rights and obligations under this Agreement, (G) change the definition of "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", "", or "", or (H) amend or modify any defined term (or any defined term used directly or indirectly in such defined term) used in clauses (A) through (G) above in a manner that would circumvent the intention of the restrictions set forth in such clauses; or
Article XII
Section 13.1(b)
Facility Termination Date
Eligible Receivable
Loss Reserve
Default Proxy Ratio
Delinquency Ratio
Delinquent Receivable
Dilution Reserve
Dilution Reserve Ratio
Dilution Trigger Ratio
Loss Reserve
Loss Reserve Ratio
Loss-to-Liquidation Ratio
Yield Reserve
 
          (ii) without the written consent of the Agent or any Managing Agent, amend, modify or waive any provision of this Agreement if the effect thereof is to affect the rights or duties of the Agent or such Managing Agent, as applicable.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) without the consent of the Financial Institutions in any Purchase Group (other than the Purchase Group to which such Financial Institutions are being added), the Agent may, with the consent of Seller, amend this Agreement solely to add additional Persons as Financial Institutions hereunder and (ii) the Agent, the Required Financial Institutions, the Managing Agents, and the Conduits may enter into amendments to modify any of the terms or provisions of , and or any other provision of this Agreement without the consent of Seller, that such amendment has no negative impact upon Seller. Any modification or waiver made in accordance with this shall apply to each of the Purchasers equally and shall be binding upon Seller, the Purchasers, the Managing Agents and the Agent.
Article XI
Article XII
Section 13.13
provided
Section 13.1
     Section 13.2 . Except as provided below, all communications and notices provided for hereunder shall be in writing (including bank wire, telecopy or electronic facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given to the other parties hereto at their respective addresses or telecopy numbers set forth on the signature pages hereof or at such other address or telecopy number as such Person may hereafter specify for the purpose of notice to each of the other parties hereto. Each such notice or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by telecopy, upon the receipt thereof, (ii) if given by mail, three (3) Business Days after the time such communication is deposited in the mail with first class postage prepaid or (iii) if given by any other means, when received at the address specified in this . Seller hereby authorizes the Agent to effect purchases and each Managing Agent to make Tranche Period and Discount Rate selections based on telephonic notices made by any Person whom the Agent or such Managing Agent, as applicable, in good faith believes to be acting on behalf of Seller. Seller agrees to deliver promptly to the Agent or the applicable Managing Agent a written confirmation of each telephonic notice signed by an authorized officer of Seller; , , the absence of such confirmation shall not affect the validity of such notice. If the written confirmation differs from the action taken by the Agent or such Managing Agent, the records of the Agent or such Managing Agent shall govern absent manifest error.
Notices
Section 13.2
provided
however
     Section 13.3 . If any Purchaser, whether by setoff or otherwise, has payment made to it with respect to any portion of the Aggregate Unpaids owing to such Purchaser (other than payments received pursuant to or ) in a greater proportion than that received by any other Purchaser entitled to receive a ratable share of such Aggregate Unpaids, such Purchaser agrees, promptly upon demand, to purchase for cash without recourse or warranty a portion of such Aggregate Unpaids held by the other Purchasers so that after such purchase each Purchaser will hold its ratable proportion of such Aggregate Unpaids; provided that if all or any portion of such excess amount is thereafter recovered from such Purchaser, such purchase shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, but without interest.
Ratable Payments
Section 10.2
10.3
 
     Section 13.4 .
Protection of Ownership Interests of the Purchasers
          (a) Seller agrees that from time to time, at its expense, it will promptly execute and deliver all instruments and documents, and take all actions, that may be necessary or desirable, or that the Agent or any Managing Agent may request, to perfect, protect or more fully evidence the Purchaser Interests, or to enable the Agent or the Purchasers to exercise and enforce their rights and remedies hereunder. At any time after the occurrence of an Amortization Event, the Agent may (or at the direction of the Managing Agents, shall), or the Agent may (or at the direction of the Managing Agents, shall) direct Seller or the Servicer to, notify the Obligors of Receivables, at Seller's expense, of the ownership or security interests of the Purchasers under this Agreement and may (or at the direction of the Managing Agents, shall) also direct that payments of all amounts due or that become due under any or all Receivables be made directly to the Agent or its designee. Seller or the Servicer (as applicable) shall, at any Purchaser's request, withhold the identity of such Purchaser in any such notification.
          (b) If any Seller Party fails to perform any of its obligations hereunder, the Agent or any Purchaser may (but shall not be required to) perform, or cause performance of, such obligations, and the Agent's or such Purchaser's costs and expenses incurred in connection therewith shall be payable by Seller as provided in . Each Seller Party irrevocably authorizes the Agent at any time and from time to time in the sole discretion of the Agent, and appoints the Agent as its attorney-in-fact, to act on behalf of such Seller Party (i) to execute on behalf of Seller as debtor and to file financing statements necessary or desirable in the Agent's sole discretion (including financing statements describing the collateral covered thereby as "all assets" of the Seller or words to similar effect) to perfect and to maintain the perfection and priority of the interest of the Purchasers in the Receivables and (ii) to file a carbon, photographic or other reproduction of this Agreement or any financing statement with respect to the Receivables as a financing statement in such offices as the Agent in its sole discretion deems necessary or desirable to perfect and to maintain the perfection and priority of the interests of the Purchasers in the Receivables. This appointment is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable.
Section 10.3
     Section 13.5 .
Confidentiality
          (a) Each Seller Party and each Purchaser shall maintain and shall cause each of its employees and officers to maintain the confidentiality of this Agreement and the other confidential or proprietary information with respect to the Agent, the Managing Agents and the Purchasers and their respective businesses obtained by it or them in connection with the structuring, negotiating and execution of the transactions contemplated herein, except that such Seller Party and such Purchaser and its officers and employees may disclose such information to such Seller Party's and such Purchaser's external accountants and attorneys and as required by any applicable law or order of any judicial or administrative proceeding. Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, each Seller Party, each Purchaser, the Agent, each Indemnified Party and any successor or assign of any of the foregoing (and each employee, representative or other agent of any of the foregoing) may disclose to any and all Persons, without limitation of any kind, the "tax treatment" and "tax structure" (in each case, within the meaning of Treasury Regulation Section 1.6011-4) of the transactions contemplated herein and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are or have been provided to any of the foregoing relating to such tax treatment or tax structure, and it is hereby confirmed that each of
 
the foregoing have been so authorized since the commencement of discussions regarding the transactions. In addition, each Purchaser (or any administrative agent on its behalf), may disclose any information delivered to it in connection with any Transaction Document to a nationally recognized statistical rating organization in compliance with Rule 17g-5 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (or to any other rating agency in compliance with any similar rule or regulation in any relevant jurisdiction).
          (b) Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, each Seller Party hereby consents to the disclosure of any nonpublic information with respect to it (i) to the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers by each other, (ii) by the Agent, the Managing Agents or the Purchasers to any prospective or actual assignee or participant of any of them and (iii) by the Agent or the Managing Agents to any rating agency, Commercial Paper dealer or provider of a surety, guaranty or credit or liquidity enhancement to the Conduits or any entity organized for the purpose of purchasing, or making loans secured by, financial assets for which either Managing Agent acts as the administrative agent and to any officers, directors, employees, outside accountants and attorneys of any of the foregoing, provided that any Person receiving information shall be advised by the Agent or the applicable Managing Agent, as applicable, of the obligation to keep such information confidential. In addition, the Purchasers, the Managing Agents and the Agent may disclose any such nonpublic information pursuant to any law, rule, regulation, direction, request or order of any judicial, administrative or regulatory authority or proceedings (whether or not having the force or effect of law), provided that Purchasers, the Managing Agents and Agent shall, if practicable, notify Seller in advance prior to disclosure and will use reasonable efforts to cooperate with Seller at Seller's expense in obtaining any protective order for such information.
          (c) Notwithstanding any other express or implied agreement to the contrary, the parties hereto agree and acknowledge that each of them and each of their employees, representatives, and other agents may disclose to any and all Persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of the transaction and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to any of them relating to such tax treatment and tax structure, except to the extent that confidentiality is reasonably necessary, to comply with U.S. federal or state securities laws. For purposes of this paragraph, the terms "tax treatment" and "tax structure" have the meanings specified in Treasury Regulation section 1.6011-4(c).
     Section 13.6 . Each of the Seller, the Servicer, the Agent, each Managing Agent and each Financial Institution hereby covenants and agrees that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding senior indebtedness of a Conduit, it will not institute against, or join any other Person in instituting against, such Conduit or any such entity any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings or other similar proceeding under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States.
Bankruptcy Petition
     Section 13.7 .
Limitation of Liability; Limitation on Payment; No Recourse
          (a) Except with respect to any claim arising out of the willful misconduct or gross negligence of any Purchaser, Financial Institution, Managing Agent or the Agent, no claim
 
may be made by any Seller Party or any other Person against any Conduit, the Agent, any Managing Agent, or any Financial Institution or their respective Affiliates, directors, officers, employees, attorneys or agents for any special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages in respect of any claim for breach of contract or any other theory of liability arising out of or related to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, or any act, omission or event occurring in connection therewith; and each Seller Party hereby waives, releases, and agrees not to sue upon any claim for any such damages, whether or not accrued and whether or not known or suspected to exist in its favor.
          (b) No Conduit shall be required to make payment of the amounts required to be paid pursuant hereto unless, and then only to the extent that, such Conduit has Excess Funds (as defined below). If a Conduit does not have Excess Funds, the excess of the amount due hereunder over the amount paid shall not constitute a "claim" (as defined in Section 101(5) of the Bankruptcy Code) against such Conduit until such time as such Conduit has Excess Funds. If a Conduit does not have sufficient Excess Funds to make any payment due hereunder, then such Conduit may pay a lesser amount and make additional payments that in the aggregate equal the amount of deficiency as soon as possible thereafter. The term "Excess Funds" means with respect to a Conduit the excess of (1) the aggregate projected value of such Conduit's assets and other property (including cash and cash equivalents), over (2) the sum of (A) the sum of all scheduled payments of principal, interest and other amounts payable on publicly or privately placed indebtedness of such Conduit for borrowed money, plus (B) the sum of all other liabilities, indebtedness and other obligations of such Conduit for borrowed money or owed to any credit or liquidity provider, together with all unpaid interest then accrued thereon, plus (C) all taxes payable by such Conduit to the Internal Revenue Service, plus (D) all other indebtedness, liabilities and obligations of such Conduit then due and payable, but the amount of any liability, indebtedness or obligation of such Conduit shall not exceed the projected value of the assets to which recourse for such liability, indebtedness or obligation is limited. Excess Funds shall be calculated once each Business Day.
     Section 13.8 . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, 735 ILCS SECTION 105/5-1 ET SEQ., BUT OTHERWISE WITHOUT REGARD TO THE CONFLICTS OF LAW PROVISIONS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
CHOICE OF LAW
     Section 13.9 . EACH SELLER PARTY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY SUBMITS TO THE NON-EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF ANY UNITED STATES FEDERAL OR ILLINOIS STATE COURT SITTING IN CHICAGO, ILLINOIS IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY DOCUMENT EXECUTED BY SUCH PERSON PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT AND EACH SELLER PARTY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY AGREES THAT ALL CLAIMS IN RESPECT OF SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING MAY BE HEARD AND DETERMINED IN ANY SUCH COURT AND IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY OBJECTION IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE AS TO THE VENUE OF ANY SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING BROUGHT IN SUCH A COURT OR THAT SUCH COURT IS AN INCONVENIENT FORUM. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL LIMIT THE RIGHT OF THE AGENT, ANY MANAGING AGENT OR ANY PURCHASER TO BRING PROCEEDINGS AGAINST ANY SELLER PARTY IN THE COURTS OF ANY OTHER
CONSENT TO JURISDICTION
 
JURISDICTION. ANY JUDICIAL PROCEEDING BY ANY SELLER PARTY AGAINST THE AGENT, ANY MANAGING AGENT OR ANY PURCHASER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF SUCH PARTIES INVOLVING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ANY MATTER IN ANY WAY ARISING OUT OF, RELATED TO, OR CONNECTED WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY DOCUMENT EXECUTED BY SUCH SELLER PARTY PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE BROUGHT ONLY IN A COURT IN CHICAGO, ILLINOIS.
     Section 13.10 . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY JUDICIAL PROCEEDING INVOLVING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ANY MATTER (WHETHER SOUNDING IN TORT, CONTRACT OR OTHERWISE) IN ANY WAY ARISING OUT OF, RELATED TO, OR CONNECTED WITH THIS AGREEMENT, ANY DOCUMENT EXECUTED BY ANY SELLER PARTY PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE RELATIONSHIP ESTABLISHED HEREUNDER OR THEREUNDER.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
     Section 13.11 .
Integration; Binding Effect; Survival of Terms
          (a) This Agreement and each other Transaction Document contain the final and complete integration of all prior expressions by the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof and shall constitute the entire agreement among the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof superseding all prior oral or written understandings.
          (b) This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns (including any trustee in bankruptcy). This Agreement shall create and constitute the continuing obligations of the parties hereto in accordance with its terms and shall remain in full force and effect until terminated in accordance with its terms; , , that the rights and remedies with respect to (i) any breach of any representation and warranty made by any Seller Party pursuant to , (ii) the indemnification and payment provisions of , and and shall be continuing and shall survive any termination of this Agreement.
provided
however
Article V
Article X
Sections 13.5
13.6
     Section 13.12 . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Agreement. Any provisions of this Agreement which are prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction. Unless otherwise expressly indicated, all references herein to "Article," "Section," "Schedule" or "Exhibit" shall mean articles and sections of, and schedules and exhibits to, this Agreement.
Counterparts; Severability; Section References
     Section 13.13 .
Agent Roles
          (a) . Each of the Financial Institutions acknowledges that JPMCB acts, or may in the future act, (i) as Agent for the Purchasers, (ii) as Managing Agent for Falcon, (iii) as issuing and paying agent for Falcon's Commercial Paper, (iv) to provide credit or
JPMCB Roles
 
liquidity enhancement for the timely payment for the Commercial Paper and (v) to provide other services from time to time for some or all of the Conduits (collectively, the "JPMCB Roles"). Without limiting the generality of this , each Financial Institution hereby acknowledges and consents to any and all JPMCB Roles and agrees that in connection with any JPMCB Role, JPMCB may take, or refrain from taking, any action that it, in its discretion, deems appropriate, including, without limitation, in its role as Agent and Managing Agent for the related Conduits, and the giving of notice to the Agent or Managing Agent of a mandatory purchase pursuant its Liquidity Agreement.
Section 13.13(a)
          (b) . Each of the Financial Institutions acknowledges that each Financial Institution that serves as a Managing Agent hereunder (a "Managing Agent Institution") acts, or may in the future act, (i) as Managing Agent for a Conduit or Conduits, (ii) as issuing and paying agent for such Conduit's Commercial Paper, (iii) to provide credit or liquidity enhancement for the timely payment for the Commercial Paper and (iv) to provide other services from time to time for some or all of the Conduits (collectively, the "Managing Agent Institution Roles"). Without limiting the generality of this , each Financial Institution hereby acknowledges and consents to any and all Managing Agent Institution Roles and agrees that in connection with any Managing Agent Institution Role, the applicable Managing Agent Institution may take, or refrain from taking, any action that it, in its discretion, deems appropriate, including, without limitation, in its role as Managing Agent for the related Conduits, and the giving of notice to the Agent or Managing Agent of a mandatory purchase pursuant to its liquidity back-stop program.
Managing Agent Institution Roles
Section 13.13(b)
     Section 13.14 . Anixter and the Seller hereby acknowledge and agree that any Purchaser or any affiliate of a Purchaser may, from time to time (but without any obligation) purchase and hold Commercial Paper issued by any Conduit for its own account, regardless of the terms (so long as such terms are substantially similar to the terms of a sale of Commercial Paper to a third party).
Commercial Paper
     Section 13.15 .
Characterization
          (a) It is the intention of the parties hereto that each purchase hereunder shall constitute and be treated as an absolute and irrevocable sale, which purchase shall provide the applicable Purchaser with the full benefits of ownership of the applicable Purchaser Interest. Except as specifically provided in this Agreement, each sale of a Purchaser Interest hereunder is made without recourse to Seller; , , that (i) Seller shall be liable to each Purchaser and the Agent for all representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities made by Seller pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, and (ii) such sale does not constitute and is not intended to result in an assumption by any Purchaser or the Agent or any assignee thereof of any obligation of Seller or any Originator or any other person arising in connection with the Receivables, the Related Security, or the related Contracts, or any other obligations of Seller or any Originator.
provided
however
          (b) In addition to any ownership interest which the Agent may from time to time acquire pursuant hereto, Seller hereby grants to the Agent for the ratable benefit of the Purchasers a valid and perfected security interest in all of Seller's right, title and interest in, to and under all Receivables now existing or hereafter arising, the Collections, each Lock-Box,
 
each Collection Account, all Related Security, all other rights and payments relating to such Receivables, and all proceeds of any thereof prior to all other liens on and security interests therein to secure the prompt and complete payment of the Aggregate Unpaids. The Agent and the Purchasers shall have, in addition to the rights and remedies that they may have under this Agreement, all other rights and remedies provided to a secured creditor under the UCC and other applicable law, which rights and remedies shall be cumulative.
          (c) If, notwithstanding the intention of the parties expressed above, any sale or transfer by Seller hereunder shall be characterized as a secured loan and not a sale or such sale shall for any reason be ineffective or unenforceable (any of the foregoing being a ""), then this Agreement shall be deemed to constitute a security agreement under the UCC and other applicable law. In the case of any Recharacterization, Seller represents and warrants that each remittance of Collections to the Agent or the Purchasers hereunder will have been (i) in payment of a debt incurred in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs and (ii) made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs.
Recharacterization
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed and delivered by their duly authorized signatories as of the date hereof.
 
 
 
 
     As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following meanings (such meanings to be equally applicable to both the singular and plural forms of the terms defined):
     "" means each calendar month, provided that the initial Accrual Period hereunder means the period from (and including) the date of the initial purchase hereunder to (and including) the last day of the calendar month thereafter.
Accrual Period
     "" means Accu-Tech Corporation, a Georgia corporation.
Accu-Tech
     "" means, collectively, Collection Account #'s 3750777965, 3750777981 and 3750905180 maintained at Bank of America, N.A.
Accu-Tech Accounts
     "" means any Receivables originated by Accu-Tech and sold to Anixter pursuant to the Accu-Tech Transfer Agreement.
Accu-Tech Receivables
     "" means that certain Receivables Transfer Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, between Accu-Tech and Anixter, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Accu-Tech Transfer Agreement
     "" means, for each Financial Institution, the Back-up Commitment of such Financial Institution within a given Purchase Group divided by the sum of the Back-up Commitments of each Financial Institution in such Purchase Group, adjusted as necessary to give effect to any assignments pursuant to and to the termination of the Back-up Commitment of any Terminating Financial Institution in such Purchase Group.
Adjusted Pro Rata Share
Section 12.1(b)
     "" means a lien, security interest, charge or encumbrance, or other right or claim in, of or on any Person's assets or properties in favor of any other Person.
Adverse Claim
     "" has the meaning specified in .
Affected Financial Institution
Section 12.1(c)
     "" means, with respect to any Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under direct or indirect common control with, such Person. A Person shall be deemed to be "controlled by" any other Person if such other Person possesses, directly or indirectly, power (a) to vote 33% or more (or, in the case of an Affiliate of a Purchaser, 20% or more) of the securities (on a fully diluted basis) having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or managing general partners; or (b) to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person whether by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
Agent
     "" means, as of any date of determination, the aggregate amount of Capital of all Purchaser Interests outstanding on such date.
Aggregate Capital
 
     "" has the meaning set forth in
Aggregate Reduction
Section 1.3.
     "" means, on any date of determination, the sum of the Loss Reserve, the Servicer Reserve, the Yield Reserve, and the Dilution Reserve.
Aggregate Reserves
     "" means, at any time, an amount equal to the sum of all accrued and unpaid fees under the Fee Letter, Yield, Aggregate Capital and all other unpaid Obligations (whether due or accrued) at such time.
Aggregate Unpaids
     "" means this Second Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, as it may be amended or modified and in effect from time to time.
Agreement
     "" means GAAP as of the date of this Agreement together with any changes in GAAP after the date hereof which are not "Material Accounting Changes" (as defined below). If any changes in GAAP are hereafter required or permitted and are adopted by Anixter International Inc. or Anixter with the agreement of its independent certified public accountants and such changes result in a material change in the method of calculation of any of the financial covenants, restrictions or standards herein or in the related definitions or terms used therein (""), the parties hereto agree to enter into negotiations, in good faith, in order to amend such provisions in a credit neutral manner so as to reflect equitably such changes with the desired result that the criteria for evaluating Anixter's consolidated financial condition shall be the same after such changes as if such changes had not been made; , , that no Material Accounting Change shall be given effect in such calculations until such provisions are amended in a manner reasonably satisfactory to the Required Financial Institutions. If such amendment is entered into, all references in this Agreement to Agreement Accounting Principles shall mean GAAP as of the date of such amendment together with any changes in GAAP after the date of such amendment which are not Material Accounting Changes.
Agreement Accounting Principles
Material Accounting Changes
provided
however
     "" means the earliest to occur of:
Amortization Date
     (i) the day on which any of the conditions precedent set forth in (except for ) are not satisfied;
Section 6.2
Section 6.2(d)(iii)
     (ii) the Business Day immediately prior to the occurrence of an Amortization Event set forth in ;
Section 9.1(d)(ii)
     (iii) the Business Day specified in a written notice from the Agent pursuant to following the occurrence of any other Amortization Event; and
Section 9.2
     (iv) the Business Day specified in a written notice from the Agent following the failure to obtain the Specified Rating within 90 days following delivery of a Ratings Request to Seller and the Servicer, and (v) the date which is thirty (30) Business Days after the Agent's receipt of written notice from Seller that it wishes to terminate the facility evidenced by this Agreement.
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Amortization Event
Article IX
 
     "" means, at any time:
Applicable Loss Horizon Period
     (a) if Rating Level I is in effect, the four Collection Periods most recently ended;
     (b) if (x) Rating Level II is in effect or (y) Rating Level I is in effect and the Servicer has notified the Managing Agents that it will deliver Reports as if Rating Level II were in effect (and the Servicer is actually delivering Reports as if Rating Level II were in effect), the three Collection Periods most recently ended and one-half of the fourth Collection Period most recently ended;
     (c) if Rating Level III is in effect, the three Collection Periods most recently ended and one-quarter of the fourth Collection Period most recently ended; and
     (d) if Rating Level IV is in effect, the three Collection Periods most recently ended.
     "" means 2.90%.
Applicable Margin
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Assignment Agreement
Section 12.1(b)
     "" means, with respect to any Person, its president, corporate controller, treasurer or chief financial officer.
Authorized Officer
     "" means, for each Financial Institution, the commitment of such Financial Institution to purchase Purchaser Interests from the Seller, in an amount not to exceed (x) in the aggregate, the amount set forth opposite such Financial Institution's name under the Back-up Commitment column on to this Agreement, as such amount may be modified in accordance with the terms hereof, and (y) with respect to any individual purchase from the Seller hereunder, its Pro Rata Share of the Purchase Price therefor.
Back-up Commitment
Schedule A
     "" means Title 11 of the United States Code entitled "Bankruptcy," as amended, and any successor statute thereto.
Bankruptcy Code
     "" means:
Base Rate
     (a) with respect to each Financial Institution in the Falcon Purchase Group, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus / of 1% and (c) the LIBO Rate for a one month Tranche Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1%, that, for the avoidance
1
2
provided
 
of doubt, the LIBO Rate for purposes of this definition for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters BBA Libor Rates Page 3750 (or on any successor or substitute page of such page) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day; and
     (b) with respect to each Financial Institution in the Three Pillars Purchase Group, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greater of (i) the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate most recently determined by SunTrust Bank plus one half of one percent (0.50%), and (ii) the SunTrust Prime Rate.
Any change in the Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate, the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate or the LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate, the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate or the LIBO Rate, respectively.
     "" means, with respect to the Falcon Purchase Group, Falcon Broken Funding Costs and, with respect to the Three Pillars Purchase Group, Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs.
Broken Funding Costs
     "" means any day on which banks are not authorized or required to close in New York, New York or Chicago, Illinois and The Depository Trust Company of New York is open for business, and, if the applicable Business Day relates to any computation or payment to be made with respect to the LIBO Rate, any day on which dealings in dollar deposits are carried on in the London interbank market.
Business Day
     "" means with respect to any Purchaser Interest, at any time, (A) the Purchase Price of such Purchaser Interest, (B) the sum of the aggregate amount of Collections and other payments received by the Agent or the applicable Managing Agent which in each case have been applied to reduce the Capital of such Purchaser Interest in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement; provided that such Capital shall be restored (in accordance with ) in the amount of any Collections or other payments so received and applied if at any time the distribution of such Collections or payments are rescinded, returned or refunded for any reason.
Capital
minus
Section 2.5
     "" means, for any Purchaser at any time, the amount of Capital allocated to the Purchaser Interests of such Purchaser at such time divided by the Aggregate Capital at such time.
Capital Pro Rata Share
     "" means (i) the acquisition by any Person, or two or more Persons acting in concert, of beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 of the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of 20% or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of any Seller Party or (ii) the failure of Anixter to own, directly or indirectly, 100% of the equity interests of the Seller.
Change of Control
     "" means a Receivable: (i) as to which the Obligor thereof has taken any action, or suffered any event to occur, of the type described in (as if references to Seller Party therein refer to such Obligor); (ii) as to which the Obligor thereof, if a natural person, is deceased, (iii) which, consistent with the Credit and Collection Policy, would
Charged-Off Receivable
Section 9.1(d)
 
be written off Seller's books as uncollectible, (iv) which has been identified by Seller as uncollectible or (v) as to which any payment, or part thereof, remains unpaid for 120 days or more from the original invoice date for such Receivable.
     "" means May 31, 2011.
Closing Date
     "" means each concentration account, depositary account, lock-box account or similar account in which any Collections are collected or deposited and which is listed on .
Collection Account
Exhibit IV
     "" means an account control agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Agent.
Collection Account Agreement
     "" means, at any time, any of the banks holding one or more Collection Accounts.
Collection Bank
     "" means a "notice of exclusive control", a "springing notice" or the equivalent of any of the foregoing that could be delivered by the Agent to a Collection Bank from time to time pursuant to a Collection Account Agreement.
Collection Notice
     "" means each fiscal month of the Seller Parties.
Collection Period
     "" means, with respect to any Receivable, all cash collections and other cash proceeds in respect of such Receivable, including, without limitation, all yield, Finance Charges or other related amounts accruing in respect thereof and all cash proceeds of Related Security with respect to such Receivable.
Collections
     "" means promissory notes of any Conduit issued by such Conduit in the commercial paper market.
Commercial Paper
     "" means each of Falcon and Three Pillars, and their respective successors and assigns as Conduits hereunder.
Conduit
     "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, (a) Consolidated Net Income for such period taken as a single accounting period (b) the sum of the following, without duplication, to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income for such period: (i) the provision for depreciation and amortization expense of the Consolidated Group for such period, (ii) income taxes of the Consolidated Group for such period, and (iii) net interest expense of the Consolidated Group for such period; that there shall be excluded from Consolidated EBITDA any non-cash, non-operating gains or losses (including, without limitation, extraordinary or unusual gains or losses, gains or losses arising from the sale of capital assets or the sale of owned buildings and properties and other non-recurring gains or losses) during such period.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
provided
     "" means, as of any date of determination, the ratio of (a) the sum of Consolidated EBITDA and Rental Expense to (b) the Consolidated Fixed
Consolidated Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
Charge Expense, in each case determined in accordance with Section 7.18 of the Credit Agreement as in effect as of the date hereof for the period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters ending on or immediately prior to such determination date.
     "" means, for any period, the net interest expense of the Consolidated Group (including the interest component of capital leases, the interest component of synthetic lease obligations, commitment fees and fees for standby letters of credit, excluding amortization of deferred financing fees) consolidated yield or discount accrued on the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or other transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of Anixter and its Subsidiaries in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof) (regardless of the accounting treatment of such Receivables Securitization Transaction) Rental Expense for such period calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Fixed Charge Expense
plus
plus
     "" means, as of any date of determination, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations and liabilities, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including Obligations (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof)), (b) that portion of obligations with respect to capital leases that are capitalized in the consolidated balance sheet of the Consolidated Group, (c) the principal portion of synthetic lease obligations, (d) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables under Receivables Securitization Transactions (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof), and (e) without duplication, all Accommodation Obligations (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof) with respect to Indebtedness of the type specified in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) above of Persons other than Anixter or any Subsidiary.
Consolidated Funded Indebtedness
     "" means Anixter and each of its Subsidiaries.
Consolidated Group
     "" means, for any period, for the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, the net income of the Consolidated Group for that period, determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Consolidated Net Income
     "" means, with respect to any Receivable, any and all instruments, agreements, invoices or other writings pursuant to which such Receivable arises or which evidences such Receivable.
Contract
     "" means for any Accrual Period, with respect to any Purchaser Interest owned by the Falcon Purchase Group, the Falcon CP Rate and with respect to any Purchaser Interest owned by the Three Pillars Purchase Group, the Three Pillars CP Rate.
CP Rate
     "" means that certain Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of April 8, 2011 by and among Anixter, the Subsidiaries of Anixter identified as Borrowing Subsidiaries thereunder, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A. and JPMCB, as Co-Syndication Agents, SunTrust Bank and The Royal Bank
Credit Agreement
 
of Scotland plc as Co-Documentation Agents, and the lenders party thereto from time to time, as the same may be amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
     "" means (i) Anixter's credit and collection policies and practices relating to Contracts and Receivables existing on the date hereof and (ii) Accu-Tech's credit and collection policies and practices relating to Contracts and Receivables existing on the date hereof, as summarized in and as modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement.
Credit and Collection Policy
Exhibit VIII
     "" means a report, in the form agreed to by the Servicer and the Managing Agents from time to time (appropriately completed), furnished by the Servicer to the Managing Agents pursuant to .
Daily Report
Section 8.5
     "" for any Person at any time means the then current rating by (i) S&P, (ii) Moody's or (iii) any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency of such Person's long term public senior unsecured noncredit enhanced debt.
Debt Rating
     "" means the aggregate of all amounts Seller shall have been deemed to have received as a Collection of a Receivable. Seller shall be deemed to have received a Collection in full of a Receivable if at any time (i) the Outstanding Balance of any such Receivable is either (x) reduced as a result of any defective or rejected goods or services, any discount or any adjustment or otherwise by Seller (other than cash Collections on account of the Receivables) or (y) reduced or canceled as a result of a setoff in respect of any claim by any Person (whether such claim arises out of the same or a related transaction or an unrelated transaction) or (ii) any of the representations or warranties in are no longer true with respect to such Receivable.
Deemed Collections
Article V
     "" means with respect to any amount due and payable by Seller in respect of any Aggregate Unpaids, an amount equal to interest on any such unpaid Aggregate Unpaids at a rate per annum equal to 3.90% above the Base Rate.
Default Fee
     "" means, for any Collection Period, a fraction (calculated as a percentage) equal to (i) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables (without duplication) which, as of the last day of such Collection Period, remain unpaid for at least one hundred twenty (120) but less than one hundred fifty (150) days from the original invoice date the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables (without duplication) which, consistent with the Credit and Collection Policy, were or should have been written off the Seller's books as uncollectible and are less than one hundred twenty (120) days past invoice date during such period, (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during the Collection Period which ended on the date four (4) months prior to the last day of the current Collection Period.
Default Proxy Ratio
plus
divided
by
     "" means, at any time, a percentage equal to (i) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables that were Delinquent Receivables at such time divided by (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables at such time.
Delinquency Ratio
 
     "" means a Receivable as to which any payment, or part thereof, remains unpaid for 91 days or more from the original invoice date for such Receivable.
Delinquent Receivable
     "" means the third Business Day prior to each Monthly Settlement Date.
Determination Date
     "" means, as of any date as set forth in the most recent Monthly Report, a ratio computed by dividing (i) the aggregate of all Receivables generated during the two (2) most recently ended Collection Periods by (ii) the aggregate Net Receivables Balance as at the last day of the most recently ended Collection Period.
Dilution Horizon Ratio
     "" means, for any Collection Period, the ratio (expressed as a percentage) computed as of the last day of such Collection Period by dividing (i) the aggregate amount of Dilutions during such Collection Period by (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during the preceding Collection Period.
Dilution Ratio
     "" means, on any date, an amount equal to (x) the greater of (i) 9% and (ii) the Dilution Reserve Ratio then in effect, (y) the Net Receivables Balance as of the close of business on the immediately preceding Business Day.
Dilution Reserve
times
     "" means, as of any date, an amount calculated as follows:
Dilution Reserve Ratio
     DRR = [(Stress Factor x ADR) + [(HDR-ADR) x (HDR/ADR)]] x DHR
The Dilution Reserve Ratio shall be calculated monthly in each Monthly Report and such Dilution Reserve Ratio shall, absent manifest error, be effective from the corresponding Monthly Settlement Date until the next succeeding Monthly Settlement Date.
     "" means, at any time, the aggregate amount of reductions or cancellations described in clause (i) of the definition of "Deemed Collections".
Dilutions
     "" means, as of the end of any Collection Period, the ratio (expressed as a percentage), computed as of the last day of such Collection Period by dividing (i) the aggregate amount of Dilutions during such Collection Period by (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables at the end of such Collection Period the aggregate
Dilution Trigger Ratio
minus
 
outstanding amount of all credit memos from Originators outstanding at the end of such Collection Period.
     "" means, the LIBO Rate or the Base Rate, as applicable, with respect to each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions, and any Purchaser Interest of a Conduit, an undivided interest in which has been assigned by such Conduit to a Financial Institution pursuant to the applicable Liquidity Agreement.
Discount Rate
     "" means, at any time, a Receivable:
Eligible Receivable
          (i) the Obligor of which (a) if a natural person, is a resident of the United States or, if a corporation or other business organization, is organized under the laws of the United States or any political subdivision thereof and has its chief executive office in the United States; (b) is not an Affiliate of any of the parties hereto; (c) is not the subject of a proceeding under the Bankruptcy Code or any other insolvency proceeding and (d) is not a government or a governmental subdivision or agency;
          (ii) due from an Obligor that is the Obligor on another Receivable or Receivables, and the Outstanding Balance of all Receivables from such Obligor which are Charged-Off Receivables is less than 20% of the Outstanding Balance of all Receivables from such Obligor;
          (iii) which is not a Charged-Off Receivable or a Delinquent Receivable;
          (iv) which by its terms is due and payable within 90 days of the original billing date therefor and has not had its payment terms extended; provided, however, that no more than 25% of the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables which are due and payable between 61 and 90 days of the original billing date therefor will be deemed to be "Eligible Receivables";
          (v) which is "an "account" within the meaning of Section 9-102(a)(2) of the UCC of all applicable jurisdictions, and which represents all or part of the sales price of merchandise, insurance and services within the meaning of Section 3(c)(5) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended;
          (vi) which is denominated and payable only in United States dollars in the United States;
          (vii) which arises under a Contract in substantially the form of one of the form contracts set forth on hereto or otherwise approved by the Managing Agents in writing, which, together with such Receivable, is in full force and effect and constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of the related Obligor enforceable against such Obligor in accordance with its terms;
Exhibit IX
          (viii) which arises under a Contract which (A) does not require the Obligor under such Contract to consent to the transfer, sale or assignment of the rights
 
and duties of any Originator or any of its assignees under such Contract (unless such consent has been obtained) and (B) does not contain a confidentiality provision that purports to restrict the ability of any Purchaser to exercise its rights under this Agreement, including, without limitation, its right to review the Contract;
          (ix) which arises under a Contract that contains an obligation to pay a specified sum of money, contingent only upon the sale of goods or the provision of services by an Originator;
          (x) which, together with the Contract related thereto, does not contravene any law, rule or regulation applicable thereto (including, without limitation, any law, rule and regulation relating to truth in lending, fair credit billing, fair credit reporting, equal credit opportunity, fair debt collection practices and privacy) and with respect to which no part of the Contract related thereto is in violation of any such law, rule or regulation;
          (xi) which satisfies all applicable requirements of the Credit and Collection Policy;
          (xii) which was generated in the ordinary course of an Originator's business;
          (xiii) which arises solely from the sale of goods or the provision of services to the related Obligor by an Originator, and not by any other Person (in whole or in part);
          (xiv) as to which the Agent has not notified Seller that the Agent has determined that such Receivable or class of Receivables is not acceptable as an Eligible Receivable, including, without limitation, because such Receivable arises under a Contract that is not acceptable to the Agent; , that Agent shall not determine a Receivable to be ineligible pursuant to this clause (xiv) because the Obligor is in a particular industry if on the date hereof any Originator has outstanding Receivables from Obligors in such industry; and , that Agent shall not determine a Receivable to be ineligible pursuant to this clause (xiv) because it is generated by a particular type of business of any Originator if such Originator is engaged in such type of business on the date hereof.
provided
provided
further
          (xv) which is not subject to any right of rescission, set-off, counterclaim, any other defense (including defenses arising out of violations of usury laws) of the applicable Obligor against any Originator or any other Adverse Claim;
          (xvi) due from an Obligor that holds no right as against any Originator to cause such Originator to repurchase the goods or merchandise the sale of which shall have given rise to such Receivable (except with respect to sale discounts effected pursuant to the Contract, or defective goods returned in accordance with the terms of the Contract);
 
          (xvii) as to which the applicable Originator has satisfied and fully performed all obligations on its part with respect to such Receivable required to be fulfilled by it, and no further action is required to be performed by any Person with respect thereto other than payment thereon by the applicable Obligor;
          (xviii) all right, title and interest to and in which has been validly transferred by (A) the applicable Originator directly to Anixter under and in accordance with the applicable Transfer Agreement and subsequently to Seller under and in accordance with the Receivables Sale Agreement, and Seller has good and marketable title thereto free and clear of any Adverse Claim or (B) Anixter directly to Seller under and in accordance with the Receivables Sale Agreement, and Seller has good and marketable title thereto free and clear of any Adverse Claim;
          (xix) (A) for which Anixter has given reasonably equivalent value to the applicable Originator in consideration therefor pursuant to the applicable Transfer Agreement, which was not made for or on account of an antecedent debt and which is not voidable under any section of the Bankruptcy Code and for which Seller has subsequently given reasonably equivalent value to Anixter in consideration therefor pursuant to the Receivables Sale Agreement, which was not made for or on account of an antecedent debt and which is not voidable under any section of the Bankruptcy Code or (B) for which Seller has given reasonably equivalent value to Anixter in consideration therefor pursuant to the Receivables Sale Agreement, which was not made for or on account of an antecedent debt and which is not voidable under any section of the Bankruptcy Code;
          (xx) in which the Agent, for the benefit of the Purchasers, has a valid and perfected first priority undivided percentage ownership or security interest, free and clear of any Adverse Claim;
          (xxi) that does not represent "billed but not yet shipped" goods or merchandise, partially performed or unperformed services, consigned goods or "sale or return" goods and does not arise from a transaction for which any additional performance by any Originator, or acceptance by or other act of the Obligor thereunder, including any required submission of documentation, remains to be performed as a condition to any payments on such Receivable or the enforceability of such Receivable under applicable law; and
          (xxii) which is not associated with the delivery of goods with "free on board destination" terms ("") where goods have not yet been delivered to the related Obligor (any determination whether a Receivable would not constitute an Eligible Receivable hereunder because of this clause (xxii) shall be made based upon (1) the information available to the Servicer at such time and/or (2) the information with respect to accruals related to FOB Receivables most recently prepared by the Servicer in accordance with ).
FOB Receivables
Section 8.5
 
     "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
     "" means indebtedness and other obligations owed to Anixter, in respect of: (i) all accounts receivable generated by Anixter's Latin American export locations, (ii) all accounts receivable generated by Anixter's "Pacer", "IMS" and "Pentacon" divisions which are not included in Anixter's main subledger system, (iii) all accounts receivable generated by any of Anixter's divisions which are acquired after July 24, 2009 which are not included in Anixter's main subledger system, (iv) all accounts receivable owing by Obligors with the following customer prefixes: N-N, NN+, SIE or SG. (in each case, as such customer prefixes are in effect or otherwise categorized as of July 24, 2009), and thereafter, and (v) all accounts receivable existing at Anixter's general corporate division coded WC (as such division is in effect or otherwise structured as of July 24, 2009).
Excluded Receivable
     "" means Seller's Account No. 8188016122 at Bank of America.
Facility Account
     "" means the earliest of (i) the Liquidity Termination Date and (ii) the Amortization Date.
Facility Termination Date
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble in this Agreement.
Falcon
     "" means (a) for any Purchaser Interest owned by JPMCB on behalf of the Purchasers in the Falcon Purchase Group which: (i) has its Capital reduced without compliance by Seller with the notice requirements hereunder or (ii) does not become subject to an Aggregate Reduction following the delivery of any Reduction Notice or (iii) is assigned pursuant to the Falcon Liquidity Agreement or has a Tranche Period to which it is subject terminated prior to the date on which it was originally scheduled to end; an amount equal to the excess, if any, of (A) the Yield that would have accrued during the remainder of the Tranche Periods or the tranche periods for Commercial Paper determined by JPMCB to relate to such Purchaser Interest (as applicable) subsequent to the date of such reduction, assignment or termination (or in respect of clause (ii) above, the date such Aggregate Reduction was designated to occur pursuant to the Reduction Notice) of the Capital of such Purchaser Interest if such reduction, assignment or termination had not occurred or such Reduction Notice had not been delivered, over (B) the sum of (x) to the extent all or a portion of such Capital is allocated to another Purchaser Interest with respect to the same Purchaser, the amount of Yield actually accrued during the remainder of such period on such Capital for the new Purchaser Interest, and (y) to the extent such Capital is not allocated to another Purchaser Interest, the income, if any, actually received during the remainder of such period by the holder of such Purchaser Interest from investing the portion of such Capital not so allocated, and (b) any loss or expense incurred by any Purchaser (including any loss or expense incurred by reason of the liquidation or reemployment of funds acquired by such Purchaser in order to make any such requested Incremental Purchase) as a result of any Incremental Purchase not being made in accordance with a request therefor under (whether because of the failure of the conditions precedent with respect to such Incremental Purchase to be satisfied or for any other reason, other than default by the relevant Purchaser). All Falcon Broken Funding Costs shall be due and payable upon demand.
Falcon Broken Funding Costs
Section 1.2
 
     "" means for any Accrual Period for any Purchaser Interest owned by Falcon if and to the extent it funds the Purchase or maintenance of its Purchaser Interest by the issuance of commercial paper notes during such Settlement Period, the per annum rate that reflects, for each day during such Settlement Period, the sum of (i) discount accrued on Pooled Commercial Paper of Falcon on such day, plus (ii) any and all accrued commissions in respect of placement agents and commercial paper dealers, and issuing and paying agent fees incurred, in respect of Pooled Commercial Paper of such Conduit for such day, plus (iii) other costs associated with funding small or odd-lot amounts with respect to all receivable purchase facilities which are funded by Pooled Commercial Paper of Falcon for such day, minus (iv) any accrual of income net of expenses received on such day from investment of collections received under all receivable purchase facilities funded substantially with Pooled Commercial Paper of Falcon, minus (v) any payment received on such day net of expenses in respect of Broken Funding Costs related to the prepayment of any Purchaser Interest of Falcon pursuant to the terms of any receivable purchase facilities funded substantially with Pooled Commercial Paper; provided, however, that in addition to the foregoing costs, if the Seller shall request any additional Purchase by Falcon during any period of time determined by Falcon's Managing Agent in its sole discretion to result in an incrementally higher CP Rate applicable to such additional Purchase, the Capital associated with any such additional Purchase shall, during such period, be deemed to be funded by Falcon in a special pool (which may include capital associated with other receivable purchase facilities) for purposes of determining such higher CP Rate applicable only to such special pool and charged each day during such period against such Capital.
Falcon CP Rate
     "" means, with respect to any Tranche Period, the rate per annum equal to the sum of:
Falcon LIBO Rate
     (i) (a) the applicable British Bankers' Association Interest Settlement Rate for deposits in U.S. dollars appearing on Reuters Screen FRBD as of 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the first day of the relevant Tranche Period, and having a maturity equal to such Tranche Period, that, (1) if Reuters Screen FRBD is not available to the Agent for any reason, the applicable LIBO Rate for the relevant Tranche Period shall instead be the applicable British Bankers' Association Interest Settlement Rate for deposits in U.S. dollars as reported by any other generally recognized financial information service as of 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the first day of such Tranche Period, and having a maturity equal to such Tranche Period, and (2) if no such British Bankers' Association Interest Settlement Rate is available to the Agent, the applicable LIBO Rate for the relevant Tranche Period shall instead be the rate determined by the applicable Managing Agent to be the rate at which such Managing Agent offers to place deposits in U.S. dollars with first-class banks in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the first day of such Tranche Period, in the approximate amount to be funded at the LIBO Rate and having a maturity equal to such Tranche Period, (b) one minus the maximum aggregate reserve requirement (including all basic, supplemental, marginal or other reserves) which is imposed against the Agent (or, in the case of clause (ii), such Managing Agent) in respect of Eurocurrency liabilities, as defined in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System as in effect from time to time (expressed as a decimal), applicable to such Tranche Period;
provided
divided by
plus
 
     (ii) the Applicable Margin in effect from time to time.
     "" means an agreement entered into by Falcon with its Financial Institutions in connection herewith for the purpose of providing liquidity with respect to the Capital funded by Falcon under this Agreement.
Falcon Liquidity Agreement
     "" means Falcon, JPMCB and each of the Financial Institutions identified as a member of the Falcon Purchase Group on Schedule A hereto, together with their respective successors, assigns and participants.
Falcon Purchase Group
     "" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
     "" means that certain letter agreement dated as of May 31, 2011 hereof among Seller and each Managing Agent, as it may be amended or modified and in effect from time to time.
Fee Letter
     "" means, with respect to a Contract, any finance, interest, late payment charges or similar charges owing by an Obligor pursuant to such Contract.
Finance Charges
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble in this Agreement.
Financial Institutions
     "" means a 13-week (or, as the case may be, periodically a 14-week) accounting period of Anixter ending on or about March 31, June 30, September 30 or December 31 of any fiscal year.
Fiscal Quarter
     "" means this Agreement and any agreement or instrument executed by any Funding Source with or for the benefit of a Conduit, including any Liquidity Agreement.
Funding Agreement
     "" means (i) any Financial Institution or (ii) any insurance company, bank or other funding entity providing liquidity, credit enhancement or back-up purchase support or facilities to a Conduit.
Funding Source
     "" means generally accepted accounting principles in effect in the United States of America as of the date of this Agreement.
GAAP
     "" means, with respect to any Purchase Group and as of any date of determination, an amount equal to (expressed as a percentage) the Back-Up Commitment of such Purchase Group on such date divided by the Purchase Limit as of such date.
Group Pro Rata Share
     "" means, for each Purchase Group, the sum of the Back-up Commitments of the Financial Institutions in such Purchase Group, adjusted as necessary to give
Group Purchase Limit
 
effect to the termination of the Back-up Commitment of any Terminating Financial Institution in such Purchase Group.
     "" means a purchase of one or more Purchaser Interests which increases the total outstanding Aggregate Capital hereunder.
Incremental Purchase
     "" means, as to any Person at a particular time, all of the following (without duplication): (i) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money and all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, loan agreements or other similar instruments; (ii) any direct or contingent obligations of such Person arising under letters of credit (including standby and commercial), banker's acceptances, bank guaranties, surety bonds and similar instruments; (iii) net obligations under any hedging contract in an amount equal to (x) if such hedging contract has been closed out, the termination value thereof, or (y) if such hedging contract has not been closed out, the mark-to-market value thereof determined on the basis of readily available quotations provided by any recognized dealer in such hedging contract; (iv) whether or not so included as liabilities in accordance with GAAP, all obligations of such Person to pay the deferred purchase price of property or services, and indebtedness (excluding prepaid interest thereon) secured by a lien on property owned or being purchased by such Person (including indebtedness arising under conditional sales or other title retention agreements), whether or not such indebtedness shall have been assumed by such Person or is limited in recourse; (v) capital leases and synthetic lease obligations; (vi) the outstanding aggregate investment or principal amount of claims held by purchasers, assignees or transferees of (or of interests in) receivables of such Person in connection with any Receivables Securitization Transaction (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof); and (vii) all Accommodation Obligations (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof) of such Person in respect of any of the foregoing.
Indebtedness
     For all purposes hereof, the Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any partnership or joint venture in which such Person is a general partner or a joint venturer, unless such Indebtedness is expressly made non-recourse to such Person except for customary exceptions acceptable to the Required Financial Institutions. The amount of any capital lease or synthetic lease obligation as of any date shall be deemed to be the amount of Attributable Indebtedness (as defined in the Credit Agreement in effect as of the date hereof) in respect thereof as of such date.
     "" shall mean a member of the Board of Directors of Seller who (i) shall not have been at the time of such Person's appointment or at any time during the preceding five years, and shall not be as long as such Person is a director of Seller, (A) a director, officer, employee, partner, shareholder, member, manager or Affiliate of any of the following Persons (collectively, the ""): the Servicer, any Originator, or any of their respective Subsidiaries or Affiliates (other than Seller), (B) a supplier to any of the Independent Parties, (C) a Person controlling or under common control with any partner, shareholder, member, manager, Affiliate or supplier of any of the Independent Parties, or (D) a member of the immediate family of any director, officer, employee, partner, shareholder, member, manager, Affiliate or supplier of any of the Independent Parties; (ii) has prior experience as an independent director for a corporation or limited liability company whose charter documents required the unanimous
Independent Director
Independent Parties
 
consent of all independent directors thereof before such corporation or limited liability company could consent to the institution of bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings against it or could file a petition seeking relief under any applicable federal or state law relating to bankruptcy and (iii) has at least three years of employment experience with one or more entities that provide, in the ordinary course of their respective businesses, advisory, management or placement services to issuers of securitization or structured finance instruments, agreements or securities.
     "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its individual capacity and its successors.
JPMCB
     "" means, as of any date of determination, for Anixter and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis and in accordance with Section 7.18 of the Credit Agreement as in effect as of the date hereof, the ratio of (a) Consolidated Funded Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of the four Fiscal Quarters ending on or immediately prior to such date, that, for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated on a pro forma basis (in accordance with Article 11 of Regulation S-X of the Commission) to the extent necessary to give effect to (i) any acquisition made by Anixter or any Subsidiary during such period (without giving effect to any increase in Consolidated EBITDA reflecting projected synergies resulting from such acquisition) so long as, and to the extent that, (A) Anixter delivers to the Agent (which shall promptly deliver to each Financial Institution) a summary in reasonable detail of the underlying assumptions, and the calculations made, in computing Consolidated EBITDA on a pro forma basis and (B) the Required Financial Institutions do not object to such assumptions and/or calculations within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof; and (ii) any divestiture of a Subsidiary, division or other operating unit made during such period.
Leverage Ratio
provided
     "" means the Falcon LIBO Rate or the Three Pillars LIBO Rate, as the case may be.
LIBO Rate
     "" means the Falcon Liquidity Agreement and/or the Three Pillars Liquidity Agreement, as the case may be.
Liquidity Agreement
     "" means, for each Financial Institution, the commitment of such Financial Institution to purchase Purchaser Interests from the Conduit in its Purchase Group in an amount not to exceed (a) in the aggregate, the amount set forth opposite such Financial Institution's name under the Liquidity Commitment Column on Schedule A to this Agreement, as such amount may be modified in accordance with the terms hereof, and (b) with respect to any individual purchase from such Conduit, its Adjusted Pro Rata Share of the Purchase Price therefor.
Liquidity Commitment
     "" means May 31, 2013.
Liquidity Termination Date
     "" means each locked postal box with respect to which a bank who has executed a Collection Account Agreement has been granted exclusive access for the purpose of retrieving and processing payments made on the Receivables and which is listed on .
Lock-Box
Exhibit IV
 
     "" means, for any Collection Period, a fraction (calculated as a percentage) computed by dividing (i) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during Applicable Loss Horizon Period by (ii) the aggregate Net Receivables Balance as at the last day of the most recently ended Collection Period.
Loss Horizon Ratio
     "" means, on any date, an amount equal to (x) the greater of (i) 12% and (ii) the Loss Reserve Ratio then in effect times (y) the aggregate Net Receivables Balance as of the close of business on the immediately preceding Business Day.
Loss Reserve
     "" means, as of any date, an amount calculated as follows:
Loss Reserve Ratio
The Loss Reserve Ratio shall be calculated monthly in each Monthly Report and such Loss Reserve Ratio shall, absent manifest error, be effective from the corresponding Monthly Settlement Date until the next succeeding Monthly Settlement Date.
     "" means, for any Collection Period, a fraction (calculated as a percentage) equal to (i) the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables (without duplication) which, as of the last day of such Collection Period, remain unpaid for at least one hundred twenty (120) but less than one hundred fifty (150) days from the original invoice date the aggregate Outstanding Balance of all Receivables (without duplication) which, consistent with the Credit and Collection Policy, were or should have been written off the Seller's books as uncollectible and are less than one hundred twenty (120) days past invoice date during such period, (ii) the aggregate amount of Collections during such Collection Period.
Loss-to Liquidation Ratio
plus
divided
by
     "" means, as to any Conduit, the financial institution responsible for the administration of such Conduit's Commercial Paper program and related activities. As of the date hereof, JPMCB is the Managing Agent for Falcon and its Financial Institutions, and SunTrust is the Managing Agent for Three Pillars and its Financial Institutions.
Managing Agent
     "" means a material adverse effect on (i) the financial condition or operations of any Seller Party and its Subsidiaries, (ii) the ability of any Seller Party to perform its obligations under this Agreement, (iii) the legality, validity or enforceability of this Agreement or any other Transaction Document, (iv) any Purchaser's interest in the Receivables generally or in any significant portion of the Receivables, the Related Security or the Collections with respect thereto, or (v) the collectibility of the Receivables generally or of any material portion of the Receivables.
Material Adverse Effect
 
     "" means a report, in substantially the form of hereto (appropriately completed), furnished by the Servicer to the Managing Agents pursuant to .
Mid-Month Report
Exhibit XI
Section 8.5
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Mid-Month Report Date
Section 8.5
     "" means a report, in substantially the form of hereto (appropriately completed), furnished by the Servicer to the Managing Agents pursuant to .
Monthly Report
Exhibit X
Section 8.5
     "" means the 17th day of each month, or if such day is not a Business Day, the next succeeding Business Day.
Monthly Settlement Date
     "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., and any successor thereto.
Moody's
     "" means, at any time, the aggregate Outstanding Balance of Eligible Receivables at such time reduced by the aggregate amount by which the Outstanding Balance of Eligible Receivables from each Obligor and its Affiliates exceeds the Standard Concentration Limit or Special Concentration Limit for such Obligor, as the case may be.
Net Receivables Balance
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Non-Renewing Financial Institution
Section 12.3
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Obligations
Section 2.1
     "" means a Person obligated to make payments pursuant to a Contract.
Obligor
     "" means (i) Anixter, (ii) Accu-Tech or (iii) any other Person approved from time to time by the Managing Agents, in each case, in such Person's capacity as a "Seller" party to the Receivables Sale Agreement or a Transfer Agreement.
Originator
     "" means, with respect to any Receivable at any time, the then outstanding principal balance thereof.
Outstanding Balance
     "" means, for purposes of the definitions of "", "" and "", the Outstanding Balance of all Eligible Receivables (the Outstanding Balance of an Eligible Receivable subject to any right of rescission, set-off, counterclaim or other defense as described in clause (xv) of the definition of "Eligible Receivable" being the outstanding principal balance of such Receivable the amount of such right of rescission, set-off, counterclaim or other defense).
Outstanding Balance of Eligible Receivables
Net Receivables Balance
Special Concentration Limit
Standard Concentration Limit
less
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Participant
Section 12.2
     "" means an individual, partnership, corporation (including a business trust), limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity, or a government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.
Person
 
     "" means Commercial Paper notes of a Conduit subject to any particular pooling arrangement by such Conduit, but excluding Commercial Paper issued by such Conduit for a tenor and in an amount specifically requested by any Person in connection with any agreement effected by such Conduit.
Pooled Commercial Paper
     "" means an event which, with the passage of time or the giving of notice, or both, would constitute an Amortization Event.
Potential Amortization Event
     "" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Proposed Reduction Date
Section 1.3
     "" means, (1) for each Financial Institution, the Back-up Commitment of such Financial Institution divided by the Purchase Limit, adjusted as necessary to give effect to the application of any assignments pursuant to and (2) for each Conduit, the Group Pro Rata Share of its Purchase Group.
Pro Rata Share
Article XII
     "" means each Conduit, its Financial Institutions and their related Managing Agent.
Purchase Group
     "" means $275,000,000, as such amount may be increased or decreased in accordance with the provisions of .
Purchase Limit
Article XII
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Purchase Notice
Section 1.2
     "" means, with respect to any Incremental Purchase of a Purchaser Interest, the amount paid to Seller for such Purchaser Interest which shall not exceed the least of the amount requested by Seller in the applicable Purchase Notice, the Unused Purchase Limit on the applicable purchase date and the excess, if any, of the Net Receivables Balance (less the Aggregate Reserves) on the applicable purchase date over the aggregate outstanding amount of Aggregate Capital determined as of the date of the most recent Monthly Report.
Purchase Price
     "" means any Conduit or Financial Institution, as applicable and "Purchasers" means, collectively, all Conduits and Financial Institutions.
Purchaser
     "" means, at any time, an undivided percentage ownership interest (computed as set forth below) associated with a designated amount of Capital, selected pursuant to the terms and conditions hereof in (i) each Receivable arising prior to the time of the most recent computation or recomputation of such undivided interest, (ii) all Related Security with respect to each such Receivable, and (iii) all Collections with respect to, and other proceeds of, each such Receivable. Each such undivided percentage interest shall equal:
Purchaser Interest
 
Such undivided percentage ownership interest shall be initially computed on its date of purchase. Thereafter, until the Amortization Date, each Purchaser Interest shall be automatically recomputed (or deemed to be recomputed) on each day prior to the Amortization Date. The variable percentage represented by any Purchaser Interest as computed (or deemed recomputed) as of the close of the business day immediately preceding the Amortization Date shall remain constant at all times thereafter.
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Purchasing Financial Institution
Section 12.1(b)
     "" means, any of the following based upon the Debt Rating of Anixter then in effect:
Rating Level
     Rating Level I: Greater than or equal to BBB- by S&P and Baa3 by Moody's;
     Rating Level II: Less than BBB- by S&P or Baa3 by Moody's but greater than or equal to BB by S&P or Ba2 by Moody's;
     Rating Level III: Less than BB by S&P and Ba2 by Moody's but greater than or equal to B+ by S&P and B1 by Moody's; and
     Rating Level IV: Less than B+ by S&P or B1 or by Moody's or unrated by S&P or Moody's.
     "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Ratings Request
Section 10.2(c)
     "" means all indebtedness and other obligations owed to Seller or any Originator (at the time it arises, and before giving effect to any transfer or conveyance under the applicable Transfer Agreement, the Receivables Sale Agreement or hereunder) other than Excluded Receivables or in which Seller or such Originator has a security interest or other interest, including, without limitation, any indebtedness, obligation or interest constituting an account, chattel paper, instrument or general intangible, arising in connection with the sale of goods or the rendering of services by an Originator, and further includes, without limitation, the obligation to pay any Finance Charges with respect thereto. Indebtedness and other rights and obligations arising from any one transaction, including, without limitation, indebtedness and other rights and obligations represented by an individual invoice, shall constitute a Receivable
Receivable
 
separate from a Receivable consisting of the indebtedness and other rights and obligations arising from any other transaction; , that any indebtedness, rights or obligations referred to in the immediately preceding sentence shall be a Receivable regardless of whether the account debtor or Seller treats such indebtedness, rights or obligations as a separate payment obligation.
provided
further
     "" means that certain Second Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, dated as of May 31, 2011, between Anixter and Seller, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Receivables Sale Agreement
     "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Recharacterization
Section 13.15(c)
     "" means, with respect to any Receivable, all Contracts and other documents, books, records and other information (including, without limitation, computer programs, tapes, disks, punch cards, data processing software and related property and rights) relating to such Receivable, any Related Security therefor and the related Obligor.
Records
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Reduction Notice
Section 1.3
     "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Regulatory Change
Section 10.2(a)
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Reinvestment
Section 2.2
     "" means, with respect to any Receivable:
Related Security
          (A) all of Seller's interest in the inventory and goods (including returned or repossessed inventory or goods), if any, the sale of which by an Originator gave rise to such Receivable, and all insurance contracts with respect thereto,
          (B) all other security interests or liens and property subject thereto from time to time, if any, purporting to secure payment of such Receivable, whether pursuant to the Contract related to such Receivable or otherwise, together with all financing statements and security agreements describing any collateral securing such Receivable,
          (C) all guaranties, letters of credit, insurance and other agreements or arrangements of whatever character from time to time supporting or securing payment of such Receivable whether pursuant to the Contract related to such Receivable or otherwise,
          (D) all service contracts and other contracts and agreements associated with such Receivable,
          (E) all Records related to such Receivable,
 
          (F) all of Seller's right, title and interest in, to and under the applicable Transfer Agreement and the Receivables Sale Agreement in respect of such Receivable, and
          (G) all proceeds of any of the foregoing.
     "" means, for any period, the total rental expense for operating leases of the Consolidated Group on a consolidated basis, as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Rental Expense
     "" means a Monthly Report, a Mid-Month Report, a Weekly Report or a Daily Report, as applicable.
Report
     "" means, at any time, (a) if any Conduit holds any Purchaser Interests, the Managing Agent for each such Conduit and Financial Institutions with Back-Up Commitments equal to or greater than 50% of the Purchase Limit, and (b) if no Conduit holds any Purchaser Interests, Financial Institutions with Back-up Commitments equal to or greater than 50% of the Purchase Limit.
Required Financial Institutions
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Required Ratings
Section 12.1(b)
     "" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a Standard & Poor's Financial Services LLC business.
S&P
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
Seller
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
Seller Parties
     "" means at any time the Person (which may be the Agent) then authorized pursuant to to service, administer and collect Receivables.
Servicer
Article VIII
     "" means, on any date, an amount equal to (a) if Anixter or any Affiliate of Anixter is the Servicer on such date, the product of (x) 0.36% and (y) the Outstanding Balance of all Receivables generated during the most recently ended Collection Period immediately preceding such date, or (b) if a Person other than Anixter or any Affiliate of Anixter is the Servicer on such date, the product of (i) 0.33% and (ii) the Outstanding Balance of all Receivables as at the end of the most recently ended Collection Period immediately preceding such date, or such other amount as the Managing Agents shall determine in its reasonable judgment.
Servicer Reserve
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Servicing Fee
Section 8.6
     "" means (A) the Monthly Settlement Date, and (B) the last day of the relevant Tranche Period in respect of each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions.
Settlement Date
 
     "" means (A) in respect of each Purchaser Interest of the Conduits, the immediately preceding Accrual Period, and (B) in respect of each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions, the entire Tranche Period of such Purchaser Interest.
Settlement Period
     "" has the meaning set forth in Regulation S-X of the Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. Part 210, as in effect on the date hereof.
Significant Subsidiary
     "" means, at any time, with respect to any Special Obligor, a dollar amount equal to a percentage of the aggregate Outstanding Balance of Eligible Receivables or such other limit as the Agent, with the consent of Moody's and S&P, may designate for such Special Obligor; , that the Agent may, upon notice to Seller, cancel or reduce any Special Concentration Limit.
Special Concentration Limit
provided
     "" means any Obligor as may be designated by the Agent from time to time as a "Special Obligor."
Special Obligor
     "" has the meaning set forth in hereof.
Specified Rating
Section 10.2(c)
     "" means, at any time, with respect to any Obligor other than a Special Obligor, 3% of the aggregate Outstanding Balance of Eligible Receivables at such time.
Standard Concentration Limit
     "" means, as of any date, (i) if the Servicer's Debt Ratings are greater than or equal to BB- and Ba3 as of such date, 2.0 and (ii) at all other times, 2.25.
Stress Factor
     "" means, with respect to any Person, (i) any corporation more than 50% of the outstanding securities having ordinary voting power of which shall at the time be owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by such Person or by one or more of its Subsidiaries or by such Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries, or (ii) any partnership, association, limited liability company, joint venture or similar business organization more than 50% of the ownership interests having ordinary voting power of which shall at the time be so owned or controlled. Unless otherwise expressly provided, all references herein to a "Subsidiary" shall mean a Subsidiary of Anixter.
Subsidiary
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
SunTrust
     "" means SunTrust Bank in its individual capacity and its successors.
SunTrust Bank
     "" means, for any day the greater of (i) the average rate per annum as determined by SunTrust Bank at which overnight Federal funds are offered to SunTrust Bank for such day by major banks in the interbank market, and (ii) if SunTrust Bank is borrowing overnight funds from a Federal Reserve Bank that day, the average rate per annum at which such overnight borrowings are made on that day. Each determination of the SunTrust Federal Funds Rate by SunTrust Bank shall be conclusive and binding on the Seller except in the case of manifest error.
SunTrust Federal Funds Rate
 
     "" means, as of any date of determination, the rate of interest most recently announced by SunTrust Bank at its principal office in Atlanta, Georgia as its prime rate (it being understood that at any one time there shall exist only one such prime rate so announced, which rate is not necessarily intended to be the lowest rate of interest determined by SunTrust Bank in connection with extensions of credit).
SunTrust Prime Rate
     "" means (i) any Affected Financial Institution or Non-Renewing Financial Institution which has not assigned all of its rights and obligations hereunder pursuant to , and (ii) a Financial Institution (a) to which the related Conduit has assigned such Financial Institution's Pro Rata Share of the Purchaser Interests then held by such Conduit, or (b) which, pursuant to the applicable Liquidity Agreement, has had its Liquidity Commitment under the Liquidity Agreement and Back-up Commitment hereunder terminated by the Conduit, in either such case in connection with such Financial Institution's decision not to renew its Liquidity Commitment under such Liquidity Agreement or its Back-up Commitment hereunder or such Financial Institution's becoming an Affected Financial Institution.
Terminating Financial Institution
Article XII
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Terminating Tranche
Section 4.3(b)
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Termination Date
Section 2.2
     "" has the meaning set forth in .
Termination Percentage
Section 2.2
     "" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
Three Pillars
     "" if
Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs
     (a) any request for an Incremental Purchase is made and such Incremental Purchase does not occur; or
     (b) any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment that is funded through the issuance of commercial paper (a "") or any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment that is not funded through the issuance of commercial paper (an "") (i) in either such case, has its principal reduced without compliance by Seller with the notice requirements hereunder, (ii) [Reserved], (iii) in the case of a CP Rate Funding, is assigned under any Three Pillars Credit Agreement to the related Three Pillars Credit Bank for credit related reasons, due to a termination event or event of default or as required under the Three Pillars Credit Agreement or (iv) in the case of an Alternate Rate Funding, is terminated or reduced prior to the last day of the then current Settlement Period,
CP Rate Funding
Alternate Rate Funding
then, the amount of "Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs" related thereto shall be equal to the excess, if any, of (1) the CP Costs and fees that would have accrued during the remainder of the Settlement Period determined by SunTrust to relate to such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment subsequent to, as applicable, the proposed date related to such failure to complete such Incremental Funding or Reinvestment or the date of such reduction, assignment or termination, assuming that, as applicable, such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment had occurred, such reduction, assignment or termination had
 
not occurred or such notice had not been delivered, over (2) the income, if any, actually received during the remainder of such period by Three Pillars from investing the principal related to, as applicable, such Incremental Purchase that did not occur or such reduction, assignment or termination that did not occur. All Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs shall be due and payable hereunder upon demand.
     "" means any program-wide agreement entered into by any Three Pillars Credit Bank providing for the issuance of one or more letters of credit for the account of Three Pillars, the issuance of one or more surety bonds for which Three Pillars is obligated to reimburse the applicable Three Pillars Credit Bank for any drawings hereunder, the sale by Three Pillars to any Three Pillars Credit Bank of receivables or other financial assets owned or held by Three Pillars (or portions thereof) and/or the making of loans and/or other extensions of credit to Three Pillars in connection with its commercial paper program, together with any cash collateral agreement, letter of credit, surety bond or other agreement or instrument executed and delivered in connection therewith (but excluding the Three Pillars Liquidity Agreement, or similar agreement, or any voluntary advance agreement).
Three Pillars Credit Agreement
     "" means SunTrust Bank and any other or additional bank or other Person (other than the Seller or any other customer of Three Pillars or any liquidity provider as such) now or hereafter extending credit or a purchase commitment to or for the account of Three Pillars or issuing a letter of credit, surety bond or other instrument, in each case to support any obligations arising under or in connection with Three Pillar's commercial paper program.
Three Pillars Credit Bank
     "" means, for any day during any Accrual Period, the per annum rate equivalent to the sum of the weighted average of the per annum rates paid or payable by Three Pillars from time to time as interest on or otherwise in respect of the Commercial Paper issued by Three Pillars that are allocated, in whole or in part, by the Managing Agent for the Three Pillars Purchase Group (on behalf of Three Pillars) to fund or maintain the Purchaser Interests owned by Three Pillars, the commissions and charges charged by placement agents and commercial paper dealers with respect to such Commercial Paper.
Three Pillars CP Rate
     "" means, for any Tranche Period (i) the rate per annum, determined by SunTrust Bank, on the Rate Setting Day (as defined below) of such Tranche Period on the basis of the offered rates shown on Telerate Page 3750 or any successor page as the composite offered rate for London interbank deposits, as shown under the heading "USD" as of 11:00 a.m. (London time); provided that in the event no such rate is shown, the LIBOR Rate shall be the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest one thousandth of one percent), determined by SunTrust Bank, based on the offered rates at which Dollar deposits for are displayed on the Reuters Screen as of 11:00 a.m. (London time) on the Rate Setting Day (it being understood that if at least two such offered rates appear on such page, the rate will be the arithmetic mean of such displayed rates); provided further, that in the event fewer than two such rates are displayed, or if no such offered rate is relevant, the LIBO Rate shall be the rate per annum, determined by SunTrust Bank, equal to the average of the rates at which deposits in Dollars are offered by the Managing Agent for the Three Pillars Purchase Group at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on the Rate Setting Day to prime banks in the London
Three Pillars LIBO Rate
 
interbank market plus (ii) the Applicable Margin. The "Rate Setting Day" for any Tranche Period shall mean, two (2) Business Days prior to the commencement of such Tranche Period. In the event such day is not a Business Day, then the Rate Setting Day shall be the immediately preceding Business Day.
     "" means (i) the Liquidity Asset Purchase Agreement (regarding the Seller), dated as of October 3, 2002, among Three Pillars, as borrower, SunTrust Bank, as liquidity agent for the Liquidity Banks, SunTrust Capital Markets, Inc., as administrator for Three Pillars, and the Liquidity Banks, and (ii) any other agreement thereafter entered into by Three Pillars providing for the sale by Three Pillars of Purchaser Interests owned by it (or portions thereof), or the making of loans or other extensions of credit to Three Pillars secured by security interests in the Purchaser Interests owned by it (or portions thereof), to support all or part of Three Pillar's payment obligations under its Commercial Paper or to provide an alternate means of funding Three Pillars' investments in accounts receivable or other financial assets, in each case as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Three Pillars Liquidity Agreement
     "" means SunTrust Bank and the various financial institutions as are, or may become, parties to the Three Pillars Liquidity Agreement, as purchasers thereunder.
Three Pillars Liquidity Bank
     "" means Three Pillars, SunTrust, each Three Pillars Credit Bank and each of the Financial Institutions identified as a member of the Three Pillars Purchase Group on Schedule A hereto, together with each of their respective successors, assigns and participants.
Three Pillars Purchase Group
     "" means, with respect to any Purchaser Interest held by a Financial Institution, including any Purchaser Interest or undivided interest in a Purchaser Interest assigned to a Financial Institution pursuant to a Liquidity Agreement:
Tranche Period
     (a) if Yield for such Purchaser Interest is calculated on the basis of the LIBO Rate, a period of one, two or three months, or such other period as may be mutually agreeable to the applicable Managing Agent and Seller, commencing on a Business Day selected by Seller or such Managing Agent pursuant to this Agreement. Such Tranche Period shall end on the day in the applicable succeeding calendar month which corresponds numerically to the beginning day of such Tranche Period, provided, however, that if there is no such numerically corresponding day in such succeeding month, such Tranche Period shall end on the last Business Day of such succeeding month; or
     (b) if Yield for such Purchaser Interest is calculated on the basis of the Base Rate, a period selected by Seller and agreed to by the applicable Managing Agent, commencing and ending on a Business Day, provided no such period shall exceed one month.
If any Tranche Period would end on a day which is not a Business Day, such Tranche Period shall end on the next succeeding Business Day, provided, however, that in the case of Tranche Periods corresponding to the LIBO Rate, if such next succeeding Business Day falls in a new
 
month, such Tranche Period shall end on the immediately preceding Business Day. In the case of any Tranche Period for any Purchaser Interest which commences before the Amortization Date and would otherwise end on a date occurring after the Amortization Date, such Tranche Period shall end on the Amortization Date. The duration of each Tranche Period which commences after the Amortization Date shall be of such duration as selected by the applicable Managing Agent. In no event shall any Tranche Period extend beyond the Facility Termination Date.
     "" means, collectively, this Agreement, each Purchase Notice, each Transfer Agreement, the Receivables Sale Agreement, each Collection Account Agreement, the Fee Letter, the Subordinated Notes (as defined in the Receivables Sale Agreement) and all other instruments, documents and agreements executed and delivered in connection herewith.
Transaction Documents
     "" means (a) the Accu-Tech Transfer Agreement and (b) each other receivables transfer agreement entered into from time to time between an Originator (other than Anixter) approved by the Agent, and Anixter, in form and substance satisfactory to the Agent, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Transfer Agreement
     "" means the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the specified jurisdiction.
UCC
     "" means, with respect to any Financial Institution at any time, such Financial Institution's Back-up Commitment at such time such Financial Institution's Pro Rata Share of the Aggregate Capital outstanding at such time.
Unused Back-up Commitment
minus
     "" means, at any time, the Purchase Limit at such time the Aggregate Capital outstanding at such time.
Unused Purchase Limit
minus
     "" means, a period commencing on a Monday and ending on the immediately following Sunday.
Weekly Period
     "" means a report, in the form agreed to by the Servicer and the Managing Agents from time to time (appropriately completed), furnished by the Servicer to the Managing Agents pursuant to .
Weekly Report
Section 8.5
     "" means (a) for each respective Tranche Period relating to Purchaser Interests of the Financial Institutions, including any Purchaser Interests or undivided interest in a Purchaser Interest assigned to a Financial Institution pursuant to a Liquidity Agreement, an amount equal to the product of the applicable Discount Rate for each Purchaser Interest multiplied by the Capital of such Purchaser Interest for each day elapsed during such Tranche Period, annualized on a 360 day basis, and (b) for each respective Settlement Period relating to Purchaser Interests of the Conduits, other than a Purchaser Interest which, or an undivided interest in which, has been assigned by a Conduit to a Financial Institution pursuant to a Liquidity Agreement, an amount equal to the product of the applicable CP Rate multiplied by the Capital of such Purchaser Interest for each day elapsed during such Settlement Period, annualized on a 360 day basis.
Yield
 
     "" means, on any date, an amount equal to the product of (a) the Purchase Limit and (b) 1.875%.
Yield Reserve
     All accounting terms not specifically defined herein shall be construed in accordance with GAAP. All terms used in Article 9 of the UCC in the State of Illinois, and not specifically defined herein, are used herein as defined in such Article 9.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110706154939.txt.gz
TIME:20110706154939
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On July 1, 2011, Theodore ("Ted") A. Dosch became Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"). Mr. Dosch, age 51, has served as the Company's Senior Vice President - Global Finance since January 2009. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated February 18, 2011, and is incorporated herein by reference. In connection with his appointment as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, on July 1, 2011, Mr. Doschs base salary was increased to $420,000 and his target bonus was increased to $350,000. In addition, Mr. Dosch received, on July 1, 2011, a long-term stock incentive valued at $500,000. The long-term stock incentive value was delivered 50% in employee stock options and 50% in restricted stock units based on the Companys closing stock price on July 1, 2011.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110726121047.txt.gz
TIME:20110726121047
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
     On July 26, 2011, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended July 1, 2011. The Company's press release, dated July 26, 2011, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended July 1, 2011.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 26, 2011 
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Financial Results
Second Quarter Highlights
 
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "We were pleased that all of our business segments and end markets delivered strong year-on-year growth for the fifth consecutive quarter. In addition to the 18 percent year-on-year sales increase, we also achieved a 6 percent sequential increase in sales compared to the first quarter."
"Our strategic initiatives are clearly helping to fuel our sales growth in each of our end markets around the world. These efforts have once again delivered well-balanced sales performance across our geographic reporting segments with North America, Europe and Emerging Markets all delivering excellent year-on-year sales increases ranging between 16 and 33 percent," continued Eck. "Sales growth by end market was also robust, with both our Electrical Wire & Cable and OEM Supply end markets delivering a 25 percent improvement year-on-year. In addition, the Enterprise Cabling and Security end market grew by 12 percent, with approximately one-third of that growth coming from the Clark acquisition."
Second Quarter Operating Results
"The sales momentum that has been building throughout this recovery is reflected in our strong operating profit performance, which was driven by top-line growth coupled with excellent gross margin management," commented Eck. "Specifically, second quarter operating margin of 6.1 percent reached its highest level in three years, due to a favorable end market sales mix driving a 30 basis point improvement in gross margin combined with operating expense leverage delivering a 70 basis point improvement in operating expense as a percentage of sales. This performance resulted in an incremental operating profit leverage of 11 percent on the increased year-on-year sales."
 
"Second quarter operating expenses of $275.5 million were 17.1 percent of sales compared to 17.8 percent in the prior year quarter," continued Eck. "Excluding the impact of the Clark acquisition of $8.5 million and exchange rates of $9.0 million, year-on-year operating expenses increased by only $15.1 million or 6 percent, on a 10 percent organic increase in sales, demonstrating the leverage in our operating structure. Expense increases were primarily volume related."
operating margin improved to 6.1 percent from 5.1 percent in the year ago quarter. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 60 basis points. Both year-on-year and sequential improvements benefited from a higher-margin sales mix coupled with continued strong operating leverage from the company's cost structure.
Company-wide
operating margin improved from 6.4 percent in the year ago quarter to 7.4 percent in the current quarter. This 100 basis point improvement was driven by a higher gross margin sales mix and operating expense leverage on higher sales volumes. This resulted in a 14 percent incremental operating profit on the increased year-on-year sales. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 30 basis points driven by operating expense leverage on the higher sales.
North America
operating margin of 1.6 percent in the current quarter was a 190 basis point improvement over the prior year quarter. The strong year-on-year improvement was driven by a 100 basis point improvement in gross margin combined with a 90 basis point improvement in operating expense as a percent of sales. This resulted in a 13 percent incremental operating profit on the increased year-on-year sales. Excluding the restructuring charge of $5.3 million from the first quarter results, the operating profit margin declined by 20 basis points on a sequential basis.
Europe
operating margin of 4.6 percent in the current quarter declined by 110 basis points from the prior year quarter primarily driven by lower gross margin due to product and customer mix. In addition, operating expenses were impacted by investments made to pursue organic growth initiatives. Sequentially, operating margin was flat compared to the first quarter.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Due to the incremental working capital requirements to support 18 percent sales growth in the current quarter, net cash generated from operations was $18.3 million," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice President-Finance. "In the prior year quarter, cash flow generated from operations was $36.6 million, but that was in the context of a slower revenue growth period with lower working capital requirements. Going forward, we expect to continue generating positive cash flow but at a rate lower than last year as we continue to fund the working capital requirements of a growing business."
"During the most recent quarter we retired $16.3 million in accreted value of our 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes," said Dosch. "In addition, we refinanced our revolving credit agreement and renewed our accounts receivable securitization facility, both resulting in increased liquidity to support our continued strong growth. Our financial leverage of 46.1 percent at the end of the current quarter is comfortably in our longstanding target range of 45 to 50 percent. With the prior quarter repurchases of 3.25% convertible notes and the subsequent call of the remaining notes in early July, we have fully eliminated these notes from our debt structure. Our strong balance sheet along with expected positive cash flows allows us the flexibility to support
 
continued strong growth in the business while enabling us to pursue strategic acquisition opportunities when they arise."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the second quarter include:
Business Outlook
Eck commented, "Strong first half sales results position us very well to continue leveraging our global supply chain platform through the balance of the year. While growing markets will positively impact our business, volatile sovereign debt markets and unclear U.S. tax policies create uncertainty for future levels of corporate spending. Nevertheless, we believe that our strategic growth initiatives position us well to achieve strong year-on-year sales growth and operating leverage in the second half of the year."
"Overall, these strategic growth initiatives have driven improved market share while maintaining or improving gross margin. We expect our future growth to be fueled by adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate; developing an end market presence in either Electrical Wire & Cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited primarily to the Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions end market; and selectively expanding our geographic presence. We also remain optimistic about the broad growth opportunities in our security business especially as we continue the integration of the Clark Security Products acquisition into our growing Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions business," Eck concluded.
Second Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, July 26, 2011. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (. The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com)
 
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 231 warehouses with approximately 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 269 cities in 51 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend,"
"anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110812101727.txt.gz
TIME:20110812101727
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On August 8, 2011, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed. The Company currently has approximately 35 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated August 8, 2011, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated August 8, 2011, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed.
Glenview, IL., August 8, 2011 
Anixter currently has approximately 35 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 231 warehouses with approximately 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 269 cities in 51 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20110826100838.txt.gz
TIME:20110826100838
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On August 24, 2011, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that the previously announced share repurchase program on August 8, 2011 had been completed. The Company currently has approximately 34 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated August 24, 2011, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits 99.1 Press Release, dated August 24, 2011, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that the previously announced share repurchase program on August 8, 2011 had been completed.
Glenview, IL., August 24, 2011 
Anixter currently has approximately 34 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 231 warehouses with approximately 7.0 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in 269 cities in 51 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, including the severity of current economic and financial market conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20111025170234.txt.gz
TIME:20111025170234
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 25, 2011, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2011. The Company's press release, dated October 25, 2011, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011.
GLENVIEW, IL, October 25, 2011 
The previously announced strategic divestiture of the Anixter Aerospace Hardware Division closed on August 26, 2011. The sales price of $155.0 million resulted in net proceeds of $137.6 million after adjusting for amounts placed in escrow, working capital adjustments and legal and advisory fees. As a result of the sale, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations in the third quarter of $18.1 million, which included a net loss on the sale of $21.0 million primarily due to the write-off of goodwill of $19.0 million. The results for the Aerospace Hardware business have been reported as discontinued operations for both current and prior periods. The company will post the revised historical performance by quarter on the Investor Page of its website. All commentary in this release reflects continuing operations only unless otherwise noted.
 
 
 
Financial Results From Continuing Operations
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
 
Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
Exclusive of the above items, sales increased by 13 percent organically.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "We were pleased that all of our business segments and end markets delivered strong year-on-year growth resulting in our sixth consecutive quarter of growth. In addition to the 20 percent year-on-year sales increase, we also achieved a 3 percent sequential increase in sales compared to the second quarter."
"Our strategic initiatives continue to fuel our sales growth in each of our end markets around the world. These efforts have once again delivered well-balanced sales performance across our geographic reporting segments with North America, Europe and Emerging Markets all delivering
 
excellent year-on-year sales increases of approximately 20 percent," continued Eck. "Sales growth by end market was also robust, with both our Electrical Wire & Cable and OEM Supply end markets delivering approximately 25 percent improvement year-on-year. In addition, the Enterprise Cabling and Security end market grew by 16 percent during the quarter, with approximately one-fourth of that growth coming from the Clark acquisition."
Third Quarter Operating Results
"The sales momentum that we have continued to build on throughout the past several quarters is reflected in our strong operating profit performance," commented Eck. "Specifically, we are encouraged by the strong third quarter operating margin of 6.3 percent given the current uncertain economic environment. In addition, third quarter operating expenses of $260.3 million were 16.2 percent of sales compared to 17.7 percent in the prior year quarter. Excluding the impact of the Clark acquisition of $8.5 million and exchange rates of $8.5 million, year-on-year operating expenses increased by only $5.0 million or 2 percent, on a 13 percent organic increase in sales, demonstrating the leverage in our operating structure. Expense increases were primarily the result of higher volumes."
operating margin improved to 6.3 percent from 5.3 percent in the year ago quarter. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 40 basis points. This performance resulted in an incremental operating profit leverage of 12 percent on the increased year-on-year sales. The strong operating margin improvement was driven by better operating leverage on higher sales, more than offsetting a mix-driven lower gross margin.
Company-wide
operating margin improved from 6.6 percent in the year ago quarter to 7.5 percent in the current quarter. The 90 basis point improvement was driven primarily by strong operating expense leverage on higher sales volumes. This resulted in a 12 percent incremental operating profit on the increased year-on-year sales. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 30 basis points driven by operating expense leverage on the higher sales.
North America
operating margin of 2.0 percent in the current quarter reflected a 260 basis point improvement over the prior year quarter. The strong year-on-year improvement was driven by a 20 basis point improvement in gross margin combined with a 240 basis point improvement in operating expense as a percent of sales. This resulted in a 15 percent incremental operating profit on the increased year-on-year sales. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 40 basis points.
Europe
operating margin of 5.7 percent in the current quarter declined by 70 basis points from the prior year quarter primarily driven by lower gross margin due to product and customer mix. In addition, operating expenses were impacted by investments made to pursue organic growth initiatives. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 110 basis points.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Due to the incremental working capital requirements to support 20 percent sales growth in the current quarter, net cash generated from operations was $18.7 million," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice President-Finance. "In the prior year quarter, cash flow generated from operations was $54.2 million, but that was in the context of a slower revenue growth period with lower working capital requirements. We expect to continue generating positive cash flow but at a rate lower than last year as we continue to fund the working capital requirements of a growing business."
 
"During the most recent quarter the remaining $11.6 million in accreted value of the 3.25% zero coupon convertible notes were converted," said Dosch. "In addition, $108 million of the proceeds from the sale of our Aerospace Hardware business was used to complete both of our previously announced share repurchase plans totaling 2 million shares. After these transactions, our financial leverage of 45.7 percent at the end of the current quarter is comfortably in our longstanding target range of 45 to 50 percent. Our strong balance sheet, along with expected positive cash flows, allows us the flexibility to support continued strong growth in the business while enabling us to pursue strategic acquisition opportunities when they arise."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the third quarter include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "Continued strong sales should position us very well to further leverage our global supply chain platform through the balance of the year and as we look into 2012. While growing global markets will positively impact our business, market pressures on sovereign debt, government fiscal policies and unclear U.S. tax policies create uncertainty for future levels of corporate spending. Nevertheless, we believe that our strategic growth initiatives position us well to achieve continued strong year-on-year sales growth and operating leverage through the balance of the year. Overall, we believe that these strategic growth initiatives have driven improved market share. We expect our future growth to be fueled by adding new products to our portfolio where appropriate; developing an end market presence in either Electrical Wire & Cable or OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited primarily to the Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions end market; and selectively expanding our geographic presence."
Third Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, October 25, 2011. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at
www.anixter.com
 
, or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 400,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) 225 warehouses with approximately 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, potential impairment of goodwill and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20111213165345.txt.gz
TIME:20111213165345
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
John A. Dul, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, left Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") on Thursday, December 8, 2011 and is pursuing other opportunities. Until the Company completes a global search for a new General Counsel, the legal department staff will report to Ted A. Dosch, Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120131122907.txt.gz
TIME:20120131122907
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
On January 31, 2012, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 30, 2011. The Company's press release, dated January 31, 2012, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the fourth quarter ended December 30, 2011.
GLENVIEW, IL, January 31, 2012 
 
 
 
 
Financial Results From Continuing Operations
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Exclusive of the above items, sales increased by 5 percent organically.
 
 
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on fourth quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "We were pleased that all of our business segments continued to deliver year-on-year growth, resulting in our seventh consecutive quarter of revenue growth. As expected, our year-on-year growth rate slowed due to a much stronger prior year comparison. Slightly softer project billings and normal seasonality contributed to the sequential reduction in sales, which was also affected by weaker currency and copper effects."
"Our strategic initiatives continue to help drive our sales performance in each of our end markets around the world. As expected, these efforts have once again helped to bolster our sales performance in Emerging Markets, which delivered the highest sales growth rate among our segments," continued Eck. "Within our end markets, the OEM Supply business delivered the highest sales growth rate with 16 percent improvement year-on-year. Our two cabling businesses experienced a lower growth rate due to both a challenging comparison to the prior year period and a slowdown in billings due to project delays."
Fourth Quarter Operating Results
"Strong cost management and operating leverage are reflected in our solid operating profit performance," commented Eck. "Specifically, we are encouraged by the strong fourth quarter operating margin given the weak economic environment in many parts of the world, attesting to our diverse product and value added service offerings. In addition, fourth quarter operating expenses of $257.1 million were 17.2 percent of sales compared to 17.6 percent in the prior year quarter. Excluding the impact of the Clark acquisition of $8.3 million and exchange rates of $0.3 million,
 
year-on-year operating expenses increased by only $5.7 million or 2 percent, on a 5 percent organic increase in sales, further demonstrating the leverage in our operating structure. Expense increases were primarily the result of higher volumes."
operating margin improved to 6.1 percent from 5.7 percent in the year ago quarter. This performance resulted in an incremental operating profit leverage of 12 percent on the increased year-on-year sales for the quarter and 11 percent for the full year. The strong operating margin improvement was primarily driven by good expense management. Sequentially, operating margin decreased by 20 basis points due to the seasonality driven revenue reduction.
Company-wide
operating margin of 7.0 percent in the current quarter compares to 7.1 percent in the prior year quarter. The 10 basis point change was driven primarily by higher corporate operating expenses related to employee benefits and incentives. Sequentially, operating margin was 50 basis points lower in the current quarter primarily driven by normal seasonality resulting in lower fourth quarter sales volume. Full year incremental operating profit leverage equated to 12 percent.
North America
operating margin of 1.9 percent in the current quarter reflected a 180 basis point improvement over the prior year quarter. The strong year-on-year improvement was entirely driven by lower operating expense with a relatively flat gross margin comparison. This resulted in a 36 percent incremental operating profit leverage on the increased year-on-year sales for the quarter and 12 percent for the full year. Sequentially, operating margin was only 10 basis points lower on the seasonally lower fourth quarter sales.
Europe
operating margin of 7.5 percent in the current quarter improved by 110 basis points from the prior year quarter primarily driven by a 70 basis point improvement in gross margin along with operating expense leverage. The 16 percent incremental operating profit leverage represented the best performance for this segment for 2011. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 180 basis points.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Due to strong working capital management combined with a lower sales growth rate in the current quarter, net cash generated from operations was $112.9 million," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice President-Finance. "In the prior year quarter, cash flow generated from operations was $29.7 million, but that was in the context of a higher revenue growth period with higher working capital requirements. In addition, our healthy balance sheet, along with continued expected positive cash flows, provides us the flexibility to support continued growth in the business while enabling us to pursue strategic acquisitions as they arise."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the fourth quarter include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "Looking ahead to 2012, expected sales growth should position us very well to further leverage our global supply chain platform. While both the U.S. and global market growth rates are difficult to predict in the current economic climate, we believe that our strategic growth initiatives position us well to achieve continued strong year-on-year sales growth and operating leverage, driving further market share improvement. We expect our future growth to be fueled by adding new products and technologies to our portfolio; developing an end market presence in Electrical Wire & Cable and OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited primarily to the Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions end market; and selectively expanding our geographic presence."
Fourth Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, January 31, 2012. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 225 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services,
 
political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
In August 2011, the Company sold its Aerospace Hardware business ("Aerospace"). As a result of the divestiture, results of the business are reflected in "Discontinued Operations" and all prior periods have been revised to reflect this classification.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120224110435.txt.gz
TIME:20120224110435
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On February 23, 2012, the Board of Directors of Anixter International Inc. (the "Company"), upon the recommendation of the Nominating & Governance Committee, amended the Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company to provide for a majority vote standard in the election of directors. The amendments took effect upon adoption by the Board of Directors. The Board amended Section 1 of Article III of the Amended and Restated By-laws to provide that in all uncontested elections of directors of the Company (i.e., an election where the only nominees are those recommended by the Board), to be elected as a director, a nominee must receive a majority of the votes cast with respect to that nominees election by shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting of stockholders and entitled to vote on the election of directors. The amendment states that a "majority of the votes cast" means that the number of shares voted "for" a nominees election exceeds the number of votes cast "against" that nominees election. The amendment further provides that in all contested elections of directors of the Company, the vote of a plurality of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting of stockholders and entitled to vote on the election of directors will be required to elect directors. Sections 2 and 9 of Article II of the Amended and Restated By-laws were also amended for purposes of consistency. Prior to the amendments, nominees for director were elected in all circumstances by a plurality vote. In connection with the amendments to the Amended and Restated By-laws, the Board also amended, effective February 23, 2012, the Corporate Governance Guidelines of the Company to require an incumbent director who fails to receive a majority of votes cast with respect to his or her election in an uncontested election to tender his or her resignation. Such resignation will be considered by the Nominating & Governance Committee, which will make a recommendation to the Board whether to accept or reject the resignation. The Board will act on the recommendation no later than 90 days following the date of the stockholders meeting, and the Company will publicly disclose the Boards decision in a Form 8-K. The amended Corporate Governance Guidelines can be found on the Companys website at http://investors.anixter.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=87282&p=irol-govhighlights. A copy of the Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company, effective February 23, 2012, is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit No. Description 3.1 Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company, effective February 23, 2012.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 3.1
Section 1. The registered office shall be in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, State of Delaware.
Registered Office.
Section 2. The corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or the business of the corporation may require.
Other Offices.
Section 1. All meetings of the stockholders for the election of Directors shall be held in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, at such place as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, or at such other place either within or without the State of Delaware as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. Meetings of stockholders for any other purpose may be held at such time and place within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting or in a duly executed waiver of notice thereof.
Place of Meetings.
Section 2. Annual meetings of stockholders shall be held at such date and time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. At such meeting the stockholders shall elect a Board of Directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
Annual Meetings.
Section 3. Except as provided by law, written notice of the annual meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting.
Notice of Annual Meeting.
Section 4. The officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the corporation shall prepare and make, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of meeting, or if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.
List of Stockholders.
Section 5. Special meetings of the stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, unless otherwise prescribed by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation, may be called by the President and shall be called by the President or Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the Board of Directors, or at the request in writing of stockholders owning a majority in amount of the entire capital stock of the corporation issued and outstanding and entitled to vote. Such request shall state the purpose or purposes of the proposed meeting.
Special Meetings.
Section 6. Except as provided by law, written notice of a special meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting, to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting.
Notice of Special Meeting.
Section 7. Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice.
Business Transacted at Special Meeting.
Section 8. The holders of one-half of the stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation. If, however, such quorum shall not be present or represented at any meeting of the stockholders, the stockholders entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall have the power to adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present or represented. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally notified. If the adjournment is for more than thirty days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.
Quorum.
Section 9. When a quorum is present at any meeting, the vote of the majority of the shares present in person or represented by proxy and entitled to vote on the subject matter shall decide any question brought before such meeting, unless the question is one upon which by express provision of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation a different vote is required, in which case such express provision shall govern and control the decision of such question, or unless the question brought before the meeting is election of Directors, in which case Directors shall be elected in accordance with Section 1 of Article III of these By-laws.
Vote Requirements.
Section 10. Each stockholder shall at every meeting of the stockholders be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy for each share of the capital stock having voting power held by such stockholder, but no proxy shall be voted on after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.
Vote in Person or by Proxy.
Section 11. Stockholders may not take action by written consent in lieu of a meeting.
Action without Meeting.
Section 12. . Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as Directors. The nomination for election to the Board of Directors of the corporation at a meeting of stockholders may be made by the Board of Directors or by any stockholder (i) who is a stockholder of record on the date of the giving of notice provided for in this Section 12 and on the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 12. Nominations, other than those made by or on behalf of the Board of Directors, for the election of Directors at an annual meeting of stockholders shall be made by notice in writing delivered or mailed by first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary, and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of stockholders; , , that if the annual meeting is not held within thirty days before or after such anniversary date, then such nomination shall have been delivered to or mailed and received by the Secretary not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever occurs first. Nominations, other than those made by or on behalf of the Board of Directors, for the election of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders shall be made by notice in writing delivered to or mailed and received by the Secretary not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the special meeting was made, whichever occurs first. Such notice shall set forth (a) as to each proposed nominee (i) the name, age, business address and, if known, residence address of each such nominee, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of each such nominee, (iii) the class and number of shares of stock of the corporation which are beneficially owned by each such nominee, and (iv) any other information concerning the nominee that must be disclosed as to nominees in proxy solicitations pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including such person's written consent to be named as a nominee and to serve as a Director if elected; and (b) as to the stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder. The corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as a Director of the corporation.
Nomination of Directors
provided
however
The chairman of the meeting may, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
Section 13. . At an annual meeting of the stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) otherwise properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder (i) who is a stockholder of record on the date of the giving of notice provided for in this Section 13 and on the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at such annual meeting, and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 13. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, if such business relates to the election of Directors of the corporation, the procedures in Section 12 of this Article II must be complied with. If such business relates to any other matter, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be made in writing, delivered or mailed by first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary, and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of stockholders; , , that if the annual meeting is not held within thirty days before or after such anniversary date, then for the notice by the stockholder to be timely it must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which the notice of the annual meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever occurs first. To be in proper written form, a stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's books, of the stockholder proposing such business, (c) the class and number of shares of the corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder, (d) any material interest of the stockholder in such business and (e) a representation that such stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to bring such business before the meeting. Notwithstanding anything in these By-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 13, except that any stockholder proposal which complies with Rule 14a-8 of the proxy rules, or any successor provision, promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and is to be included in the corporation's proxy statement for an annual meeting of stockholders shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this Section 13.
Notice of Business at Annual Meetings
provided
however
The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 13, and if he or she should so determine, the chairman shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
Section 1. The number of Directors which shall constitute the whole Board shall be the number at any given time determined by the Board. In all uncontested elections of Directors of the corporation (i.e., an election where the only nominees are those recommended by the Board), to be elected as a Director, a nominee must receive a majority of the votes cast with respect to that nominee's election by shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting of stockholders and entitled to vote on the election of Directors. For purposes of the preceding sentence, a majority of the votes cast shall mean that the number of shares voted "for" a nominee's election exceeds the number of votes cast "against" that nominee's election. In all contested elections of Directors of the corporation, the vote of a plurality of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting of stockholders and entitled to vote on the election of Directors will be required to elect Directors. Each Director elected shall hold office until his successor is elected and qualified.
Number and Election.
Section 2. Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of Directors may be filled by a majority of the Directors then in office though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining Director, and the Directors so chosen shall hold office until the next annual election and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, unless sooner displaced. If there are no Directors in office, then an election of Directors may be held in the manner provided by statute. If, at the time of filling any vacancy or any newly created directorship, the Directors then in office shall constitute less than a majority of the whole Board (as constituted immediately prior to any such increase), the Court of Chancery may, upon application of any stockholder or stockholders holding at least ten percent of the total number of the shares at the time outstanding having the right to vote for such Directors, summarily order an election to be held to fill any such vacancies or newly created directorships, or to replace the Directors chosen by the Directors then in office.
Vacancies.
Section 3. The business of the corporation shall be managed by its Board of Directors which may exercise all such powers of the corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these By-laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.
Authority of Board of Directors.
Section 4. The Board of Directors of the corporation may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware. A meeting of the Board of Directors shall be held immediately following the annual meeting of stockholders.
Meetings of the Board of Directors.
Section 5. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times and places as are fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board. No notice need be given for regular meetings.
Regular Meetings.
Section 6. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the President on not less than two days' prior notice to each Director, either personally, by mail or by electronic transmission. Special meetings shall be called by the President or Secretary in like manner and on like notice on the written request of two Directors.
Special Meetings.
Section 7. At all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of Directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the act of a majority of the Directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the Directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Quorum.
Section 8. Unless otherwise restricted by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-laws, any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or of any Committee thereof may be taken without a meeting, if all members of the Board or Committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, and the writing or writings or electronic transmission or transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or Committee. Such filing shall be in paper form if the minutes are maintained in paper form and in electronic form if the minutes are maintained in electronic form.
Action without Meeting.
Section 9. The Board of Directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the whole Board of Directors, designate one or more Committees, each Committee to consist of two or more of the Directors of the corporation. The Board of Directors may designate one or more Directors as alternate members of any Committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the Committee. Any such Committee, to the extent provided in the resolution, shall have and may exercise the powers of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it; provided, however, that in the absence or disqualification of any member of such Committee or Committees, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not he or they constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member. Such Committee or Committees shall have such name or names as may be determined from time to time by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors.
Committees of Directors.
Section 10. Each Committee may hold meetings, regular and/or special, either within or without the State of Delaware. No notice need be given for regular meetings of a Committee. Any special meeting of a Committee shall be held on not less than two days' prior notice to each member of such Committee, either personally, by mail or by electronic transmission.
Meetings of Committees.
Section 11. Each Committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.
Minutes of Committee Meetings.
Section 12. The Directors may be paid such compensation as the Board of Directors shall deem advisable.
Compensation of Directors.
Section 13. . The Board of Directors at its first meeting after each annual meeting of stockholders, or at such other time as it may determine, shall choose a Chairman of the Board. The Chairman of the Board shall preside at meetings of the Board, shall be the Chairman of the Executive Committee, and shall have such other powers and duties as shall from time to time be assigned by the Board of Directors.
The Chairman of the Board
Section 1. Whenever, under the provisions of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation or of these By-laws, notice is required to be given to any Director or stockholder, it shall not be construed to mean personal notice, but such notice may be given in writing by mail, addressed to such Director or stockholder at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid, and such notice shall be deemed to be given at the time when the same shall be deposited in the United States mail. Notice to Directors may also be given personally and by electronic transmission.
Form of Notice.
Section 2. Whenever any notice is required to be given under the provisions of the statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation or of these By-laws, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, or a waiver thereof by electronic transmission by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent thereto.
Waiver of Notice.
Section 1. The officers of the corporation shall be chosen by the Board of Directors and shall be a President, a Chief Financial Officer, one or more Vice-Presidents, a Secretary, a Treasurer, a Controller, and a General CounselThe Board of Directors may designate certain Vice-Presidents as executive or senior Vice-Presidents and may affix such functional designations to Vice-Presidential titles as it shall deem appropriate. The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, Assistant Controllers, and Associate General Counsels. Any number of offices may be held by the same person unless the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-laws otherwise provide. The Board of Directors may authorize and approve the terms of employment contracts with officers covering the duties, term, compensation, and other terms of the employment of officers.
Officers.
.
Section 2. The Board of Directors may appoint such other officers and agents as it shall deem necessary who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Appointment of Other Officers.
Section 3. The compensation of all officers of the corporation shall be fixed by the Board of Directors.
Compensation of Officers.
Section 4. The officers of the corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify. Any officer elected or appointed by the Board of Directors may be removed at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Board of Directors. Any vacancy occurring in any office of the corporation shall be filled by the Board of Directors.
Terms of Office.
Section 5. The President shall be Chief Executive Officer of the corporation and shall have all powers ordinarily exercised by the President and Chief Executive Officer of a corporation and such other powers and duties as shall from time to time be assigned to him by the Board of Directors. The President may execute on behalf of the corporation stock certificates, bonds, contracts, deeds, mortgages, or other instruments authorized by the Board of Directors, except in cases where the signing or execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board or by these By-laws to some other officer or agent of the corporation or such documents or instruments shall be required by law to be signed or executed otherwise, and the President may affix the seal of the corporation to any instrument requiring the same. In the performance of all the duties hereunder, the President shall be subject to the supervision of, and shall report to, the Board of Directors.
The President.
Section 6. . The Chief Financial Officer shall have general supervision of the financial operations of the corporation. The Chief Financial Officer shall also perform such duties and have such other powers as may from time to time be prescribed by the Board of Directors or the President.
Chief Financial Officer
Section 7. The Vice-Presidents shall perform such duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors or the President may from time to time prescribe.
The Vice-Presidents.
Section 8. The Secretary shall attend all meetings of the Board of Directors and its Committees and all meetings of the stockholders and record all the proceedings of all such meetings in a book to be kept for that purpose. The Secretary shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors and its Committees, and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as may be prescribed by the Board of Directors or President, or other officer who either shall designate, under whose supervision he shall be. The Secretary shall have custody of the corporate seal of the corporation and the Secretary or Assistant Secretary shall have the authority to affix the same to any instrument requiring it and when so affixed, it may be attested by the Secretary's signature or by the signature of such Assistant Secretary. The Board of Directors may give general authority to any other officer to affix the seal of the corporation and to attest the affixing by the signature of such officer.
The Secretary.
Section 9. The Assistant Secretary, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Secretaries in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Secretary, or at the Secretary's request, or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, or if the office of Secretary is vacant, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President or the Secretary may from time to time prescribe.
The Assistant Secretary.
Section 10. The Treasurer shall have the custody of the corporate funds and securities and shall keep full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements in books belonging to the corporation and shall deposit all moneys and other valuable effects in the name and to the credit of the corporation in such depositories as may be designated by the Board of Directors. The Treasurer shall disburse the funds of the corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors, or as he may deem appropriate, taking proper vouchers for such disbursements, and shall render to the President and the Board of Directors, at its regular meetings, or when the Board of Directors so requires, an account of all transactions of the Treasurer.
The Treasurer.
Section 11. The Assistant Treasurer, or if there shall be more than one, the Assistant Treasurers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Treasurer, or at the Treasurer's request, or, in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Treasurer may from time to time prescribe.
The Assistant Treasurer.
Section 12. The Controller shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as are ordinarily performed or exercised by the Controller of a corporation and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President or the Chief Financial Officer may from time to time prescribe.
The Controller.
Section 13. The Assistant Controller, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Controllers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Controller or at the Controller's request, or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Controller and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Controller may from time to time prescribe.
The Assistant Controller.
Section 14. The General Counsel shall be the Chief Legal Officer of the corporation and shall act as legal advisor to the Board of Directors and officers. The General Counsel shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as are ordinarily performed or exercised by the General Counsel of a corporation and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors or the President, or other officer who either shall designate, may from time to time prescribe.
The General Counsel.
Section 15. The Associate General Counsel, or if there be more than one, the Associate General Counsels either in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election) or with such allocations of the duties and powers to, between or among them as may be fixed in a manner authorized by the Board of Directors, shall in the absence of the General Counsel, or at the General Counsel's request, or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, or if the office of General Counsel is vacant, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the General Counsel and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the President or the General Counsel may from time to time prescribe.
The Associate General Counsel.
Section 1. Shares of stock of the corporation may be represented by stock certificates or uncertificated, as provided by the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
Form.
Every holder of stock in the corporation shall be entitled to have a certificate, signed in the name of the corporation by the Chairman of the Board of Directors, or the President or a Vice-President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or Assistant Secretary of the corporation, certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation.
Section 2. Where a certificate is countersigned (i) by a transfer agent other than the corporation or its employee, or (ii) by a registrar other than the corporation or its employee, the signatures of the officers of the corporation may be facsimiles. In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of issue.
Signatures on Stock Certificates.
Section 3. The Board of Directors may direct a new certificate or certificates to be issued in place of any certificate or certificates theretofore issued by the corporation alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming the certificate of stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed. When authorizing such issue of a new certificate or certificates, the Board of Directors may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or certificates, or his legal representative, to give the corporation a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the corporation with respect to the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed.
Lost Certificates.
Section 4.
Transfers of Stock.
 
Except as otherwise established by rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Directors, and subject to applicable law, shares of stock may be transferred on the books of the corporation (a) in the case of shares of stock represented by a certificate, by the surrender to the corporation or the transfer agent of the corporation of a certificate representing such shares properly endorsed or accompanied by a written assignment or power of attorney properly executed, or (b) in the case of uncertificated shares, on proper instructions from the holder of record of such shares or the holder's legal representative, in either case with such proof of authority or the authenticity of signature as the corporation or its transfer agent may reasonably require.
Section 5. In order that the corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, or to express consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix, in advance, a record date, which shall not be more than sixty nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting, nor more than sixty days prior to any other action. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
Fixing Record Date.
Section 6. The corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Registered Stockholders.
Section 1. Dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, if any, may be declared by the Board of Directors at any regular or special meeting, pursuant to law. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property, or in shares of the capital stock, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
Dividends.
Section 2. All checks or demands for money and notes of the corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the Board of Directors may from time to time designate.
Checks.
Section 3. The fiscal year of the corporation shall be fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Fiscal Year.
Section 4. The corporate seal shall have inscribed thereon the name of the corporation, the year of its organization and the words "Corporate Seal, Delaware." The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced otherwise.
Seal.
Section 5. . For purposes of these By-laws, "electronic transmission" means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such recipient through an automated process.
Electronic Transmissions
Section 1. These By-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors at any regular meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal, or adoption of new by-laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting.
Amendment of By-laws.
Section 1. Subject to Section 3 of this Article IX, the corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (other than an action by or in the right of the corporation) by reason of the fact that she or he is or was a director or officer, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection with such action, suit or proceeding if she or he acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe her or his conduct was unlawful. The termination of any action, suit or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of or its equivalent, shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had reasonable cause to believe that her or his conduct was unlawful.
Power to Indemnify in Actions, Suits or Proceedings other Than Those by or in the Right of the Corporation.
nolo
contendere
Section 2. Subject to Section 3 of this Article IX, the corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action or suit by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that she or he is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection with the defense or settlement of such action or suit if she or he acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation; except that no indemnification shall be made in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which such person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation unless and only to the extent that the Court of Chancery or the court in which such action or suit was brought shall determine upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in view of all the circumstances of the case, such person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for such expenses which the Court of Chancery or such other court shall deem proper.
Power to Indemnify in Actions, Suits or Proceedings by or in the Right of the Corporation.
Section 3. Any indemnification under this Article IX (unless ordered by a court) shall be made by the corporation only as authorized in the specific case upon a determination that indemnification of the director or officer is proper in the circumstances because she or he has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section 1 or Section 2, of this Article IX, as the case may be. Such determination shall be made (i) by the Board of Directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who were not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, or (ii) by a committee of such directors designated by majority vote of such directors, even though less than a quorum, or (iii) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (iv) by the stockholders. To the extent, however, that a director or officer of the corporation has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of any action, suit or proceeding described above, or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, she or he shall be indemnified against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by her or him in connection therewith, without the necessity of authorization in the specific case.
Authorization of Indemnification.
Section 4. For purposes of any determination under Section 3 of this Article IX, a person shall be deemed to have acted in good faith and in a manner she or he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, or, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, to have had no reasonable cause to believe her or his conduct was unlawful, if her or his action is based on the records or books of account of the corporation or another enterprise, or on information supplied to her or him by the officers of the corporation or another enterprise in the course of their duties, or on the advice of legal counsel for the corporation or another enterprise or on information or records given or reports made to the corporation or another enterprise by an independent certified public accountant or by an appraiser or other expert selected with reasonable care by the corporation or another enterprise. The term "another enterprise" as used in this Section 4 shall mean any other corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise of which such person is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer. The provisions of this Section 4 shall not be deemed to be exclusive or to limit in any way the circumstances in which a person may be deemed to have met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section 1 or 2 of this Article IX, as the case may be.
Good Faith Defined.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any contrary determination in the specific case under Section 3 of this Article IX, and notwithstanding the absence of any determination thereunder, any director or officer may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction in the State of Delaware for indemnification to the extent otherwise permissible under Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX. The basis of such indemnification by a court shall be a determination by such court that indemnification of the director or officer is proper in the circumstances because she or he has met the applicable standards of conduct set forth in Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX, as the case may be. Notice of any application for indemnification pursuant to this Section 5 shall be given to the corporation promptly upon the filing of such application.
Indemnification by a Court.
Section 6. Expenses incurred in defending or investigating a threatened or pending action, suit or proceeding may be paid by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit or proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer to repay such amount if it shall ultimately be determined that she or he is not entitled to be indemnified by the corporation as authorized in this Article IX.
Expenses Payable in Advance.
Section 7. The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by or granted pursuant to this Article IX shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled under any by-law, agreement, contract, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or pursuant to the direction (howsoever embodied) of any court of competent jurisdiction or otherwise, both as to action in her or his official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office, it being the policy of the corporation that indemnification of the persons specified in Sections 1 and 2 of this Article IX shall be made to the fullest extent permitted by law. The provisions of this Article IX shall not be deemed to preclude the indemnification of any person who is not specified in Sections 1 or 2 of this Article IX but whom the corporation has the power or obligation to indemnify under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, or otherwise.
Non-exclusivity of Indemnification and Advancement of Expenses.
Section 8. The corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against her or him and incurred by her or him in any such capacity, or arising out of her or his status as such, whether or not the corporation would have the power or the obligation to indemnify her or him against such liability under the provisions of this Article IX.
Insurance.
Section 9. For purposes of this Article IX, references to "the corporation" shall include, in addition to the resulting corporation, any constituent corporation (including any constituent of a constituent) absorbed in a consolidation or merger which, if its separate existence had continued, would have had power and authority to indemnify its directors or officers so that any person who is or was a director or officer of such constituent corporation, or is or was serving at the request of such constituent corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, shall stand in the same position under the provisions of this Article IX with respect to the resulting or surviving corporation as she or he would have with respect to such constituent corporation if its separate existence had continued.
Meaning of "Corporation" for Purposes of Article IX.
Section 10. The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted pursuant to, this section shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director or officer and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such a person.
Survival of Indemnification and Advancement of Expenses.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120327163243.txt.gz
TIME:20120327163243
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Elections of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On December 13, 2011, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K, which disclosed that John A. Dul, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, left the Company on Thursday, December 8, 2011.
On March 26, 2012, Anixter Inc. entered into a Separation Agreement and General Release (the "Separation Agreement") with Mr. Dul.
The material terms of the Separation Agreement are as follows: (i) base salary continuation for 24 months from December 9, 2011; (ii) a 2011 bonus; (iii) continued coverage under the Company's health plans at active employee rates, for the lesser of 18 months following December 8, 2011 or until he obtains comparable coverage from a new employer; (iv) a tax gross-up on the imputed income resulting from such continued health coverage; and (v) outplacement services until the earlier of June 19, 2013 or the date he finds new employment. Mr. Dul's unvested restricted stock units due to vest on March 1, 2012 vested on such date, and stock options due to vest on March 1, 2012 vested on such date and may be exercised until December 7, 2012. For the period ending December 7, 2012, Mr. Dul has been retained by the Company as a general advisor and consultant on an independent contractor basis.
Until 24 months from the effective date of the agreement, Mr. Dul is prohibited from engaging in any employment or business activity with certain of the Company's competitors and suppliers.
The Separation Agreement also contains a release of claims provision. Mr. Dul has until March 29, 2012 in which to revoke his acceptance of the Separation Agreement. If he does not revoke his acceptance, the Separation Agreement shall become effective on March 30, 2012.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120424162559.txt.gz
TIME:20120424162559
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 24, 2012, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended March 30, 2012. The Company's press release, dated April 24, 2012, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the first quarter ended March 30, 2012.
GLENVIEW, IL, April 24, 2012 
 
 
 
Financial Results From Continuing Operations (excluding the Aerospace Hardware results)
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Exclusive of the above items, sales increased by 5 percent organically.
 
 
 
 
 
 
First Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on first quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "After the expected slow start in both cabling businesses in the first two months of the quarter, sales and bookings improved nicely in the month of March, resulting in our ninth consecutive quarter of growth across the business. While our year-on-year growth rate slowed slightly for the full quarter due to a strong comparative period in the first quarter of 2011, combined with weaker project billings and unfavorable currency and copper effects, our momentum exiting the quarter was very solid."
"Our strategic growth initiatives combined with strong day-to-day execution continue to drive our success in each of our end markets around the world. As expected, these efforts have once again helped bolster our sales performance in Emerging Markets, which delivered the highest year-on-year organic sales growth rate among our geographic reporting segments at 7 percent," continued Eck. "Within our end markets, the OEM Supply business delivered the highest sales growth rate with 12 percent improvement year-on-year. Despite a slowdown in billings due to project delays in both cabling businesses, Electrical Wire & Cable and Enterprise Cabling delivered 6 percent and 3 percent organic sales growth, respectively."
First Quarter Operating Results
 
"Despite a smaller revenue increase than prior quarters, our continued focus on cost management helped deliver strong operating leverage," commented Eck. "We delivered another quarter of positive sales growth in every region including Europe, which is worth noting given the very weak economic environment in that region. In addition, first quarter operating expenses of $262.5 million were 17.2 percent of sales compared to 17.8 percent in the prior year quarter. Excluding the impact of the restructuring charge in the prior year quarter and the negative $2.3 million impact of exchange rates, year-on-year operating expenses increased by only $8.9 million or 3.5 percent, on a 5.4 percent organic increase in sales, further demonstrating the leverage in our operating structure even in a lower growth quarter. Expense increases were primarily driven by higher benefit costs."
operating margin improved to 5.7 percent from 5.3 percent in the year ago quarter, or 5.6 percent excluding the prior year European restructuring charge of $5.3 million. This performance resulted in an incremental operating profit leverage of 7 percent on the increased year-on-year sales for the quarter, excluding the prior year restructuring charge. Sequentially, operating margin decreased by 40 basis points primarily due to the seasonality of the Emerging Markets segment.
Company-wide
operating margin of 7.1 percent in the current quarter compares to 6.8 percent in the prior year quarter. The 30 basis point improvement was driven primarily by operating expense leverage resulting in 13 percent incremental operating profit leverage. Sequentially, operating margin was 10 basis points higher in the current quarter.
North America
operating margin of 1.3 percent in the current quarter reflected a 130 basis point improvement over the prior year quarter. However, this was down 50 basis points excluding the prior year first quarter restructuring charge. The impact of the weak economy on our cabling businesses could not be offset by strong growth in the OEM Supply end market. Sequentially, operating margin was 60 basis points lower on relatively flat sales.
Europe
operating margin of 4.5 percent in the current quarter compares to 4.6 percent in the prior year quarter. Sequentially, operating margin declined by 300 basis points driven by the normal seasonal decline in revenue combined with strategic investments in the segment.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Due to a change in working capital requirements compared to the prior year and normal seasonality of our business, along with delays in project shipments, we once again consumed cash in the first quarter," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice President-Finance. "Going forward, our continued strong balance sheet and expected positive cash flows for the full year 2012, provides us the flexibility to support continued growth in the business while enabling us to pursue strategic acquisitions as they arise."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the first quarter include:
 
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "Our outlook for 2012 remains positive, as expected sales growth should position us well to further leverage our global supply chain platform. While both the U.S. and global market growth rates are difficult to predict in the current economic climate, we believe that our strategic growth initiatives position us well to achieve continued year-on-year sales growth and operating leverage, while also expanding our leadership position within the industry. We expect our future growth to be fueled by adding new products and technologies to our portfolio; developing an end market presence in Electrical Wire & Cable and OEM Supply in countries where our current presence is large but limited primarily to the Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions end market; and selectively expanding our geographic presence."
First Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, April 24, 2012. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 225 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier
 
sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange, copper pricing and acquisitions, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
In August 2011, the Company sold its Aerospace Hardware business ("Aerospace"). As a result of the divestiture, results of the business are reflected in "Discontinued Operations" and all prior periods have been revised to reflect this classification.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120430162854.txt.gz
TIME:20120430162854
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 25, 2012, Anixter International Inc. and Anixter Inc. entered into an Underwriting Agreement with Wells Fargo Securities, LLC as representative of the underwriters named therein (the "Underwriting Agreement"), with respect to the offering and sale of $350,000,000 of 5.625% Senior Notes due 2019 (the "Notes"). The sale closed on April 30, 2012. The purchase price paid by the underwriters was 98.25% of the aggregate principal amount. The Notes were issued under an Indenture by and among Anixter Inc., Anixter International Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, dated as of April 30, 2012 (the "Indenture"), as supplemented by a First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 30, 2012 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"). The Notes were issued by Anixter Inc. and guaranteed by Anixter International Inc. The Notes were sold pursuant to an effective registration statement on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-180905 and 333-180905-01).
A copy of the Underwriting Agreement, the Indenture, the First Supplemental Indenture (including the form of Note) and an opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP with respect to the Notes are filed as Exhibit 1.1, 4.1, 4.2 and 5.1, respectively, to this Report on Form 8-K, and are hereby incorporated by reference herein.
 
See Item 1.01.
 
 
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrants have duly caused this report to be signed on their behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
EXECUTION VERSION
April 25, 2012
Wells Fargo Securities, LLC
        As Representative of the several Underwriters
c/o Wells Fargo Securities, LLC
301 South College Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28288-0613
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell to the several underwriters named in (the "Underwriters") $350,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of its 5.625% Senior Notes due 2019 (the "Notes"). Wells Fargo Securities, LLC has agreed to act as representative of the several Underwriters (in such capacity, the "Representative") in connection with the offering and sale of the Notes. The Notes will be guaranteed (the "Guarantee") by Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation and parent of the Company (the "Guarantor"). The Notes and the Guarantee are collectively referred to as the "Securities".
Introductory.
Schedule A
The Securities will be issued pursuant to the terms, and subject to the conditions, set forth in the indenture dated as of April 30, 2012 (the "Base Indenture"), by and among the Company, the Guarantor and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented by the supplemental indenture, dated as of April 30, 2012 (the "First Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the Base Indenture, the "Indenture"), by and among the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee, on the Closing Date (as defined herein).
The Company hereby confirms its engagement of UBS Securities LLC, and UBS Securities LLC hereby confirms its agreement with the Company to render services, without compensation, as a "qualified independent underwriter" within the meaning of Rule 5121(f)(12) of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("FINRA") with respect to the offering and sale of the Notes. UBS Securities LLC, solely in its capacity as qualified independent underwriter and not otherwise, is referred to herein as the "QIU."
The Company and the Guarantor hereby confirm their agreements with the Underwriters as follows:
Section 1. Representations and Warranties of the Company.
The Company and the Guarantor each hereby jointly and severally represent and warrant to, and covenant with, each Underwriter as follows:
(a) The Company and the Guarantor have prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-180905 and 333-180905-01), which contains a base prospectus (the "Base Prospectus") to be used in connection with the public offering and sale of the Securities. Such registration statement, as amended, including the financial statements, exhibits and schedules thereto at the time of effectiveness under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (collectively, the "Securities Act"), including any required information deemed to be a part thereof at the time of effectiveness pursuant to Rules 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act"), is called the "Registration Statement". Any registration statement filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Securities Act is called the "Rule 462(b) Registration Statement", and from and after the date and time of filing of the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement the term "Registration Statement" shall include the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement. Any preliminary prospectus supplement to the Base Prospectus that describes the Securities and the offering hereby and is used prior to the filing of the Prospectus is called, together with the Base Prospectus, a "preliminary prospectus". The term "Prospectus" shall mean the final prospectus supplement relating to the Securities, together with the Base Prospectus, that is first filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act after the date and time that this Agreement is executed and delivered by the parties hereto (the "Execution Time") or, if no filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act is required, shall mean the form of final prospectus relating to the Securities included in the Registration Statement at the effective date. Any reference herein to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3. All references in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendments or supplements to any of the foregoing, shall include any copy thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System ("EDGAR").
(b) The Company and the Guarantor meet the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the Securities Act. The Registration Statement has become effective under the Securities Act. The Company and the Guarantor have complied to the Commission's satisfaction with all requests of the Commission for additional or supplemental information. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, the Commission has not issued any order or notice preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus and no proceedings for such purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act have been instituted or are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, are contemplated or threatened by the Commission.
Compliance with Registration and Exchange Act Requirements.
Each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus when filed complied and will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act. Each of the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto, at the time it became effective, at the date hereof and at the Closing Date, complied and will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading. The Prospectus (including any Prospectus wrapper), as amended or supplemented, as of its date, at the date hereof, at the time of any filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act and at the Closing Date did
 
not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representations and warranties set forth in the two immediately preceding sentences do not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto, or the Prospectus, or any amendments or supplements thereto, based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representative expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof. There is no contract or other document required to be described in the Prospectus or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement that has not been described or filed as required.
(c) The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package (as defined herein) and the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable.
(d) The term "Disclosure Package" shall mean (i) the Base Prospectus, including any preliminary prospectus supplement, if any, as amended or supplemented, (ii) the Final Term Sheet (as defined herein), (iii) any other issuer free writing prospectuses as defined in Rule 433 under the Securities Act (each, an "Issuer Free Writing Prospectus"), if any, identified on Schedule C hereto and (iv) any other free writing prospectus that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to treat as part of the Disclosure Package. As of 3:45 p.m., New York time, on the date of this Agreement (the "Applicable Time"), the Disclosure Package did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The preceding sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from the Disclosure Package based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representative expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof.
Disclosure Package.
(e) . (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Securities Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus) and (iii) at any other time specified in the Securities Act for determining whether each of the Company and the Guarantor is a "well known seasoned issuer" in connection with the offering of the Securities, each of the Company and the Guarantor was and is a "well known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. The Registration Statement is an "automatic shelf registration statement," as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act, that automatically became effective not more than three years prior to the Execution Time. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor has received from the Commission any notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) of the Securities Act objecting to use of the automatic shelf registration statement form and neither the Company nor the Guarantor has otherwise ceased to be eligible to use the automatic shelf registration form.
Each of Company and Guarantor is a Well-Known Seasoned Issuer
 
(f) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement and (ii) as of the date of the Applicable Time (with such date being used as the determination date for purposes of this clause (ii)), neither the Company nor the Guarantor was and is an Ineligible Issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act), without taking account of any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 under the Securities Act that it is not necessary that the Company or the Guarantor be considered an Ineligible Issuer.
Neither Company nor Guarantor Ineligible Issuer.
(g) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the offering of Securities under this Agreement or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies the Representative as described in the next sentence, did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus including any prospectus or prospectus supplement that is or becomes part of the Registration Statement. If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, the Company has promptly notified or will promptly notify the Representative and has promptly amended or supplemented or will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict. Any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus not identified on Schedule C, when taken together with the Disclosure Package, did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The foregoing three sentences do not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representative expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof.
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses.
(h) Neither the Company nor the Guarantor has distributed or will distribute, prior to the later of the Closing Date and the completion of the Underwriters' distribution of the Securities, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Securities other than a preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus (as defined herein), the Final Term Sheet or the Registration Statement.
Distribution of Offering Material by the Company or the Guarantor.
(i) . There are no persons with registration or other similar rights to have any equity or debt securities registered for sale under the Registration Statement or included in the offering contemplated by this Agreement, except for such rights as have been duly waived.
No Applicable Registration or Other Similar Rights
(j) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any amendment or supplement thereto), subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, (i) there has been no material adverse change, or any development that could reasonably be expected to result in a material adverse change, in the
No Material Adverse Change
 
condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business, properties or operations whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries, considered as one entity (any such change is called a "Material Adverse Change"); (ii) the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries, considered as one entity, have not incurred any material liability or obligation, indirect, direct or contingent, nor entered into any material transaction or agreement; and (iii) there has been no dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made by the Guarantor or, except for dividends paid to the Company, the Guarantor or other subsidiaries, any of its subsidiaries on any class of capital stock or repurchase or redemption by the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries of any class of capital stock.
(k) . Each of the Company, the Guarantor and each "significant subsidiary" of the Guarantor (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X under the Securities Act) (each, including the Company, a "Subsidiary" and, collectively, the "Subsidiaries") has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and has corporate power and authority to own or lease, as the case may be, and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and, in the case of the Company and the Guarantor, to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities. Each of the Company, the Guarantor and each Subsidiary is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except for such jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, result in a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or on the earnings, business, properties or operations, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, of the Company, the Guarantor and its subsidiaries, considered as one entity (a "Material Adverse Effect"). All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each Subsidiary have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Guarantor, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance or claim. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Guarantor, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance or claim.
Incorporation and Good Standing of the Company, the Guarantor and certain Subsidiaries
(l) . The authorized, issued and outstanding capital stock of the Guarantor is as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (other than for subsequent issuances, if any, pursuant to employee benefit plans described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants or convertible notes described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, as the case may be). All of the issued and outstanding shares of common stock of the Guarantor have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and have been issued in compliance with federal and state securities laws. None of the outstanding shares of common stock of the Guarantor were issued in violation of any preemptive rights, rights of first refusal or other similar rights to subscribe
Capitalization and Other Capital Stock Matters
 
for or purchase securities of the Guarantor. There are no authorized or outstanding options, warrants, preemptive rights, rights of first refusal or other rights to purchase, or equity or debt securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, any capital stock of the Guarantor, the Company or any of its subsidiaries other than those accurately described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. The description of the Company's and the Guarantor's stock option, stock bonus and other stock plans or arrangements, and the options or other rights granted thereunder, set forth or incorporated by reference in each of the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus accurately and fairly presents the information required to be shown with respect to such plans, arrangements, options and rights.
(m) . The Notes to be purchased by the Underwriters from the Company are in the form contemplated by the Indenture, have been duly authorized for issuance and sale pursuant to this Agreement and the Indenture and, at the Closing Date, will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor, will constitute valid and binding agreements of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors or by general equitable principles and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture. The Guarantee of the Notes is in the form contemplated by the Indenture, has been duly authorized for issuance and sale pursuant to this Agreement and the Indenture and, at the Closing Date, will have been duly executed by the Guarantor and, when the Notes have been authenticated in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor, will constitute a valid and binding agreement of the Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors or by general equitable principles and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture.
The Notes and Guarantee
(n) . The Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended. The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and the Guarantor and, at the Closing Date, will have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor and will constitute a valid and binding agreement of the Company and the Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors or by general equitable principles.
The Indenture
(o) . The Securities and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Conformance of Description of Notes
(p) . None of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including, without limitation, the use of the proceeds from the sale of the Securities) will violate or result in a violation of Section 7 of the Exchange Act, or any regulation promulgated thereunder, including, without limitation, Regulations T, U, and X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Certain Regulations
 
(q) . Neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any Subsidiary is (i) in violation or in default (or, with the giving of notice or lapse of time, would be in default) under ("Default") its charter or by-laws, (ii) in Default under any indenture, mortgage, loan or credit agreement, deed of trust, note, contract, franchise, lease or other agreement, obligation, condition, covenant or instrument to which the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary is subject (each, an "Existing Instrument"), or (iii) in violation of any statute, law, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company, the Guarantor or such Subsidiary or any of its properties, as applicable, except with respect to clauses (ii) and (iii) only, for such Defaults or violations as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company's and the Guarantor's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities and consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby (including, without limitation, the issuance of the Securities), by the Disclosure Package and by the Prospectus (i) have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not result in any Default under the charter or by-laws of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary, (ii) will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or Default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries pursuant to, or require the consent of any other party to, any Existing Instrument, and (iii) will not result in any violation of any statute, law, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree applicable to the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries or any of its or their properties.
Non-Contravention of Existing Instruments
(r) . No consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court or other governmental or regulatory authority or agency is required for the Company's or the Guarantor's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities and consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, by the Disclosure Package and by the Prospectus, except such as have been obtained or made by the Company and are in full force and effect under the Securities Act, or as may be required under applicable state securities or blue sky laws and from the FINRA.
No Further Authorizations or Approvals Required
(s) . There are no legal or governmental actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the best of the Company's or the Guarantor's knowledge, threatened (i) against or affecting the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries or (ii) which has as the subject thereof any officer or director of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries in his or her role as an officer or director thereof, or property owned or leased by the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiaries, and, in each case, would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or adversely affect the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
No Material Actions or Proceedings
 
(t) . The Guarantor is subject to and in compliance in all material respects with the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
Exchange Act Compliance
(u) . Ernst & Young LLP, who have expressed their opinion with respect to the financial statements (which term as used in this Agreement includes the related notes thereto) and supporting schedules filed with the Commission as a part of the Registration Statement and included in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, is an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company and the Guarantor as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and the applicable published rules and regulations thereunder and the rules and regulations of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
Independent Accountants
(v) . The financial statements filed with the Commission as a part of or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and included or incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, together with the related schedules and notes, present fairly the consolidated financial position of the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries as of and at the dates indicated and the results of their operations and cash flows for the periods specified. The supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein. Such financial statements and supporting schedules comply as to form with the applicable accounting requirements of Regulation S-X and have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles as applied in the United States applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved, except as may be expressly stated in the related notes thereto. No other financial statements or supporting schedules are required to be included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement. The financial data set forth in the preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus under the captions "Summary Consolidated Financial Data of Anixter International" and "Capitalization" fairly present the information set forth therein on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements contained in the Registration Statement. The Guarantor's ratios of earnings to fixed charges set forth in each of the preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Ratios of Earnings to Fixed Charges" and in Exhibit 12 to the Registration Statement have been calculated in compliance in all material respects with the requirements of Item 503(d) of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act. The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus fairly present the information called for in all material respects and have been prepared in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto.
Preparation of Financial Statements
(w) . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor.
The Underwriting Agreement
 
(x) . The Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries own, possess, license or have other rights to use, on reasonable terms, all patents, patent applications, trade and service marks, trade and service mark registrations, trade names, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets, technology, know-how and other intellectual property (collectively, the "Intellectual Property") necessary for the conduct of their respective businesses as now conducted or as proposed in each of the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus to be conducted. Except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any Intellectual Property or of any facts or circumstances which would render any Intellectual Property invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Intellectual Property Rights
(y) . The Company, the Guarantor and each Subsidiary possess such valid and current licenses, certificates, authorizations or permits issued by the appropriate state, federal or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct their respective businesses, and neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any Subsidiary has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of, or non-compliance with, any such license, certificate, authorization or permit which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, could have a Material Adverse Effect.
All Necessary Permits, etc
(z) . The Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all the properties and assets reflected as owned in the financial statements referred to in Section 1(v) above (or elsewhere in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus), in each case free and clear of any security interests, mortgages, liens, encumbrances, equities, claims and other defects, except (i) as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or (ii) those which do not, singly or in the aggregate, materially and adversely affect the value of such property and do not materially interfere with the use made or proposed to be made of such property by the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries. The real property, improvements, equipment and personal property held under lease by the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary are held under valid and enforceable leases, with such exceptions as are not material and do not materially interfere with the use made or proposed to be made of such real property, improvements, equipment or personal property by the Company, the Guarantor or such Subsidiary.
Title to Properties
(aa) . The Company, the Guarantor and their consolidated subsidiaries have filed all necessary federal, state, local and foreign income and franchise tax returns in a timely manner and have paid all taxes required to be paid by any of them and, if due and payable, any related or similar assessment, fine or penalty levied against any of them, except for any taxes, assessments, fines or penalties as may be being contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings. The Company and the Guarantor have made appropriate provisions in the applicable financial statements referred to in Section 1 (v) above in respect of all federal, state, local and foreign income and franchise taxes for all current or prior periods as to which the tax liability of the Company, the Guarantor or any of their consolidated subsidiaries has not been finally determined.
Tax Law Compliance
 
(bb) . The Company and the Guarantor have been advised of the rules and requirements under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "Investment Company Act"). Neither the Company nor the Guarantor is, or after receipt of payment for the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in each of the preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus will be, an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act, and each will conduct its business in a manner so that it will not become subject to the Investment Company Act.
"Investment Company"
(cc) . Each of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries are insured under policies in such amounts and with such deductibles and covering such risks as are generally deemed adequate and customary for their businesses including, but not limited to, policies covering real and personal property owned or leased by the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries against theft, damage, destruction, acts of vandalism and earthquakes. All policies of insurance and fidelity or surety bonds insuring the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries or their respective businesses, assets, employees, officers and directors are in full force and effect; the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies and instruments in all material respects; and there are no claims by the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries under any such policy or instrument as to which any insurance company is denying liability or defending under a reservation of rights clause, except for defenses under a reservations of rights clause where the failure to have coverage would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any such subsidiary has been refused any insurance coverage sought or applied for.
Insurance
(dd) . No domestic subsidiary of the Company, other than Anixter Receivables Corporation, is currently contractually prohibited, directly or indirectly, from paying any dividends or other distributions to the Company, from making any other distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring any of such subsidiary's property or assets to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor, except as described in or contemplated by the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
No Restrictions on Dividends or Other Distributions
(ee) . Neither the Company nor the Guarantor has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or that might be reasonably expected to cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company or the Guarantor to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities.
No Price Stabilization or Manipulation
(ff) . There are no business relationships or related-party transactions involving the Company, the Guarantor or any subsidiary or any other person required to be described in the preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus that have not been described as required.
Related Party Transactions
 
(gg) . The Guarantor maintains (i) effective internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rule 13a-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and (ii) a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain asset accountability; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences; and (E) the interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus fairly present the information called for in all material respects and are prepared in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto.
Internal Controls and Procedures
(hh) . Since the end of the Guarantor's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (i) no material weakness in the Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (ii) no change in the Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Guarantor's internal control over financial reporting.
No Material Weakness in Internal Controls
(ii) The Guarantor maintains an effective system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Guarantor in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Guarantor's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. Each of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries have carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act.
Disclosure Controls.
(jj) With respect to the stock options (the "Stock Options") granted pursuant to the stock-based compensation plans of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries (the "Company Stock Plans"), (i) each Stock Option designated by the Company, the Guarantor or the relevant subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor at the time of grant as an "incentive stock option" under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"), so qualifies, (ii) each grant of a Stock Option was duly authorized no later than the date on which the grant of such Stock Option was by its terms to be effective (the "Grant Date") by all necessary corporate action, including, as applicable, approval by the board of directors of the Company, the Guarantor or the relevant subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor (or a duly constituted and authorized committee thereof) and any required stockholder approval by the necessary number of votes or written consents, and the award agreement governing such grant (if any) was
Stock Options.
 
duly executed and delivered by the Guarantor, (iii) each such grant was made in accordance with the terms of the Company Stock Plans, the Exchange Act and all other applicable laws and regulatory rules or requirements, including the rules of the New York Stock Exchange and any other exchange on which the securities of the Company, the Guarantor or the relevant subsidiary of the Company or Guarantor are traded, (iv) the per share exercise price of each Stock Option was equal to or greater than the fair market value of a share of common stock on the applicable Grant Date and (v) each such grant was properly accounted for in accordance with GAAP in the consolidated financial statements (including the related notes) of the Company and disclosed in the Company's filings with the Commission in accordance with the Exchange Act and all other applicable laws. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any of its subsidiaries has knowingly granted, and there is no and has been no policy or practice of the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries of granting, Stock Options prior to, or otherwise coordinating the grant of Stock Options with, the release or other public announcement of material information regarding the Company, the Guarantor or their subsidiaries or their results of operations or prospects.
(kk) . Neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any of their subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, any director, officer, agent, employee or affiliate of the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries is aware of or has taken any action, directly or indirectly, that would result in a violation by such Persons of the FCPA, including, without limitation, making use of the mails or any means or instrumentality of interstate commerce corruptly in furtherance of an offer, payment, promise to pay or authorization of the payment of any money, or other property, gift, promise to give, or authorization of the giving of anything of value to any "foreign official" (as such term is defined in the FCPA) or any foreign political party or official thereof or any candidate for foreign political office, in contravention of the FCPA, and the Company, the Guarantor, its subsidiaries and, to the knowledge of the Company and the Guarantor, its affiliates have conducted their businesses in compliance with the FCPA and have instituted and maintain policies and procedures designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance therewith.
No Unlawful Contributions or Other Payments
"FCPA" means Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder.
(ll) . The operations of the Company, the Guarantor and their subsidiaries are and have been conducted at all times in material compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all applicable jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency (collectively, the "Money Laundering Laws") and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, threatened.
No Conflict with Money Laundering Laws
 
(mm) . None of the Company, the Guarantor, any of the Guarantor's other subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company or the Guarantor, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or representative of the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Guarantor's other subsidiaries is currently the subject or target of any sanctions administered or enforced by the United States Government, including, without limitation, the U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), the United Nations Security Council ("UNSC"), the European Union, Her Majesty's Treasury ("HMT"), or other relevant sanctions authority (collectively, "Sanctions"), nor is the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Guarantor's other subsidiaries located, organized or resident in a country or territory that is the subject of Sanctions; and the Company will not, directly or indirectly, use the proceeds of the sale of the Securities, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person, (i) to fund any activities of or business with any person, or in any country or territory, that, at the time of such funding, is the subject of Sanctions or (ii) in any other manner that will result in a violation by any person (including any person participating in the transaction, whether as underwriter, advisor, investor or otherwise) of Sanctions.
No Conflict with Sanctions Laws
(nn) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, except as would not, singly or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect (i) neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law and any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release, in any form, or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, asbestos, asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, hazardous substances, petroleum and petroleum products (collectively, "Hazardous Materials") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, "Environmental Laws"), (ii) the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (iii) there are no pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, the Guarantor and the Subsidiaries after reasonable investigation, threatened actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation or potential responsibility, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Company, Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries, (iv) there are no events, conditions or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to result in any liability of the Company, the Guarantor or any of the Subsidiaries relating to any Hazardous Materials or the violation of any Environmental Laws, (v) neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is conducting or financing, in whole or in part, any investigation, response or other corrective action pursuant to any Environmental Law at any location and (vi) neither the Company, the Guarantor nor any of the Subsidiaries is a party to any order, judgment, decree or agreement, which imposes any obligation on any of them under any Environmental Law.
Compliance with Environmental Laws
(oo) . None of the following events has occurred or exists: (i) a failure to fulfill the obligations, if any, under the minimum funding standards of Section 302 of the United States Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"), and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder with
ERISA Compliance
 
respect to a Plan, determined without regard to any waiver of such obligations or extension of any amortization period; (ii) an audit or investigation by the Internal Revenue Service, the U.S. Department of Labor, the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any other federal or state governmental agency or any foreign regulatory agency with respect to the employment or compensation of employees by any member of the Company or the Guarantor that could have a Material Adverse Effect; or (iii) any breach of any contractual obligation, or any violation of law or applicable qualification standards, with respect to the employment or compensation of employees by any member of the Company or the Guarantor that could have a Material Adverse Effect. None of the following events has occurred or is reasonably likely to occur: (i) a material increase in the aggregate amount of contributions required to be made to all Plans in the current fiscal year of the Company and the Guarantor compared to the amount of such contributions made in the Company's and the Guarantor's most recently completed fiscal year; (ii) a material increase in the Company's or the Guarantor's "accumulated post-retirement benefit obligations" (within the meaning of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 106) compared to the amount of such obligations in the Company's or the Guarantor's most recently completed fiscal year; (iii) any event or condition giving rise to a liability under Title IV of ERISA that could have a Material Adverse Effect; or (iv) the filing of a claim by one or more employees or former employees of the Company or the Guarantor related to their employment that could have a Material Adverse Effect. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "Plan" means a plan (within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title IV of ERISA with respect to which any member of the Company or the Guarantor may have any liability.
(pp) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, there is no broker, finder or other party that is entitled to receive from the Company any brokerage or finder's fee or other fee or commission as a result of any transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Brokers
(qq) . There are no outstanding loans, advances (except normal advances for business expenses in the ordinary course of business) or guarantees or indebtedness by the Company or the Guarantor to or for the benefit of any of the executive officers or directors of the Company or the Guarantor or any of the members of any of them, except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
No Outstanding Loans or Other Indebtedness
(rr) . There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or the Guarantor and any of the Company's or the Guarantor's respective directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act"), including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Sarbanes-Oxley Compliance
(ss) . Except as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Package, no "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" as such term is defined for purposes of Section 3(a)(62) of the Exchange Act (i) has imposed (or has informed the Company that it is considering imposing) any condition (financial or otherwise) on the Company's or the Guarantor's retaining any rating assigned to the Company or the Guarantor, any securities of the Company or the Guarantor or (ii) has indicated to the Company or Guarantor that it is considering (a) the downgrading, suspension, or withdrawal of, or any review for a possible change that does not indicate the direction of the possible change in, any rating so assigned or (b) any change in the outlook for any rating of the Company or the Guarantor or any securities of the Company or the Guarantor.
Ratings
 
(tt) . Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor the Guarantor have any material lending or other relationship with any bank or lending affiliate of any Underwriter.
Lending Relationship
(uu) . Nothing has come to the attention of the Company or the Guarantor that has caused the Company or the Guarantor to believe that the statistical and market-related data included in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus is not based on or derived from sources that are reliable and accurate in all material respects.
Statistical and Market Related Data
(vv) . The Company and the Guarantor (on a consolidated basis) and the Guarantor and its subsidiaries (on a consolidated based) are, as of the date hereof, and will be, immediately after the Closing Date (giving effect to the use of proceeds as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus) Solvent. As used herein, the term "Solvent" means, with respect to any person on a particular date, that on such date (i) the fair market value of the assets of such person is greater than the total amount of liabilities (including contingent liabilities) of such person, (ii) the present fair salable value of the assets of such person is greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liabilities of such person on its debts as they become absolute and matured, (iii) such person is able to realize upon its assets and pay its debts and other liabilities, including contingent obligations, as they mature and (iv) such person does not have unreasonably small capital.
Solvency
Any certificate signed by an officer of the Company or the Guarantor and delivered to the Representative or to counsel for the Underwriters shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Company and the Guarantor to each Underwriter as to the matters set forth therein.
Section 2. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of the Securities.
(a) The Company agrees to issue and sell to the several Underwriters the Notes upon the terms herein set forth. On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, and upon the terms but subject to the conditions herein set forth, the Underwriters agree, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company the respective aggregate principal amount of Notes set forth opposite their names on Schedule A. The purchase price to be paid by the several Underwriters to the Company shall be equal to 98.25% of the aggregate principal amount thereof.
The Securities.
(b) Delivery of the Notes to be purchased by the Underwriters and payment therefor shall be made at the offices of Schiff Hardin LLP, 233 South Wacker Drive, Suite 6600, Chicago, IL 60606 (or such other place as may be agreed to by the Company and the Representative) at 9:00 a.m., New York time, on April 30, 2012, or such other time and date not later than 1:30 p.m., New York time, on April 30, 2012 as the Representative shall designate by notice to the Company (the time and date of such closing are called the "Closing Date").
The Closing Date.
 
(c) The Representative hereby advises the Company that the Underwriters intend to offer for sale to the public, as described in the Prospectus, their respective portions of the Securities as soon after this Agreement has been executed as the Representative, in its sole judgment, has determined is advisable and practicable.
Public Offering of the Securities.
(d) Payment for the Notes shall be made at the Closing Date by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the order of the Company.
Payment for the Securities.
It is understood that the Representative has been authorized, for its own account and the accounts of the several Underwriters, to accept delivery of and receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Securities the Underwriters have agreed to purchase. Wells Fargo Securities, LLC ("Wells Fargo"), individually and not as the Representative of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment for any Securities to be purchased by any Underwriter whose funds shall not have been received by the Representative by the Closing Date for the account of such Underwriter, but any such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from any of its obligations under this Agreement.
(e) The Company shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Representative for the accounts of the several Underwriters, the Notes (guaranteed by the Guarantor) the Underwriters have agreed to purchase on the Closing Date, against the irrevocable release of a wire transfer of immediately available funds for the amount of the purchase price therefor. Delivery of the Securities shall be made through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company unless the Representative shall otherwise instruct. Time shall be of the essence, and delivery at the time and place specified in this Agreement is a further condition to the obligations of the Underwriters.
Delivery of the Securities.
(f) . The Company shall deliver or cause to be delivered, copies of the Prospectus in such quantities and at such places as the Representative shall request.
Delivery of Prospectus to the Underwriters
Section 3. Covenants of the Company and the Guarantor.
The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, covenant and agree with each Underwriter as follows:
(a) During the period beginning on the Applicable Time and ending on the later of the Closing Date or such date, as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, the Prospectus is no longer required by law to be delivered in connection with sales by an Underwriter or dealer, including in circumstances where such requirement may be satisfied pursuant to Rule 172 under the Securities Act (the "Prospectus Delivery Period"), prior to amending or supplementing the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, the Company shall furnish to the Representative for review a copy of each such proposed amendment or supplement, and neither the Company nor the Guarantor shall file or use any such proposed amendment or supplement to which the Representative reasonably objects.
Representative's Review of Proposed Amendments and Supplements.
 
(b) After the date of this Agreement, the Company shall promptly advise the Representative in writing (i) of the receipt of any comments of, or requests for additional or supplemental information from, the Commission, (ii) of the time and date of any filing of any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, (iii) of the time and date that any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement becomes effective and (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any order or notice preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, or of any proceedings to remove, suspend or terminate from listing or quotation the common stock from any securities exchange upon which it is listed for trading or included or designated for quotation, or of the threatening or initiation of any proceedings for any of such purposes (including any notice or order pursuant to Section 8A or Rule 401(g)(2) of the Securities Act). The Company and the Guarantor shall use their best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such stop order or notice of prevention or suspension of such use. If the Commission shall enter any such stop order or issue any such notice at any time, the Company will use its best efforts to obtain the lifting or reversal of such order or notice at the earliest possible moment, or, subject to Section 3(a), will file an amendment to the Registration Statement or will file a new registration statement and use its best efforts to have such amendment or new registration statement declared effective as soon as practicable. Additionally, each of the Company and the Guarantor agrees that it shall comply with the provisions of Rules 424(b), 430A, 430B and 430C, as applicable, under the Securities Act, including with respect to the timely filing of documents thereunder, and will use its reasonable efforts to confirm that any filings made by the Company under such Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act were received in a timely manner by the Commission.
Securities Act Compliance.
(c) If, during the Prospectus Delivery Period, any event or development shall occur or condition exist as a result of which the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or then prevailing, as the case may be, not misleading, or if it shall be necessary to amend or supplement the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or then prevailing, as the case may be, not misleading, or if in the opinion of the Representative it is otherwise necessary or advisable to amend or supplement the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or to file a new registration statement containing the Prospectus, in order to comply with law, including in connection with the delivery of the Prospectus, each of the Company and the Guarantor agrees to (i) notify the Representative of any such event or condition and (ii) promptly prepare (subject to Sections 3(a) and 3(e) hereof), file with the Commission (and use its best efforts to have any amendment to the Registration Statement or any new registration statement to be declared effective) and furnish at its own expense to the Underwriters and to dealers, amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any new registration statement, necessary in order to make the statements in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus as so amended or supplemented, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or then prevailing, as the case may be, not misleading or so that the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, will comply with law.
Amendments and Supplements to the Registration Statement, Disclosure Package and Prospectus and Other Securities Act Matters.
 
(d) The Company will prepare a final term sheet, containing solely a description of final terms of the Securities and the offering thereof, in the form approved by the Representative and attached as Schedule B hereto (the "Final Term Sheet") and will file such Final Term Sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d) within the time required by such rule.
Final Term Sheet.
(e) Each of the Company and the Guarantor represents that it has not made, and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of the Representative, it will not make, any offer relating to the Securities that constitutes or would constitute an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or that otherwise constitutes or would constitute a "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) or a portion thereof required to be filed by the Company and the Guarantor with the Commission or retained by the Company and the Guarantor under Rule 433 under the Securities Act; provided that the prior written consent of the Representative hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Final Term Sheet. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representative is hereinafter referred to as a "Permitted Free Writing Prospectus". Each of the Company and the Guarantor agrees that (i) it has treated and will treat, as the case may be, each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, and (ii) has complied and will comply, as the case may be, with the requirements of Rules 164 and 433 under the Securities Act applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including in respect of timely filing with the Commission, legending and record keeping. The Company and the Guarantor consent to the use by any Underwriter of a free writing prospectus that (a) is not an "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433, and (b) contains only (i) information describing the preliminary terms of the Securities or their offering, (ii) information that describes the final terms of the Securities or their offering and that was included in the Final Term Sheet of the Company contemplated in Section 1(d)(ii) as previously filed with the Commission or (iii) information permitted under Rule 134 under the Securities Act (prior to giving effect to the amendments to Rule 134 adopted in SEC Release No: 33-9245); provided that each Underwriter severally covenants with the Company not to take any action without the Company's consent which consent shall be confirmed in writing that would result in the Company being required to file with the Commission under Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Underwriter that otherwise would not be required to be filed by the Company thereunder, but for the action of the Underwriter.
Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses.
(f) The Company agrees to furnish the Underwriters, without charge, during the Prospectus Delivery Period, as many copies of the Prospectus and any amendments and supplements thereto (including any documents incorporated or deemed incorporated by reference therein) and the Disclosure Package as the Underwriters may request.
Copies of any Amendments and Supplements to the Prospectus.
(g) The Company will furnish to the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters conformed copies of the Registration Statement (including exhibits thereto) as originally filed and, so long as delivery of a prospectus by an Underwriter or dealer may be required by the Act, as many copies of each preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus and any supplement thereto and the Disclosure Package as the Representative may reasonably request.
Copies of the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
 
(h) The Company and the Guarantor shall cooperate with the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters to qualify or register the Securities for sale under (or obtain exemptions from the application of) the state securities or blue sky laws or Canadian provincial securities laws or other foreign laws of those jurisdictions designated by the Representative, shall comply with such laws and shall continue such qualifications, registrations and exemptions in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Securities. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor shall be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to take any action that would subject it to general service of process in any such jurisdiction where it is not presently qualified or where it would be subject to taxation as a foreign corporation, other than those arising out of the offering or sale of the Securities in any jurisdiction where it is not now so subject. The Company and the Guarantor will advise the Representative promptly of the suspension of the qualification or registration of (or any such exemption relating to) the Securities for offering, sale or trading in any jurisdiction or any initiation or threat of any proceeding for any such purpose, and in the event of the issuance of any order suspending such qualification, registration or exemption, each of the Company and the Guarantor shall use its best efforts to obtain the withdrawal thereof at the earliest possible moment.
Blue Sky Compliance.
(i) The Company shall apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Securities sold by it in the manner described under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Use of Proceeds.
(j) The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the Exchange Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act.
Earnings Statement.
(k) During the Prospectus Delivery Period the Company and the Guarantor shall file, on a timely basis, with the Commission and the New York Stock Exchange all reports and documents required to be filed under the Exchange Act and Rule 158 under the Securities Act.
Periodic Reporting Obligations.
(l) During the period commencing on the date hereof and ending on the 90th day following the date of the Prospectus, neither the Company nor the Guarantor will, without the prior written consent of Wells Fargo (which consent may be withheld at the sole discretion of Wells Fargo), directly or indirectly, sell, offer, contract or grant any option to sell, pledge, transfer or establish an open "put equivalent position" or liquidate or decrease a "call equivalent position" within the meaning of Rule 16a-1(h) under the Exchange Act, or otherwise dispose of or transfer (or enter into any transaction that is designed to, or might reasonably be expected to, result in the disposition of), or announce the offering of, or file any registration statement under the Securities Act in respect of, any debt securities of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary or securities exchangeable for or convertible into debt securities of the Company, the Guarantor or any Subsidiary (other than contemplated by this Agreement).
Agreement Not to Offer or Sell Additional Securities.
 
(m) . The Company and the Guarantor will comply with all applicable securities and other laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the Sarbanes Oxley Act, and use its best efforts to cause the Company's and the Guarantor's respective directors and officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with such laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the provisions of the Sarbanes Oxley Act.
Compliance with Sarbanes Oxley Act
(n) . The Company agrees to pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) of the Securities Act without regard to the proviso therein and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) of the Securities Act.
Filing Fees
(o) . During the period of two years hereafter the Company will furnish to the Representative (i) to the extent not available on the Commission's EDGAR filing system, as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, copies of the Annual Report of the Guarantor containing the balance sheet of the Guarantor as of the close of such fiscal year and statements of income, stockholders' equity and cash flows for the year then ended and the opinion thereon of the Guarantor's independent public or certified public accountants; (ii) to the extent not available on the Commission's EDGAR filing system, as soon as practicable after the filing thereof, copies of each proxy statement, Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q, Current Report on Form 8-K or other report filed by the Guarantor with the Commission, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority ("FINRA") or any securities exchange; and (iii) as soon as available, copies of any publicly available report or communication of the Company or the Guarantor mailed generally to holders of its capital stock.
Future Reports to the Representative
(p) The Company shall not invest or otherwise use the proceeds received by the Company from its sale of the Securities in such a manner as would require the Company, the Guarantor or any of their subsidiaries to register as an investment company under the Investment Company Act.
Investment Limitation.
(q) Neither the Company nor the Guarantor will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to cause or result in, or that has constituted or might reasonably be expected to constitute, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any securities of the Company or the Guarantor to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities.
No Manipulation of Price.
(r) The Company will cooperate with the Representative and use its best efforts to permit the Securities to be eligible for clearance and settlement through The Depository Trust Company.
DTC.
(s) . If at any time during the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company receives from the Commission a notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) or otherwise ceases to be eligible to use the automatic shelf registration statement form, the Company will (i) promptly notify the Representative, (ii) promptly file a new registration statement or post effective amendment on the proper form relating to the Notes, in a form satisfactory to the Representative, (iii) use its best efforts to cause such registration statement or post effective amendment to be declared effective and (iv) promptly notify the Representative of such effectiveness. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the
Notice of Inability to Use Automatic Shelf Registration Statement Form
 
public offering and sale of the Notes to continue as contemplated in the registration statement that was the subject of the Rule 401(g)(2) notice or for which the Company has otherwise become ineligible. References herein to the Registration Statement shall include such new registration statement or post effective amendment, as the case may be.
Section 4. Payment of Expenses.
The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to pay all costs, fees and expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their obligations hereunder and in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby, including without limitation (i) all expenses incident to the issuance and delivery of the Securities (including all printing and engraving costs), (ii) all necessary issue, transfer and other stamp taxes in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities to the Underwriters, (iii) all fees and expenses of the Company's and the Guarantor's counsel, independent public or certified public accountants and other advisors, (iv) all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, printing, filing, shipping and distribution of the Registration Statement (including financial statements, exhibits, schedules, consents and certificates of experts), each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus, and all amendments and supplements thereto, and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers, this Agreement, the Indenture and the Notes and Guarantee, (v) all filing fees, attorneys' fees and expenses incurred by the Company, the Guarantor or the Underwriters in connection with qualifying or registering (or obtaining exemptions from the qualification or registration of) all or any part of the Securities for offer and sale under the securities laws of the several states of the United States, the provinces of Canada or other jurisdictions designated by the Underwriters (including, without limitation, the cost of preparing, printing and mailing preliminary and final blue sky or legal investment memoranda), (vi) the fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee in connection with the Indenture and the Securities, (vii) any fees payable in connection with the rating of the Securities with the ratings agencies, (viii) any filing fees incident to, and any reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel to the Underwriters in connection with the review by the FINRA, if any, of the terms of the sale of the Securities, (ix) all fees and expenses (including reasonable fees and expenses of counsel) of the Company and the Guarantor in connection with approval of the Securities by the DTC for "book-entry" transfer, (x) all expenses incident to the "road show" for the offering of the Securities, including the cost of any chartered airplane or other transportation, (xi) all other fees, costs and expenses referred to in Item 14 of Part II of the Registration Statement, (xii) the costs and expenses of the QIU and (xiii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section 4. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section 4, Section 6, Section 8 and Section 9 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees and expenses of their counsel.
Section 5. Conditions of the Obligations of the Underwriters.
The obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Securities as provided herein on the Closing Date shall be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company and the Guarantor set forth in Section 1 hereof as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Date as though then made and, to the accuracy of the statements of the Company and the Guarantor made in any certificates pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the timely performance by the Company and the Guarantor of its covenants and other obligations hereunder, and to each of the following additional conditions:
 
(a) On the date hereof, the Representative shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP, independent public accountants for the Company and the Guarantor, a letter dated the date hereof addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representative.
Accountants' Comfort Letter.
(b) No Stop Order. For the period from and after effectiveness of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date:
Compliance with Registration Requirements;
(i) the Company shall have filed the Prospectus with the Commission (including the information required by Rules 430A, 430B and 430C under the Securities Act) in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act; or the Company shall have filed a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement containing the information required by such Rule 430B under the Securities Act, and such post-effective amendment shall have become effective;
(ii) all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act, including the Final Term Sheet, shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings under such Rule 433 under the Securities Act; and
(iii) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, or any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, shall be in effect and no proceedings for such purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act shall have been instituted or threatened by the Commission; and the Company shall not have received from the Commission any notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) of the Securities Act objecting to use of the automatic shelf registration statement form.
(c) For the period from and after the date of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date:
No Material Adverse Change or Ratings Agency Change.
(i) in the judgment of the Representative there shall not have occurred any Material Adverse Change;
(ii) there shall not have been any change or decrease specified in the letter or letters referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section 5 which is, in the sole judgment of the Representative, so material and adverse as to make it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Securities as contemplated by this Agreement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; and
(iii) there shall not have occurred any downgrading, nor shall any notice have been given of any intended or potential downgrading or of any review for a possible change that does not indicate the direction of the possible change, in the rating accorded any securities of the Company, the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" as such term is defined for purposes of Section 3(a)(62) of the Exchange Act, and no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, any such rating.
 
(d) On the Closing Date the Representative shall have received favorable opinions of Schiff Hardin LLP, counsel for the Company and the Guarantor and Bradd Easton, Esq., Associate General Counsel to the Company and the Guarantor, each dated as of such Closing Date, the forms of which are attached as Exhibit A and Exhibit B, respectively.
Opinion of Counsel for the Company and Guarantor.
(e) On the Closing Date the Representative shall have received the favorable opinion of Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP counsel for the Underwriters, dated as of such Closing Date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to, and addressed to, the Representative, and the Company and the Guarantor shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they request for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon such matters.
Opinion of Counsel for the Underwriters.
(f) On the Closing Date the Representative shall have received a written certificate executed by the Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Officer or President of the Company and the Guarantor and the Chief Financial Officer or Chief Accounting Officer of the Company and the Guarantor, dated as of such Closing Date to the effect that the signers of such certificate have carefully examined the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto and this Agreement, to the effect set forth in subsections (b)(iii) and (c)(iii) of this Section 5, and further to the effect that:
Officers' Certificate.
(i) for the period from and after the date of this Agreement and prior to such Closing Date there has not occurred any Material Adverse Change;
(ii) the representations and warranties of the Company and the Guarantor set forth in Section 1 of this Agreement are true and correct on and as of such Closing Date with the same force and effect as though expressly made on and as of such Closing Date; and
(iii) each of the Company and the Guarantor has complied with all the agreements hereunder and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to such Closing Date.
(g) On the Closing Date, the Representative shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP, independent public accountants for the Company and the Guarantor, a letter dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representative, to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished by them pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 5, except that the specified date referred to therein for the carrying out of procedures shall be no more than three business days prior to such Closing Date.
Bring-down Comfort Letter.
(h) . On the Closing Date, the Securities shall be eligible for clearance and settlement through the DTC.
Securities Eligible for DTC
(i) . The Securities and the Indenture shall be executed by the Company and the Guarantor in substantially the form previously delivered to you.
The Securities
 
(j) On or before the Closing Date the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters shall have received such information, documents and opinions as they may reasonably require for the purposes of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as contemplated herein, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations and warranties, or the satisfaction of any of the conditions or agreements, herein contained.
Additional Documents.
If any condition specified in this Section 5 is not satisfied when and as required to be satisfied, this Agreement may be terminated by the Representative by notice to the Company at any time on or prior to the Closing Date which termination shall be without liability on the part of any party to any other party, except that Section 4, Section 6, Section 8, Section 9 and Section 14 shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
Section 6. Reimbursement of Underwriters' Expenses.
If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 5, Section 10 or clauses (i) or (iv) of Section 11 or if the sale to the Underwriters of the Securities on the Closing Date is not consummated because of any refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company or the Guarantor to perform any agreement herein or to comply with any provision hereof, the Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to reimburse the Representative and the other Underwriters (or such Underwriters as have terminated this Agreement with respect to themselves) that have not defaulted under Section 10, severally, upon demand for all out-of-pocket expenses that shall have been reasonably incurred by the Representative and the Underwriters in connection with the proposed purchase and the offering and sale of the Securities, including but not limited to fees and disbursements of counsel, printing expenses, travel expenses, postage, facsimile and telephone charges.
Section 7. Effectiveness of this Agreement.
This Agreement shall not become effective until execution by the parties hereto.
Section 8. Indemnification.
(a) The Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its directors, officers, employees and agents, and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense, as incurred, to which such Underwriter, director, officer, employee, agent or controlling person may become subject, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or expense (or actions in respect thereof as contemplated below) arises out of or is based (i) upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, or any amendment thereto, including any information deemed to be a part thereof pursuant to Rule 430A, Rule 430B or Rule 430C under the Securities Act, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; or (ii) upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the information contained in the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any prospectus wrapper material distributed in Canada in connection with foreign sales or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact, in each case, necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made,
Indemnification of the Underwriters.
 
not misleading, and to reimburse each Underwriter, its officers, directors, employees, agents and each such controlling person for any and all expenses (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by Wells Fargo) as such expenses are reasonably incurred by such Underwriter, or its officers, directors, employees, agents or such controlling person in connection with investigating, defending, settling, compromising or paying any such loss, claim, damage, liability, expense or action; provided, however, that the foregoing indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense to the extent, but only to the extent, arising out of or based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representative expressly for use in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 8(b) hereof. The indemnity agreement set forth in this Section 8(a) shall be in addition to any liabilities that the Company and Guarantor may otherwise have.
(b) Each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Guarantor, each of their respective directors, each of their respective officers who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company or the Guarantor within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense, as incurred, to which the Company, or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or expense (or actions in respect thereof as contemplated below) arises out of or is based upon any untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the information contained in the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or arises out of or is based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, and only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representative expressly for use therein; and to reimburse the Company or the Guarantor, or any such director, officer or controlling person for any legal and other expense reasonably incurred by the Company or the Guarantor, or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating, defending, settling, compromising or paying any such loss, claim, damage, liability, expense or action. The Company and the Guarantor hereby acknowledge that the only information that the Underwriters have furnished to the Company and Guarantor expressly for use in the Registration Statement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Final Term Sheet, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) are the statements set forth in the sixth, seventh, eighth paragraphs and the first and second sentences of the eleventh paragraph under the caption of "Underwriting" in the prospectus supplement. The indemnity agreement set forth in this Section 8(b) shall be in addition to any liabilities that each Underwriter may otherwise have.
Indemnification of the Company, its Directors and Officers.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 8 of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against an indemnifying party under this Section 8, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof, but
Notifications and Other Indemnification Procedures.
 
the failure to so notify the indemnifying party (i) will not relieve it from liability under paragraph (a) or (b) above unless and to the extent it did not otherwise learn of such action and such failure results in the forfeiture by the indemnifying party of substantial rights and defenses and (ii) will not, in any event, relieve the indemnifying party from any obligations to any indemnified party other than the indemnification obligation provided in paragraph (a) or (b) above. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party and such indemnified party seeks or intends to seek indemnity from an indemnifying party, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate in, and, to the extent that it shall elect, jointly with all other indemnifying parties similarly notified, by written notice delivered to the indemnified party promptly after receiving the aforesaid notice from such indemnified party, to assume the defense thereof with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party; provided, however, if the defendants in any such action include both the indemnified party and the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have reasonably concluded that a conflict may arise between the positions of the indemnifying party and the indemnified party in conducting the defense of any such action or that there may be legal defenses available to it and/or other indemnified parties that are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party, the indemnified party or parties shall have the right to select separate counsel to assume such legal defenses and to otherwise participate in the defense of such action on behalf of such indemnified party or parties. Upon receipt of notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of such indemnifying party's election so to assume the defense of such action and approval by the indemnified party of counsel, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section 8 for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof unless (i) the indemnified party shall have employed separate counsel in accordance with the proviso to the preceding sentence (it being understood, however, that the indemnifying party shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate counsel (other than local counsel), reasonably approved by the indemnifying party (or by Wells Fargo in the case of Section 8(b)), representing the indemnified parties who are parties to such action) or (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have employed counsel satisfactory to the indemnified party to represent the indemnified party within a reasonable time after notice of commencement of the action, in each of which cases the fees and expenses of counsel shall be at the expense of the indemnifying party.
(d) The indemnifying party under this Section 8 shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, which shall not be withheld unreasonably, but if settled with such consent or if there is a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by Section 8(c) hereof, the indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 30 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request and (ii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement, compromise or consent to the entry of judgment in any pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity was or could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement, compromise or consent (x) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such action, suit or proceeding and (y) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
Settlements.
 
(e) . Without limitation and in addition to their obligations under the other subsections of this Section 8, the Company and the Guarantor, jointly and severally, agree to indemnify and hold harmless the QIU, its directors, officers, employees and agents, and each person, if any, who controls the QIU within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, from and against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense, as incurred, to which the QIU or such director, officer, employee, agent or controlling person may become subject, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or expense (or action in respect thereof) arises out of or is based upon the QIU's acting (or alleged failure to act) as a "qualified independent underwriter" (within the meaning of Rule 5121(f)(12) of FINRA) in connection with the offering contemplated by this Agreement, and agree to reimburse the QIU, its directors, officers, employees and agents and each such controlling person for any and all legal or other expenses (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by the QIU (it being understood, however, that the indemnifying party shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate counsel (other than local counsel)) reasonably incurred by the QIU or such director, officer, employee, agent or controlling person in connection with investigating, defending, settling, compromising or paying any such loss, claim, damage, liability, expense or action; provided, however, that the Company and the Guarantor shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage, liability or expense results solely from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the QIU. If the indemnification provided for in this Section 8(e) is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of losses, claims, damages, liabilities of expenses referred to in the prior sentence, then the Company and the Guarantor shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses, based on the factors described in Section 9 below; provided, however, that (i) the relative benefits received by the QIU in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall, for purposes of Section 9, be deemed to be equal to the compensation, if any, received by the QIU solely for acting in such capacity and (ii) notwithstanding the provisions of Section 9, the QIU shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the compensation, if any, received by the QIU solely for acting in such capacity.
Indemnification of the QIU
Section 9. Contribution.
If the indemnification provided for in Section 8 is for any reason unavailable to or otherwise insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount paid or payable by such indemnified party, as incurred, as a result of any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses referred to therein (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the untrue statements or omissions or alleged untrue statements or alleged omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the
 
Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company, and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the front cover page of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on such cover. The relative fault of the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, or the Underwriters, on the other hand, and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
The amount paid or payable by a party as a result of the losses, claims, damages, liabilities and expenses referred to above shall be deemed to include, subject to the limitations set forth in Section 8(c), any legal or other fees or expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating or defending any action or claim.
The Company, the Guarantor and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 9 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in this Section 9.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 9, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the underwriting discount or commission received by such Underwriter in connection with the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 9 are several, and not joint, in proportion to their respective underwriting commitments as set forth opposite their names in . For purposes of this Section 9, each director, officer, employee and agent of an Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company and the Guarantor, each officer of the Company and the Guarantor who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company and the Guarantor within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company and the Guarantor.
Schedule A
Section 10. Default of One or More of the Several Underwriters.
If, on the Closing Date, any one or more of the several Underwriters shall fail or refuse to purchase Securities that it or they have agreed to purchase hereunder on such date, and the aggregate principal amount of Securities which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed or refused to purchase does not exceed 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased on the Closing Date, the other Underwriters shall be obligated, severally, in the proportions that the aggregate principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their respective names on bears to the aggregate principal amount of Securities set forth opposite the names of all such non-defaulting Underwriters, or in such other proportions as may be specified by the Representative with the consent of the non-defaulting Underwriters, to purchase the Securities which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed or refused to purchase on such date. If, on the Closing Date, any one or more of the Underwriters shall fail or refuse to purchase Securities and the aggregate principal amount of Securities with
Schedule A
 
respect to which such default occurs exceeds 10% of the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be purchased on such date, and arrangements satisfactory to the Representative and the Company for the purchase of such Securities are not made within 48 hours after such default, this Agreement shall terminate without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Section 4, Section 6, Section 8, Section 9 and Section 19 shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination. In any such case either the Representative or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Closing Date but in no event for longer than seven days in order that the required changes, if any, to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus or any other documents or arrangements may be effected.
As used in this Agreement, the term "Underwriter" shall be deemed to include any person substituted for a defaulting Underwriter under this Section 10. Any action taken under this Section 10 shall not relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of any default of such Underwriter under this Agreement.
Section 11. Termination of this Agreement.
Prior to the Closing Date this Agreement may be terminated by the Representative by notice given to the Company if at any time (i) trading or quotation in any of the Company's or Guarantor's securities shall have been suspended or limited by the Commission or by the NYSE, (ii) trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange shall have been suspended or limited, or minimum or maximum prices shall have been generally established by the Commission or FINRA or on such stock exchange; (iii) a general banking moratorium shall have been declared by federal or New York authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States has occurred; (iv) in the judgment of the Representative there shall have occurred any Material Adverse Change or (v) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of national or international hostilities or declaration of a national emergency or war by the United States or any crisis or calamity, or any change in the United States or international financial markets, or any substantial change or development involving a prospective substantial change in United States' or international political, financial or economic conditions, as in the judgment of the Representative is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale and delivery of the Securities in the manner and on the terms described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or to enforce contracts for the sale of securities. Any termination pursuant to this Section 11 shall be without liability on the part of (a) the Company and the Guarantor to any Underwriter, except that the Company and Guarantor shall be obligated to reimburse the expenses of the Representative and the Underwriters pursuant to Sections 4 and 6 hereof, (b) any Underwriter to the Company or the Guarantor, or (c) any party hereto to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 8 and 9 hereof shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
Section 12. No Advisory or Fiduciary Responsibility.
The Company and the Guarantor acknowledge and agree that: (i) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company and the Guarantor, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, and the Company and the Guarantor are capable of evaluating and understanding and understand and accept the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (ii) in connection with each transaction contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal
 
and is not the financial advisor, agent or fiduciary of the Company or the Guarantor or their respective affiliates, stockholders, creditors or employees or any other party; (iii) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory, agency or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company or the Guarantor with respect to any of the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company or the Guarantor on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company or Guarantor with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement; (iv) the several Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company and the Guarantor and that the several Underwriters have no obligation to disclose any of such interests by virtue of any advisory, agency or fiduciary relationship; and (v) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company and the Guarantor have consulted their own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent they deemed appropriate.
This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company, the Guarantor and the several Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof. The Company and the Guarantor hereby waive and release, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims that the Company or the Guarantor may have against the several Underwriters with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty.
Section 13. Representations and Indemnities to Survive Delivery.
The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the Guarantor, of their respective officers and of the several Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement (i) will remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of any (A) investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or the QIU, officers or employees of any Underwriter or the QIU, or any person controlling the Underwriter or the QIU, the Company, the Guarantor, the officers or employees of the Company or the Guarantor or any person controlling the Company or the Guarantor, as the case may be or (B) acceptance of the Securities and payment for them hereunder and (ii) will survive delivery of and payment for the Securities sold hereunder and any termination of this Agreement.
Section 14. Notices.
All communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be mailed, hand delivered or telecopied and confirmed to the parties hereto as follows:
If to the Underwriters:
Wells Fargo Securities, LLC
301 South College Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28288-0613
Attention: Suzanne Alwan, Esq.
 
with a copy to:
Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP
80 Pine Street
New York, NY 10005
Facsimile: (212) 269-5420
Attention: Luis R. Penalver, Esq.
If to the QIU:
UBS Securities LLC
299 Park Avenue
New York, NY 10171-0026
Facsimile: (203) 719-3667
Attention: High Yield Syndicate Department
with a copy to:
Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP
80 Pine Street
New York, NY 10005
Facsimile: (212) 269-5420
Attention: Luis R. Penalver, Esq.
If to the Company:
Anixter International Inc.
2301 Patriot Blvd.
Glenview, Illinois 60026
Facsimile: 224-521-8990
Attention: Treasurer
with a copy to:
Schiff Hardin LLP
233 South Wacker Drive
Suite 6600
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Facsimile: 312-258-5700
Attention: David McCarthy, Esq.
Any party hereto may change the address for receipt of communications by giving written notice to the others.
Section 15. Successors and Assigns.
This Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto, including any substitute Underwriters pursuant to Section 10 hereof, and to the benefit of (i) the Company and the Guarantor, their respective directors, any person who controls the Company or the Guarantor within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act and any officer of
 
the Company and the Guarantor who signs the Registration Statement, (ii) the Underwriters and the QIU, the officers, directors, employees and agents of the Underwriters and the QIU, and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter or the QIU within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, and (iii) the respective successors and assigns of any of the above, all as and to the extent provided in this Agreement, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. The term "successors and assigns" shall not include a purchaser of any of the Securities from any of the several Underwriters merely because of such purchase.
Section 16. Partial Unenforceability.
The invalidity or unenforceability of any Section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other Section, paragraph or provision hereof. If any Section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement is for any reason determined to be invalid or unenforceable, there shall be deemed to be made such minor changes (and only such minor changes) as are necessary to make it valid and enforceable.
Section 17. Governing Law Provisions.
(a) THIS AGREEMENT AND ANY CLAIM, CONTROVERSY OR DISPUTE ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED AND INTERPRETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Governing Law Provisions.
Section 18. Patriot Act.
In accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), the Underwriters are required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies their respective clients, including the Company, which information may include the name and address of their respective clients, as well as other information that will allow the Underwriters to properly identify their respective clients.
Section 19. General Provisions.
This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement of the parties to this Agreement and supersedes all prior written or oral and all contemporaneous oral agreements, understandings and negotiations with respect to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each one of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page to this Agreement by telecopier, facsimile, email or other electronic transmission (i.e., "pdf" or "tif") shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement. This Agreement may not be amended or modified unless in writing by all of the parties hereto, and no condition herein (express or implied) may be waived unless waived in writing by each party whom the condition is meant to benefit. The Section headings herein are for the convenience of the parties only and shall not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement.
 
Each of the parties hereto acknowledges that it is a sophisticated business person who was adequately represented by counsel during negotiations regarding the provisions hereof, including, without limitation, the indemnification provisions of Section 8 and the contribution provisions of Section 9, and is fully informed regarding said provisions. Each of the parties hereto further acknowledges that the provisions of Sections 8 and 9 hereto fairly allocate the risks in light of the ability of the parties to investigate the Company, its affairs and its business in order to assure that adequate disclosure has been made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus (and any amendments and supplements thereto), as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to the Company the enclosed copies hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts hereof, shall become a binding agreement in accordance with its terms.
 
 
 
The foregoing Underwriting Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted by the Representative as of the date first above written.
Wells Fargo Securities, LLC
Acting as the Representative of the
several Underwriters named in
the attached Schedule A.
 
 
Accepted and agreed to as of the date
first above written
 
 
 
 
 
The information in this term sheet supplements Anixter's preliminary prospectus supplement, dated April 24, 2012 (the "Preliminary Prospectus Supplement") and supersedes the information in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement to the extent inconsistent with the information in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement. This term sheet is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement. Terms used herein but not defined herein shall have the respective meanings as set forth in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement.
Other financial information presented in the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement is deemed to have changed to the extent effected by the changes described herein.
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus and the prospectus supplement in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at . Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Wells Fargo Securities, LLC at the following number: (800) 326-5897 or by e-mailing a request to: or by calling by calling Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated at the following number: (800) 294-1322 or by e-mailing a request to: or by contacting J.P. Morgan, c/o Broadridge Financial Solutions, 1155 Long Island Avenue, Edgewood, New York 11717, or by calling: (866) 803-9204 or by calling RBS Securities Inc. at the following number: (866) 884 2071 or by calling UBS Securities LLC at the following number: (877) 827-6444, ext. 561 3884.
www.sec.gov
cmclientsupport@wellsfargo.com
dg.prospectus_requests@baml.com
None.
EXHIBIT A
1. Each of the Company and the Guarantor is a corporation validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
2. Each of the Company and the Guarantor has the corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under each of the Transaction Documents to which it is a party, and the execution, delivery and performance thereof by the Company and the Guarantor have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of each of the Company and the Guarantor.
3. The Underwriting Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantor.
4. The Indenture has been duly executed and delivered by each of the Company and the Guarantor, has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company and the Guarantor, enforceable against each of the Company and the Guarantor in accordance with its terms.
5. The form and terms of the Notes and Guarantees have been established in conformity with the provisions of the Indenture. The issuance and sale of the Notes and the Guarantees have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company and the Guarantor, respectively, all conditions precedent under the Indenture to the authentication of the Notes have been complied with, and the Notes and Guarantees, when executed and authenticated in accordance with the terms of the Indenture, and delivered to and paid for by you in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company and the Guarantor, respectively, entitled to the benefits of the Indenture and enforceable against the Company and the Guarantor in accordance with their respective terms.
6. The Notes, the Guarantees and the Indenture conform as to legal matters in all material respects to the descriptions thereof contained in the Base Prospectus under the heading "Description of Debt Securities" and in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus under the heading "Supplemental Description of the Notes," except that we express no opinion with respect to that portion of the description under the heading "Book-Entry Issuance."
7. The execution and delivery by the Company and the Guarantor of each of the Transaction Documents do not, and the performance by the Company and the Guarantor of their obligations under the Transaction Documents will not, (i) violate the Restated Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company or the Guarantor, (ii) violate any Applicable Law applicable to the Company or the Guarantor or (iii) breach or result in a default under any indenture, mortgage, instrument or agreement that is listed on Schedule I attached to this opinion letter.
8. Neither the execution and delivery by the Company or the Guarantor of any of the Transaction Documents nor the performance by the Company or the Guarantor of its obligations under the Transaction Documents requires any consent or approval from or filing with any governmental authority of the State of Illinois, the State of New York or the United States of America or under the Delaware General Corporation Law under any Applicable Law (other than filings under the Securities Act and regulations under the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, which have been made, and filings under the Exchange Act or as may be required under the securities or blue sky laws of the various states, as to which we express no opinion.)
9. The Registration Statement, as of the effective date of the Registration Statement, and the Prospectus, as of its date and the date hereof, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the regulations under the Securities Act.
10. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor is, or after receipt of payment for the Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus will be, an "investment company" within the meaning of Investment Company Act.
The Registration Statement became effective upon filing with the Commission pursuant to Rule 462(e) and we have been orally advised by the Commission that no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and, to the best of our knowledge, no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or threatened by the Commission. The Prospectus was filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(5) on April             , 2012.
In addition, we have participated in conferences with officers and representatives of the Company and the Guarantor, representatives of the independent registered public accounting firm of the Guarantor and you and your representatives at which the contents of the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and related matters were discussed and, although we are not passing upon, and do not assume any responsibility for, the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and have made no independent check or verification thereof (except as stated in paragraph 6 above), on the basis of the foregoing, no facts have come to our attention that have led us to believe that the Registration Statement (except for financial statements and schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which we make no statement), at the time it became effective, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or that the Disclosure Package, as of the Applicable Time, or the Prospectus, as of its date or the date hereof (in each case, except for financial statements and schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which we make no statement), contained or contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT B
1. Each of the Company and the Guarantor has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
2. Each of the Company and the Guarantor has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and to enter into and perform its obligations under the Underwriting Agreement.
3. Each of the Company and the Guarantor is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except for such jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
4. Each Subsidiary of the Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own or lease, as the case may be, and to operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except for such jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
5. To the best of my knowledge, all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Subsidiary of the Guarantor has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and is owned by the Guarantor, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance or any pending or threatened claim.
6. The Guarantor's authorized equity capitalization is as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
7. No stockholder of the Company or the Guarantor or any other person has any preemptive right, right of first refusal or other similar right to subscribe for or purchase securities of the Company or the Guarantor arising (i) by operation of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company or the Guarantor or the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware or (ii) to the best of my knowledge, otherwise.
8. Each document filed pursuant to the Exchange Act (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules included therein, as to which I express no opinion) and incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus complied when so filed as to form in all material respects with the Exchange Act.
9. To the best of my knowledge, there are no legal or governmental actions, suits or proceedings pending or threatened which are required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, other than those disclosed therein or in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
10. The issue and sale of the Notes by the Company, the issuance of the Guarantee by the Guarantor, the execution delivery and performance by the Company and the Guarantor of the Indenture, the performance by each of the Company and the Guarantor of its obligations under the Underwriting Agreement (i) will not result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or bylaws of the Company, the Guarantor or any subsidiary; (ii) will not constitute a breach of, or Default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company, the Guarantor or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to any agreement listed on Schedule I hereto; (iii) will not constitute a breach of, or Default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company, the Guarantor or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to any other Existing Instrument known to me (except, with respect to this clause (iii) only, for such breaches, Defaults, liens, charges or encumbrances as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect); or (iii) will not result in any violation of any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any judgment, order or decree known by me to be applicable to the Company, the Guarantor or any of its Subsidiaries issued by any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company, the Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their properties.
11. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor is, or after receipt of payment for the Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus will be, an "investment company" within the meaning of Investment Company Act.
12. Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and Prospectus, to the best of my knowledge, there are no persons with registration or other similar rights to have any equity or debt securities registered for sale under the Registration Statement or included in the offering contemplated by the Underwriting Agreement.
13. To the best of my knowledge, neither the Company nor the Guarantor nor any Subsidiary (i) is in violation of its charter or by-laws or (ii) is in Default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any material Existing Instrument, except, with respect to this clause (ii) only, for such Defaults as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
In addition, in my capacity as Associate General Counsel of the Company and the Guarantor, no facts have come to my attention that have led me to believe (i) that the Registration Statement, at the time it became effective, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, not misleading, except that I express no opinion or belief with respect to the financial statements, schedules and other financial data included therein, or (ii) that the Disclosure Package, as of the Applicable Time, and the Prospectus, as of its date or as of the date hereof, contained or contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that I express no opinion or belief with respect to the financial statements, schedules thereto and other financial data included therein.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
N.A. means not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
, dated as of April 30, 2012, by and among , a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (the "Company"), , a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware and the parent corporation of the Company (the "Guarantor"), and , a national banking association, as Trustee (the "Trustee").
INDENTURE
ANIXTER INC.
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
A. The Company has duly authorized the execution and delivery of this Indenture to provide for the issuance from time to time of its unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness (the "Securities"), to be issued in one or more series unlimited as to principal amount, to bear such rates of interest, to mature at such times and to have such other provisions as in this Indenture provided.
B. All things necessary to make this Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, in accordance with its terms, have been done.
A. The Company is a direct subsidiary of the Guarantor and the Guarantor desires to make the Guarantee provided for herein.
B. All things necessary to make this Indenture a valid agreement of the Guarantor, in accordance with its terms, have been done.
That, in order to declare the terms and conditions upon which the Securities are authenticated, issued and delivered, and in consideration of the premises and the purchase of the Securities by the Holders (as defined herein) thereof, the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee covenant and agree with each other, for the benefit of each other and of all Holders from time to time of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 101.
Definitions
.
For all purposes of this Indenture and of any supplemental indenture hereto, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) the terms defined in this Article have the meanings assigned to them in this Article and include the plural as well as the singular;
(2) all other terms used herein which are defined in the Trust Indenture Act (as defined herein), either directly or by reference therein, have the meanings assigned to them therein;
(3) all accounting terms not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in accordance with GAAP;
(4) the words "herein," "hereof" and "hereunder" and other words of similar import refer to this Indenture as a whole and not to any particular Article, Section or other subdivision;
(5) the word "or" is not exclusive;
(6) the word "including" means including without limitation; and
(7) words in the singular include the plural and words in the plural include the singular.
"Act," when used with respect to any Holder, has the meaning specified in .
Section 104
"Affiliate" of any specified Person means any other Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with the specified Person. For the purposes of this definition, "control" when used with respect to any specified Person means the power to direct the management and policies of that Person, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise; and the terms "controlling" and "controlled" have meanings correlative to the foregoing.
"Applicable Procedures" means, with respect to any payment, tender, redemption, transfer or exchange of or for beneficial interests in any Global Security, the rules and procedures of the Depositary that apply to such payment, tender, redemption, transfer or exchange.
"Authenticating Agent" means any Person authorized by the Trustee pursuant to to act on behalf of the Trustee to authenticate Securities of one or more series.
Section 613
"Authorized Newspaper" means a newspaper in an official language of the country of publication or in the English language, customarily published on each Business Day, whether or not published on Saturdays, Sundays or holidays, and of general circulation in the applicable city or country. Where successive publications are required to be made in Authorized Newspapers, the successive publications may be made in the same or in different newspapers meeting the foregoing requirements and in each case on any Business Day.
"Bearer Security" means any Security in the form established pursuant to which is payable to bearer.
Section 201
"Board of Directors" means either the board of directors of the Company or any duly authorized committee thereof and, with respect to the Guarantor, either the board of directors of the Guarantor or any duly authorized committee thereof.
 
"Board Resolution" means a copy of a resolution delivered to the Trustee that is certified by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Guarantor to have been duly adopted by the applicable Board of Directors and to be in full force and effect on the date of such certification.
"Business Day" when used with respect to any Place of Payment, means each Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday and Friday that is not a day on which banking institutions in the Place of Payment are authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close.
"Capital Stock" means, with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interests, participations or other equivalents (however designated, whether voting or non-voting) in equity of such Person, whether outstanding on the date of the Indenture or issued thereafter, including, without limitation, all common stock and preferred stock.
"Commission" means the Securities and Exchange Commission, as from time to time constituted, created under the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or if at any time after the execution of this instrument such Commission is not existing and performing the duties now assigned to it under the Trust Indenture Act, then the body performing such duties on such date.
"Company" means the Person named as the "Company" in the first paragraph of this Indenture until a successor Person shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter "Company" shall mean such successor Person.
"Company Request" or "Company Order" means a written request or order delivered to the Trustee that is signed in the name of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, its President or any Vice President, and by its Treasurer, any Assistant Treasurer, its Controller, any Assistant Controller, its Secretary or any Assistant Secretary.
"Consolidated Net Tangible Assets" means, in each case, with respect to the Guarantor (a) the total amount of assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) after deducting therefrom (i) all liabilities and liability items, except for indebtedness payable by its terms more than one year from the date of incurrence thereof (or renewable or extendable at the option of the obligor for a period ending more than one year after such date of incurrence), capitalized rent, capital stock (including redeemable preferred stock) and surplus, surplus reserves and deferred income taxes and credits and other non-current liabilities, and (ii) all goodwill, trade names, trademarks, patents, unamortized debt discount, unamortized expenses incurred in the issuance of debt, and other like intangibles which, in each case, under generally accepted accounting principles in effect on the date of the Indenture would be included on a consolidated balance sheet of the Guarantor and its Restricted Subsidiaries, less (b) loans, advances, equity investments and guarantees (other than accounts receivable arising from the sale of merchandise in the ordinary course of business) at the time outstanding that were made or incurred by the Guarantor and its Restricted Subsidiaries to, in or for Unrestricted Subsidiaries or to, in or for corporations while they were Restricted Subsidiaries and which at the time of computation are Unrestricted Subsidiaries.
 
"Corporate Trust Office" means the office of the Trustee at which at any particular time its corporate trust business in relation to this Indenture shall be principally administered, which office at the date of execution of this Indenture is located at Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, 230 W. Monroe Street, Suite 2900, Chicago, IL 60606, Attn: Corporate Trust Services, and for purposes of Section 305 and Section 307 such office shall also mean the office or agency of the Trustee located at 608 Second Avenue South, N9303-121, Minneapolis, MN 55479, Attn: Corporate Trust Operations.
"Corporation" means a corporation, association, company, limited liability company, joint-stock company or business trust.
"default" has the meaning specified in .
Section 601
"Defaulted Interest" has the meaning specified in .
Section 307
"defeasance" has the meaning specified in .
Section 1302
"Depositary" means, with respect to the Securities of any series issuable or issued in whole or in part in the form of one or more Global Securities, the Person designated as Depositary by the Company pursuant to .
Section 301
"Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
"Event of Default" has the meaning specified in .
Section 501
"Funded Debt" means all indebtedness for borrowed money having a maturity of more than 12 months from the date as of which the amount thereof is to be determined; it being understood that debt outstanding under a revolving credit or similar agreement which may be borrowed, repaid and reborrowed (and reimbursement obligations relating to letters of credit) shall not constitute Funded Debt.
"GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States as of the date or time of any computation hereunder.
"Global Security" means a Security evidencing all or part of a series of Securities, issued to the Depositary for such series or its nominee, and registered in the name of such Depositary or nominee.
"Global Security Registered Owner" has the meaning given it in .
Section 305
"Guarantee" means the guarantee of the Guarantor set forth in .
Section 1501
"Guarantor" means the Person named as the "Guarantor" in the first paragraph of this Indenture until a successor corporation shall become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter "Guarantor" shall mean such successor corporation.
"Holder" means a Person in whose name a Security is registered in the Security Register.
 
"Indenture" means this instrument as originally executed or as it may from time to time be supplemented or amended by one or more indentures supplemental hereto entered into pursuant to the applicable provisions hereof. The term "Indenture" shall also include the terms of particular series of Securities established as contemplated by , whether or not a supplemental indenture is entered into with respect thereto.
Section 301
"Interest," when used with respect to an Original Issue Discount Security which by its terms bears interest only after Maturity, means interest payable after Maturity.
"Interest Payment Date," when used with respect to any Security, means the Stated Maturity of an installment of interest on such Security.
"Maturity," when used with respect to any Security, means the date on which the principal of such Security or an installment of principal becomes due and payable as therein or herein provided, whether at the Stated Maturity or by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption, occurrence of any Repurchase Date or otherwise.
"Officers' Certificate" means a certificate delivered to the Trustee that is signed by the Company's Chairman of the Board, its President or any Vice President, and by its Treasurer, any Assistant Treasurer, its Controller, any Assistant Controller, its Secretary or any Assistant Secretary.
"Opinion of Counsel" means a written opinion of counsel from counsel for the Company or the Guarantor (who may be an employee of the Company or the Guarantor).
"Original Issue Discount Security" means any Security which provides for an amount less than the principal amount thereof to be due and payable upon a declaration of acceleration of the Maturity thereof pursuant to .
Section 502
"Outstanding," when used with respect to any series of Securities, means, as of the date of determination, all Securities of that series which are authenticated and delivered under this Indenture, except:
(i) Securities of that series previously canceled by the Trustee or delivered to the Trustee for cancellation;
(ii) Securities of that series for whose payment or redemption money in the necessary amount has been previously deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent (other than the Company) in trust or set aside and segregated in trust by the Company (if the Company shall act as its own Paying Agent) for the Holders of such Securities; that, if such Securities are to be redeemed, notice of such redemption has been duly given pursuant to this Indenture or provision therefor satisfactory to the Trustee has been made; and
provided
(iii) Securities of that series which have been paid pursuant to or in exchange for or in lieu of which other Securities have been authenticated and delivered pursuant to this Indenture, other than any such Securities in respect of which there shall have been presented to the Trustee proof satisfactory to it that such Securities are held by a bona fide purchaser in whose hands such Securities are valid obligations of the Company;
Section 306
 
, , that in determining whether the Holders of the requisite principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series have given any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent or waiver hereunder, (A) the principal amount of an Original Issue Discount Security that shall be deemed to be Outstanding shall be the amount of the principal thereof that would be due and payable as of the date of such determination upon acceleration of the Maturity thereof pursuant to , (B) the principal amount of a Security denominated in one or more foreign currencies or currency units shall be the U.S. dollar equivalent, determined in the manner provided for such Security on the date of original issuance thereof, as contemplated by , of the principal of original issuance of such Security of the amount determined as provided in (A) above) of such Security, and (C) Securities owned by the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities or any Affiliate of the Company or of such other obligor shall be disregarded and deemed not to be Outstanding, except that, in determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying upon any such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent or waiver, only Securities which the Trustee actually knows to be so owned shall be so disregarded. Notwithstanding the foregoing clause (C), Securities so owned by the Company, such obligor, or such Affiliate that have been pledged in good faith may be regarded as Outstanding if the pledgee establishes to the satisfaction of the Trustee the pledgee's right so to act with respect to such Securities so long as the pledgee is not the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities or an Affiliate of the Company or of such other obligor.
provided
however
Section 502
Section 301
"Paying Agent" means any Person authorized by the Company to pay the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Securities on behalf of the Company.
"Person" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, trust, unincorporated organization or any other entity or government or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
"Place of Payment," when used with respect to the Securities of any series, means such city or political subdivision thereof where the principal of, premium (if any), and interest on the Securities of that series are payable as specified for such Securities as contemplated by .
Section 301
"Predecessor Security" of any particular Security means every previous Security evidencing all or a portion of the same debt as that evidenced by such particular Security; and, for the purposes of this definition, any Security authenticated and delivered under in exchange for or in lieu of a mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be deemed to evidence the same debt as the mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security.
Section 306
"Principal Facility" means any land, building, machinery or equipment, or leasehold interests and improvements in respect of the foregoing, owned, on the date of the Indenture or thereafter, by the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, which has a gross book value (without deduction for any depreciation reserves) at the date as of which the determination is being made of in excess of one percent of the Consolidated Net Tangible Assets, other than any such land, building, machinery or equipment, or leasehold interests and improvements in
 
respect of the foregoing which, in the opinion of the Board of Directors of the Guarantor (evidenced by a Board Resolution), is not of material importance to the business conducted by the Guarantor and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Redemption Date," when used with respect to any Security to be redeemed, means the date fixed for such redemption by or pursuant to this Indenture.
"Redemption Price," when used with respect to any Security to be redeemed, means the price at which it is to be redeemed pursuant to this Indenture.
"Registered Security" means any Security established pursuant to which is registered in the Security Register.
Section 201
"Regular Record Date" for the interest payable on any Interest Payment Date on the Securities of any series payable on the first day of any month means the fifteenth day (whether or not a Business Day) of the calendar month next preceding the month during which such Interest Payment Date occurs or if any Interest Payment Date shall occur on the fifteenth day of a month in respect of any series of Securities, means the first day (whether or not a Business Day) of the calendar month during which such Interest Payment Date occurs, or such other date with respect to Securities of any series specified as contemplated by .
Section 301
"Repurchase Date," when used with respect to any Security of any series to be repurchased, means the date, if any, fixed for such repurchase pursuant to .
Section 301
"Repurchase Price," when used with respect to any Security of any series to be repurchased, means the price, if any, at which such Security is to be repurchased pursuant to .
Section 301
"Responsible Officer," when used with respect to the Trustee, means the Chairman of the Board of Directors, the President, any Vice President, the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary, the Treasurer, any Assistant Treasurer or any other officer or assistant officer of the Trustee customarily performing functions similar to those performed by the persons who at the time shall be such officers as are assigned by the Trustee to administer this Indenture, respectively, or any other officer to whom any corporate trust matter is referred at the Trustee's Corporate Trust Office because of that person's knowledge of and familiarity with the particular subject.
"Restricted Subsidiary" means (a) any Subsidiary other than an Unrestricted Subsidiary and (b) any Subsidiary that was an Unrestricted Subsidiary but which, subsequent to the date of the Indenture, is designated by the Guarantor and the Company (evidenced by a resolution of their respective Boards of Directors) to be a Restricted Subsidiary; , that the Guarantor and the Company may not designate any such Subsidiary to be a Restricted Subsidiary if the Guarantor or the Company would thereby breach any covenant or agreement contained herein (on the assumption that any transaction to which such Subsidiary was a party at the time of such designation and which would have given rise to Secured Debt or Senior Funded Debt or constituted a Sale and Leaseback Transaction at the time it was entered into had such Subsidiary then been a Restricted Subsidiary was entered into at the time of such designation).
provided, however
 
"Sale and Leaseback Transaction" means any sale or transfer made by the Guarantor, the Company or one or more Restricted Subsidiaries (except a sale or transfer made to the Guarantor, the Company or one or more Restricted Subsidiaries) of any Principal Facility that (in the case of a Principal Facility which is a building or equipment) has been in operation, use or commercial production (exclusive of test and start-up periods) by the Guarantor, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary for more than 180 days prior to such sale or transfer, or that (in the case of a Principal Facility that is a parcel of real property not containing a building) has been owned by the Guarantor, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary for more than 180 days prior to such sale or transfer, if such sale or transfer is made with the intention of leasing, or as part of an arrangement involving the lease of such Principal Facility to the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary (except a lease for a period not exceeding 36 months made with the intention that the use of the leased Principal Facility by the Guarantor, the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary will be discontinued on or before the expiration of such period); , , that the creation of any Secured Debt permitted under shall not be deemed to create or be considered a Sale and Leaseback Transaction.
provided
however
Section 1005
"Secured Debt" means any indebtedness for money borrowed by, or evidenced by a note or other similar instrument of, the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, and any other indebtedness of the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary on which, by the terms of such indebtedness, interest is paid or payable, including obligations evidenced or secured by leases, installment sales agreements or other instruments (other than indebtedness owed by a Restricted Subsidiary to the Guarantor or the Company, or by a Restricted Subsidiary to another Restricted Subsidiary, or by the Guarantor or the Company to a Restricted Subsidiary), which in any such case is secured by (a) a Security Interest in any property or assets of the Guarantor, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary, or (b) a Security Interest in any shares of stock owned directly or indirectly by the Guarantor or the Company in a Restricted Subsidiary or in indebtedness for money borrowed by a Restricted Subsidiary from the Guarantor, the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary. The securing in the foregoing manner of any previously unsecured debt shall be deemed to be the creation of Secured Debt at the time such security is given. The amount of Secured Debt at any time outstanding shall be the aggregate amount then owing thereon by the Guarantor, the Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries.
"Securities" has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Indenture and more particularly means any Securities of any series authenticated and delivered under this Indenture, including any coupons attached thereto.
"Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
"Security Interest" means any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance or other security interest which secures payment or performance of an obligation.
"Security Register" and "Security Registrar" have the respective meanings specified in .
Section 305
"Senior Funded Debt" means any obligation of the Guarantor, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary which constituted Funded Debt as of the date of its creation and that, in the case of such Funded Debt of the Guarantor and the Company, is not subordinate and junior in right of payment to the prior payment of the Securities.
 
"Special Record Date" for the payment of any Defaulted Interest means a date fixed by the Company pursuant to .
Section 307
"Stated Maturity," when used with respect to any Security or any installment of principal thereof or interest thereon, means the date specified in such Security as the fixed date on which the principal of such Security or such installment of principal or interest is due and payable.
"Subsidiary" means a corporation, association, partnership or other entity of which more than 50% of the outstanding Voting Stock is owned, directly or indirectly, by the Guarantor, the Company or by one or more other Subsidiaries, or by the Guarantor, the Company and one or more other Subsidiaries.
"Trust Indenture Act" means the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, as in force at the date as of which this instrument is qualified (to the extent required by law) under such act, except as provided by .
Section 905
"Trustee" means the Person named as the "Trustee" in the first paragraph of this instrument until a successor Trustee shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter "Trustee" shall mean or include each Person who is then a Trustee hereunder, and if at any time there is more than one such Person, "Trustee" as used with respect to the Securities of any series shall mean the Trustee with respect to Securities of that series.
"United States" means the United States of America (including the States and the District of Columbia), its territories and possessions and other areas subject to its jurisdiction.
"Unrestricted Subsidiary" means (a) any Subsidiary acquired or organized after the date of the Indenture, , , that such Subsidiary is not a successor, directly or indirectly, to, and does not directly or indirectly own any equity interest in, any Restricted Subsidiary, (b) any Subsidiary the principal business and assets of which are located outside the United States, (c) any Subsidiary the principal business of which consists of financing the acquisition or disposition of machinery, equipment, inventory, accounts receivable and other real, personal and intangible property by Persons including the Guarantor, the Company or a Subsidiary, (d) any Subsidiary the principal business of which is owning, leasing, dealing in or developing real property for residential or office building purposes, and (e) any Subsidiary substantially all the assets of which consist of stock or other securities of an Unrestricted Subsidiary or Unrestricted Subsidiaries of the character described in clauses (a) through (d) of this paragraph, unless and until, in each of the cases specified in this paragraph, any such Subsidiary shall have been designated to be a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to clause (b) of the definition of "Restricted Subsidiary."
provided
however
"U.S. Government Obligations" means securities that are (x) direct obligations of the United States of America for the payment of which its full faith and credit is pledged or (y) obligations of a Person controlled or supervised by and acting as an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, the payment of which is unconditionally guaranteed as a full faith
 
and credit obligation by the United States of America, which, in either case, are not callable or redeemable at the option of the issuer thereof, and shall also include a depository receipt issued by a bank (as defined in Section 3(a)(2) of the Securities Act) as custodian with respect to any such U.S. Government Obligation or a specific payment of principal of or interest on any such U.S. Government Obligation held by such custodian for the account of the holder of such depository receipt, that (except as required by law) such custodian is not authorized to make any deduction from the amount payable to the holder of such depository receipt from any amount received by the custodian in respect of the U.S. Government Obligation or the specific payment of principal of or interest on the U.S. Government Obligation evidenced by such depository receipt.
provided
"value" has the meaning specified in .
Section 1005
"Vice President" when used with respect to the Trustee means any vice president, whether or not designated by a number or a word or words added before or after the title "vice president," and when used with respect to the Company means any vice president who is an officer of the Company, whether or not designated by a number or word or words before such title.
"Voting Stock" means with respect to any Person, Capital Stock of any class or kind ordinarily having the power to vote for the election of directors, managers or other voting members of the governing body of such Person.
SECTION 102.
Compliance Certificates and Opinions
.
Upon any application or request by the Company to the Trustee to take any action under any provision of this Indenture, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate stating that all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture relating to the proposed action have been complied with and an Opinion of Counsel stating that in the opinion of such counsel all such conditions precedent, if any, have been complied with, except that in the case of any such application or request as to which the furnishing of such documents is specifically required by any provision of this Indenture relating to such particular application or request, no additional certificate or opinion need be furnished.
Every certificate or opinion with respect to compliance with a condition or covenant provided for in this Indenture shall include:
(1) a statement that each individual signing such certificate or opinion has read such covenant or condition and the definitions herein relating thereto;
(2) a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinions contained in such certificate or opinion are based;
(3) a statement that, in the opinion of each such individual, he or she has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable him or her to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and
 
(4) a statement as to whether, in the opinion of each such individual, such condition or covenant has been complied with.
SECTION 103.
Form of Documents Delivered to Trustee
.
In any case where several matters are required to be certified by, or covered by an opinion of, any specified Person, it is not necessary that all such matters be certified by, or covered by the opinion of, only one such Person, or that they be so certified or covered by only one document, but one such Person may certify or give an opinion with respect to some matters and one or more other such Persons as to other matters, and any such Person may certify or give an opinion as to such matters in one or several documents.
Any certificate or opinion of an officer of the Company may be based, insofar as it relates to legal matters, upon a certificate or opinion of, or representations by, counsel, unless such officer knows that the certificate or opinion or representations with respect to the matters upon which such officer's certificate or opinion is based are erroneous. Any such certificate or Opinion of Counsel may be based, insofar as it relates to factual matters or information which is in the possession of the Company, upon a certificate or opinion of, or representations by, an officer or officers of the Company, unless such counsel knows that the certificate or opinion or representations with respect to such matters are erroneous. Any Opinion of Counsel may be stated to be based on the opinion of other counsel, in which event it shall be accompanied by a copy of such other opinion.
Where any Person is required to make, give or execute two or more applications, requests, consents, certificates, statements, opinions or other instruments under this Indenture, they may, but need not, be consolidated and form one instrument.
SECTION 104.
Acts of Holders; Record Dates
.
(a) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action provided by this Indenture to be given or taken by Holders may be embodied in and evidenced by one or more instruments of substantially similar tenor signed by such Holders in person or by agent duly appointed in writing; and, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, such action shall become effective when such instrument or instruments are delivered to the Trustee and, where it is expressly hereby required, to the Company. Such instrument or instruments (and the action embodied therein and evidenced thereby) are herein sometimes referred to as the "Act" of the Holders signing such instrument or instruments. Proof of execution of any such instrument or of a writing appointing any such agent shall be sufficient for any purpose of this Indenture and (subject to Section 315 of the Trust Indenture Act) conclusive in favor of the Trustee and the Company, if made in the manner provided in this Section.
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, a Holder, including a Depositary that is a Holder of a Global Security, may make, give or take, by a proxy, or proxies, duly appointed in writing, any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action provided or permitted by this Indenture to be made, given or taken by Holders, and a Depositary that is a Holder of a Global Security may provide its proxy or proxies to the beneficial owners of interest in any such Global Security.
 
(b) The fact and date of the execution of any such instrument or writing, and the authority of the Person executing the same, may be proved in any other manner that the Trustee deems sufficient.
(c) Except as specifically provided otherwise pursuant to with respect to any series of Securities, the Company may set any day as the record date for the purpose of determining the Holders of Securities of any series entitled to give or take any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action, or to vote on any action, authorized or permitted to be given or taken by Holders of Securities of such series. With regard to any record date set pursuant to this Subsection (c), the Holders of Outstanding Securities of the relevant series on such record date (or their duly appointed agents), and only such Persons, shall be entitled to give or take the relevant action, whether or not such Holders remain Holders after such record date. With regard to any action that may be given or taken hereunder only by Holders of a requisite principal amount of Outstanding Securities of any series (or their duly appointed agents) and for which a record date is set pursuant to this Subsection (c), the Company may, at its option, set an expiration date after which no such action purported to be given or taken by any Holder shall be effective hereunder unless given or taken on or prior to such expiration date by Holders of the requisite principal amounts of Outstanding Securities of such series on such record date (or their duly appointed agents). On or prior to any expiration date set pursuant to this Subsection (c), the Company may, on one or more occasions at its option, extend such date to any later date. Nothing in this Subsection (c) shall prevent any Holder (or any duly appointed agent thereof) from giving or taking, after any expiration date, any action identical to, or, at any time, contrary to or different from any action given or taken, or purported to have been given or taken, hereunder by a Holder on or prior to such date, in which event the Company may set a record date in respect thereof pursuant to this Subsection (c).
Section 301
(d) The ownership of Registered Securities shall be proved by the Security Register.
(e) The principal amount and serial numbers of Bearer Securities held by any Person, and the date of holding the same, may be proved by the production of such Bearer Securities or by a certificate executed, as depositary, by any trust company, bank, banker or other depositary reasonably acceptable to the Company, wherever situated, if such certificate shall be deemed by the Trustee to be satisfactory, showing that at the date therein mentioned such Person had on deposit with such depositary, or exhibited to it, the Bearer Securities therein described; or such facts may be proved by the certificate or affidavit of the Person holding such Bearer Securities, if such certificate or affidavit is deemed by the Trustee to be satisfactory. The Trustee and the Company may assume that such ownership of any Bearer Security continues until (1) another certificate or affidavit bearing a later date issued in respect of the same Bearer Security is produced, or (2) such Bearer Security is produced to the Trustee by some other Person or (3) such Bearer Security is surrendered in exchange for a Registered Security, or (4) such Bearer Security is no longer Outstanding. The principal amount and serial numbers of Bearer Securities held by the Person so executing such instrument or writing and the date of holding the same may also be proved in any other manner which the Trustee deems sufficient.
(f) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act of the Holder of any Security shall bind every future Holder of the same Security and the
 
Holder of every Security issued upon the registration of transfer thereof or in exchange thereof or in lieu thereof in respect of anything done, omitted or suffered to be done by the Trustee, any Security Registrar, any Paying Agent, any Authenticating Agent, or the Company in reliance thereon, whether or not notation of such action is made upon such Security.
SECTION 105.
Notices, Etc., to Trustee, Company and Guarantor
.
Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or Act of Holders or other document provided or permitted by this Indenture to be made upon, given or furnished to, or filed with,
(1) the Trustee by any Holder or by the Company shall be sufficient for every purpose hereunder if made, given, furnished or filed in writing to or with the Trustee at its Corporate Trust Office, Attention: Corporate Trust Services, or at such other address as previously furnished in writing to the Holders and the Company by the Trustee for such purpose, or
(2) the Company or the Guarantor by the Trustee or by any Holder shall be sufficient for every purpose hereunder (unless otherwise herein expressly provided) if in writing and mailed, registered or certified mail postage prepaid, or delivered by nationally recognized overnight delivery service guaranteeing next day delivery, in the case of the Company, to the Company addressed to it at 2301 Patriot Boulevard, Glenview, Illinois 60026-8020, Attn: Secretary, or at such other address as previously furnished in writing to the Trustee by the Company for such purpose and, in the case of the Guarantor, to the Guarantor addressed to it at 2301 Patriot Boulevard, Glenview, Illinois 60026-8020, Attn: Secretary, or at such other address as previously furnished in writing to the Trustee by the Guarantor for such purpose.
SECTION 106.
Notice to Holders; Waiver
.
Except as otherwise provided in any supplemental indenture with respect to Holders of Securities of any series issued pursuant to such supplemental indenture, where this Indenture provides for notice to Holders of any event:
(1) such notice shall be sufficiently given (unless otherwise herein expressly provided) if in writing and mailed, first-class postage prepaid, to each Holder of the Registered Securities affected by such event, at such Holder's address as it appears in the Security Register, not later than the latest date (if any), and not earlier than the earliest date (if any), prescribed for the giving of such notice, and
(2) such notice shall be sufficiently given to Holders of Bearer Securities, if any, if published in an Authorized Newspaper in The City of New York and if the Securities of such series are then listed on any stock exchange outside the United States, in an Authorized Newspaper in such city as the Company shall advise the Trustee that such stock exchange so requires, on a Business Day at least twice, the first such publication to be not earlier than the earliest date and not later than the latest date prescribed for the giving of such notice.
 
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture or any Security, where this Indenture or any Security provides for notice of any event (including any notice of redemption or repurchase) to a Holder of a Global Security (whether by mail or otherwise), such notice shall be sufficiently given if given to the Depositary (or its designee) pursuant to the standing instructions from the Depositary or its designee, including by electronic mail in accordance with Applicable Procedures.
In any case where notice to Holders is given by mail, neither the failure to mail such notice, nor any defect in any notice so mailed, to any particular Holder shall affect the sufficiency of such notice with respect to other Holders. Any notice mailed to the Holder in the manner herein prescribed shall be conclusively deemed to have been received by such Holder, whether or not such Holder actually receives such notice. In case by reason of the suspension of regular mail service or by reason of any other cause it shall be impracticable to give such notice by mail, then such notification as shall be made with the approval of the Trustee shall constitute a sufficient notification for every purpose hereunder.
In case by reason of the suspension of publication of any Authorized Newspaper or Authorized Newspapers or by reason of any other cause it shall be impracticable to publish any notice to Holder of Bearer Securities as provided above, then such notification to Holders of Bearer Securities as the Company shall reasonably determine shall constitute sufficient notice to such Holders for every purpose hereunder. Neither failure to give notice by publication to Holders of Bearer Securities as provided above, nor any defect in any notice so published, shall affect the sufficiency of any notice mailed to Holders or Registered Securities as provided above.
Where this Indenture provides for notice in any manner, such notice may be waived in writing by the Person entitled to receive such notice, either before or after the event, and such waiver shall be the equivalent of such notice. Waivers of notice by Holders shall be filed with the Trustee, but such filing shall not be a condition precedent to the validity of any action taken in reliance upon such waiver.
SECTION 107.
Language of Notices
.
Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, election or waiver required or permitted under this Indenture shall be in the English language, except that, if the Company so elects, any published notice may be in an official language of the country of publication.
SECTION 108.
Applicability of Trust Indenture Act
.
If any provision hereof limits, qualifies or conflicts with any duties under any required provision of the Trust Indenture Act deemed included herein by Section 318(c) thereof, such required provision shall control.
SECTION 109.
Effect of Headings and Table of Contents
.
The Article and Section headings herein and the Table of Contents are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
 
SECTION 110.
Successors and Assigns
.
All covenants and agreements in this Indenture by the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee shall bind their respective successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 111.
Separability Clause
.
In case any provision in this Indenture or in the Securities of any series shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 112.
Benefits of Indenture
.
Nothing in this Indenture or in the Securities, express or implied, shall give to any Person, other than the parties hereto, any Security Registrar, any Paying Agent, any Authenticating Agent, and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit or any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Indenture.
SECTION 113.
Governing Law; Jury Trial Waiver
.
This Indenture and the Securities shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to the conflict of laws principals thereof. EACH OF THE COMPANY, THE GUARANTOR, AND THE TRUSTEE, AND BY ITS ACCEPTANCE THEREOF, EACH HOLDER OF A SECURITY, HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE SECURITIES, THE GUARANTEE OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
SECTION 114.
Legal Holidays
.
In any case where any Interest Payment Date, Redemption Date, Repurchase Date, sinking fund payment date or Stated Maturity or Maturity of any Security of any series or any date by which any report or other information is due pursuant to any provision of this Indenture shall not be a Business Day, then (notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture or such Securities) payment of interest or principal (and premium, if any) or delivery of such report or information need not be made on or by such date, but may be made on the next succeeding Business Day with the same force and effect (a) with respect to any payment, as if made on the Interest Payment Date, Repurchase Date or Redemption Date, sinking fund payment date or at the Stated Maturity or Maturity, and (b) with respect to any such report or other information, as if delivered by the stated due date. No interest shall accrue for the period from and after such Interest Payment Date, Redemption Date, Repurchase Date, sinking fund payment date or Stated Maturity or Maturity, as the case may be, to such next succeeding Business Day.
SECTION 115.
Execution in Counterparts
.
This Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original; but such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument. The
 
exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
SECTION 116.
Patriot Act.
The Company and the Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledge that in accordance with Section 326 of the U.S.A. PATRIOT Act, the Trustee, like all financial institutions and in order to help fight the funding of terrorism and money laundering, is required to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies each person or legal entity that establishes a relationship or opens an account with the Trustee. The parties to this Indenture agree that they will provide the Trustee with such information as it may request in order for the Trustee to satisfy the requirements of the U.S.A. PATRIOT Act.
SECTION 201.
Forms Generally
.
The Securities of each series shall be in substantially the form as shall be established without the approval of any Holders by or pursuant to one or more Board Resolutions in accordance with or in one or more indentures supplemental hereto, in each case, including without limitation such appropriate legends, insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as are required or are not prohibited by this Indenture, and may have such letters, numbers or other marks of identification and such legends or endorsements placed thereon as the Company may deem appropriate and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Indenture, or as necessary or appropriate to comply with any law or with any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto or with any rules or regulations of any securities exchange on which such series of Securities may be listed, or to conform to general usage, or as may, consistently herewith, be determined by the officers executing such Securities, as evidenced by their execution of such Securities.
Section 301
SECTION 202.
Securities in Global Form
.
If Securities of a series are Global Securities, any such Global Security may provide that it shall represent the aggregate amount of Outstanding Securities from time to time endorsed thereon and may also provide that the aggregate amount of Outstanding Securities represented thereby may from time to time be reduced to reflect exchanges. Any endorsement of a Global Security to reflect the amount, or any increase or decrease in the amount, or changes in the rights of Holders, of Outstanding Securities represented thereby shall be made in such manner and by such Person or Persons as shall be specified therein. Any instructions by the Company with respect to a Global Security shall be in writing but need not comply with .
Section 102
 
Unless otherwise provided as contemplated by with respect to any series of Securities, the Securities of each series shall be issuable in registered form without coupons. If so provided as contemplated by , the Securities of a series shall also be issuable in bearer form, with or without interest coupons attached.
Section 301
Section 301
The definitive Securities of each series shall be printed, lithographed or engraved on steel engraved borders or may be produced in any other manner, all as determined by the officers executing such Securities, as evidenced by their execution of such Securities.
SECTION 203.
Form of Trustee's Certificate of Authentication
.
The Trustee's certificates of authentication shall be in substantially the following form:
This is one of the Securities of the series designated therein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
SECTION 301.
Amount Unlimited; Issuable in Series
.
The aggregate principal amount of Securities of all series which may be issued, executed, authenticated, delivered and Outstanding under this Indenture is unlimited.
The Securities may be issued in one or more series. There shall be established, without the approval of any Holders, by or pursuant to authority granted by one or more Board Resolutions and, subject to , there shall be set forth in an Officers' Certificate, or established in one or more indentures supplemental hereto, prior to the issuance of Securities of any series, any or all of the following, as applicable:
Section 303
(1) the title of the Securities of the series (which shall distinguish the Securities of such series from all other series of Securities);
(2) any limit upon the aggregate principal amount of the Securities of the series which may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture (except for Securities of the series authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Securities of the series pursuant to and except for any Securities of the series which, pursuant to , are deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered hereunder);
Section 304, 305, 306, 906, 1107 or 1405
Section 303
 
(3) if other than the Trustee, the identity of each Security Registrar and Paying Agent;
(4) the date or dates, or the method by which such date or dates are determined or extended, on which the principal and premium (if any) of the Securities of the series shall be payable;
(5) the rate or rates (which may be fixed or variable) at which the Securities of the series shall bear interest, or the method by which such rates will be determined, if any, the date or dates from which such interest shall accrue, the Interest Payment Dates on which any such interest shall be payable, or the method by which such date will be determined, and the basis upon which interest shall be calculated if other than that of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months;
(6) if other than the fifteenth calendar day of the month next preceding an Interest Payment Date occurring on the first of any month, or if other than the first calendar day of the month for any Interest Payment Date occurring on the fifteenth of that month, the Regular Record Date with respect to an Interest Payment Date;
(7) the place or places, if any, other than or in addition to the Corporate Trust Office, where the principal of, premium (if any), and interest on Securities of the series shall be payable;
(8) the period or periods within which, the price or prices at which, and the terms and conditions upon which Securities of the series may be redeemed, in whole or in part, at the option of the Company, if the Company is to have such option;
(9) the obligation, if any, of the Company to redeem, repay or purchase Securities of the series pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provisions or at the option of a Holder thereof and the period or periods within which, the price or prices at which, and the terms and conditions upon which Securities of the series shall be redeemed, repaid, or purchased, in whole or in part, pursuant to such obligation;
(10) if other than denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof, the denominations in which Securities of the series shall be issuable;
(11) if other than the currency of the United States of America, the currency, currencies or currency units in which payment of the principal, premium (if any), and interest on any Securities of the series shall be payable and the manner of determining the equivalent thereof in the currency of the United States of America for purposes of the definition of "Outstanding" in ;
Section 101
(12) if the amount of payments of principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Securities of the series may be determined with reference to an index, the manner in which such amounts shall be determined;
(13) if the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Securities of the series is to be payable, at the election of the Company or a Holder thereof, in one or more
 
currencies or currency units other than that or those in which the Securities are stated to be payable, the currency, currencies or currency units in which payment of the principal of, premium (if any), and interest on Securities of such series as to which such election is made shall be payable, and the periods within which and the terms and conditions upon which such election is to be made;
(14) if other than the principal amount thereof, the portion of the principal amount of Securities of the series which shall be payable upon declaration of acceleration of the Maturity thereof pursuant to or provable in bankruptcy pursuant to ;
Section 502
Sections 503 and 504
(15) the application, if any, of either or both of and to the Securities of the series;
Section 1302
Section 1303
(16) any addition to or change in the Events of Default with respect to the Securities of the series and any change in the right of the Trustee or the Holders to declare the principal of, premium (if any), and interest on, such Securities due and payable;
(17) any addition to or change in the covenants and definitions currently set forth in this Indenture or in the terms currently set forth in Article Eight or Article Ten;
(18) whether Securities of the series shall be issuable as Registered Securities, Bearer Securities (with or without coupons) or both; any restrictions applicable to the offer, sale or delivery of Bearer Securities and the terms, if any, upon which Bearer Securities of the series may be exchanged for Registered Securities of the series and vice versa;
(19) if and as applicable, that the Securities of the series shall be issuable in whole or in part in the form of one or more Global Securities and, in such case, the Depositary or Depositaries for such Global Security or Global Securities and any circumstances other than those set forth in in which any such Global Security may be transferred to, and registered and exchanged for Securities of the series registered in the name of, a Person other than the Depositary for such Global Security or nominee thereof, and in which any such transfer may be registered; and
Section 305
(20) any other terms of the series (which terms shall not be prohibited by the provisions of this Indenture, except as permitted by ).
Section 901(4)
All Securities of any one series shall be substantially identical except as to denomination and except as may otherwise be provided in or pursuant to the Board Resolution referred to above and (subject to ) set forth, or determined in the manner provided, in the Officers' Certificate referred to above or in any such indenture supplemental hereto. All Securities of any one series need not be issued at the same time. Unless otherwise provided, Securities within a single series may have different terms and a series may be reopened, without the consent of the Holders, for issuance of additional Securities of such series.
Section 303
 
If any of the terms of the series are established by action taken by or pursuant to one or more Board Resolutions, a copy of an appropriate record of such action(s) shall be certified by the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary of the Company and delivered to the Trustee at or prior to the delivery of the Officers' Certificate setting forth the terms of the Securities of such series.
SECTION 302.
Denominations
.
Unless otherwise specified pursuant to , the Securities of each series shall be issuable in registered form without coupons. In the absence of any contrary provisions with respect to the Securities of any series pursuant to , the Registered Securities of such series shall be issuable in denominations of $2,000 and any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof, and the Bearer Securities of such series, if any, shall be issuable in the denomination of $5,000.
Section 301
Section 301
SECTION 303.
Execution, Authentication, Delivery and Dating
.
The Securities shall be executed on behalf of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, its President, any of its Vice Presidents, the Treasurer or any Assistant Treasurer and attested by its Secretary or any of its Assistant Secretaries. The signature of any of these officers on the Securities may be manual or facsimile.
Securities bearing the manual or facsimile signatures of individuals who, at the time such manual or facsimile signatures were affixed to such Securities, were properly serving as such officers of the Company shall bind the Company, notwithstanding that such individuals or any of them have ceased to hold such offices prior to the authentication and delivery of such Securities or did not hold such offices at the date of such Securities.
At any time and from time to time after the execution and delivery of this Indenture, the Company may deliver Securities of any series executed by the Company to the Trustee for authentication, together with a Company Order for the authentication and delivery of such Securities, arid the Trustee in accordance with the Company Order shall authenticate and make available for delivery such Securities as provided in this Indenture. If the form or terms of the Securities of the series have been established in or pursuant to one or more Board Resolutions as permitted by , in authenticating such Securities, and accepting the additional responsibilities under this Indenture in relation to such Securities, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive, and (subject to Sections 315(a) through 315(d) of the Trust Indenture Act) shall be fully protected in relying upon,
Sections 201 and 301
 
 
 
 
 
(1) if the form of such Securities has been established by or pursuant to one or more Board Resolutions as permitted by , that such form has been established in conformity with the provisions of this Indenture;
Section 201
(2) if the terms of such Securities have been established by or pursuant to one or more Board Resolutions as permitted by , that such terms have been established in conformity with the provisions of this Indenture; and
Section 301
(3) that such Securities have been duly authorized and, when executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in accordance with the terms of this Indenture, and assuming due authentication thereof by the Trustee, and when such Securities are delivered and paid for by the purchaser thereof, will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company and the Guarantor enforceable against the Company and the Guarantor in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance or transfer, reorganization, moratorium and other laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles; , , that such Opinion of Counsel need express no opinion as to whether a court in the United States would render a money judgment in a currency other than that of the United States.
provided
however
If such form or terms have been so established, the Trustee shall not be required to authenticate such Securities if the issue of such Securities pursuant to this Indenture will affect the Trustee's own rights, duties or immunities under such Securities and this Indenture or otherwise in a manner which is not reasonably acceptable to the Trustee.
Notwithstanding the provisions of and of the preceding paragraph, if all Securities of any series are not to be originally issued at one time, it shall not be necessary to deliver the Officers' Certificate otherwise required pursuant to or a Company Order or an Opinion of Counsel otherwise required pursuant to such preceding paragraph at or prior to the time of authentication of each Security of such series if such documents are delivered at or prior to the authentication upon original issuance of the first Security of such series to be issued.
Section 301
Section 301
Each Security shall be dated and issued as of the date of its authentication.
No Security shall be entitled to any benefit under this Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose unless there appears on such Security a certificate of authentication substantially in the form provided for herein executed by the Trustee or its Authenticating Agent by manual signature, and such certificate upon any such Security shall be conclusive evidence, and the only evidence, that such Security has been duly authenticated and delivered hereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any such Security shall have been authenticated and delivered hereunder but never issued and sold by the Company, and the Company shall deliver such Security to the Trustee for cancellation as provided in , for all purposes of this Indenture such Security shall be deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered hereunder and shall never be entitled to the benefits of this Indenture.
Section 309
 
SECTION 304.
Temporary Securities
.
Pending the preparation of definitive Securities of any series, the Company may execute, and upon Company Order the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery, temporary Securities of that series which are printed, lithographed, typewritten, mimeographed or otherwise produced, in any authorized denomination, substantially of the tenor of the definitive Securities of that series in lieu of which they are issued and with such appropriate insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as the officers executing such Securities may determine, as evidenced by their execution of such Securities. In the case of Securities of any series, such temporary Securities may be in the form of Global Securities.
If temporary Securities of any series are issued, the Company will cause definitive Securities of that series to be prepared without unreasonable delay. After the preparation of definitive Securities of such series, the temporary Securities of such series shall be exchangeable, subject to hereof, for definitive Securities of such series upon surrender of the temporary Securities of such series at the office or agency of the Company in a Place of Payment for that series, without charge to the Holder. Upon surrender for cancellation of any one or more temporary Securities of any series, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery in exchange therefor one or more definitive Securities of the same series, of any authorized denominations and of a like aggregate principal amount and tenor. Until so exchanged the temporary Securities of any series shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as definitive Securities of such series and tenor.
Section 305
SECTION 305.
Registration, Registration of Transfer and Exchange
.
The Company shall cause to be kept a register (the register maintained by the Trustee, any agent or in any other office or agency of the Company in a Place of Payment being herein sometimes referred to as the "Security Register") in which, subject to such reasonable regulations as it may prescribe, the Company shall provide for the registration of Registered Securities and transfers of Registered Securities. Unless the Company or another agent is designated as the Security Registrar with respect to any series of Registered Securities pursuant to , the Trustee is hereby appointed "Security Registrar" of each series of Registered Securities for the purpose of registering Registered Securities and transfers of Registered Securities on such Security Register as herein provided at the Corporate Trust Office.
Section 301
Upon surrender for registration of transfer of any Registered Security of any series at the office or agency in a Place of Payment for that series, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery, in the name of the designated transferee or transferees, one or more new Registered Securities of the same series, of any authorized denominations and of a like aggregate principal amount and tenor. No Registered Security to be issued upon exchange of an Outstanding Security shall be issued in a denomination less than $2,000 unless otherwise specified pursuant to .
Section 301
At the option of the Holder, Registered Securities of any series may be exchanged for other Registered Securities of the same series, of any authorized denomination or denominations and of a like aggregate principal amount and tenor, upon surrender of such Registered Securities to be exchanged at such office or agency, and upon payment of any taxes or governmental
 
charges as hereinafter provided. Whenever any such Registered Securities are so surrendered for exchange, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery, the Registered Securities which the Holder making the exchange is entitled to receive.
All Registered Securities of any series issued upon any registration of transfer or exchange of Registered Securities shall be the valid obligations of the Company, evidencing the same debt, and entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture, as the Registered Securities of the same series surrendered upon such registration of transfer or exchange.
Every Registered Security presented or surrendered for registration of transfer or for exchange shall (if so required by the Company or the Trustee) be duly endorsed, or be accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed, by the Holder thereof or such Holder's attorney duly authorized in writing.
If so provided with respect to Securities of a series, at the option of the Holder, Bearer Securities of any such series may be exchanged for Registered Securities of the same series containing identical terms and provisions, of any authorized denominations and aggregate principal amount, upon surrender of the Bearer Securities to be exchanged at any such office or agency, with all unmatured coupons and all matured coupons in default thereto appertaining. If the Holder of a Bearer Security is unable to produce any such unmatured coupon or coupons or matured coupon or coupons in default, such exchange may be effected if the Bearer Securities are accompanied by payment in funds acceptable to the Company and the Trustee in an amount equal to the face amount of such missing coupon or coupons, or the surrender of such missing coupon or coupons may be waived by the Company and the Trustee if there is furnished to them such security or indemnity as they may require to save each of them and any Paying Agent harmless. If thereafter the Holder of such Security shall surrender to any Paying Agent any such missing coupon in respect of which such a payment shall have been made, such Holder shall be entitled to receive the amount of such payment; , , that, except as otherwise provided in , interest represented by coupons shall be payable only upon presentation and surrender of those coupons at an office or agency located outside the United States. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in case a Bearer Security of any series is surrendered at any such office or agency in exchange for a Registered Security of the same series and like tenor after the close of business at such office or agency on (i) any Regular Record Date and before the opening of business at such office or agency on the relevant Interest Payment Date, or (ii) any Special Record Date and before the opening of business at such office or agency on the related date for payment of Defaulted Interest, such Bearer Security shall be surrendered without the coupon relating to such Interest Payment Date or proposed date of payment, as the case may be (or, if such coupon is so surrendered with such Bearer Security, such coupon shall be returned to the person so surrendering the Bearer Security), and interest or Defaulted Interest, as the case may be, will not be payable on such Interest Payment Date or proposed date for payment, as the case may be, in respect of the Registered Security issued in exchange for such Bearer Security, but will be payable only to the Holder of such coupon when due in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture.
provided
however
Section 1002
 
If expressly provided with respect to the Securities of any series, at the option of the Holder, Registered Securities of such series may be exchanged for Bearer Securities upon such terms and conditions as may be provided with respect to such series.
Whenever any Securities are so surrendered for exchange, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery, the Securities which the Holder making the exchange is entitled to receive.
No service charge shall be made for any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee shall require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of such Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to not involving any transfer.
Section 304, 906, 1107 or 1405
The Company shall not be required (i) to issue, register the transfer of, or exchange Securities of any series during a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before any selection of Securities of that series to be redeemed and ending at the close of business on the day of the sending or mailing of a notice of redemption of Securities of that series selected for redemption under ; or (ii) to register the transfer of or exchange any Security so selected for redemption in whole or in part, except the unredeemed portion of any such Security being redeemed in part.
Section 1104
Notwithstanding the foregoing and except as otherwise specified or contemplated by , no Global Security shall be exchangeable pursuant to this or for Securities registered in the name of, and no transfer of a Global Security of any series may be registered to, any Person other than the Depositary for such Security or its nominee unless (1) such Depositary notifies the Company that it is unwilling or unable to continue as Depositary for such Global Security or if the Company determines that the Depositary is unable to continue as Depositary and the Company thereupon fails to appoint a successor Depositary; (2) the Company executes and delivers to the Trustee a Company Order that such Global Security shall be so exchangeable and the transfer thereof so registerable; (3) the Company provides for such exchange pursuant to ; or (4) there shall have occurred and be continuing an Event of Default, with respect to the Securities evidenced by such Global Security. Upon the occurrence in respect of any Global Security of any series of any one or more of the conditions specified in clauses (1), (2), (3) or (4) of the preceding sentence or such other conditions as may be specified as contemplated by for such series, such Global Security may be exchanged for Securities of the same series registered in the names of, and the transfer of such Global Security may be registered to, such Persons (including Persons other than the Depositary with respect to such series and its nominees) as such Depositary shall direct. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Indenture, any Security of any series authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, any Global Security of that series shall also be a Global Security and shall bear the legend specified in the Officers' Certificate or supplemental indenture specified in except for any Security of that series authenticated and delivered in exchange for, or upon registration of transfer of, a Global Security pursuant to the preceding sentence.
Section 301
Section 305
Sections 304, 906, 1107 and 1405
Section 301
Section 301
Section 201
 
In the event that a Global Security is deposited upon issuance with a Depositary, it will be registered in the name of the Depositary or a nominee of the Depositary (the "Global Security Registered Owner"). Payments in respect of the principal of, premium (if any) and interest on any Securities registered in the name of the Global Security Registered Owner will be payable to the Global Security Registered Owner in its capacity as the registered owner of such Global Security. The Company and the Trustee may treat the person in whose name(s) the Securities, including the Global Security, are registered as the owner thereof for the purpose of receiving such payments and for any and all other purposes whatsoever. None of the Company, the Guarantor, the Trustee, the Security Registrar, the Paying Agent or any agent of the Company, the Guarantor or the Trustee will have any responsibility or liability for (i) any aspect of the records relating to or payments made on account of the beneficial ownership interests of the Global Security by the Depositary or any of its participants, or for maintaining, supervising or reviewing any records of the Depositary or any of its participants relating to the beneficial ownership interests of the Global Security; (ii) the payments to the beneficial owners of the Global Security of amounts paid to the Global Security Registered Owner; or (iii) for any other matter relating to the actions and practices of the Depositary or any of its participants. Neither the Company nor the Guarantor or the Trustee will be liable for any delay by the Global Security Registered Owner or the Depositary or any of its participants in identifying the beneficial owners of the Securities, and the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee may conclusively rely on, and will be protected in relying on, instructions from the Global Security Registered Owner or the Depositary for all purposes (including with respect to the registration and delivery, and the respective principal amounts, of the Securities to be issued).
SECTION 306.
Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost and Stolen Securities
.
If any mutilated Security is surrendered to the Trustee or the Company, together with such security, bond or indemnity as may be required by the Company or the Trustee to save each of them and any agent of either of them harmless, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery in exchange therefor a new Security of the same series and of like tenor and principal amount and bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
If there shall be delivered to the Company and the Trustee (i) evidence to their satisfaction of the destruction, loss or theft of any Security; and (ii) such security, bond or indemnity in a form satisfactory to both of them to save each of them and any agent of either of them harmless, then, in the absence of notice to the Company or the Trustee that such Security has been acquired by a bona fide purchaser, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery, in lieu of any such destroyed, lost or stolen Security, a new Security of the same series and of like tenor and principal amount and bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
Notwithstanding the provisions of the previous paragraphs of this Section, in case any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security has become or is about to become due and payable, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a new Security, pay such Security.
Upon the issuance of any Security under this Section, the Company or the Trustee shall require the payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in relation thereto and any other expenses (including the fees and expenses of the Trustee), if any, connected therewith.
 
Every new Security of any series issued pursuant to this Section in lieu of any destroyed, lost or stolen Security of the same series shall constitute an original additional contractual obligation of the Company, whether or not the destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be at any time enforceable by anyone, and shall be entitled to all the benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately and with any and all other Securities of that series duly issued hereunder. A new Security shall have such legends as are on the old Security, unless the Company provides otherwise.
The provisions of this Section are exclusive and shall preclude (to the extent lawful) all other rights and remedies with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities.
SECTION 307.
Payment of Principal and Interest; Interest Rights Preserved
.
Principal, premium (if any), and interest due on a Security at Maturity or upon redemption or repurchase will be paid by wire transfer in immediately available funds against presentation and surrender of the Security by the Holder thereof at the office of the Paying Agent, but only if appropriate wire transfer instructions have been received in writing (or such other means as deemed acceptable by the Paying Agent) by the Paying Agent not less than 15 days before Maturity or the Redemption Date or Repurchase Date. In the event such instructions are not received by such 15th day, such principal, premium (if any), and interest due will be paid by check against such presentation and surrender.
Except as otherwise provided as contemplated by with respect to any series of Securities, interest on any Security which is payable, and is punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date shall be paid, in the case of Registered Securities, to the Person in whose name that Registered Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest and, in the case of Bearer Securities, upon surrender of the coupon appertaining thereto in respect of the interest due on such Interest Payment Date. All interest payments on any Registered Security (other than interest due at Maturity or on redemption or repayment) will be made by mailing a check for such interest, payable to or upon the written order of the Person entitled thereto pursuant to , to the address of such Person as it appears on the Security Register. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Holder of Registered Securities of any series which pay interest on the same Interest Payment Date and which are in an aggregate principal amount in excess of $10,000,000 may elect to receive payments of interest with respect to such series (other than interest due at Maturity or on redemption or repayment) via wire transfer of immediately available funds by making arrangements therefor in writing (or such other means as deemed acceptable by the Paying Agent) with the Paying Agent not later than the Regular Record Date immediately preceding the applicable Interest Payment Date, or on any Global Security via wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Depositary or its nominee.
Section 301
Section 301
Any interest on any Registered Security of any series which is payable, but is not punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date for Registered Securities of
 
such series (herein called "Defaulted Interest") shall forthwith cease to be payable to the registered Holder on the relevant Regular Record Date by virtue of having been such Holder, and such Defaulted Interest may be paid by the Company, at its election in each case, as provided in clause (1) or (2) below:
(1) The Company may elect to make payment of any Defaulted Interest to the Persons in whose names the Registered Securities of such series (or their respective Predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest, which shall be fixed in the following manner. The Company shall notify the Trustee in writing of the amount of Defaulted Interest proposed to be paid on each Registered Security of such series and the date of the proposed payment, and at the same time the Company shall deposit with the Trustee an amount of money equal to the aggregate amount proposed to be paid in respect of such Defaulted Interest or shall make arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for such deposit on or prior to the date of the proposed payment, such money when deposited to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such Defaulted Interest as in this clause provided. Thereupon the Company shall fix a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest which shall be not more than 15 days and not less than 10 days prior to the date of the proposed payment and not less than 10 days after the receipt by the Trustee of the notice of the proposed payment. The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee of such Special Record Date and, in the name and at the expense of the Company, the Trustee shall cause notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date therefor to be mailed, first-class posted prepaid, to each Holder of Securities of such series at such Holder's address as it appears in the Security Register, or sent to the Depositary in accordance with Applicable Procedures, not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date. Notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date therefor having been so sent or mailed, such Defaulted Interest shall be paid to the Persons in whose names the Registered Securities of such series (or their respective Predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on such Special Record Date and shall no longer be payable pursuant to the following clause (2).
(2) The Company may make payment of any Defaulted Interest on the Registered Securities of any series in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Registered Securities of such series in respect of which interest is in default are listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange.
Subject to the foregoing provisions of this Section, each Security delivered under this Indenture upon registration of transfer of or in exchange for or in lieu of any other Security shall carry the rights to interest accrued and unpaid, and to accrue, which were carried by such other Security.
The Company will be responsible for making calculations called for under the Securities, including but not limited to determination of redemption price, premium, if any, and any additional amounts or other amounts payable on the Securities. The Company will make the calculations in good faith and, absent manifest error, its calculations will be final and binding on
 
the Holders. The Company will provide a schedule of its calculations to the Trustee when requested by the Trustee, and the Trustee is entitled to rely conclusively on the accuracy of the Company's calculations without independent verification.
Principal, premium, if any, and interest due on the Securities will be considered paid on the date due if the Paying Agent, if other than the Company, holds as of 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time on the due date money deposited by the Company in immediately available funds and designated for and sufficient to pay all principal, premium, if any, and interest then due on the Securities.
SECTION 308.
Persons Deemed Owners
.
Prior to due presentment of a Registered Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name such Registered Security is registered as the owner of such Registered Security for the purpose of receiving payment of principal of, premium (if any), and (subject to ) any interest on such Registered Security and for all other purposes whatsoever, whether or not such Registered Security be overdue, and none of the Company, the Trustee, or any agent of the Company or the Trustee shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
Sections 305 and 307
Notwithstanding the foregoing, with respect to any Global Security, nothing herein shall prevent the Company, the Trustee, or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by any Depositary, as a Holder, with respect to such Global Security or impair, as between such Depositary and owners of beneficial interests in such Global Security, the operation of Applicable Procedures or customary practices governing the exercise of the rights of such Depositary (or its nominee) as Holder of such Global Security.
The Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the bearer of any Bearer Security and the bearer of any coupon as the absolute owner of such Security or coupon for the purpose of receiving payment thereof or on account thereof and for all other purposes whatsoever, whether or not such Bearer Security or coupon is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any agent of the Company or the Trustee shall be affected by any notice to the contrary.
SECTION 309.
Cancellation
.
All Securities surrendered for payment, redemption, registration of transfer or exchange or for credit against any sinking fund payment shall, if surrendered to any Person other than the Trustee, be delivered to the Trustee and shall be promptly canceled by it. The Company may at any time deliver to the Trustee for cancellation any Securities previously authenticated and delivered hereunder which the Company may have acquired in any manner whatsoever, and may deliver to the Trustee (or to any other Person for delivery to the Trustee) for cancellation any Securities previously authenticated hereunder which the Company has not issued and sold, and all such Securities so delivered shall be promptly canceled by the Trustee. Global Securities shall be canceled or their principal balance reduced in accordance with Applicable Procedures. No Securities shall be authenticated in lieu of or in exchange for any Securities canceled as provided in this Section. All canceled Securities held by the Trustee shall be retained and disposed of by the Trustee in accordance with its customary procedures and applicable law.
 
SECTION 310.
Computation of Interest
.
Except as otherwise specified as contemplated by for Securities of any series, interest on the Securities of each series shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months. No interest will accrue with respect to the 31st day of any month.
Section 301
SECTION 311.
CUSIP, ISIN and Common Code Numbers
.
The Company in issuing the Securities may use "CUSIP," "ISIN" or "Common Code" numbers (if then generally in use), and, if so, the Trustee may use "CUSIP," "ISIN" or "Common Code" numbers in notices as a convenience to Holders; , , that any such notice may state that no representation is made as to the correctness of such numbers either as printed on the Securities or as contained in any notice and that reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers printed on the Securities, and any such notice shall not be affected by any defect in or omission of such numbers. The Company will promptly notify the Trustee of any change in the CUSIP, ISIN or Common Code numbers.
provided
however
SECTION 401.
Satisfaction and Discharge of Indenture
.
This Indenture shall cease to be of further effect with respect to any series of Securities specified in a Company Request (except as to any surviving rights of registration of transfer or exchange of Securities herein expressly provided for), and the Trustee, upon receipt of such Company Request and at the expense of the Company, shall execute proper instruments acknowledging satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture with respect to such series of Securities when:
(1) either
(A) all Securities of such series theretofore authenticated and delivered (other than (i) Securities which have been destroyed, lost or stolen and which have been replaced or paid for as provided in ; and (ii) Securities for whose payment money has theretofore been deposited in trust or segregated and held in trust by the Company and thereafter repaid to the Company or discharged from such trust, as provided in ) have been delivered to the Trustee for cancellation; or
Section 306
Section 1003
(B) all Securities of such series not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation
(i) have become due and payable, or
 
(ii) will become due and payable at their Stated Maturity within one year, or
(iii) if redeemable at the option of the Company, are to be called for redemption within one year under arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for the giving of notice of redemption by the Trustee in the name, and at the expense, of the Company,
and the Company, in the case of (i), (ii) or (iii) above, has deposited or caused to be deposited with the Trustee as trust funds in trust for the purpose an amount of money in U.S dollars sufficient to pay and discharge the entire indebtedness on such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation, for principal, premium (if any), and interest to the date of such deposit (in the case of such Securities which have become due and payable) or to the Stated Maturity or Redemption Date, as the case may be;
(2) the Company has paid or caused to be paid all other sums payable hereunder by the Company with respect to such series of Securities; and
(3) the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that all conditions precedent herein provided for relating to the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture with respect to such series have been complied with.
Notwithstanding the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture with respect to a series of Securities, the obligations of the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee to the Holders of Securities of other series not so satisfied and discharged, the obligations of the Company and the Guarantor to the Trustee under , the obligations of the Company and the Guarantor to any Authenticating Agent under , and, if money shall have been deposited with the Trustee pursuant to subclause (B) of clause (1) of this Section, the obligations of the Trustee under and the last paragraph of shall survive.
Section 606
Section 613
Section 402
Section 1003
SECTION 402.
Application of Trust Money
.
Subject to provisions of the last paragraph of , all money deposited with the Trustee pursuant to shall be held in trust and applied by it, in accordance with the provisions of the Securities of each series and this Indenture, to the payment, either directly or through any Paying Agent (including the Company acting as its own Paying Agent) as the Trustee may determine, to the Persons entitled thereto, for all sums due or to become due thereon for principal, premium (if any), and interest; but such money need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law.
Section 1003
Section 401
 
SECTION 501.
Events of Default
.
"Event of Default," wherever used herein with respect to Securities of any series, means any one of the following events (whatever the reason for such Event of Default and whether it shall be voluntary or involuntary or be effected by operation of law or pursuant to any judgment, decree or order of any court or any order, rule or regulation of any administrative or governmental body):
(1) default in the payment of any interest upon any Security of that series when it becomes due and payable, and continuance of that default for a period of 30 days; or
(2) default in the payment of the principal of (or premium, if any, on) any Security of that series when it becomes due and payable at its Maturity; or
(3) default in the deposit of any sinking fund payment, when due by the terms of a Security of that series; or
(4) default in the performance, or breach, of any covenant or warranty of the Company or the Guarantor in this Indenture with respect to any Security of that series (other than a covenant or warranty a default in the performance of which or the breach of which is elsewhere in this Section specifically dealt with or that has expressly been included in this Indenture solely for the benefit of series of Securities other than that series), and continuance of that default or breach for a period of 30 days after there has been given, by registered or certified mail, or delivered by nationally recognized overnight delivery service guaranteeing next day delivery, to the Company and the Guarantor by the Trustee or to the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee by the Holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of that series a written notice specifying the default or breach and requiring it to be remedied and stating that the notice is a "Notice of Default" hereunder; or
(5) a default under any mortgage, indenture, bonds, debentures, notes or instrument under which there may be issued, or by which there may be secured or evidenced, any indebtedness of the Company or the Guarantor for money borrowed, whether such indebtedness now exists or shall hereafter be created, which constitutes a failure to pay more than $50,000,000 in principal amount of such indebtedness when due and payable at its Stated Maturity or which results in more than $50,000,000 in principal amount of such indebtedness becoming or being declared due and payable before the date on which it would otherwise become due and payable (in which case the Company or the Guarantor shall give notice to the Trustee of such default as soon as is reasonably practicable), and that acceleration shall not be rescinded or annulled, or such indebtedness shall not have been discharged, prior to the notice in writing to the Company and the Guarantor given pursuant to ; or
Section 502
 
(6) the entry by a court having jurisdiction in the premises of (A) a decree or order for relief in respect of the Company or the Guarantor in an involuntary case or proceeding under any applicable federal or state bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar law; or (B) a decree or order adjudging the Company or the Guarantor bankrupt or insolvent, or approving as properly filed a petition seeking reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition of or in respect of the Company or the Guarantor under any applicable federal or state law, or appointing a custodian, receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, sequestrator or other similar official of the Company or the Guarantor or of all or substantially all of their respective property, or ordering the winding up or liquidation of their respective affairs, and the continuance of any such decree or order for relief or any such other decree or order unstayed and in effect for a period of 60 consecutive days; or
(7) the commencement by the Company or the Guarantor of a voluntary case or proceeding under any applicable federal or state bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar law or of any other case or proceeding to be adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent, or the consent by it to the entry of a decree or order for relief in respect of the Company or the Guarantor in an involuntary case or proceeding under any applicable federal or state bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar law or to the commencement of any bankruptcy or insolvency case or proceeding against either of them, or the filing by either of them of a petition or answer or consent seeking reorganization or relief under any applicable federal or state law, or the consent by either of them to the filing of such petition or to the appointment of or taking possession by a custodian, receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, sequestrator or other similar official of the Company or the Guarantor or of all or substantially all of their respective property, or the making by either of them of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the admission by either of them in writing of their inability to pay their respective debts generally as they become due, or the taking of corporate action by the Company or the Guarantor in furtherance of any such action; or
(8) any other Event of Default provided with respect to Securities of that series, pursuant to .
Section 301
SECTION 502.
Acceleration of Maturity; Rescission and Annulment
.
If an Event of Default specified in  occurs, all unpaid principal of, premium (if any) and accrued interest on the Securities of any series at the time Outstanding shall become and shall be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holder, and if any other Event of Default with respect to Securities of any series at the time Outstanding occurs and is continuing, then in every such case the Trustee or the Holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of that series may declare the principal amount (or, if any of the Securities of that series are Original Issue Discount Securities, such portion of the principal amount of such Securities as may be specified in the terms thereof) of all of the Securities of that series to be due and payable immediately, by a notice in writing to the Company and the Guarantor (and to the Trustee if given by Holders), and upon any such declaration such principal amount (or specified amount), plus any interest accrued on the Securities of such series to the date of declaration, shall become immediately due and payable.
Section 501(6) or (7)
ipso facto
 
Upon payment (i) of (A) such principal amount; and (B) such interest; and (ii) of interest on any overdue principal and overdue interest at the rate or rates prescribed therefor in the Securities of such series (in each case to the extent that the payment of such interest shall be legally enforceable), all of the Company's and the Guarantor's respective obligations in respect of the payment of principal of and interest on the Securities of such series shall terminate.
At any time after such a declaration of acceleration with respect to Securities of any series has been made and before a judgment or decree for payment of the money due has been obtained by the Trustee as hereinafter provided in this Article, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of that series, by written notice to the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences (and the particular event on which the declaration of acceleration is based shall no longer be grounds for a declaration of acceleration) if both:
(1) the Company or the Guarantor has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay:
(A) all overdue installments of interest on all Outstanding Securities of that series,
(B) the principal of (and premium, if any, on) any Outstanding Securities of that series which have become due otherwise than by such declaration of acceleration, and any interest thereon at the rate or rates prescribed therefor in such Securities,
(C) to the extent that payment of such interest is lawful, interest upon overdue interest at the rate or rates prescribed therefor in such Securities, and
(D) all sums paid or advanced by the Trustee hereunder and the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel; and
(2) all Events of Default with respect to Securities of that series, other than the non-payment of the principal (or premium, if any) or interest on Securities of that series which have become due solely by such declaration of acceleration, have been cured or waived as provided in .
Section 513
No such rescission shall affect any subsequent default or impair any right consequent thereon.
 
SECTION 503.
Collection of Indebtedness and Suits for Enforcement by Trustee
.
The Company covenants that if:
(1) default is made in the payment of any installment of interest on any Security of any series when such interest becomes due and payable and such default continues for a period of 30 days, or
(2) default is made in the payment of the principal of (or premium, if any, on) any Security of any series at the Maturity thereof,
the Company will pay to the Trustee, for the benefit of the Holders of Securities of such series, the whole amount then due and payable on such Securities for principal, premium (if any), and interest and, to the extent that payment of such interest shall be legally enforceable, interest on any overdue principal, premium (if any), and any overdue interest, at the rate or rates prescribed therefor in such series of Securities, and in addition thereto, such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover the costs and expenses of collection, including the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel.
If the Company fails to pay such amounts, the Trustee, in its own name and as trustee of an express trust, may institute a judicial proceeding for the collection of the sums so due and unpaid, and may prosecute such proceeding to judgment or final decree, and may enforce the same against the Company, the Guarantor or any other obligor upon such Securities and collect the moneys adjudged or decreed to be payable in the manner provided by law out of the property of the Company, the Guarantor or any other obligor upon such Securities, wherever situated.
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of any series occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may in its discretion proceed to protect and enforce its rights and the rights of the Holders of Securities of such series by such appropriate judicial proceedings as the Trustee shall deem most effectual to protect and enforce any such rights, whether for the specific enforcement of any covenant or agreement in this Indenture or in aid of the exercise of any power granted herein, or to enforce any other proper remedy.
SECTION 504.
Trustee May File Proofs of Claim
.
In case of the pendency of any receivership, insolvency, liquidation, bankruptcy, reorganization, adjustment, composition or other judicial proceeding relative to the Company or the Guarantor (or any other obligor upon the Securities of any series), its property or its creditors, the Trustee (irrespective of whether the principal of the Securities of any series shall then be due and payable as therein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Trustee shall have made any demand on the Company for the payment of overdue principal, premium (if any), or interest) shall be entitled and empowered, by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise, to (i) file and prove a claim for the whole amount, or such lesser amount as may be provided for in the Securities of such series, of principal, premium (if any), and interest (if any) owing and unpaid in respect of the Securities and to file such other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee (including any claim for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel) and of the Holders allowed in such judicial proceeding, and (ii) collect and receive any moneys or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same; and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or other similar official in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Holder of
 
Securities of such series to make such payments to the Trustee and, in the event that the Trustee shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Holders, to pay to the Trustee any amount due it for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under . To the extent that the payment of any such compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under Section 606 hereof out of the estate in any such proceeding, shall be denied for any reason, payment of the same shall be secured by a lien on, and shall be paid out of, any and all distributions, dividends, money, securities and other properties that the Holders may be entitled to receive in such proceeding whether in liquidation or under any plan of reorganization or arrangement or otherwise.
Section 606
No provision of this Indenture shall be deemed to authorize the Trustee to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Holder any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition affecting the Securities of any series or the rights of any Holder thereof or to authorize the Trustee to vote in respect of the claim of any Holder in any such proceeding. The Trustee may, on behalf of the Holders, vote for the election of a trustee in bankruptcy or similar official and be a member of a creditors' or other similar committee.
SECTION 505.
Trustee May Enforce Claims Without Possession of Securities
.
All rights of action and claims under this Indenture or any of the Securities may be prosecuted and enforced by the Trustee without the possession of any of the Securities or the production thereof in any proceeding relating thereto, any such proceeding instituted by the Trustee shall be brought in its own name as trustee of an express trust, and any recovery of judgment shall, after provision for the payment of the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, be for the ratable benefit of the Holders of the Securities in respect of which such judgment has been recovered.
SECTION 506.
Application of Money Collected
.
Any moneys or properties collected by the Trustee pursuant to this Article, or after an Event of Default any moneys or properties distributable in respect of the Company's or the Guarantor's obligations under this Indenture, shall be applied in the following order, at the date or dates fixed by the Trustee and, in case of the distribution of such money on account of principal, premium (if any) or interest, upon presentation of the Securities and the notation thereon of the payment if only partially paid and upon surrender thereof if fully paid:
To the payment of all amounts due the Trustee under ;
FIRST:
Section 606
To the payment of the amounts then due and unpaid for principal of, premium (if any) and interest on the Securities in respect of which or for the benefit of which such money has been collected, ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on such Securities for principal, premium (if any) and interest, respectively; and
SECOND:
To the payment of the remainder, if any, to the Person or Persons entitled thereto.
THIRD:
 
SECTION 507.
Limitation on Suits
.
No Holder of any Security of any series shall have any right to institute any proceeding, judicial or otherwise, with respect to this Indenture, or for the appointment of a receiver or trustee, or for any other remedy hereunder, unless:
(1) such Holder has previously given written notice to the Trustee of a continuing Event of Default with respect to the Securities of that same series;
(2) the Holders of not less than 25% in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of that same series shall have made written request to the Trustee to institute proceedings in respect of such Event of Default in its own name as Trustee hereunder;
(3) such Holder or Holders have offered to the Trustee indemnity satisfactory to the Trustee against the costs, expenses and liabilities to be incurred in compliance with such request;
(4) the Trustee for 60 days after its receipt of such notice, request and offer of indemnity has failed to institute any such proceeding; and
(5) no direction inconsistent with such written request has been given to the Trustee during such 60-day period by the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of that same series;
it being understood and intended that no one or more of such Holders shall have any right in any manner whatever by virtue of, or by availing of, any provision of this Indenture to affect, disturb or prejudice the rights of any other of such Holders, or to obtain or to seek to obtain priority or preference over any other of such Holders or to enforce any right under this Indenture, except in the manner herein provided and for the equal and ratable benefit of all of such Holders.
SECTION 508.
Unconditional Right of Holders to Receive Principal, Premium and Interest
.
Notwithstanding any other provision in this Indenture, the Holder of any Security shall have the right, which is absolute and unconditional, to receive payment of the principal of, premium (if any) and (subject to ) any interest on such Security on the Stated Maturity or Maturities expressed in such Security (or, in the case of redemption, on the Redemption Date or, in the case of repurchase at the option of the Holder, on the Repurchase Date) and to institute suit for the enforcement of any such payment, and such rights shall not be impaired without the consent of such Holder.
Section 307
SECTION 509.
Restoration of Rights and Remedies
.
If the Trustee or any Holder has instituted any proceeding to enforce any right or remedy under this Indenture and such proceeding has been discontinued or abandoned for any reason, or has been determined adversely to the Trustee or to such Holder, then and in every such case, subject to any determination in such proceeding, the Company, the Guarantor, the Trustee and the Holders shall be restored severally and respectively to their former positions hereunder and thereafter all rights and remedies of the Trustee and the Holders shall continue as though no such proceeding had been instituted.
 
SECTION 510.
Rights and Remedies Cumulative
.
Except as otherwise provided with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities in the last paragraph of , no right or remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to the Trustee or to the Holders is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, and every right and remedy shall, to the extent permitted by law, be cumulative and in addition to every other right and remedy given hereunder or now or hereafter existing at law or in equity or otherwise. The assertion or employment of any right or remedy hereunder, or otherwise, shall not prevent the concurrent assertion or employment of any other appropriate right or remedy.
Section 306
SECTION 511.
Delay or Omission Not Waiver
.
No delay or omission of the Trustee or of any Holder of Securities of any series to exercise any right or remedy accruing upon any Event of Default with respect to such series of Securities shall impair any such right or remedy or constitute a waiver of any such Event of Default or an acquiescence therein. Every right and remedy given by this Article or by law to the Trustee or to the Holders may be exercised from time to time, and as often as may be deemed expedient, by the Trustee or by the Holders, as the case may be.
SECTION 512.
Control by Holders
.
The Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the applicable Outstanding Securities of any series shall have the right to direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for any remedy available to the Trustee, or exercising any trust or power conferred on the Trustee, with respect to the applicable Outstanding Securities of such series, that
provided
(1) such direction shall not be in conflict with any rule of law or with this Indenture,
(2) the Trustee may take any other action deemed proper by the Trustee which is not inconsistent with such direction,
(3) such direction is not unduly prejudicial to the rights of the other Holders of Securities of such series (it being understood that the Trustee does not have an affirmative duty to ascertain whether or not any such directions are unduly prejudicial to such Holders) and would not involve the Trustee in personal liability, and
(4) such Holders have provided the Trustee with indemnity satisfactory to the Trustee against the costs, expenses and liabilities to be incurred in compliance with such request.
 
SECTION 513.
Waiver of Past Defaults
.
The Holders of not less than a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series may, on behalf of the Holders of all the Outstanding Securities of such series, waive any past default hereunder with respect to such series and its consequences, a default
except
(1) in the payment of the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Security of such series when due (other than amounts due and payable solely upon acceleration pursuant to ) unless theretofore paid in full and cured in accordance with the terms of this Indenture, or
Section 502
(2) in respect of a covenant or provision hereof which under cannot be modified or amended without the consent of the Holder of each Outstanding Security of such series affected.
Section 902
Upon any such waiver, such default shall cease to exist, and any default or Event of Default arising therefrom shall be deemed to have been cured, for every purpose of this Indenture; but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other default or impair any right consequent thereon.
SECTION 514.
Undertaking for Costs
.
In any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken or omitted by it as a Trustee, a court in its discretion may require the filing by any party litigant in the suit of an undertaking to pay the costs of the suit, and the court in its discretion may assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, against any party litigant in the suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses made by the party litigant. This Section does not apply to a suit by the Trustee, a suit by a Holder of a Security pursuant to Section 508 hereof, or a suit by Holders of more than 10% in principal amount of the then outstanding Securities.
SECTION 601.
Notice of Defaults
.
Within 90 days after the occurrence of any default hereunder with respect to the Securities of any series, the Trustee shall transmit to the Holders of Securities of such series, in the manner and to the extent provided in Section 313(c) of the Trust Indenture Act, notice of such default hereunder known to the Trustee, unless such default shall have been cured or waived; , , that, except in the case of a default in the payment of the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Security of such series or in the payment of any sinking fund installment with respect to Securities of such series, the Trustee shall be protected in withholding such notice if and so long as the board of directors, the executive committee, or a
provided
however
 
trust committee of directors or Responsible Officers of the Trustee in good faith determines that the withholding of such notice is in the interest of the Holders of Securities of such series; and , , that in the case of any default of the character specified in with respect to Securities of such series, no such notice to Holders shall be given until at least 30 days after the occurrence thereof. For the purpose of this Section, the term "default" means any event which is, or after notice or lapse of time or both would become, an Event of Default with respect to Securities of such series. Except with respect to an Event of Default pursuant to , the Trustee shall not be charged with knowledge of any default or Event of Default hereunder unless the written notice thereof shall have been given to a Responsible Officer at the Corporate Trust Office by the Company, the Guarantor, a Paying Agent, any Holder or an agent of any Holder.
provided
further
Section 501(4)
Section 501(1), (2) or (3)
SECTION 602.
Certain Rights and Obligations of Trustee
.
The Trustee shall have the rights and obligations specified in Section 315(a), 315(c) and 315(d) of the Trust Indenture Act. No provision of this Indenture shall require the Trustee to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers if it has reasonable grounds for believing that the repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it. Every provision of this Indenture relating to the conduct or affecting the liability of or affording protection to the Trustee is subject to the provisions of this Section, whether or not expressly provided. The Trustee shall not be required to give any bond or surety in respect of the performance of its powers or duties hereunder.
Subject to Sections 315(a) through 315(d) of the Trust Indenture Act:
(a) the Trustee may rely and shall be protected in acting or refraining from acting upon any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond, debenture, note, other evidence of indebtedness or other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper party or parties;
(b) any request or direction of the Company mentioned herein shall be sufficiently evidenced by a Company Request, Company Order or Officers' Certificate, and any resolution of the Board of Directors may be sufficiently evidenced by a Board Resolution;
(c) whenever in the administration of this Indenture the Trustee shall deem it desirable that a matter be proved or established prior to taking, suffering or omitting any action hereunder, the Trustee (unless other evidence be herein specifically prescribed) may, in the absence of bad faith on its part, rely upon an Officers' Certificate, and need not confirm or investigate the accuracy of mathematical calculations or other facts stated therein;
(d) the Trustee may consult with counsel of its selection, and the written advice of such counsel or any Opinion of Counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it hereunder in good faith and in reliance thereon;
 
(e) the Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers vested in it by this Indenture at the request or direction of any of the Holders of Securities of any series pursuant to this Indenture, unless such Holders shall have offered to the Trustee security or indemnity satisfactory to the Trustee against the costs, expenses and liabilities which might be incurred by it in compliance with such request or direction;
(f) the Trustee shall not be bound to make any investigation into the facts or matters stated in any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond, debenture, note, other evidence of indebtedness or other paper or document, but the Trustee, in its discretion, may make such further inquiry or investigation into such facts or matters as it may see fit, and, if the Trustee shall determine to make such further inquiry or investigation, it shall be entitled to examine the books, records and premises of the Company pertaining to the Securities, personally or by agent or attorney;
(g) the Trustee may execute any of the trusts or powers hereunder or perform any duties hereunder either directly or by or through agents or attorneys and the Trustee shall not be responsible for any misconduct or negligence on the part of any agent or attorney appointed with due care by it hereunder;
(h) the Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken, suffered, or omitted to be taken by it in good faith and reasonably believed by it to be authorized or within the discretion or rights or powers conferred upon it by this Indenture;
(i) the permissive right of the Trustee to do things enumerated in the Indenture shall not be construed as a duty of the Trustee, and the Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith and reasonably believed by it to be within the discretion or power conferred upon it by the Indenture other than for its own negligence or willful misconduct;
(j) The rights, privileges, protections, immunities and benefits given to the Trustee, including without limitation its right to be compensated, reimbursed, and indemnified, are extended to, and shall be enforceable by, the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder, and to each agent, custodian and other Person employed to act hereunder;
(k) in no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder arising out of or caused by, directly or indirectly, forces beyond its control, including, without limitation, strikes, work stoppages, accidents, acts of war or terrorism, civil or military disturbances, nuclear or natural catastrophes or acts of God, and interruptions, loss or malfunctions of utilities, communications or computer (software and hardware) services;
(l) the Trustee may request that the Company deliver an Officers' certificate setting forth the names of individuals and/or titles of officers authorized at such time to take specified actions pursuant to this Indenture; and
(m) in no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for any special, indirect, punitive or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including, but not limited to, loss of profit), irrespective of whether the Trustee has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action.
 
SECTION 603.
Not Responsible for Recitals or Issuance of Securities
.
The recitals contained herein and in the Securities, except the Trustee's certificate of authentication, shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and neither the Trustee nor any Authenticating Agent assumes any responsibility for their correctness. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Indenture or of the Securities or of the Guarantee except that the Trustee represents that it is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Indenture, authenticate the Securities and perform its obligations hereunder. Neither the Trustee nor any Authenticating Agent shall be accountable for the use or application by the Company of the Securities or the proceeds thereof, or money or property paid to or upon the Company's direction pursuant to this Indenture. The Trustee shall have no responsibility or liability with respect to any information, statement or recital in any offering memorandum, prospectus, prospectus supplement or other disclosure material prepared or distributed with respect to the issuance of any series of the Securities.
SECTION 604. 
May Hold Securities
.
The Trustee, any Paying Agent, any Authenticating Agent, any Security Registrar or any other agent of the Company, in its individual or any other capacity, may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and, subject to Sections 310(b) and 311 of the Trust Indenture Act, may otherwise deal with the Company and the Guarantor with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee, Paying Agent, Authenticating Agent, Security Registrar or such other agent.
There shall be excluded from the operation of Trust Indenture Act Section 310(b)(i) any series of Securities under this Indenture and any indenture or indentures under which other securities or certificates of interest or participation in other securities of the Company or the Guarantor are outstanding if the requirements for such exclusion set forth in Trust Indenture Act Section 310(b)(i) are met.
SECTION 605.
Money Held in Trust
.
Money held by the Trustee in trust hereunder need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law. The Trustee shall be under no liability for interest on any money received by it hereunder except as otherwise agreed in writing with the Company.
SECTION 606.
Compensation and Reimbursement
.
The Company and the Guarantor agree
(1) to pay to the Trustee from time to time such compensation as shall be agreed upon in writing between the Company and the Trustee for all services rendered by it hereunder (which compensation shall not be limited by any provision of law in regard to the compensation of a trustee of any express trust);
 
(2) to reimburse the Trustee upon its request for all reasonable expenses, disbursements and advances incurred or made by the Trustee in accordance with any provision of this Indenture (including the reasonable compensation and the expenses and disbursements of its agents and counsel), except any such expense, disbursement or advance as may be attributable to its negligence or bad faith; and
(3) to indemnify each of the Trustee, any predecessor Trustee, their directors, officers, agents and employees and their respective agents for, and to hold them harmless against, any and all loss, damage, claim, liability or expense, including taxes (other than taxes based on the income of the Trustee) and the reasonable compensation and the expenses and disbursements of its agents and counsel, incurred without negligence, willful misconduct or bad faith on their own part, arising out of or in connection with the acceptance or administration of the trust or trusts hereunder, including the reasonable costs and expenses of defending themselves against any claim or liability in connection with the exercise or performance of any of their powers or duties hereunder.
When the Trustee incurs expenses or renders services after an Event of Default specified in or  occurs, the expenses and the compensation for the services are intended to constitute expenses of administration under any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other similar law.
Section 501(6)
(7)
The Trustee shall have a lien prior to the Securities as to all property and funds held by it hereunder for any amount owing it or any predecessor Trustee pursuant to this , except with respect to funds held in trust for the benefit of the Holders of particular Securities.
Section 606
"Trustee" for the purposes of this Section 606 shall include any predecessor Trustee and the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder and each agent, custodian and other person employed to act hereunder; , , that the negligence or willful misconduct of any Trustee hereunder shall not affect the rights of any other Trustee hereunder. The provisions of this Section shall survive the resignation and removal of the Trustee and the satisfaction and discharge or the termination of this Indenture.
provided
however
SECTION 607.
Corporate Trustee Required; Eligibility
.
There shall at all times be a Trustee hereunder which shall be a corporation organized and doing business under the laws of the United States or of any state of the United States or the District of Columbia which is authorized under such laws to exercise corporate trust powers and is subject to supervision or examination by federal, state or District of Columbia authority. Such Trustee shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $50,000,000. If such Person publishes reports of condition at least annually, pursuant to law or to the requirements of said supervising or examining authority, then for the purposes of this Section, the combined capital and surplus of such Person shall be deemed to be its combined capital and surplus as set forth in its most recent report of condition so published. Neither the Company nor any Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Company shall serve as Trustee hereunder. If at any time the Trustee shall cease to be eligible in accordance with the provisions of this Section, it shall resign immediately in the manner and with the effect hereinafter specified in this Article.
 
SECTION 608.
Resignation and Removal; Appointment of Successor
.
(a) No resignation or removal of the Trustee and no appointment of a successor Trustee pursuant to this Article shall become effective until the acceptance of appointment by the successor Trustee in accordance with the applicable requirements of .
Section 609
(b) The Trustee may resign at any time with respect to the Securities of one or more series by giving written notice to the Company and the Guarantor. If the instrument of acceptance by a successor Trustee required by shall not have been delivered to the Trustee within 30 days after the giving of such notice of resignation, the resigning Trustee may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of such series.
Section 609
(c) The Trustee may be removed at any time with respect to the Securities of any series by the Act of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of such series, delivered to the Trustee and to the Company and the Guarantor.
(d) If at any time:
(1) the Trustee shall fail to comply with the obligations imposed on it by the provisions of Section 310(b) of the Trust Indenture Act with respect to the Securities of any series after written request therefor by the Company or by any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security of any series for at least six months, or
(2) the Trustee shall cease to be eligible under and shall fail to resign after written request therefor by the Company or by any such Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security of any series at least six months, or
Section 607
(3) the Trustee shall become incapable of acting or shall be adjudged bankrupt or insolvent or a receiver of the Trustee or of its property shall be appointed or any public officer shall take charge or control of the Trustee or of its property or affairs for the purpose of rehabilitation, conservation or liquidation,
then, in any such case, (i) the Company by or pursuant to a Board Resolution may remove the Trustee with respect to any series of Securities or all Securities, or (ii) subject to Section 315(e) of the Trust Indenture Act, any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security of any series for at least six months may, on behalf of himself or herself and all others similarly situated, petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee with respect to such series of Securities or all Securities and the appointment of a successor Trustee or Trustees.
(e) If the Trustee shall resign, be removed or become incapable of acting, or if a vacancy shall occur in the office of Trustee for any cause, with respect to the Securities of one or more series, the Company shall appoint a successor Trustee or Trustees with respect to the Securities of that or those series (it being understood that any such successor Trustee may be
 
appointed with respect to the Securities of one or more or all of such series and that at any time there shall be only one Trustee with respect to the Securities of any particular series) and shall comply with the applicable requirements of . If, within one year after such resignation, removal or incapability, or the occurrence of such vacancy, a successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of any series shall be appointed by Act of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of such series delivered to the Company and the retiring Trustee, the successor Trustee so appointed shall, forthwith upon its acceptance of such appointment in accordance with the applicable requirements of , become the successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of such series and to that extent supersede the successor Trustee appointed by the Company. If no successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of any series shall have been so appointed by the Company or the Holders and accepted appointment in the manner required by , any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security of such series for at least six months may, on behalf of himself or herself and all others similarly situated, petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of such series.
Section 609
Section 609
Section 609
(f) The Company shall give or cause to be given notice of each resignation and each removal of the Trustee with respect to the Securities of any series and each appointment of a successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of any series to all Holders of Securities of such series in the manner provided in , Each notice shall include the name of the successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of such series and the address of its Corporate Trust Office.
Section 106
SECTION 609.
Acceptance of Appointment by Successor
.
(a) In case of the appointment hereunder of a successor Trustee with respect to all Securities, every such successor Trustee so appointed shall execute, acknowledge and deliver to the Company and to the retiring Trustee an instrument accepting such appointment and thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective and such successor Trustee, without any further act, deed or conveyance, shall become vested with all the rights, powers, trusts and duties of the retiring Trustee; but, on the request of the Company or the successor Trustee, such retiring Trustee shall, upon payment of its charges, execute and deliver an instrument transferring to such successor Trustee all the rights, powers and trusts of the retiring Trustee and shall duly assign, transfer and deliver to such successor Trustee all property and money held by such retiring Trustee hereunder.
(b) In case of the appointment hereunder of a successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of one or more (but not all) series, the Company, the Guarantor, the retiring Trustee and each successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of one or more series shall execute and deliver an indenture supplemental hereto wherein each successor Trustee shall accept such appointment and which (1) shall contain such provisions as shall be necessary or desirable to transfer and confirm to, and to vest in, each successor Trustee all the rights, powers, trusts and duties of the retiring Trustee with respect to the Securities of that or those series to which the appointment of such successor Trustee relates, (2) if the retiring Trustee is not retiring with respect to all Securities, shall contain such provisions as shall be deemed necessary or desirable to confirm that all the rights, powers, trusts and duties of the retiring Trustee with respect to the Securities of that or those series as to which the retiring Trustee is not retiring shall continue to be vested in the retiring Trustee, and (3) shall add to or change any of the provisions of this
 
Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of the trusts hereunder by more than one Trustee, it being understood that nothing herein or in such supplemental indenture shall constitute such Trustees co-trustees of the same trust and that each such Trustee shall be trustee of a trust or trusts hereunder separate and apart from any trust or trusts hereunder administered by any other such Trustee; and upon the execution and delivery of such supplemental indenture the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective to the extent provided therein and each such successor Trustee, without any further act, deed or conveyance, shall become vested with all the rights, powers, trusts and duties of the retiring Trustee with respect to the Securities of that or those series to which the appointment of such successor Trustee relates; but, on request of the Company or any successor Trustee, such retiring Trustee shall duly assign, transfer and deliver to such successor Trustee all property and money held by such retiring Trustee hereunder with respect to the Securities of that or those series to which the appointment of such successor Trustee relates.
(c) Upon request of any such successor Trustee, the Company and the Guarantor shall execute any and all instruments reasonably necessary for more fully and certainly vesting in and confirming to such successor Trustee all such rights, powers and trusts referred to in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, as the case may be.
(d) No successor Trustee shall accept its appointment unless at the time of such acceptance such successor Trustee shall be qualified and eligible under this Article.
SECTION 610.
Merger, Conversion, Consolidation or Succession to Business
.
Any corporation into which the Trustee may be merged or converted or with which it may be consolidated, or any corporation resulting from any merger, conversion or consolidation to which the Trustee shall be a party, or any corporation succeeding to all or substantially all the corporate trust business of the Trustee, shall be the successor of the Trustee hereunder, such corporation shall be otherwise qualified and eligible under this Article, without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto. In case any Securities shall have been authenticated, but not delivered, by or on behalf of the Trustee then in office, any successor by merger, conversion or consolidation to such authenticating Trustee may adopt such authentication and deliver the Securities so authenticated with the same effect as if such successor Trustee had itself authenticated such Securities. In case any Securities shall have not been authenticated by such predecessor Trustee, any successor Trustee may authenticate and deliver such Securities in either its own name or that of its predecessor Trustee, with full force and effect which this Indenture provides for the certificate of authentication of the Trustee.
provided
SECTION 611.
Preferential Collection of Claims Against Company
.
If and when the Trustee shall be or become a creditor of the Company or the Guarantor (or any other obligor upon the Securities), the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of Section 311 and any other provision of the Trust Indenture Act regarding the collection of claims against the Company or the Guarantor (or any such other obligor), as the case may be.
 
SECTION 612.
Compliance with Tax Laws
.
The Trustee hereby agrees to comply with all U.S. federal income tax information reporting and withholding requirements with respect to payments of premium (if any) and interest on the Securities, whether acting as Trustee, Security Registrar, Paying Agent or otherwise with respect to the Securities.
SECTION 613.
Appointment of Authenticating Agent
.
At any time when any of the Securities remain Outstanding, the Trustee may appoint an Authenticating Agent or Agents with respect to one or more series of Securities which shall be authorized to act on behalf of the Trustee to authenticate Securities of such series issued upon original issue and upon exchange, registration of transfer or partial redemption thereof or pursuant to , and Securities so authenticated shall be entitled to the benefits of this Indenture and shall be valid and obligatory for all purposes as if authenticated by the Trustee hereunder. Any such appointment shall be evidenced by an instrument in writing signed by a Responsible Officer of the Trustee, a copy of which instrument shall be promptly furnished to the Company. Wherever reference is made in this Indenture to the authentication and delivery of Securities by the Trustee or the Trustee's certificate of authentication, such reference shall be deemed to include authentication and delivery on behalf of the Trustee by an Authenticating Agent and a certificate of authentication executed on behalf of the Trustee by an Authenticating Agent. Each Authenticating Agent shall be acceptable to the Company and shall at all times be a corporation organized and doing business under the laws of the United States of America, any state thereof or the District of Columbia, authorized under such laws to act as Authenticating Agent, having a combined capital and surplus of not less than $50,000,000 and subject to supervision or examination by federal or state authority. If such Authenticating Agent publishes reports of condition at least annually, pursuant to law or to the requirements of said supervising or examining authority, then for the purposes of this Section, the combined capital and surplus of such Authenticating Agent shall be deemed to be its combined capital and surplus as set forth in its most recent report of condition so published. If at any time an Authenticating Agent shall cease to be eligible in accordance with the provisions of this Section, such Authenticating Agent shall resign immediately in the manner and with the effect specified in this Section.
Section 306
Any corporation into which an Authenticating Agent may be merged or converted or with which it may be consolidated, or any corporation resulting from any merger, conversion or consolidation to which such Authenticating Agent shall be a party, or any corporation succeeding to all or substantially all the corporate agency or corporate trust business of an Authenticating Agent, shall continue to be an Authenticating Agent, such corporation shall be otherwise eligible under this Section, without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of the Trustee or the Authenticating Agent.
provided
An Authenticating Agent for any series of securities may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Trustee, the Company and the Guarantor. The Trustee may at any time terminate the agency of an Authenticating Agent by giving written notice thereof to such Authenticating Agent, the Company and the Guarantor. Upon receiving such a notice of resignation or upon such a termination, or in case at any time such Authenticating Agent shall cease to be eligible in accordance with the provisions of this Section, the Trustee for such
 
Securities may appoint a successor Authenticating Agent which shall be acceptable to the Company and shall (i) mail written notice of such appointment by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to all Holders of Registered Securities of the series with respect to which such Authenticating Agent will serve, as their names and addresses appear in the Security Register, and (ii) if Securities of the series are issued as Bearer Securities, publish notice of such appointment at least once in an Authorized Newspaper in the place where such successor Authenticating Agent has its principal office if such office is located outside the United States. Any successor Authenticating Agent upon acceptance of its appointment hereunder shall become vested with all the rights, powers and duties of its predecessor hereunder, with like effects as if originally named as an Authenticating Agent. No successor Authenticating Agent shall be appointed unless eligible under the provisions of this Section.
The Company agrees to pay each Authenticating Agent from time to time reasonable compensation for its services under this Section.
The provisions of shall be applicable to each Authenticating Agent.
Sections 308, 603 and 604
If an appointment with respect to one or more series is made pursuant to this Section, the Securities of such series may have endorsed thereon, in addition to the Trustee's certificate of authentication, an alternative certificate of authentication in substantially the following form:
This is one of the Securities of the series designated therein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
If all of the Securities of any series may not be originally issued at one time, and if the Trustee does not have an office capable of authenticating Securities upon original issuance located in a Place of Payment where the Company wishes to have Securities of such series authenticated upon original issuance, the Trustee, if so requested in writing (which writing need not comply with ) by the Company, shall appoint in accordance with this an Authenticating Agent having an office in a Place of Payment designated by the Company with respect to such series of Securities.
Section 102
Section 613
The Trustee is hereby appointed as an Authenticating Agent.
 
SECTION 701.
Company and Guarantor to Furnish Trustee Names and Addresses of Holders
.
The Company and the Guarantor will furnish or cause to be furnished to the Trustee
(a) semi-annually, not more than 15 days after each Regular Record Date (or, if there is no Regular Record Date relating to a series, semi-annually on the dates set forth in or pursuant to the Board Resolution or supplemental indenture with respect to such series), a list, in such form as the Trustee may reasonably require, of the names and addresses of the Holders of Securities of such series as of such date, and
(b) at such other times as the Trustee may reasonably request in writing, within 30 days after the receipt by the Company of any such request, a list of similar form and content as of a date not more than 15 days prior to the time such list is furnished,
, , that so long as the Trustee shall be the Security Registrar, no such list need be furnished.
provided
however
SECTION 702.
Preservation of Information; Communications to Holders
.
(a) The Trustee shall comply with the obligations imposed on it by the provisions of Section 312 of the Trust Indenture Act.
(b) Every Holder, by receiving and holding Securities, agrees with the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee that neither the Company, the Guarantor nor the Trustee nor any agent of any of them shall be held accountable by reason of the disclosure of any such information as to the names and addresses of the Holders in accordance with Section 312 of the Trust Indenture Act, regardless of the source from which such information was derived, and that the Trustee shall not be held accountable by reason of mailing pursuant to a request made under Section 312 of the Trust Indenture Act.
(c) The Company and the Guarantor agree with the Trustee that the Trustee shall not be held accountable by reason of the disclosure of any such information as to the names and addresses of the Holders in accordance with Section 312 of the Trust Indenture Act, regardless of the source from which such information was derived, and that the Trustee shall not be held accountable by reason of mailing any material pursuant to a request made under Section 312 of the Trust Indenture Act.
SECTION 703.
Reports by Trustee
.
(a) The term "reporting date," as used in this Section, means April 15 of each year commencing with the first such date after the issuance of the first series of Securities hereunder. Within 60 days after the reporting date in each year (beginning with April 15, 2013), the Trustee shall transmit to the Holders of Securities, a brief report dated as of such date in accordance with, and only if required under, Section 313(a) of the Trust Indenture Act.
 
(b) The Trustee shall transmit to the Holders of Securities a brief report with respect to the matters specified in, and within the times required under, Section 313(b) of the Trust Indenture Act.
(c) Reports pursuant to this Section shall be transmitted in the manner and to the persons required by Sections 313(c) and 313(d) of the Trust Indenture Act. The Company will promptly notify the Trustee when the Securities of any Series are listed on any stock exchange.
SECTION 704.
Reports by Company and the Guarantor
.
The Company and the Guarantor will:
(1) file with the Trustee, within 15 days after the Company or the Guarantor, as the case may be, is required to file the same with the Commission, copies of the annual reports and of the information, documents and other reports (or copies of such portions of any of the foregoing as the Commission may from time to time by rules and regulations prescribe) which the Company or the Guarantor may be required to file with the Commission pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act; or, if the Company or the Guarantor is not required to file information, documents or reports pursuant to either of said Sections, then it will file with the Trustee and the Commission, in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed from time to time by the Commission, such of the supplementary and periodic information, documents and reports which may be required pursuant to Section 13 of the Exchange Act in respect of a security listed and registered on a national securities exchange as may be prescribed from time to time in such rules and regulations;
(2) file with the Trustee and the Commission, in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed from time to time by the Commission, such additional information, documents and reports with respect to compliance by the Company or the Guarantor with the conditions and covenants of this Indenture as may be required from time to time by such rules and regulations; and
(3) transmit to the Holders, in the manner and to the extent provided in Section 313(c) of the Trust Indenture Act, within 30 days after the filing thereof with the Trustee, such summaries of any information, documents and reports required to be filed by the Company or the Guarantor pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Section as may be required by rules and regulations prescribed from time to time by the Commission.
Delivery of such reports, information and documents to the Trustee is for informational purposes only and the Trustee's receipt of such shall not constitute constructive notice of any information contained therein or determinable from information contained therein, including the Company's compliance with any of its covenants hereunder (as to which the Trustee is entitled to rely exclusively on Officers' Certificates).
 
SECTION 801.
Consolidations, Mergers and Sales Permitted Subject to Certain Conditions
.
The Company and the Guarantor shall not consolidate with, or sell or convey all or substantially all of their respective assets to, or merge with or into any other person or entity unless (i) either the Guarantor or the Company, as applicable, shall be the continuing corporation, or the successor shall be a corporation, limited liability company, partnership or trust organized and existing under the laws of the United States or a state thereof and the successor Person shall expressly assume the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all the Securities and the due and punctual performance and observance of all of the covenants and conditions of the Guarantor or the Company, as applicable, under this Indenture by supplemental indenture satisfactory to the Trustee, executed and delivered to the Trustee by such Person; (ii) the Guarantor or the Company, as applicable, or the successor Person, as the case may be, shall not, immediately after the merger or consolidation, or the sale or conveyance, be in default in the performance of any such covenant or condition; and (iii) after giving effect to the transaction, no Event of Default or event which, after notice or lapse of time, would become an Event of Default shall have occurred or be continuing.
SECTION 802.
Rights and Duties of Successor Person
.
In case of any such consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance and upon any such assumption by the successor Person, such successor Person shall succeed to and be substituted for the Guarantor or the Company, as applicable, with the same effect as if it had been named herein as the party of the first part, and the predecessor corporation shall be relieved of any further obligation under this Indenture and the Securities. Any such successor Person to the Company thereupon may cause to be signed, and may issue either in its own name or in the name of the Company, any or all of the Securities assumable hereunder which theretofore shall not have been signed by the Company and delivered to the Trustee; and, upon the order of such successor Person, instead of the Company, and subject to all the terms, conditions and limitations in this Indenture prescribed, the Trustee shall authenticate and shall deliver any Securities which previously shall have been signed and delivered by the officers of the Company to the Trustee for authentication, and any Securities which such successor Person thereafter shall cause to be signed and delivered to the Trustee for that purpose. All the Securities of any series so issued shall in all respects have the same legal rank and benefit under this Indenture as the Securities of that series theretofore or thereafter issued in accordance with the terms of this Indenture as though all of such Securities had been issued at the date of the execution hereof.
In case of any such consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance such changes in phraseology and form (but not in substance) may be made in the Securities thereafter to be issued as may be appropriate.
 
SECTION 803.
Officers' Certificate and Opinion of Counsel
.
The Company or the Guarantor, as applicable, shall provide to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel as conclusive evidence, subject to Section 315 of the Trust Indenture Act, that any such consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance, and any such assumption, complies with the provisions of this Article Eight.
SECTION 901.
Supplemental Indentures Without Consent of Holders
.
Without the consent of any Holders, the Company and the Guarantor, when authorized by or pursuant to one or more Board Resolutions, and the Trustee, at any time and from time to time, may enter into one or more indentures supplemental hereto, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, for any of the following purposes:
(1) to evidence the succession of another Person to the Company or the Guarantor and the assumption by any such successor of the covenants of the Company or the Guarantor herein and in the Securities; or
(2) to add to the covenants of the Company or the Guarantor for the benefit of the Holders of all or any series of Securities (and if such covenants are to be for the benefit of less than all series of Securities, stating that such covenants are expressly being included solely for the benefit of such series) or to surrender any right or power herein conferred upon the Company or the Guarantor; or
(3) to add to or change any of the provisions of this Indenture to such extent as shall be necessary to permit or facilitate the issuance of Bearer Securities of any series, registrable or not registrable as to principal, and with or without interest coupons, or to permit or facilitate the issuance of Securities of any series in uncertificated form; or
(4) to add to, change or eliminate any of the provisions of this Indenture in respect of one or more series of Securities; , , that any such addition, change or elimination shall either (i) not adversely affect the rights of the Holders of Outstanding Securities of any series in any material respect, or (ii) not apply to any Outstanding Securities of any series created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture where such addition, change or elimination has an adverse effect on the rights of the Holders of such Outstanding Securities in any material respect; or
provided
however
(5) to secure the Securities of any series; or
(6) to establish the form or terms of Securities of any series as permitted by ; or
Sections 201 and 301
(7) to evidence and provide for the acceptance of appointment hereunder by a successor Trustee with respect to the Securities of one or more series and to add to or
 
change any of the provisions of this Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of the trusts hereunder by more than one Trustee, pursuant to the requirements of ; or
Section 609(b)
(8) to cure any ambiguity or defect in and to correct or supplement any provision in this Indenture that may be inconsistent with any other provision in this Indenture, or to make any other provisions with respect to matters or questions arising under this Indenture; , that any such action pursuant to this clause (8) shall not adversely affect the rights of the Holders of Outstanding Securities of any series in any material respect; or
provided, however
(9) to modify, eliminate or add to the provisions of this Indenture to such extent as shall be necessary to effect qualification of this Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act, or under any similar federal statute hereafter enacted, and to add to this Indenture such other provisions as may be expressly permitted by the Trust Indenture Act; or
(10) to amend or supplement the restrictions on and procedures for resale, attempted resale and other transfers of any series of Securities (whether or not Outstanding) to reflect any change in applicable law or regulation (or interpretation thereof) or in practices relating to the resale or transfer of restricted securities generally.
SECTION 902.
Supplemental Indentures with Consent of Holders
.
With the consent of the Holders of not less than a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding affected by such supplemental indenture, by the Act of said Holders delivered to the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee, the Company and the Guarantor, when authorized by or pursuant to Board Resolutions, and the Trustee may enter into an indenture or indentures supplemental hereto for the purpose of adding any provisions to or changing in any manner or eliminating any of the provisions of this Indenture or of modifying in any manner the rights of the Holders of Securities of such series under this Indenture; , that no such supplemental indenture shall, without the consent of the Holder of each Outstanding Security of each series affected thereby,
provided, however
(1) change the Stated Maturity of the principal of, or any installment or principal of or interest on, any such Security, or reduce the principal amount thereof or the rate of interest thereon or premium (if any) payable upon the redemption thereof, or reduce the obligation of the Company to pay principal amounts, or reduce the amount of the principal of an Original Issue Discount Security that would be due and payable upon a declaration of acceleration of the Maturity thereof pursuant to , or change any Place of Payment where, or the coin or currency in which, any such Security of such series or any principal, premium (if any), or interest thereon is payable or impair the right to institute suit for the enforcement of any such payment on or after the due date thereof (or, in the case of redemption, on or after the Redemption Date), or
Section 502
(2) modify or waive any provision of Article Fifteen, or
 
(3) reduce the percentage in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series, the consent of whose Holders is required for any modifications or amendments to this Indenture or to the terms and conditions of that series of Securities, or to approve any supplemental indenture relating to such series, or the consent of whose Holders is required for any waiver with respect to such series (of compliance with certain provisions of this Indenture or certain defaults hereunder and their consequences) provided for in this Indenture, or
(4) modify any of the provisions of this Section, or , except to increase any such percentage or to provide that certain other provisions of this Indenture cannot be modified or waived without the consent of the Holder of each Outstanding Security affected thereby.
Section 513
Section 1007
A supplemental indenture which changes or eliminates any covenant or other provision of this Indenture which has expressly been included solely for the benefit of one or more particular previously created series of Securities, or which modifies the rights of the Holders of Securities of such previously created series with respect to such covenant or other provision, shall be deemed not to affect the rights under this Indenture of the Holders of Securities of any other series.
It shall not be necessary for any Act of Holders under this Section to approve the particular form of any proposed supplemental indenture, but it shall be sufficient if such Act shall approve the substance thereof.
SECTION 903.
Execution of Supplemental Indentures; Opinions
.
In executing, or accepting the additional trusts created by, any supplemental indenture permitted by this Article or the modifications thereby of the trusts created by this Indenture, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive, and shall be fully protected in relying upon, an Opinion of Counsel stating that the execution of such supplemental indenture is authorized or permitted by this Indenture, and that it will be valid and binding upon the Company and the Guarantor in accordance with its terms. The Trustee may, but shall not (except to the extent required in the case of a supplemental indenture entered into under ) be obligated to, enter into any such supplemental indenture which affects the Trustee's own rights, duties or immunities under this Indenture or otherwise.
Section 901(9)
SECTION 904.
Effect of Supplemental Indentures
.
Except as provided in this Article, upon the execution of any supplemental indenture under this Article, this Indenture shall be modified in accordance therewith, and such supplemental indenture shall form a part of this Indenture for all purposes; and every Holder of Securities theretofore or thereafter authenticated and delivered hereunder shall be bound thereby.
SECTION 905.
Conformity with Trust Indenture Act
.
Every supplemental indenture executed pursuant to this Article shall conform to the requirements of the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect if this Indenture shall then be qualified under the Trust Indenture Act.
 
SECTION 906.
Reference in Securities to Supplemental Indentures
.
Securities of any series authenticated and delivered after the execution of any supplemental indenture pursuant to this Article may, and shall if required by the Company, bear a notation in form approved by the Trustee as to any matter provided for in such supplemental indenture. If the Company shall so determine, new Securities of any series so modified as to conform, in the opinion of the Trustee and the Company, to any such supplemental indenture may be prepared and executed by the Company and authenticated and delivered by the Trustee in exchange for Outstanding Securities of such series.
SECTION 1001.
Payment of Principal, Premium and Interest
.
The Company covenants and agrees for the benefit of each series of Securities that it will duly and punctually pay the principal of, premium (if any) and interest on the Securities of that series in accordance with the terms of the Securities and this Indenture. Any interest due on and payable in respect of Bearer Securities on or before Maturity shall be payable only upon presentation and surrender of the several coupons for such interest installments as are evidenced thereby as they severally mature.
SECTION 1002.
Maintenance of Office or Agency
.
The Company will maintain in each Place of Payment for any series of Securities an office or agency where Securities of that series (but not Bearer Securities, except as otherwise provided below, unless such Place of Payment is located outside the United States) may be presented or surrendered for payment, where Securities of that series may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities of that series and this Indenture may be served. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of the location, and any change in the location, of each such office or agency. If Securities of a series are issuable as Bearer Securities and so long as any of such Bearer Securities are Outstanding, the Company will maintain, subject to the laws or regulations applicable thereto, an office or agency in a Place of Payment for such series which is located outside the United States where Securities of such series may be presented and surrendered for payment; , that if the Securities of such series are listed on the London Stock Exchange or the Luxembourg Stock Exchange or any other stock exchange located outside the United States and such stock exchange shall so require, the Company will maintain a Paying Agent in London, Luxembourg or any other required city located outside the United States as the case may be, so long as the Securities of such series are listed on such exchange. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of the location, and any change in the location, of such office or agency. If at any time the Company shall fail to maintain any such required office or agency or shall fail to furnish the Trustee with the address thereof, such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands may be made or served at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee, except that Bearer Securities of that series may be presented and surrendered for payment at the place specified for that purpose pursuant to , and the Company hereby appoints the Trustee as its agent to receive all such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands.
provided, however
Section 301
 
Except as otherwise provided in the form of Bearer Security of any particular series pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture, no payment of principal, premium or interest on Bearer Securities shall be made at any office or agency of the Company in the United States or by check mailed to any address in the United States or by transfer to an account maintained with a bank located in the United States; provided, however, payment of principal of, premium (if any) and interest in U.S. dollars on any Bearer Security may be made at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York if (but only if) payment of the full amount of such principal, premium (if any) or interest at all offices outside the United States maintained for the purpose by the Company in accordance with this Indenture is illegal or effectively precluded by exchange controls or other similar restrictions.
The Company may also from time to time designate one or more other offices or agencies where the Securities of one or more series may be presented or surrendered for any or all such purposes and may from time to time rescind such designations; , , that no such designation or rescission shall in any manner relieve the Company of its obligation to maintain an office or agency in each Place of Payment for Securities of any series for such purposes. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any such designation or rescission and of any change in the location of any such other office or agency.
provided
however
SECTION 1003.
Money for Securities Payments To Be Held in Trust
.
If the Company shall at any time act as its own Paying Agent with respect to any series of any Securities, it will, on or before each due date of the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any of the Securities of that series, segregate and hold in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto a sum sufficient to pay the principal, premium (if any), or interest so becoming due until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or otherwise disposed of as herein provided, and will promptly notify the Trustee of its action or failure so to act.
Whenever the Company shall have one or more Paying Agents for any series of Securities, it will, on or before each due date of the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Securities of that series, deposit with a Paying Agent a sum sufficient to pay such amount, such sum to be held as provided in the following paragraph, and (unless such Paying Agent is the Trustee) the Company will promptly notify the Trustee of its action or failure so to act.
The Company will cause each Paying Agent for any series of Securities other than the Trustee to execute and deliver to the Trustee an instrument in which such Paying Agent shall agree with the Trustee, subject to the provisions of this Section, that such Paying Agent will (i) hold all sums held by it for the payment of the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Securities of that series in trust for the benefit of the Holders of such Securities of that series until such sums shall be paid to such Holders or otherwise disposed of as herein provided; (ii) give the Trustee notice of any default by the Company (or any other obligor upon any Securities of that series) in the making of any payment of principal, premium (if any), or interest; and (iii) during the continuance of any default by the Company (or any other obligor upon the Securities of that series) in the making of any payment in respect of the Securities of that series, and upon the written request of the Trustee, forthwith pay to the Trustee all sums held in trust by such Paying Agent for payment in respect of the Securities of that series.
 
The Company may at any time, for the purpose of obtaining the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture or for any other purpose, pay, or direct the Paying Agent to pay, to the Trustee all sums held in trust by the Company or such Paying Agent, such sums to be held by the Trustee upon the same trusts as those upon which such sums were held by the Company or such Paying Agent; and upon such payment by any Paying Agent to the Trustee, the Company and such Paying Agent shall be released from all further liability with respect to such sums.
Except as otherwise provided in the form of Securities of any particular series pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture, any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Security of any series and remaining unclaimed for one year after such principal, premium (if any), or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on Company Request, or (if then held by the Company) shall be discharged from such trust; and the Holder of such Security shall thereafter, as an unsecured general creditor, look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such deposited money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, may at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in an Authorized Newspaper in each Place of Payment or to be mailed to Holders of Registered Securities, or both, notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such publication or mailing nor shall it be later than two years after such principal (and premium, if any), interest or any Additional Amounts has become due and payable, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will be repaid to the Company.
provided
however
SECTION 1004.
Statement by Officers as to Default
.
(a) The Company and the Guarantor will deliver to the Trustee, within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company and the Guarantor ending after the date hereof, statements signed on behalf of the Company and the Guarantor by their respective principal executive officer, principal financial officer or principal accounting officer stating that in the course of the performance by the signer of his or her duties as an officer of the Company or the Guarantor, as applicable, such officer would normally obtain knowledge of any default (without regard to grace periods or notice requirements) by the Company or the Guarantor, as applicable, in the performance or fulfillment of any covenant, agreement or condition contained in this Indenture, and stating whether such officer has obtained knowledge of any such default, and, if so, specifying each such default of which the signer has knowledge and the nature thereof.
(b) The Company and the Guarantor will deliver to the Trustee, within five days after the occurrence thereof, written notice of any event which after notice or lapse of time or both would become an Event of Default pursuant to .
Section 501
 
SECTION 1005.
Restriction on Creation of Secured Debt
.
So long as the Securities of any series remain Outstanding, the Guarantor and the Company will not at any time create, incur, assume or guarantee, and will not cause or permit a Restricted Subsidiary to create, incur, assume or guarantee, any Secured Debt, and the Guarantor and the Company will not at any time create, and will not cause or permit a Restricted Subsidiary to create, any Security Interest securing any indebtedness existing on the date hereof which would constitute Secured Debt if it were secured by a Security Interest, without first making effective provision (and the Guarantor and the Company covenant that in such case they will first make or cause to be made effective provision) whereby the Securities of each series then Outstanding and any other indebtedness of or guaranteed by the Guarantor and the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary then entitled thereto, subject to applicable priorities of payment, shall be secured by the Security Interest securing such Secured Debt equally and ratably with any and all other obligations and indebtedness thereby secured, so long as any such other obligations and indebtedness shall be so secured, , that the foregoing covenants shall not be applicable to Secured Debt secured solely by one or more of the following Security Interests:
provided, however
(a) (i) Security Interests upon any property hereafter acquired, constructed, developed or improved by the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary and created prior to or contemporaneously with, or within 180 days after the acquisition of property which is a parcel of real property, a building, machinery or equipment; or (ii) the acquisition by the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary of property subject to Security Interests upon such property existing at the time of the acquisition thereof, which Security Interests secure obligations assumed by the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; or (iii) any conditional sales agreement or other title retention agreement with respect to any property acquired by the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; or (iv) Security Interests existing on the property or on the outstanding shares or indebtedness of a corporation or firm at the time such corporation or firm shall become a Restricted Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary or at the time of a sale, lease or other disposition of the properties of a corporation or firm as an entirety or substantially as an entirety to the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; in each case that any such Security Interest described in clauses (ii), (iii) or (iv) does not attach to or affect property owned by the Guarantor, the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary prior to the creation thereof; or
provided
(b) Security Interests securing indebtedness of a Restricted Subsidiary to the Guarantor, the Company or to another Restricted Subsidiary; or
(c) Mechanics', materialmen's, carriers' or other like liens arising in the ordinary course of business (including construction of facilities) in respect of obligations which are not due or which are being contested in good faith; or
(d) Security Interests arising by reason of deposits with, or the giving of any form of security to, any governmental agency or any body created or approved by law or governmental regulations, which is required by law or governmental regulation as a condition to the transaction of any business, or the exercise of any privilege, franchise or license; or
 
(e) Security Interests for taxes, assessments or governmental charges or levies not yet delinquent, or the Security Interests for taxes, assessments or governmental charges or levies already delinquent but the validity of which is being contested in good faith; or
(f) Security Interests (including judgment liens) arising in connection with legal proceedings so long as such proceedings are being contested in good faith and, in the case of judgment liens, execution thereon is stayed; or
(g) Landlords' liens on fixtures located on the premises leased by the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business; or
(h) Security Interests arising in connection with contracts and subcontracts with or made at the request of the United States, or any state thereof, or any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States; or
(i) Security Interests in property of the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary to secure partial, progress, advance or other payments or any indebtedness incurred for the purpose of financing all or any part of the purchase price or the cost of construction, development, or substantial repair, alteration or improvement of the property subject to such Security Interests if the commitment for the financing is obtained not later than 180 days after the later of the completion of or the placing into operation (exclusive of test and start-up periods) of such constructed, developed, repaired, altered or improved property; or
(j) Security Interests in favor of the United States or any state, county or local government, or any agency of the United States, or any holder of bonds or other securities thereof issued, in connection with the financing of the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving property of the Guarantor, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (including, without limitation, any such property designed primarily for the purpose of pollution control), and any transfers of title to any such property and any related property or Security Interest in any such property and any related property, in favor of such government or governmental agency or any such security holders in connection with the acquisition, construction, improvement, attachment or removal of such property; provided that such transfer of title or the lien of any such Security Interest does not apply to any Principal Facility now or hereafter owned by the Guarantor, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
(k) Security Interests securing indebtedness of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary owing to an Unrestricted Subsidiary of the character described in clause (c) of the definition of Unrestricted Subsidiary that finances accounts receivables; or
(l) Any extension, renewal or refunding (or successive extensions, renewals or refundings) in whole or in part of any Secured Debt secured by any Security Interest referred to in the foregoing subparagraphs (a) through (k), inclusive, provided that the principal amount of such Secured Debt secured thereby shall not exceed the principal amount outstanding at the time of such extension, renewal or refunding, and that the Security Interest securing such Secured Debt shall be limited to the property which secured the Security Interest so extended, renewed or refunded and additions to such property.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this , the Guarantor, the Company and any one or more Restricted Subsidiaries may issue, incur, assume or guarantee Secured Debt (not including Secured Debt permitted to be secured under subparagraphs (a) through (l), inclusive, above) in an aggregate amount which, together with all other Secured Debt (not including Secured Debt to be secured under subparagraphs (a) through (l), inclusive, above) of the Guarantor, the Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries which is issued, incurred, assumed or guaranteed after the date hereof and the aggregate value of the Sale and Leaseback Transactions entered into after the date hereof (not including Sale and Leaseback Transactions referred to in clause (b) of ), does not at the time exceed 10% of Consolidated Net Tangible Assets. The term "value" shall mean, with respect to a Sale and Leaseback Transaction, as of any particular time, the amount equal to the net proceeds of the property sold or transferred or to be sold or transferred pursuant to such Sale and Leaseback Transaction divided first by the number of full years of the term of the lease and then multiplied by the number of full years of such term remaining at the time of determination, without regard to any renewal or extension options contained in the lease.
Section 1005
Section 1006
SECTION 1006.
Restriction of Sales and Leaseback Transaction
.
So long as the Securities of any series remain Outstanding, the Guarantor and the Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, enter into any Sale and Leaseback Transaction, unless (a) the Guarantor, the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary would be entitled to incur Secured Debt only by reason of the last paragraph of equal in amount to the net proceeds of the property sold or transferred or to be sold or to be transferred pursuant to such Sale and Leaseback Transaction and secured by a Security Interest on the property to be leased without equally and ratably securing the Securities of any series as provided in said Section, or (b) the Guarantor, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary shall apply, within 180 days after the effective date of such sale or transfer, an amount equal to such net proceeds to (i) the acquisition, construction, development or improvement of properties, facilities or equipment which are, or upon such acquisition, construction, development or improvement will be, a Principal Facility or Facilities or a part thereof or (ii) the redemption of Securities in accordance with the provisions of Article Eleven, or to the repayment or redemption of Senior Funded Debt of the Guarantor, the Company or of any Restricted Subsidiary (other than Senior Funded Debt owed to any Restricted Subsidiary), or in part to such acquisition, construction, development or improvement and in part to such redemption and/or repayment, , in lieu of applying an amount equal to such net proceeds to such redemption, the Guarantor or the Company may, within 180 days after such sale or transfer, deliver to the Trustee Securities (other than Securities made the basis of a reduction in a mandatory sinking fund payment pursuant to ) or deliver to the appropriate indenture trustee other debt securities constituting Senior Funded Debt (other than debt securities made the basis of a reduction in a mandatory sinking fund payment) for cancellation and thereby reduce the amount to be applied to the redemption of Securities or Senior Funded Debt pursuant to clause (ii) above by an amount equivalent to the aggregate principal amount of Securities or other debt securities so delivered (for the purposes of making such calculation the principal amount of Original Issue Discount Securities so canceled shall mean the portion thereof that could have been declared due and payable pursuant to at the time canceled). Redemption of Securities pursuant to this shall not be used as credits against mandatory sinking fund payments.
Section 1005
provided that
Section 1202
Section 502
Section 1006
 
SECTION 1007.
Waiver of Certain Covenants
.
The Company and the Guarantor may omit in any particular instance to comply with any term, provision or condition set forth in , inclusive, with respect to the Securities of any series if before or after the time for such compliance the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of such series shall, by the Act of such Holders, either waive such compliance in such instance or generally waive compliance with such term, provision or condition, but no such waiver shall extend to or affect such term, provision or condition except to the extent so expressly waived, and, until such waiver shall become effective, the obligations of the Company and the Guarantor and the duties of the Trustee in respect of any such term, provision or condition shall remain in full force and effect.
Sections 1005 and 1006
SECTION 1008.
Calculation of Original Issue Discount
.
If original issue discount is reportable to the Holders of any series of Securities, the Company shall file with the Trustee promptly at the end of each calendar year a written notice specifying the amount of original issue discount (including daily rates and accrual periods) accrued on Outstanding Securities as of the end of such year.
SECTION 1101.
Applicability of Article
.
Securities of any series which are redeemable before their Stated Maturity shall be redeemable in accordance with their terms and (except as otherwise specified as contemplated by for Securities of any series) in accordance with this Article.
Section 301
SECTION 1102.
Election to Redeem; Notice to Trustee
.
The election of the Company to redeem any Securities shall be evidenced by a Board Resolution. In case of any redemption at the election of the Company of less than all the Securities of any series, the Company shall, at least 30 days prior to the Redemption Date fixed by the Company, notify the Trustee of such Redemption Date, of the principal amount of Securities of such series to be redeemed, the Redemption Price, the place or places of payment, that payment will be made upon presentation and surrender of such Securities, that such redemption is pursuant to the mandatory or optional sinking fund, or both, if such be the case, that interest, if any (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities, original issue discount) accrued to the date fixed for redemption will be paid as specified in such notice, and that on and after that date interest, if any, thereon or on the portions thereof to be redeemed (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities, original issue discount) will cease to accrue. In the case of any redemption of such Securities prior to the expiration of any restriction on such redemption provided in the terms of such Securities, the Company shall furnish the Trustee with an Officers' Certificate evidencing compliance with such restriction. If the Redemption Price is not known at the time such notice is to be given, the actual Redemption Price, calculated as described in the terms of the Securities, will be set forth in an Officers' Certificate of the Company delivered to the Trustee no later than two Business Days prior to the Redemption Date.
 
SECTION 1103.
Selection by Trustee of Securities to Be Redeemed
.
If fewer than all the Securities of any series are to be redeemed (unless all of the Securities of such series issued on the same day with the same terms are to be redeemed), the particular Securities of such series to be redeemed shall be selected not more than 60 days prior to the Redemption Date by Applicable Procedures of the Depositary, or if the Securities are not Global Securities, by the Trustee, from the Outstanding Securities of such series not previously called for redemption, by such method as the Trustee shall deem fair and appropriate and which may provide for the selection for redemption of portions (equal to the minimum authorized denomination for Securities of that series or any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof) of the principal amount of Securities of such series of a denomination larger than the minimum authorized denomination for Securities of that series.
The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company and the Security Registrar (if other than the Trustee) in writing of the Securities selected for redemption and, in the case of any securities selected for partial redemption, the principal amount thereof to be redeemed.
For all purposes of this Indenture, unless the context otherwise requires, all provisions relating to the redemption of Securities shall relate, in the case of any such Securities redeemed or to be redeemed only in part, to the portion of the principal amount of such Securities which has been or is to be redeemed.
SECTION 1104.
Notice of Redemption
.
Notice of redemption shall be given in the manner provided in not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the Redemption Date, unless a shorter period is specified in the Securities to be redeemed, to the Holders of Securities to be redeemed. Failure to give notice by mailing in the manner herein provided to the Holder of any Registered Securities designated for redemption as a whole or in part, or any defect in the notice to any such Holder, shall not affect the validity of the proceedings for the redemption of any other Securities or portion thereof.
Section 106
Any notice that is mailed to the Holder of any Registered Securities in the manner herein provided shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly given, whether or not such Holder receives the notice.
All notices of redemption shall identify the series of Securities to be redeemed (including CUSIP number) and shall state:
(1) the Redemption Date,
(2) the Redemption Price (or manner of calculation if not then known),
(3) if fewer than all the Outstanding Securities of any series to be redeemed, the identification (and, in the case of partial redemption of any Securities, the principal amounts) of the particular Securities to be redeemed,
 
(4) that on the Redemption Date the Redemption Price will become due and payable upon each such Security to be redeemed and, if applicable, that interest thereon will cease to accrue on and after said date,
(5) the place or places where such Securities are to be surrendered for payment of the Redemption Price, and
(6) that the redemption is for a sinking fund, if such is the case.
A notice of redemption published as contemplated by need not identify particular Registered Securities to be redeemed.
Section 106
Notice of redemption of Securities to be redeemed at the election of the Company shall be given by the Company or, at the Company's request at least 45 days prior to the Redemption Date fixed by the Company (unless a shorter notice shall be satisfactory to the Trustee), by the Trustee in the name and at the expense of the Company.
SECTION 1105.
Deposit of Redemption Price
.
Prior to 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time on any Redemption Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with a Paying Agent (or, if the Company is acting as its own Paying Agent, segregate and hold in trust as provided in ) an amount of money sufficient to pay on the Redemption Date the Redemption Price of, and (except if the Redemption Date shall be an Interest Payment Date) accrued interest on, all the Securities which are to be redeemed on that date.
Section 1003
SECTION 1106.
Securities Payable on Redemption Date
.
Notice of redemption having been given as aforesaid, the Securities so to be redeemed shall, on the Redemption Date, become due and payable at the Redemption Price therein specified, and from and after such date (unless the Company shall default in the payment of the Redemption Price and accrued interest) such Securities shall cease to bear interest and the coupons for such interest appertaining to any Bearer Securities so to be redeemed, except to the extent provided below, shall be void. Upon surrender of any such Security for redemption in accordance with said notice, together with all coupons, if any, appertaining thereto maturing after the Redemption Date, such Security shall be paid by the Company at the Redemption Price, together with accrued interest to the Redemption Date; , , that installments of interest on Bearer Securities whose Stated Maturity is on or prior to the Redemption Date shall be payable only upon presentation and surrender of coupons for such interest (at an office or agency located outside the United States except as otherwise provided in ), and , that installments of interest on Registered Securities whose Stated Maturity is on or prior to the Redemption Date shall be payable to the Holders of such Securities, or one or more Predecessor Securities, registered as such at the close of business on the Regular Record Dates according to their terms and the provisions of .
provided
however
Section 1002
provided, further
Section 307
If any Bearer Security surrendered for redemption shall not be accompanied by all appurtenant coupons maturing after the Redemption Date, such Security may be paid after deducting from the Redemption Price an amount equal to the face amount of all such missing
 
coupons, or the surrender or such missing coupon or coupons may be waived by the Company and the Trustee if there be furnished to them such security or indemnity as they may require to save each of them and any Paying Agent harmless. If thereafter the Holder of such Security shall surrender to the Trustee or any Paying Agent any such missing coupon in respect of which a deduction shall have been made from the Redemption Price, such Holder shall be entitled to receive the amount so deducted; , that interest represented by coupons shall be payable only upon presentation and surrender of those coupons at an office or agency located outside of the United States except as otherwise provided in .
provided, however
Section 1002
If any such Security called for redemption shall not be so paid upon surrender thereof for redemption, the principal and premium (if any) shall, until paid, bear interest from the Redemption Date at the rate prescribed therefor in such Security.
SECTION 1107.
Securities Redeemed in Part
.
Any Security which is to be redeemed only in part shall be surrendered at a Place of Payment therefor (with, if the Company or the Trustee so requires, due endorsement by, or a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Trustee duly executed by, the Holder thereof or such Holder's attorney duly authorized in writing), and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery to the Holder of such Security without service charge, a new Security or Securities of the same series and of like tenor, of any authorized denomination as requested by such Holder, in aggregate principal amount equal to and in exchange for the unredeemed portion of the principal of the Security so surrendered.
SECTION 1201.
Applicability of this Article
.
The provisions of this Article shall be applicable to any sinking fund for the retirement of Securities of a series, if such sinking fund is established pursuant to , except as otherwise specified as contemplated by for Securities of such series.
Section 301
Section 301
The minimum amount of any sinking fund payment provided for by the terms of Securities of any series is herein referred to as a "mandatory sinking fund payment," and any payment in excess of such minimum amount provided for by the terms of Securities of any series is herein referred to as an "optional sinking fund payment." If provided for by the terms of any Securities of any series, the cash amount of any sinking fund payment may be subject to reduction as provided in . Each sinking fund payment made with respect to the Securities of any series shall be applied to the redemption of the Securities of such series as provided for by the terms of Securities of such series.
Section 1202
SECTION 1202.
Satisfaction of Sinking Fund Payments with Securities
.
The Company may, in satisfaction of all or any part of any sinking fund payment with respect to the Securities of such series to be made pursuant to the terms of such Securities as
 
provided for by the terms of such series (1) deliver Outstanding Securities of such series (other than any of such Securities previously called for redemption), together in the case of any Bearer Securities of such series with all unmatured coupons appertaining thereto, and (2) apply as a credit Securities of such series which have been redeemed either at the election of the Company pursuant to the terms of such series of Securities or through the application of permitted optional sinking fund payments pursuant to the terms of such Securities, that such series of Securities have not been previously so credited. Such Securities shall be received and credited for such purpose by the Trustee at the Redemption Price specified in such Securities for redemption through operation of the sinking fund and the amount of such sinking fund payment shall be reduced accordingly. If as a result of the delivery or credit of Securities of any series in lieu of cash payments pursuant to this , the principal amount of Securities of such series to be redeemed in order to exhaust the aforesaid cash payment shall be less than $100,000, the Trustee need not call Securities of such series for redemption, except upon Company Request, and such cash payment shall be held by the Trustee or a Paying Agent and applied to the next succeeding sinking fund payment, , , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent shall at the request of the Company from time to time pay over and deliver to the Company any cash payment so being held by the Trustee or such Paying Agent upon delivery by the Company to the Trustee of Securities of that series purchased by the Company having an unpaid principal amount equal to the cash payment requested to be released to the Company.
provided
Section 1202
provided
however
SECTION 1203.
Redemption of Securities for Sinking Fund
.
Not less than 30 days prior to each sinking fund payment date for any series of Securities, the Company will deliver to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate specifying the amount of the next ensuing mandatory sinking fund payment for that series pursuant to the terms of that series, the portion thereof, if any, which is to be satisfied by payment of cash and the portion thereof, if any, which is to be satisfied by delivering and crediting of Securities of that series pursuant to , and the optional amount, if any, to be added in cash to the next ensuing mandatory sinking fund payment, and will also deliver to the Trustee any Securities to be so credited and not theretofore delivered. If such Officers' Certificate shall specify an optional amount to be added in cash to the next ensuing mandatory sinking fund payment, the Company shall thereupon be obligated to pay the amount therein specified. Not less than 30 days before each such sinking fund payment date the Trustee shall select the Securities to be redeemed upon such sinking fund payment date in the manner specified in and cause notice of the redemption thereof to be given in the name of and at the expense of the Company in the manner provided in . Such notice having been duly given, the redemption of such Securities shall be made upon the terms and in the manner stated in .
Section 1202
Section 1103
Section 1104
Sections 1106 and 1107
SECTION 1301.
Applicability of Article; Company's Option to Effect Defeasance
.
If pursuant to provision is made for either or both of (a) defeasance of the Securities of a series under or (b) covenant defeasance of the Securities of a series under , then the provisions of such Section or Sections, as the case may be, together
Section 301
Section 1302
Section 1303
 
with the other provisions of this Article Thirteen, shall be applicable to the Securities of such series, and the Company may at its option by or pursuant to Board Resolution, at any time, with respect to such Securities of any series, elect to have either or applied to the Outstanding Securities of such series upon compliance with the conditions set forth in this Article Thirteen.
Section 1302
Section 1303
SECTION 1302.
Defeasance and Discharge
.
Upon the Company's exercise of the above option applicable to this Section with respect to any Securities of or within a series, the Company and the Guarantor shall be deemed to have been discharged from their respective obligations with respect to the Outstanding Securities of such series on the date the conditions set forth in are satisfied (hereinafter, "defeasance"). For this purpose, such defeasance means that the Company and the Guarantor shall be deemed to have paid and discharged the entire indebtedness represented by the Outstanding Securities of such series and to have satisfied all their respective other obligations under such Securities and this Indenture insofar as such Securities are concerned (and the Trustee, at the expense of the Company and upon Company Order, shall execute proper instruments acknowledging the same), except for the following which shall survive until otherwise terminated or discharged hereunder: (A) the rights of Holders of such Outstanding Securities to receive, solely from the trust fund described in and as more fully set forth in such Section, payments in respect of the principal of, premium (if any), and interest on such Securities when such payments are due, (B) the Company's and Guarantor's obligations with respect to such Securities under and Article Fourteen and with respect to the Trustee under , (C) the rights, powers, trusts, duties, and immunities of the Trustee hereunder including pursuant to hereof and (D) this Article Thirteen. Subject to compliance with this Article Thirteen, the Company may exercise its option under this notwithstanding the prior exercise of its option under with respect to such Securities.
Section 1304
Section 1304
Sections 304, 305, 306, 1002, 1003
Section 606
Section 606
Section 1302
Section 1303
SECTION 1303.
Covenant Defeasance
.
Upon the Company's exercise of the above option applicable to this Section with respect to any Securities of or within a series, the Company and the Guarantor shall be released from their respective obligations under and, if specified pursuant to , their respective obligations under any other covenant, with respect to the Outstanding Securities of such series on and after the date the conditions set forth below are satisfied (hereinafter, "covenant defeasance") and such Securities shall thereafter be deemed to be not "Outstanding" for the purpose of any direction, waiver, consent or declaration or Act of Holders (and the consequences of any thereof) in connection with or such other covenants, but shall continue to be deemed Outstanding for all other purposes hereunder. For this purpose, such covenant defeasance means that, with respect to the Outstanding Securities of such series, the Company and the Guarantor may omit to comply with and shall have no liability in respect of any term, condition or limitation set forth in any such Section or such other covenant, whether directly or indirectly, by reason of any reference in any such Section to any other provision herein or in any other document and such omission to comply shall not constitute a default or an Event of Default under  or otherwise, as the case may be, but, except as specified above, the remainder of this Indenture and such Securities shall be unaffected thereby.
Sections 501 (5), 1005 and 1006
Section 301
Sections 501 (5), 1005 and 1006
Sections 501 (4), 501 (5), 501 (8)
 
SECTION 1304.
Conditions of Defeasance
.
The following shall be the conditions to application of either or to the Outstanding Securities of or within a series:
Section 1302
Section 1303
(1) the Company shall irrevocably have deposited or caused to be deposited with the Trustee (or another trustee satisfying the requirements of who shall agree to comply with the provisions of this Article Thirteen applicable to it) as trust funds in trust for the purpose of making the following payments, specifically pledged as security for, and dedicated solely to, the benefit of the Holders of such Securities, (A) money in U.S. dollars in an amount, or (B) U.S. Government Obligations which through the scheduled payment of principal and interest, if any, in respect thereof in accordance with their terms will provide, not later than one day before the due date of any payment of principal of, premium (if any), and interest, if any, on such Securities, money in U.S. dollars in an amount, or (C) a combination thereof, sufficient, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accountants expressed in a written certification thereof delivered to the Trustee, to pay and discharge, and which shall be applied by the Trustee (or other qualifying trustee) to pay and discharge, (i) the principal of, premium (if any), and each installment of principal of, premium (if any) and interest, if any, on the Outstanding Securities of such series on the Stated Maturity of such principal or installment of principal or interest and (ii) any mandatory sinking fund payments or analogous payments applicable to the Outstanding Securities of such series on the day on which such payments are due and payable in accordance with the terms of this Indenture and of such Securities.
Section 607
(2) No Event of Default or event which with notice or lapse of time or both would become an Event of Default under  with respect to any other series of Securities, at any time during the period ending on the 123rd day after the date of such deposit or, if longer, ending on the day following the expiration of the longest preference period applicable to the Company in respect of such deposit (it being understood that this condition shall not be deemed satisfied until the expiration of such period).
Sections 501 (6) and (7)
(3) Such defeasance or covenant defeasance shall not result in a breach or violation of, or constitute a default under, this Indenture or any other material agreement or instrument to which the Company or the Guarantor is a party or by which it is bound.
(4) In the case of an election under , the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Holders of the Outstanding Securities of such series will not recognize income, gain or loss for federal income tax purposes as a result of such defeasance and will be subject to federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such defeasance had not occurred.
Section 1302
 
(5) In the case of an election under , the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that the Holders of the Outstanding Securities of such series will not recognize income, gain or loss for federal income tax purposes as a result of such covenant defeasance and will be subject to federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such covenant defeasance has not occurred.
Section 1303
(6) The Company delivers to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that all conditions precedent to the defeasance and discharge of the Securities of such series as contemplated by this Article Thirteen have been satisfied.
SECTION 1305.
Deposited Money and U.S. Government Obligations to Be Held in Trust; Miscellaneous
.
Subject to the provisions of the last paragraph of , all money and U.S. Government Obligations (including the proceeds thereof) deposited with the Trustee (or other qualifying trustee, collectively, for purposes of this , the "Trustee") pursuant to in respect of the Outstanding Securities of such series shall be held in trust and applied by the Trustee, in accordance with the provisions of such Securities and this Indenture, to the payment, either directly or through any Paying Agent (including the Company acting as its own Paying Agent) as the Trustee may determine, to the Holders of such Securities, of all sums due and to become due thereon in respect of principal, premium (if any), and interest (if any), but such money need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law.
Section 1003
Section 1305
Section 1304
The Company shall pay and indemnify the Trustee against any tax, fee or other charge imposed on or assessed against the U.S. Government Obligations deposited pursuant to or the principal and interest received in respect thereof other than any such tax, fee or other charge which by law is for the account of the Holders of the Outstanding Securities of such series.
Section 1304
Anything in this Article Thirteen to the contrary notwithstanding, the Trustee shall deliver or pay to the Company from time to time upon Company Request any money or U.S. Government Obligations held by it as provided in which, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accounts expressed in a written certification thereof delivered to the Trustee, are in excess of the amount thereof which would then be required to be deposited to effect an equivalent defeasance or covenant defeasance.
Section 1304
SECTION 1306.
Reinstatement
.
If the Trustee or any Paying Agent is unable to apply any money or U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with this Article Thirteen by reason of any legal proceeding or by reason of any order or judgment of any court or government authority enjoining, restraining or otherwise prohibiting such application, the Company's obligations under this Indenture and Securities of the defeased series shall be revived and reinstated as though no deposit had occurred pursuant to this Article Thirteen until such time as the Trustee or any Paying Agent is permitted to apply all such money or U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with this Article Thirteen.
 
SECTION 1401.
Applicability of Article
.
Securities of any series which are repurchasable before their Stated Maturity at the option of the Holders shall be repurchasable in accordance with their terms and (except as otherwise specified as contemplated by for Securities of any series) in accordance with this Article.
Section 301
SECTION 1402.
Notice of Repurchase Date
.
Notice of any Repurchase Date with respect to Securities of any series shall, unless otherwise specified by the terms of the Securities of any series, be given by the Company not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to such Repurchase Date to each Holder of Securities of such series in accordance with (with a copy to the Trustee).
Section 106
The notice as to Repurchase Date shall state:
(1) the Repurchase Date;
(2) the Repurchase Price;
(3) the place or places where such Securities are to be surrendered for payment of the Repurchase Price and the date by which Securities must be so surrendered in order to be repurchased;
(4) a description of the procedure which a Holder must follow to exercise a repurchase right; and
(5) that exercise of the option to elect repurchase is irrevocable.
No failure of the Company to give the foregoing notice shall limit any Holder's right to exercise a repurchase right.
SECTION 1403.
Deposit of Repurchase Price
.
Prior to 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time on the Repurchase Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with a Paying Agent (or, if the Company is acting as its own Paying Agent, segregate and hold in trust as provided in ) an amount of money sufficient to pay the Repurchase Price of and (unless the Repurchase Date shall be an Interest Payment Date) accrued interest, if any, on all of the Securities of such series which are to be repurchased on that date.
Section 1003
 
SECTION 1404.
Securities Payable on Repurchase Date
.
The form of option to elect repurchase having been delivered as specified in the form of Security for such series as provided in , the Securities of such series so to be repurchased shall, on the Repurchase Date, become due and payable at the Repurchase Price applicable thereto and from and after such date (unless the Company shall default in the payment of the Repurchase Price and accrued interest) such Securities shall cease to bear interest. Upon surrender of any such Security for repurchase in accordance with said notice, such Security shall be paid by the Company at the Repurchase Price together with accrued interest to the Repurchase Date; , that installments of interest whose Stated Maturity is on or prior to such Repurchase Date shall be payable to the Holders of such Securities, or one or more Predecessor Securities, registered as such at the close of business on the relevant Record Dates according to their terms and the provisions of .
Section 201
provided, however
Section 307
If any such Security shall not be paid upon surrender thereof for repurchase, the principal (and premium, if any) shall, until paid, bear interest from the Repurchase Date at the rate prescribed therefor in such Security.
SECTION 1405.
Securities Repurchased in Part
.
Any Security which by its terms may be repurchased in part at the option of the Holder and which is to be repurchased only in part shall be surrendered at any office or agency of the Company designated for that purpose pursuant to (with, if the Company or the Trustee so requires, due endorsement by, or a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Trustee duly executed by, the Holder thereof or such Holder's attorney duly authorized in writing), and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery to the Holder of such Security without service charge, a new Security or Securities of the same series, of any authorized denomination as requested by such Holder, in aggregate principal amount equal to and in exchange for the unrepurchased portion of the principal of the Security so surrendered.
Section 1002
SECTION 1501.
Guarantee
.
The Guarantor hereby unconditionally guarantees to each Holder of a Security, and to the Trustee on behalf of each such Holder, the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium (if any) and interest on such Security and the due and punctual payment of any sinking fund payments provided for pursuant to the terms of such Security when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the Stated Maturity, by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, in accordance with the terms of such Security and of this Indenture. In case of the failure of the Company punctually to make any such principal, premium (if any), interest, or sinking fund payment, the Guarantor hereby agrees to cause any such payment to be made punctually when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the Stated Maturity, by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, and as if such payment were made by the Company.
 
The Guarantor hereby agrees that its obligations hereunder shall be as if it were principal debtor and not merely surety, and shall be absolute and unconditional, irrespective of, and unaffected by, any invalidity, irregularity or unenforceability of any Security of any series or this Indenture, any failure to enforce the provisions of any Security of any series or this Indenture, any waiver, modification or indulgence granted to the Company with respect thereto by the Holder of any Security of any series or the Trustee, or any other circumstance which may otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge of a surety or guarantor; , that, notwithstanding the foregoing, no such waiver, modification, indulgence or circumstance shall without the consent of the Guarantor increase the principal amount of a Security or the interest rate thereon or change the currency of payment with respect to any Security, or alter the Stated Maturity thereof, or increase the principal amount of any Original Issue Discount Security that would be due and payable upon a declaration of acceleration or acceleration of the maturity thereof pursuant to , or increase any premium payable upon redemption thereof or increase any sinking fund payment required under such Security. The Guarantor hereby waives diligence, presentment, demand of payment, filing of claims with a court in the event of merger or bankruptcy of the Company, any right to require a proceeding first against the Company, protest or notice with respect to any Security or the indebtedness evidenced thereby or with respect to any sinking fund payment required pursuant to the terms of a Security issued under this Indenture and all demands whatsoever, and covenants that this Guarantee will not be discharged with respect to any Security except by payment in full of the principal of, premium (if any) and interest, if any, thereon. If at any time any payment of principal of, premium (if any) and interest on such Security is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company, the Guarantor's obligations hereunder with respect to such payment shall be reinstated as of the date of such rescission, restoration or return as though such payment had become due but had not been made at such time.
provided, however
Section 502
SECTION 1502.
Subrogation
.
The Guarantor shall not be subrogated to the rights of the Holder of a Security against the Company in respect of any amounts paid to such Holder pursuant to the provisions of this Guarantee unless and until the Guarantor or the Company has made due payment of the principal of, premium (if any) and interest on each and every other Outstanding Security when the same becomes due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, in accordance with the terms of such Security and this Indenture.
SECTION 1601.
Securities in Foreign Currencies
.
Whenever this Indenture provides for (i) any action by, or the determination of any of the rights of, Holders of Securities of any series in which not all of such Securities are denominated in the same currency, or (ii) any distribution to Holders of Securities, in the absence of any
 
provision to the contrary in the form of Security of any particular series, any amount in respect of any Security denominated in a currency other than U.S. dollars shall be treated for any such action or distribution as that amount of U.S. dollars that could be obtained for such amount on such reasonable basis of exchange and as of the record date with respect to Registered Securities of such series (if any) for such action, determination of rights or distribution (or, if there shall be no applicable record date, such other date reasonably proximate to the date of such action, determination of rights or distribution) as the Company may specify in a written notice to the Trustee or, in the absence of such written notice, as the Trustee may determine.
SECTION 1701.
Indenture and Securities Solely Corporate Obligations
.
No recourse under or upon any obligation, covenant or agreement contained in this Indenture, any supplemental indenture, or in any Security, because of any indebtedness evidenced thereby, shall be had against any incorporator, or against any past, present or future shareholder, employee, officer or director, as such, of the Company or the Guarantor or of any successor corporation of the Company or the Guarantor, either directly or through the Company or the Guarantor or any successor corporation of the Company or the Guarantor, under any rule of law, statute or constitutional provision or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or by any legal or equitable proceeding or otherwise, all such liability, whether at common law, in equity, by any constitution, statute or otherwise, of incorporators, shareholders, employees, officers or directors being expressly waived and released by the acceptance of the Securities by the Holders thereof and as part of the consideration of the issuance of the Securities.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Indenture to be duly executed as of the day and year first above written.
 
 

Exhibit 4.2
 
EXHIBIT AForm of 5.625% Senior Note due 2019
 
FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE (this ""), dated as of April 30, 2012, by and among Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation, as Guarantor (the ""), and Wells Fargo, National Association, a national banking association, as trustee (the "").
First Supplemental Indenture
Company
Guarantor
Trustee
, the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee executed and delivered an Indenture, dated as of April 30, 2012 (the "" and as supplemented by this First Supplemental Indenture, the ""), to provide for the issuance by the Company from time to time of its debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness (the "");
WHEREAS
Base Indenture
Indenture
Securities
, Sections 201, 301 and 901 of the Base Indenture provide that the Company and the Guarantor, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee, at any time and from time to time, may enter into one or more indentures supplemental to the Indenture, without the consent of any Holders, to, among other things, establish the form or terms of Securities of any series as permitted by the Indenture;
WHEREAS
, the issuance and sale of $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of a new series of the Securities of the Company designated as its 5.625 % Senior Notes due 2019 (the "") have been authorized by resolutions adopted by the board of directors of the Company and the Guarantor;
WHEREAS
Notes
, the Company desires to issue and sell $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Notes as of the date hereof;
WHEREAS
, the Company desires to establish the form and terms of the Notes;
WHEREAS
, all things necessary to make this First Supplemental Indenture a legal and binding supplement to the Base Indenture in accordance with its terms and the terms of the Base Indenture have been done;
WHEREAS
, the Company and the Guarantor have complied with all conditions precedent provided for in the Base Indenture relating to this First Supplemental Indenture; and
WHEREAS
, the Company has requested that the Trustee execute and deliver this First Supplemental Indenture.
WHEREAS
:
NOW, THEREFORE
For and in consideration of the premises stated herein and the purchase of the Notes by the Holders thereof, the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee covenant and agree, for the benefit of each other and the equal and proportionate benefit of the Holders of the Notes, as follows:
Section 101. . This First Supplemental Indenture constitutes a supplement to the Base Indenture and an integral part of the Indenture and shall be read together with the Base Indenture as though all the provisions thereof are contained in one instrument. Except as expressly amended by the First Supplemental Indenture, the terms and provisions of the Base Indenture shall remain in full force and effect. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this First Supplemental Indenture shall only apply to the Notes.
Scope
Section 201. . For all purposes of this First Supplemental Indenture unless otherwise specified herein:
Definitions and Other Provisions of General Application
(a) all terms used in this First Supplemental Indenture which are not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings they are given in the Base Indenture;
(b) the provisions of general application stated in the first paragraph of Section 101 of the Base Indenture shall apply to this First Supplemental Indenture, except that the words "," "," "" and "" and other words of similar import refer to this First Supplemental Indenture as a whole and not to the Base Indenture or any particular Article, Section or other subdivision of the Base Indenture or this First Supplemental Indenture;
herein
hereof
hereto
hereunder
(c) Section 101 of the Base Indenture is amended and supplemented, solely with respect to the Notes, by inserting the following additional defined terms in their appropriate alphabetical positions:
means the board of directors of the Guarantor.
"Board of Directors"
means such time as:
"Change of Control"
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means an offer to purchase Notes then outstanding by the Company from the holders commenced by mailing a notice to the Trustee and each holder stating:
Offer to Purchase
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 301. .
Form and Dating
(a) The Notes shall be substantially in the form of attached hereto. The Notes may have a legend or legends or endorsements as may be required to comply with any law or with any rules of any securities exchange or usage. The Notes shall be dated the date of their authentication. The Notes and any beneficial interest in the Notes shall be in minimum denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.
Exhibit A
(b) The terms contained in the Notes shall constitute, and are hereby expressly made, a part of the Indenture as supplemented by this First Supplemental Indenture and the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee, by their execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture, expressly agree to such terms and provisions and to be bound thereby.
Section 302. . The following terms relating to the Notes are hereby established:
Terms of the Notes
(a) . The Notes shall constitute a series of Securities having the title "5.625% Senior Notes due 2019."
Title
(b) . The aggregate Principal amount of the Notes that may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture, as amended hereby, shall be $350,000,000 on the original issue date. Provided that no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing with respect to the Notes, the Company may, without notice to or the consent of the Holders, create and issue additional Securities in an unlimited amount having the same terms as, and ranking equally and ratably with, the Notes in all respects and so that such additional Notes will be consolidated and form a single series with, and have the same terms as to status, redemption or otherwise as, the Notes initially issued; provided that if the additional Securities are not fungible with the Notes for U.S. federal income tax purposes, the additional Securities will have a separate CUSIP number.
Principal Amount
 
(c) . The entire outstanding principal of the Notes shall be payable on May 1, 2019.
Maturity Date
(d) . The rate at which the Notes shall bear interest shall be 5.625% per annum; the date from which interest shall accrue on the Notes shall be April 30, 2012 or the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for; the Interest Payment Dates for the Notes shall be May 1 and November 1 of each year, beginning November 1, 2012; the interest so payable and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date, will be paid to the Person in whose names the Notes are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the April 15 or October 15, as the case may be, immediately preceding such Interest Payment Date; interest will be computed on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months.
Interest Rate
(e) . The Place of Payment shall be the Corporate Trust Office.
Place of Payment of Principal and Interest
(f) . The Notes shall be redeemable as specified in the form of Note attached as hereto, and Article Eleven of the Base Indenture shall reply to any such redemption.
Optional Redemption
Exhibit A
(g) . Except as provided pursuant Article Four hereof, the Company shall have no other obligation to redeem, purchase or repay the Notes pursuant to any mandatory redemption, sinking fund or analogous provisions or at the option of a Holder thereof.
Mandatory Redemption, Repurchase or Repayment
(h) . The Notes shall initially be issuable as one or more Global Securities in registered form.
Registered Form
(i) . Article Thirteen of the Base Indenture shall apply to the Notes.
Defeasance
(j) . The Depositary for any Notes issued as Global Securities shall be The Depository Trust Company ("DTC") or any successor Depositary appointed by the Company upon the termination of services of DTC (or any successor to DTC). While the Notes are evidenced by one or more Global Securities, the Depository or its nominee, as the case may be, shall be the sole Holder thereof for all purposes under the Indenture.
Depositary
(k) . Other terms applicable to the Notes are as otherwise provided for below.
Additional Terms
Section 401. The Company must commence, within 30 days of the occurrence of a Change of Control, and consummate an Offer to Purchase for all Notes, at a purchase price equal to 101% of their principal amount, plus accrued interest, if any, to the Payment Date.
Redemption on a Change in Control.
 
However, the Company shall not be required to make an Offer to Purchase upon a Change of Control if (i) a third party makes the Offer to Purchase in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this First Supplemental Indenture, and purchases all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under the Offer to Purchase upon a Change of Control, or (ii) a notice of redemption has been given pursuant to the Notes as described in Section 1104 of the Base Indenture to redeem all outstanding Notes otherwise subject to the Offer to Purchase, unless and until there is a default in payment of the applicable Redemption Price. An Offer to Purchase upon the occurrence of a Change of Control may be made by either the Company or a third party in advance of a Change of Control if a definitive agreement to effect the Change of Control is in place at the time such Offer to Purchase is made and the Offer to Purchase is effected upon the consummation of the Change of Control, and such Offer to Purchase may be conditional on the Change of Control.
On the Payment Date, the Company shall (1) accept for payment Notes or portions thereof tendered pursuant to an Offer to Purchase; (2) deposit with the paying agent money sufficient to pay the purchase price of all Notes or portions thereof so accepted; and (3) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Trustee all Notes or portions thereof so accepted together with an officers' certificate specifying the Notes or portions thereof accepted for payment by the Company. The paying agent shall promptly mail to the holders of Notes so accepted payment in an amount equal to the purchase price, and the Trustee shall promptly authenticate and mail to such holders a new Notes equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Notes surrendered (or through book entry transaction if Global Securities); provided that each Note purchased and each new Note issued shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. The Company will publicly announce the results of an Offer to Purchase as soon as practicable after the Payment Date. The Trustee shall act as the paying agent for an Offer to Purchase. The Company will comply with Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent such laws and regulations are applicable, in the event that the Company is required to repurchase Notes pursuant to an Offer to Purchase.
Section 501. . This First Supplemental Indenture shall incorporate and be governed by the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act that are required to be part of and to govern indentures qualified under the Trust Indenture Act.
Trust Indenture Act of 1939
Section 502. . This First Supplemental Indenture and the Notes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to the conflict of laws principals thereof. EACH OF THE COMPANY, THE GUARANTOR, AND THE TRUSTEE, AND BY ITS ACCEPTANCE THEREOF, EACH HOLDER OF A NOTE, HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE NOTES, THE GUARANTEE OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
Governing Law
 
Section 503. . This First Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original; but such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument. The exchange of copies of this First Supplemental Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original First Supplemental Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
Counterparties
Section 504. . In case any provision in this First Supplemental Indenture or the Notes shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
Separability
Section 505. . The Base Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this First Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed. The Base Indenture and this First Supplemental Indenture shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. All provisions included in this First Supplemental Indenture supersede any conflicting provisions included in the Base Indenture unless not permitted by law. The Trustee accepts the trusts created by the Base Indenture, as supplemented by this First Supplemental Indenture, and agrees to perform the same upon the terms and conditions of the Base Indenture, as supplemented by this First Supplemental Indenture.
Ratification
Section 506. . The provisions of this First Supplemental Indenture shall become effective as of the date hereof.
Effectiveness
Section 507. . All agreements of the Company and the Guarantor in this First Supplemental Indenture shall bind their successors. All agreements of the Trustee in this First Supplemental Indenture shall bind its successors.
Successors
Section 508. . The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company and the Guarantor and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness. The Trustee shall not be responsible in any manner whatsoever for or in respect of the validity or sufficiency of this First Supplemental Indenture, the Notes, any Guarantee or for or in respect of the recitals contained herein, all of which recitals are made solely by the Company and the Guarantor.
Trustee's Disclaimer
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this First Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT A
THIS NOTE IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE OF A DEPOSITARY. THIS NOTE IS EXCHANGEABLE FOR NOTES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR ITS NOMINEE ONLY IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT AS A WHOLE BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY.
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
 
ANIXTER INC., a corporation incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware (hereinafter called the "Company", which term includes any successor corporation under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of $350,000,000 on May 1, 2019 and to pay interest thereon at the rate per annum of 5.625 % from April 30, 2012 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid, semiannually on May 1 and November 1 in each year, commencing November 1, 2012, until the principal hereof has been paid or duly provided for in accordance with said Indenture. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in the Indenture, be paid to the Holder of this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) of record at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the April 15 or October 15 next preceding each Interest Payment Date. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date, and may be paid to the Holder of this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) of record at the close of business on
a Special Record Date fixed by the Company for the payment of such defaulted interest, notice whereof shall be given to Holders not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or may be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in the Indenture. Interest shall be calculated on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months.
Payment of principal, premium (if any) and interest due on this Note at Maturity or upon redemption or repurchase will be paid by wire transfer in immediately available funds against presentation and surrender of this Note by the Holder hereof at the office of the Paying Agent, but only if appropriate wire transfer instructions have been received in writing (or by such other means as deemed acceptable by the Paying Agent) by the Paying Agent not less than 15 days before Maturity or the Redemption Date or the Repurchase Date. In the event such instructions are not received by such 15th day, such principal and interest will be paid by check against such presentation and surrender.
All interest payments on this Note (other than interest due at Maturity, redemption or repurchase) will be made by mailing a check for such interest, payable to or upon the written order of the Holder of this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) of record at the close of business on the Regular Record Date preceding the Interest Payment Date for such interest, to the address of such Holder as it appears on the Security Register. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Holder of Securities of any series issued under the Indenture (including the Notes) which pay interest on the same Interest Payment Date and which are in an aggregate principal amount in excess of $10,000,000 may elect to receive payments of interest with respect to such Securities (other than interest due at Maturity) via wire transfer of immediately available funds by making arrangements therefor in writing (or such other means as deemed acceptable by the Paying Agent) with the Paying Agent not later than the Regular Record Date immediately preceding the applicable Interest Payment Date, or on any Global Security via wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Depositary or its nominee.
The provisions of this Note are continued on the reverse hereof and such continued provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as though fully set forth at this place. Unless the certificate of authentication herein has been executed by or on behalf of the Trustee by manual signature, this Note shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture, or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
This Note shall be construed in accordance with and governed by laws of the State of New York.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed.
 
 
 
 
 
This Note is one of a duly authorized issue of Notes of the Company (herein called the "Notes"), issuable in series, unlimited in aggregate principal amount except as may be otherwise provided in respect of the Notes of a particular series, issued and to be issued under and pursuant to an Indenture dated as of April 30, 2012, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 30, 2012 (as supplemented, the "Indenture"), duly executed and delivered by the Company, Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Guarantor") and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and is one of a series designated as 5.625% Senior Notes due 2019 (herein called the "Notes"), limited in aggregate principal amount to $350,000,000. Reference is hereby made to the Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto for a description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities thereunder of the Trustee, the Company, the Guarantor and the Holders.
The Notes will not be redeemable at any time prior to maturity except as set forth below.
The Company may at any time redeem all or part of the Notes, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' notice, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed, plus the Applicable Premium plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the Redemption Date (subject to the right of holders of record on the relevant Regular Record Date to receive interest due on an Interest Payment Date that is on or prior to the Redemption Date).
As used herein:
"Applicable Premium" means, with respect to a Note on any date of redemption, the greater of (1) 1.0% of the principal amount of such Note and (2) the excess of (a) the present value at such time of the Principal Amount that, but for the redemption, would have been payable on the maturity date of the Note, plus all remaining scheduled payments of interest on such Note that, but for the redemption, would have been payable on the Note (but excluding accrued and unpaid interest to the Redemption Date), computed using a discount rate equal to the Treasury Rate plus 50 basis points, over (b) the then outstanding principal amount of such Note.
"Treasury Rate" means the yield to maturity at the time of computation of United States Treasury securities with a constant maturity (as compiled and published in the most recent Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) which has become publicly available at least two business days prior to the Redemption Date (or, if such Statistical Release is no longer published, any publicly available source of similar market data)) most nearly equal to the period from the Redemption Date to the maturity date of the Note; provided, however, that if the period from the Redemption Date to the maturity date of the Note is not equal to the constant maturity of a United States Treasury security
 
for which a weekly average yield is given, the Treasury Rate shall be obtained by linear interpolation (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth of a year) from the weekly average yields of United States Treasury securities for which such yields are given, except that if the period from the Redemption Date to the maturity date of the Note is less than one year, the weekly average yield on actually traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to a constant maturity of one year shall be used.
Subject to certain exceptions contained in the Indenture, the Company must commence, within 30 days of the occurrence of a Change of Control, and consummate an Offer to Purchase for all Notes, at a purchase price equal to 101% of their principal amount, plus accrued interest, if any, to the Payment Date pursuant to and in accordance with the terms of the Indenture.
The Indenture provides that each Holder of a Note is entitled to the benefits of a Guarantee by the Guarantor of the timely payment of the principal, and premium, if any, of and interest on the Notes. The Guarantee enclosed herein is an integral part of this Note. The Indenture contains provisions for defeasance at any time of the entire indebtedness of the Company on this Note upon compliance by the Company with certain conditions set forth therein, which provisions apply to this Note. The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the Guarantor and the rights of the Holders under the Indenture at any time by the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of Notes at the time Outstanding, except that certain amendments specified in the Indenture may be made without approval of Holders of the Notes. The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes to waive on behalf of the Holders of the Notes compliance by the Company or the Guarantor with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Note shall be binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Note and any Note issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Note.
Unless this Note is defeased and discharged as provided in the Indenture, no reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the respective obligations of the Company and the Guarantor, which are absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and interest on this Note at the times, place, and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, transfer of this Note is registrable on the Security Register, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Trustee, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or his attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Notes of the same series containing identical terms and provisions, of authorized denominations and for a like aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
 
The Notes are issuable only as registered Notes without coupons in denominations of $2,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000. As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Notes are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Notes of the same series containing identical terms and provisions and of different authorized denominations, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
No service charge will be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge payable in connection therewith.
The Company, the Guarantor, the Trustee and any agent of the Company, the Guarantor or the Trustee may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment as herein provided and for all other purposes whether or not this Note be overdue, and neither the Company, the Guarantor, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
All terms used in the Note which are defined in the Indenture have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
This is one of the Securities of the series designated herein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
If you wish to have this Note purchased by the Company pursuant to Articles Two and Four of the First Supplemental Indenture, check the Box: 
If you wish to have a portion of this Note purchased by the Company pursuant to Articles Two and Four of the First Supplemental Indenture, state the principal amount: $.
                        
Date:
 
 
Signature must be guaranteed by a participant in a recognized signature guaranty medallion program or other signature guarantor acceptable to the Trustee.
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, Anixter International Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (the "Guarantor"), hereby unconditionally guarantees to the Holder of the Note upon which this Guarantee is endorsed the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on said Note, when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, according to the terms thereof and of the Indenture referred to therein.
In case of the failure of the Company punctually to pay any such principal, premium, if any, or interest, the Guarantor hereby agrees to cause any such payment to be made punctually when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, and as if such payment were made by the Company.
The Guarantor hereby agrees that its obligations hereunder shall be as if it were principal debtor and not merely surety, and shall be absolute and unconditional, irrespective of, and unaffected by, any invalidity, irregularity or unenforceability of any Note or the Indenture, any failure to enforce the provisions of any Note or the Indenture, any waiver, modification or indulgence granted to the Company with respect thereto by the Holder of any Note or the Trustee, or any other circumstance which may otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge of a surety or guarantor; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, no such waiver, modification, indulgence or circumstance shall without the consent of the Guarantor increase the principal amount of any Note or the interest rate thereon or change the currency of payment with respect to any Note, or alter the Stated Maturity thereof, or increase any premium payable upon redemption thereof. The Guarantor hereby waives diligence, presentment, demand of payment, filing of claims with a court in the event of merger or bankruptcy of the Company, any right to require a proceeding first against the Company, protest or notice with respect to any Note or the indebtedness evidenced thereby and all demands whatsoever, and covenants that this Guarantee will not be discharged with respect to any Note except by payment in full of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest, if any, thereon.
provided, however,
The Guarantor shall not be subrogated to the rights of the Holder of this Note against the Company in respect of any amounts paid to the Holder pursuant to the provisions of this Guarantee unless and until the Guarantor or the Company has made due payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on each and every other outstanding Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at Stated Maturity, by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption or otherwise, in accordance with the terms of the Indenture.
If at any time any payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on this Note is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company, the Guarantor's obligations hereunder with respect to such payment shall be reinstated as of the date of such rescission, restoration or return as though such payment had become due but had not been made at such time.
This Guarantee ranks equally with all other unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Guarantor. This Guarantee will remain in full force and effect until the principal of and interest on the Note have been fully paid.
 
This Guarantee shall not be valid or become obligatory for any purpose with respect to the Note upon which it is endorsed until the certificate of authentication on said Note shall have been signed by the Trustee or the authenticating agent.
This Guarantee shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to conflicts of law principles thereof.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Guarantor has caused this Guarantee to be duly executed.
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to Anixter International Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Parent"), and Anixter Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), in connection with a registration statement on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-180905 and 333-180905-01)(the "Registration Statement") filed by the Parent and the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") on April 24, 2012 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"). The Registration Statement, which became effective upon filing pursuant to Rule 462(e) under the Securities Act, relates to the issuance and sale from time to time, pursuant to Rule 415 of the rules and regulations promulgated under the Securities Act, of an unspecified amount of (i) debt securities of the Company and (ii) guarantees of the Parent in connection with the debt securities. We have also acted as counsel to the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Company's 5.625% Notes due 2019 in the aggregate principal amount of $350,000,000 (the "Notes"), which are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by the Parent (the "Guarantees"), in an underwritten public offering pursuant to an Underwriting Agreement dated April 25, 2012 among the Company and the underwriters named therein (the "Underwriting Agreement").
The Notes and Guarantees are to be issued under an Indenture among the Parent, the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, as filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Parent's Current Report on Form 8-K filed the date hereof (the "Form 8-K"), and a First Supplemental Indenture thereto, as filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Form 8-K. The Indenture, as so supplemented, is referred to herein as the "Indenture."
This opinion letter is being delivered in accordance with the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act.
In connection with our opinion, we have examined the Registration Statement, including the exhibits thereto, and such other documents, corporate records and instruments, and have examined such laws and regulations, as we have deemed necessary for the purposes of this opinion. In making our examination, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to us as copies and the legal capacity of all natural persons. As to matters of fact material to our opinions in this letter, we have relied on certificates and statements from officers and other employees of the Parent and the Company, public officials and other appropriate persons.
Anixter International Inc.
Anixter Inc.
April 30, 2012
Page 2
 
In rendering the opinions in this letter we have assumed, without independent investigation or verification, that each party to each of the documents executed or to be executed, other than the Parent and the Company, (a) is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, (b) has full power and authority to execute such documents to which it is a party and to perform its obligations thereunder, (c) has taken all necessary action to authorize execution of such documents on its behalf by the persons executing same, (d) has properly executed and delivered, or will properly execute and deliver, each of such documents to which it is a party, and (e) has duly obtained all consents or approvals of any nature from and made all filings with any governmental authorities necessary for such party to execute, deliver or perform its obligations under such documents to which it is a party. In addition, in rendering such opinions we have assumed, without independent investigation or verification, (i) that the execution and delivery of, and performance of their respective obligations under, the documents executed or to be executed by each party thereto, other than the Parent and the Company, do not violate any law, rule, regulation, agreement or instrument binding upon such party and (ii) that each of such documents is the legal, valid and binding obligation of, and enforceable against, each party thereto, other than the Parent and the Company.
We make no representation that we have independently investigated or verified any of the matters that we have assumed for the purposes of this opinion letter.
Based on the foregoing and subject to the qualifications set forth below, we are of the opinion that the Notes and the Guarantees, when executed and authenticated in accordance with the terms of the Indenture, and delivered to and paid for by the underwriters in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company and the Parent, respectively, enforceable against the Company and the Parent in accordance with their respective terms.
The opinions set forth above are subject to the following qualifications:
A. The opinions expressed herein with respect to the legality, validity, binding nature and enforceability of the Notes and Guarantees are subject to (i) applicable laws relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent transfer or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally, whether now or hereafter in effect and (ii) general principles of equity, including, without limitation, concepts of materiality, laches, reasonableness, good faith and fair dealing and the principles regarding when injunctive or other equitable remedies will be available (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity).
Anixter International Inc.
Anixter Inc.
April 30, 2012
Page 3
 
B. The foregoing opinions are limited to the laws of the State of New York (excluding the "blue sky" laws of such state) and the General Corporation Law of Delaware, and we express no opinion as to the laws of any other jurisdiction.
The opinions expressed in this opinion letter are as of the date of this opinion letter only and as to laws covered hereby only as they are in effect on that date, and we assume no obligation to update or supplement such opinion to reflect any facts or circumstances that may come to our attention after that date or any changes in law that may occur or become effective after that date. The opinions herein are limited to the matters expressly set forth in this opinion letter, and no opinion or representation is given or may be inferred beyond the opinions expressly set forth in this opinion letter.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the references to us under the caption "Legal Matters" in the prospectus contained in the Registration Statement and in the prospectus supplement dated April 25, 2012. In giving this consent, we do not thereby admit that we are within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120511152056.txt.gz
TIME:20120511152056
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") is furnishing this Report on Form 8-K in connection with the disclosure of information at meetings with analysts and investors beginning on May 14, 2012. A copy of the slide presentation to be used during these meetings is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Report on Form 8-K and will be available on the Company's website, beginning on May 11, 2012. From time to time, the Company may update this presentation on the Company's website. The information in this Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, is being furnished and shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any registration statement or other document filed under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as otherwise stated in such filing.
www.anixter.com
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120601153346.txt.gz
TIME:20120601153346
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 31, 2012, Anixter International Inc.'s operating subsidiary Anixter Inc. (the "Company") amended the agreements governing its accounts receivable securitization program. The following key changes have been made to the program:
All other material terms and conditions remain unchanged. The Amendment No. 1 to Second Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement between the Company and Anixter Receivables Corporation ("ARC") and the Amendment No. 1 to Second Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, among ARC, the Company, the Conduits and the Financial Institutions party thereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. ("J.P. Morgan") and SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. ("SunTrust") as Managing Agents, and J.P. Morgan, as agent for the purchasers, each dated as of May 31, 2012, are attached as Exhibit 10.1 and Exhibit 10.2, respectively.
J.P. Morgan and an affiliate of SunTrust serve as lenders under the Company's Five Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 10.1 EXECUTION COPY
THIS AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES SALE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of May 31, 2012, between ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation, (the "") and ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the "").
Amendment
Originator
Buyer
WHEREAS, the Originator and the Buyer are parties to that certain Second Amended and Restated Receivables Sale Agreement, dated as of May 31, 2011 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.
. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
SECTION 2.
. Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the parties hereto agree that Section 1.3(b) of the Agreement is amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
Amendment to the Agreement
Section 3
"(b) any of the representations and warranties set forth in and of are no longer true with respect to any Receivable;"
paragraphs (i)
(t)
Section 2.1
SECTION 3.
. This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when the parties shall have received a copy of this Amendment duly executed by each of the parties hereto.
Effective Date
SECTION 4.
. In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, the Originator represents and warrants to the Buyer, as to itself, that the execution and delivery by such Originator of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Originator and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Originator, enforceable against such Originator in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
Representations and Warranties of the Originator
SECTION 5.
. The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
SECTION 6.
. From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
SECTION 7.
CHOICE OF LAW
. THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (AND NOT THE LAW OF CONFLICTS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
SECTION 8.
. This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Execution of Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered as of the date first written above:
ANIXTER INC., as the Originator
By: Name: Rod Shoemaker Title: V.P. Treasurer
/s/ Rod Shoemaker
ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, as the Buyer
By: Name: Rod Shoemaker Title: V.P. Treasurer
/s/ Rod Shoemaker
Acknowledged and Agreed as of the date first written above:
CHARIOT FUNDING LLC
By: JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., its attorney-in-fact
By: Name: Joel Gedroic Title: Executive Director
/s/ Joel Gedroic
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as a Financial Institution,
a Managing Agent and as Agent
By: Name: Joel Gedroic Title: Executive Director
/s/ Joel Gedroic
Acknowledged and Agreed as of the date first written above:
SUNTRUST BANK, as a Financial Institution
By: Name: Joseph Franke Title: Senior Vice President SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC., as a Managing Agent
/s/ Joseph Franke
By: Name: Kyle Shenton Title: Vice President
/s/ Kyle Shenton

EXHIBIT 10.2 EXECUTION COPY
AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED RECEIVABLES PURCHASE AGREEMENT (the ""), dated as of May 31, 2012, among ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the ""), ANIXTER INC., a Delaware corporation (""), as the initial Servicer, each financial institution party hereto as a Financial Institution, CHARIOT FUNDING LLC (successor by merger to Falcon Asset Securitization Company LLC) ("") and THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC (""), as conduits, (collectively, the "" and each individually, a ""), SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC. and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. (""), as managing agents (collectively, the "" and each individually, a "") and J.P. Morgan, as agent for the Purchasers (the "").
Amendment
Seller
Anixter
Chariot
Three Pillars
Conduits
Conduit
J.P. Morgan
Managing Agents
Managing Agent
Agent
WHEREAS, the Seller, Anixter, the Financial Institutions, the Conduits, the Managing Agents and the Agent are parties to that certain Second Amended and Restated Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 31, 2011 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""); and
Agreement
WHEREAS the parties hereto desire to amend the Agreement on the terms and conditions set forth below;
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.
. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Agreement.
Defined Terms
SECTION 2.
. Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent set forth in below, the parties hereto agree that the Agreement is amended as follows:
Amendments to the Agreement
Section 3
(a)
Three Pillars shall cease to be a party to the Agreement and shall have no further rights or obligations under the Transaction Documents other than those rights and obligations under provisions that expressly survive termination of the applicable Transaction Document.
(b)
Each reference to the "Three Pillars Purchase Group" in the Agreement is hereby replaced with a reference to "SunTrust Purchase Group".
(c)
Clause (b)(i) under the heading "AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT" in the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to "CP Costs," in such clause.
(d)
Section 1.2 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following sentence to the end of such section:
"The Seller may not request more than one (1) Incremental Purchase per calendar week."
(e) Section 1.3 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following sentence to the end of  such section:
"The Seller may not issue more than one (1) Reduction Notice per calendar week."
(f)
Section 1.4 of the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the final sentence of such section in its entirety.
(g)
Section 3.1 of the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the final two sentences of such section in their entirety.
(h)
Section 4.3(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following sentence to the end of such section:
"Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, each Tranche Period with respect to any Purchaser Interest held by a Financial Institution in the SunTrust Purchase Group shall be identical to each Accrual Period.
(i)
Section 9.1(b) of the Agreement is amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"(b) Any representation, warranty, certification or statement made by any Seller Party in this Agreement, any other Transaction Document or in any other document delivered pursuant hereto or thereto shall prove to have been incorrect when made or deemed made; , , that (i) any breach of the representations and warranties set forth in , or shall not constitute an Amortization Event unless such breach or breaches apply in the aggregate to a material portion of the Receivables and (ii) any breach of the representations and warranties set forth in with respect to account number 3750186815 maintained at Bank of America, N.A. shall not constitute an Amortization Event unless such breach occurs after sixty (60) days after May 31, 2012."
provided
however
Sections 5.1(i)
(s)
(t)
Section 7.1(j)
(j)
Section 9.1 of the Agreement is amended by adding the following new clause (o) to the end of such section:
"(o) (i) Account number 3750186815 maintained at Bank of America, N.A. shall not be re-titled in the name of the Seller on or before the date that is sixty (60) days after May 31, 2012 or (ii) the Seller shall fail to deliver, on or before the date that is sixty (60) days after May 31, 2012, a fully-executed Collection Account Agreement (or another account control agreement that is reasonably satisfactory to the Agent) with respect to account number 3750186815 maintained at Bank of America, N.A."
(k)
Section 10.2(a) of the Agreement is amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"10.2 . (a) If any Regulatory Change (i) subjects any Purchaser or any Funding Source to any charge or withholding on or with respect to any Funding Agreement or a Purchaser's or Funding Source's obligations under a Funding Agreement, or on or with respect to the Receivables, or changes the basis of taxation of payments to any Purchaser or any Funding Source of any amounts payable under any Funding Agreement (except for changes in the rate of tax on the overall net income of a Purchaser or Funding Source or taxes excluded by ) or (ii) imposes, modifies or deems applicable any reserve, assessment, fee, tax, insurance charge, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of,
Increased Cost and Reduced Return
Section 10.1
deposits with or for the account of, or liabilities of a Funding Source or a Purchaser, or credit extended by a Funding Source or a Purchaser pursuant to a Funding Agreement or (iii) imposes any other condition the result of which is to increase the cost to a Funding Source or a Purchaser of performing its obligations under a Funding Agreement, or to reduce the rate of return on a Funding Source's or Purchaser's capital or assets as a consequence of its obligations under a Funding Agreement, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by a Funding Source or a Purchaser under a Funding Agreement, or to require any payment calculated by reference to the amount of interests or loans held or interest received by it, then, upon demand by the Agent or the relevant Managing Agent, Seller shall pay to the applicable Managing Agent, for the benefit of the relevant Funding Source or Purchaser, such amounts charged to such Funding Source or Purchaser or such amounts to otherwise compensate such Funding Source or such Purchaser for such increased cost or such reduction. Subject to the limitations contemplated by the last sentence of this , Seller acknowledges that any Purchaser or Funding Source may institute measures in anticipation of a Regulatory Change, and may commence allocating charges to or seeking compensation from Seller under this , in advance of the effective date of such Regulatory Change and Seller agrees to pay such charges or compensation to the applicable Managing Agent, for the benefit of such Purchaser or Funding Source, following demand therefor without regard to whether such effective date has occurred. The term "" shall mean (i) the adoption after the date hereof of any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy or liquidity coverage) or any change therein after the date hereof or (ii) any change after the date hereof in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency; that for purposes of this definition, (x) the United States bank regulatory rule titled Risk-Based Capital Guidelines; Capital Adequacy Guidelines; Capital Maintenance: Regulatory Capital; Impact of Modification to Generally Accepted Accounting Principles; Consolidation of Asset-Backed Commercial Paper Programs; and Other Related Issues, adopted on December 15, 2009, (y) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder, issued in connection therewith or in implementation thereof, and (z) all requests, rules, guidelines and directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Regulatory Change", regardless of the date enacted, adopted, issued or implemented. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Seller shall not have any obligation to pay to the applicable Managing Agent, for the benefit of the relevant Funding Source or Purchaser, any amounts pursuant to this to the extent that such amounts or compensation arise solely in connection with any such Purchaser's or Funding Source's, as applicable, compliance with the liquidity coverage ratio requirements contemplated by Basel III (the "") unless such LCR Increased Costs arise, or relate to, any time on or after the sixtieth (60) day following Seller's receipt of a written notice from such Purchaser, such Funding Source or a Managing Agent, as applicable, to the effect that such Purchaser or Funding Source intends to request compensation for such LCR Increased Costs."
Section 10.2(a)
Section 10.2
Regulatory Change
provided
Section 10.2(a)
LCR Increased Costs
th
(l)
The definition of "Applicable Margin" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means 2.95%.
Applicable Margin
(m)
The definition of "Broken Funding Costs" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means, with respect to the Falcon Purchase Group, Falcon Broken Funding Costs and, with respect to the SunTrust Purchase Group, SunTrust Broken Funding Costs.
Broken Funding Costs
(n)
The definition of "Conduit" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
(o)
The definition of "CP Rate" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means for any Accrual Period, with respect to any Purchaser Interest owned by the Falcon Purchase Group, the Falcon CP Rate.
CP Rate
(p)
The definition of "Default Fee" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means with respect to any amount due and payable by Seller in respect of any Aggregate Unpaids, an amount equal to interest on any such unpaid Aggregate Unpaids at a rate per annum equal to 3.95% above the Base Rate.
Default Fee
(q)
Clause (i) of the definition of "Eligible Receivable" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"(i) the Obligor of which (a) if a natural person, is a resident of the United States or, if a corporation or other business organization, is organized under the laws of the United States or any political subdivision thereof and has its chief executive office in the United States; (b) is not an Affiliate of any of the parties hereto and (c) is not the subject of a proceeding under the Bankruptcy Code or any other insolvency proceeding;"
(r)
The definition of "Falcon" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means Chariot Funding LLC (successor by merger to Falcon Asset Securitization Company LLC) and its successors and permitted assigns.
Falcon
(s)
The definition of "Falcon CP Rate" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
", for any day, a rate per annum equal to the thirty (30) day London-Interbank Offered Rate appearing on the Bloomberg BBAM (British Bankers Association) Page (or on any successor or substitute page of such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such service, as determined by
Falcon CP Rate" means
the Administrative Agent from time to time in accordance with its customary practices for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to U.S. Dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on such day or, if such day is not a Business Day in London, the immediately preceding Business Day in London. In the event that such rate is not available on any day at such time for any reason, then the "Daily/30 Day LIBOR Rate" for such day shall be the rate at which thirty (30) day U.S. Dollar deposits of $5,000,000 are offered by the principal London office of JPMCB in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on such day; and if the Administrative Agent is for any reason unable to determine the Daily/30 Day LIBOR Rate in the foregoing manner or has determined in good faith that the Daily/ 30 Day LIBOR Rate determined in such manner does not accurately reflect the cost of acquiring, funding or maintaining a Purchaser Interest, the Daily/30 Day LIBOR Rate for such day shall be the Base Rate.
(t)
The definition of "LIBO Rate" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means the Falcon LIBO Rate or the SunTrust LIBO Rate, as the case may be.
LIBO Rate
(u)
The definition of "Liquidity Agreement" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means the Falcon Liquidity Agreement or any other Agreement between a Conduit and its related Financial Institutions related to the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents.
Liquidity Agreement
(v)
The definition of "Liquidity Commitment" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means, for each Financial Institution that is the member of a Purchase Group that has a Conduit, the commitment of such Financial Institution to purchase interests in respect of (or lend against) Purchaser Interests from such Conduit in an amount not to exceed (a) in the aggregate, the amount set forth opposite such Financial Institution's name under the Liquidity Commitment Column on Schedule A to this Agreement, as such amount may be modified in accordance with the terms hereof, and (b) with respect to any individual purchase from such Conduit, its Adjusted Pro Rata Share of the Purchase Price therefor. Any Financial Institution that is a member of a Purchase Group with no Conduit shall not have any Liquidity Commitment.
Liquidity Commitment
(w)
The definition of "Liquidity Termination Date" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means May 31, 2015.
Liquidity Termination Date
(x)
The definition of "Managing Agent" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means, as to any Purchase Group, the financial institution responsible for the administration of such Purchase Group. As of the date hereof, JPMCB is the Managing Agent for the members of the Falcon Purchase Group, and SunTrust is the Managing Agent for members of the SunTrust Purchase Group.
Managing Agent
(y)
The definition of "Purchase Group" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means a Managing Agent and its related Purchasers.
Purchase Group
(z)
The definition of "Purchase Limit" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means $300,000,000, as such amount may be increased or decreased in accordance with the provisions of .
Purchase Limit
Article XII
(aa)
The definition of "Settlement Period" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means (A) the Monthly Settlement Date, (B) in the case of Financial Institutions that are members of any Purchase Group other than the SunTrust Purchase Group, the last day of the relevant Tranche Period in respect of each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions and (C) in the case of Financial Institutions other than Financial Institutions in the SunTrust Purchase Group that are members of the SunTrust Purchase Group, each Monthly Settlement Date.
Settlement Date
(bb)
The definition of "Settlement Period" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means (A) in respect of each Purchaser Interest of the Conduits and Purchasers in the SunTrust Purchase Group, the immediately preceding Accrual Period, and (B) in respect of each Purchaser Interest of the Financial Institutions, the entire Tranche Period of such Purchaser Interest; and
Settlement Period
(cc)
The definition of "Special Concentration Limit" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means, at any time, with respect to any Special Obligor, a dollar amount equal to a percentage of the aggregate Outstanding Balance of Eligible Receivables or such other limit as the Agent may designate for such Special Obligor; , that any Managing Agent may, upon notice to Seller, cancel or reduce any Special Concentration Limit. As of May 31, 2012, the Special Concentration Limits described on the table below are in effect:
Special Concentration Limit
provided
   
(dd)
The definition of "Special Obligor" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means any Obligor as may be designated by the Managing Agents from time to time as a "Special Obligor." As of May 31, 2012, the following Obligors are "Special Obligors": (i) Walgreen Co., so long as the Debt Rating of Walgreen Co. is greater than or equal to BBB- by S&P and greater than or equal to Baa3 by Moody's, (ii) Cummins Inc., so long as the Debt Rating of Cummins Inc. is greater than or equal to BBB- by S&P and greater than or equal to Baa3 by Moody's and (iii) all governments and governmental subdivisions or agencies collectively.
Special Obligor
(ee)
The definition of "Tranche Period" set forth in Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means
Tranche Period
(i) with respect to any Purchaser Interest held by a Financial Institution (other than a Financial Institution in the SunTrust Purchase Group), including any Purchaser Interest or undivided interest in a Purchaser Interest assigned to a Financial Institution pursuant to a Liquidity Agreement:
(a) if Yield for such Purchaser Interest is calculated on the basis of the LIBO Rate, a period of one, two or three months, or such other period as may be mutually agreeable to the applicable Managing Agent and Seller, commencing on a Business Day selected by Seller or such Managing Agent pursuant to this Agreement. Such Tranche Period shall end on the day in the applicable succeeding calendar month which corresponds numerically to the beginning day of such Tranche Period, provided, however, that if there is no such numerically corresponding day in such succeeding month, such Tranche Period shall end on the last Business Day of such succeeding month; or
(b) if Yield for such Purchaser Interest is calculated on the basis of the Base Rate, a period selected by Seller and agreed to by the applicable Managing Agent, commencing and ending on a Business Day, provided no such period shall exceed one month.
If any Tranche Period would end on a day which is not a Business Day, such Tranche Period shall end on the next succeeding Business Day, provided, however, that in the case of Tranche Periods corresponding to the LIBO Rate, if such next succeeding Business Day falls in a new month, such Tranche Period shall end on the immediately preceding Business Day. In the case of any Tranche Period for any Purchaser Interest which commences before the Amortization Date and would otherwise end on a date occurring after the Amortization Date, such Tranche Period shall end on the Amortization Date. The duration of each Tranche Period which commences after the Amortization Date shall be of such duration as selected by the applicable Managing Agent. In no event shall any Tranche Period extend beyond the Facility Termination Date.
(ii) with respect to any Purchaser Interest held by a Financial Institution in the SunTrust Purchase Group, each Accrual Period.
(ff)
Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the following defined terms in their entirety: Three Pillars, Three Pillars Broken Funding Costs, Three Pillars Credit Agreement, Three Pillars Credit Bank, Three Pillars CP Rate, Three Pillars LIBO Rate, Three Pillars Liquidity Agreement, Three Pillars Liquidity Bank and Three Pillars Purchase Group.
(gg)
Exhibit I to the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following defined terms in the appropriate alphabetical locations:
"" means any day on which dealings in dollar deposits are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank eurodollar market.
London Banking Day
"" if
SunTrust Broken Funding Costs
(i) any request for an Incremental Purchase is made and such Incremental Purchase does not occur; or
(ii) any Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment, has its principal reduced without compliance by Seller with the notice requirements hereunder,
then, the amount of "" related thereto shall be equal to the excess, if any, of (1) the fees that would have accrued, assuming that, as applicable, such Incremental Purchase or Reinvestment had occurred, or such reduction had occurred in compliance with the notice requirements hereunder, over (2) the income, if any, actually received during the remainder of such period by the members of the SunTrust Purchase Group from investing the principal related to, as applicable, such Incremental Purchase that did not occur or such reduction that occurred without compliance with the notice requirements hereunder. All SunTrust Funding Costs shall be due and payable hereunder upon demand.
SunTrust Broken Funding Costs
"" means, for any Accrual Period, a rate per annum equal the rate per annum appearing on page BBAM on the Bloomberg Terminal (successor to Telerate page 3750) ("Page BBAM") (or any other page that may replace such page from time to time for the purpose of displaying offered rates of leading banks for London interbank deposits for one month in United States dollars) at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on the second London
SunTrust LIBO Rate
Business Day preceding the commencement of such Accrual Period; provided that in the event no such rate is shown, the SunTrust LIBO Rate shall be the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100th of one percent) based on the rates at which Dollar deposits for one month are displayed on page "LIBOR" of the Reuters Screen as of 11:00 a.m. (London time) on the second London Business Day preceding the commencement of such Accrual Period (it being understood that if at least two (2) such rates appear on such page, the rate will be the arithmetic mean of such displayed rates); provided further, that in the event fewer than two (2) such rates are displayed, or if no such rate is relevant, the LIBOR Rate shall be the rate per annum equal to the average of the rates at which deposits in Dollars are offered by SunTrust at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) on the second London Business Day preceding the commencement of such Accrual Period to prime banks in the London interbank market for a one month period.
"" means SunTrust and each of the other Financial Institutions (if any) identified as a member of the SunTrust Purchase Group on Schedule A hereto, together with each of their respective successors, assigns and participants. The SunTrust Purchase Group does not include a Conduit.
SunTrust Purchase Group
(hh)
Schedule A to the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as Schedule A hereto.
SECTION 3.
. This Amendment shall become effective and shall be deemed effective as of the date first written above when:
Effective Date
(a)
the Agent shall have received counterparts hereof executed by each Person for which a signature block is attached hereto;
(b)
the Seller shall have paid all invoiced audit and legal fees of Sidley Austin LLP incurred by the Agent in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Amendment and the Agreement; and
(c)
the Managing Agents shall have received (1) counterparts to the Sixth Amended and Restated Fee Letter duly executed by each Person for which a signature is attached thereto and (2) all fees payable on the date hereof pursuant to such Sixth Amended and Restated Fee Letter.
SECTION 4.
. In order to induce the parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, each of the Seller Parties represents and warrants to the Agent and the Purchasers, as to itself, that:
Representations and Warranties of the Seller Parties
(a)
The representations and warranties of such Seller Party set forth in of the Agreement, as hereby amended, are true, correct and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof and there exists no Amortization Event or Potential Amortization Event on the date hereof, provided that in the case of any representation or warranty in Section 5.1 that expressly relates to facts in existence on an earlier date, the reaffirmation thereof under this shall be made as of such earlier date.
Section 5.1
Section 4(a)
(b)
The execution and delivery by such Seller Party of this Amendment has been duly authorized by proper corporate proceedings of such Seller Party and this Amendment, and the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of such Seller Party, enforceable against such Seller Party in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.
SECTION 5.
. The Agreement, as amended hereby, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed in all respects.
Ratification
SECTION 6.
. From and after the effective date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", or "hereunder" or words of like import, and all references to the Agreement in any and all agreements, instruments, documents, notes, certificates and other writings of every kind and nature shall be deemed to mean the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment.
Reference to Agreement
SECTION 7.
. THIS AMENDMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, 735 ILCS SECTION 105/5-1 ET SEQ., BUT OTHERWISE WITHOUT REGARD TO THE CONFLICTS OF LAW PROVISIONS) OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.
CHOICE OF LAW
SECTION 8.
. This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and by different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement. Delivery of an executed signature page of this Amendment by facsimile or other electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Execution of Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed and delivered as of the date first written above:
ANIXTER RECEIVABLES CORPORATION, as the Seller
By: Name: Rod Shoemaker Title: V.P. Treasurer
/s/ Rod Shoemaker
ANIXTER INC.,
as the initial Servicer
By: Name: Rod Shoemaker Title: V.P. Treasurer
/s/ Rod Shoemaker
CHARIOT FUNDING LLC
By: JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., its attorney-in-fact
By: Name: Joel Gedroic Title: Executive Director
/s/ Joel Gedroic
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as a Financial
Institution, a Managing Agent and as Agent
By: Name: Joel Gedroic Title: Executive Director
/s/ Joel Gedroic
THREE PILLARS FUNDING LLC
By: Name: Doris J. Hearn Title: Authorized Signatory
/s/ Doris J. Hearn
SUNTRUST BANK, as a
Financial Institution
By: Name: Joseph Franke Title: Senior Vice President
/s/ Joseph Franke
SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC., as a Managing
Agent
By: Name: Kyle Shenton Title: Vice President
/s/ Kyle Shenton


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120709120025.txt.gz
TIME:20120709120025
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 9, 2012, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") announced that it purchased Jorvex, S.A. on June 28, 2012 for approximately $56.2 million and assumed approximately $10.5 million in debt. The final purchase price will be subject to a net asset adjustment. For additional information, see the Companys Press Release dated July 9, 2012, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit No. Description 99.1 Press Release, dated July 9, 2012, issued by Anixter International Inc.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today announced that it has acquired all the outstanding shares of Jorvex, S.A. ("Jorvex") as of June 28, 2012.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 9, 2012 
Jorvex, based in Lima, Peru, is a leading distributor of electrical wire and cable products to commercial, industrial and government entities throughout Peru, with major distribution centers in Lima, Arequipa and Chiclayo. Jorvex's broad array of products includes electrical wire and cable products, PVC and HDPE pipe and conveyor belts along with various technical support services. Annual sales for Jorvex were approximately $115 million for 2011 and Anixter expects the acquisition to be immediately accretive to earnings in the second half of 2012.
Commenting on the acquisition, Bob Eck, President and CEO of Anixter, said, "We are pleased to have Jorvex join Anixter and look forward to gaining their insight and partnering with the excellent team that has successfully built and led this business for over 40 years. Consistent with the strategy we have articulated, the acquisition of Jorvex represents an important step with our Emerging Markets growth initiative while also leveraging Anixter's existing geographical presence and logistics capabilities. Furthermore, as a market leader, Jorvex immediately positions Anixter as a stronger and more significant player in the Andean market. Combined with Anixter's existing Wire & Cable business, we will continue to lead the market and grow the business throughout the Latin American region."
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 225 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120724153300.txt.gz
TIME:20120724153300
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 24, 2012, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended June 29, 2012. The Company's press release, dated July 24, 2012, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE), a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts, today reported results for the second quarter ended June 29, 2012.
GLENVIEW, IL, July 24, 2012 
 
 
 
Financial Results From Continuing Operations (excluding the Aerospace Hardware results)
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Exclusive of the above items, sales increased by 4 percent organically.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Second Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on second quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "Our slower revenue growth was primarily driven by persistent softness in the data infrastructure market coupled with a reduction in production rates by several OEM Supply customers. We believe this is due to the uncertain macro economic environment, reflected in lower levels of both corporate and consumer spending. Our Electrical Wire & Cable business grew at a faster year-over-year rate in the second quarter than the first quarter while our Enterprise Cabling and Security and OEM Supply businesses experienced slower year-over-year growth than in the first quarter. A stronger US dollar and lower copper prices contributed to the slower revenue growth rate. These factors resulted in a sequential quarter growth rate of 3.6 percent, which is below our longer term historical trend."
"Our strategic growth initiatives, combined with strong day-to-day execution, enabled us to improve our competitive position across our end markets in spite of the macro economic headwinds," continued Eck. These efforts helped bolster our sales performance, particularly within our North American segment, which delivered 5 percent year-on-year organic sales growth, the highest rate among our geographic reporting segments. Within our end markets, the Electrical Wire & Cable business delivered the highest organic sales growth rate with 9 percent improvement year-on-year. Despite a slowdown in activity, Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions and OEM Supply each delivered 2 percent organic sales growth over the prior year quarter."
Second Quarter Operating Results
"Our focus on cost management continues to enable us to deliver solid operating performance," commented Eck. "We also delivered another quarter of positive organic sales growth in every geographic segment including Europe, which is worth noting given the very weak economic environment that persists in that region. In addition, second quarter operating expenses of $268.0 million were 17.0 percent of sales, matching that of the prior year quarter and resulting from strong cost management actions, despite expense increases due to higher pension benefit costs."
operating margin of 5.7 percent was down 20 basis points from the year ago quarter and was flat sequentially.
Company-wide
 
operating margin of 7.0 percent in the current quarter compares to 7.2 percent in the prior year quarter. This 20 basis point decline along with the sequential decline of 10 basis points was driven primarily by lower gross margin partially offset by strong cost management actions.
North America
operating margin of 0.3 percent in the current quarter reflected a 130 basis point decline from the prior year quarter. The impact of the weak economy in this region, combined with the stronger U.S. dollar, put significant pressure on revenue while also contributing to the unfavorable operating expense leverage. Sequentially, operating margin was 100 basis points lower.
Europe
operating margin of 5.6 percent in the current quarter compares to 4.6 percent in the prior year quarter driven by improved product mix. Sequentially, operating margin improved by 110 basis points driven by the normal seasonal increases in revenue combined with realizing the benefits of our strategic investments in this segment.
Emerging Markets
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Our strong cash generation in a period of slower year-on-year revenue growth reflects our disciplined working capital and cash management processes," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice-President  Finance. "We paid a special dividend of $4.50 per common share during the quarter to return excess capital to our shareholders. During the second quarter, we also completed the previously announced seven year $350 million senior notes offering and, at the end of the quarter, we closed on the acquisition of Jorvex S.A., a Peruvian Electrical Wire & Cable distributor. The acquisition represents an important step in our Emerging Markets growth initiative while also leveraging Anixter's existing geographical presence and logistics capabilities in this key Latin American region."
"With a quarter-end cash balance of $152.0 million and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow for the remainder of 2012, we will continue to evaluate the optimal use of our funds," continued Dosch. "Going forward, we will maintain flexibility to utilize future cash flows to invest in the growth of the business, capitalize on strategic acquisition opportunities as they arise and selectively return capital to shareholders through share repurchases."
The impact of the $350 million bond offering in the quarter is reflected in the following key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the second quarter:
 
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "Our outlook for 2012 remains positive. We continue to be very well positioned to leverage our global supply chain platform in what has once again become a very volatile global economy. While global markets, particularly in Europe, are difficult to predict in the current economic climate, our strategic growth initiatives position us well to continue to expand our leadership position within the industry. In this more uncertain environment we continue to manage expenses and working capital carefully, while pursuing strategic investments to build our business."
 
Second Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, July 24, 2012. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 225 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of foreign exchange and copper pricing for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of foreign exchange and copper pricing, which activities are subject to volatility and can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company business and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance trends.
In August 2011, the Company sold its Aerospace Hardware business ("Aerospace"). As a result of the divestiture, results of the business are reflected in "Discontinued Operations" and all prior periods have been revised to reflect this classification.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120727090135.txt.gz
TIME:20120727090135
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On July 27, 2012, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release that announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. The Company noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed. The Company currently has approximately 33.5 million shares outstanding. For additional information, reference is made to the Company's press release, dated July 27, 2012, which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE:AXE) today announced a share repurchase program under which the Company may repurchase up to 1 million of its outstanding shares with the exact volume and timing dependent on market conditions. Anixter noted that all previously announced share repurchase programs had been completed.
Glenview, IL., July 27, 2012 
Anixter currently has approximately 33.5 million shares outstanding.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 225 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120808090225.txt.gz
TIME:20120808090225
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
            Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") is furnishing this Report on Form 8-K in connection with the disclosure of information at meetings with analysts and investors beginning on August 8, 2012. A copy of the slide presentation to be used during these meetings is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Report on Form 8-K and will be available on the Company's website,
www.anixter.com
beginning on August 8, 2012. From time to time, the Company may update this presentation on the Company's website. The information in this Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, is being furnished and shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any registration statement or other document filed under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as otherwise stated in such filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
INVESTOR DAY 2012
 
Anixter International (AXE) Investor Day Agenda Welcome and Introductions Safe Harbor Statement Customer Value Proposition Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable OEM Supply  Fasteners Shareholder Value Proposition Product Displays / Demo Ted Dosch Lisa Meers Bob Eck Bill Galvin Giulio Berardesca Ian Clarke Ted Dosch All
 
Anixter Attendees Company Presenters Bob Eck  President & Chief Executive Officer Ted Dosch  EVP Finance & Chief Financial Officer Bill Galvin  EVP Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions Giulio Berardesca  EVP Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable Ian Clarke  SVP Fasteners Other Attendees Justin Choi  General Counsel Bob Graham  SVP Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable Dan Jack  SVP Global Marketing & Business Development Fasteners Steve Leatherwood  SVP Corporate Communications Dawn Marks  VP Marketing Communications Lisa Meers  VP Investor Relations Randy Mortensen  SVP Marketing Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions
 
anixter.com/InvestorResource Anixter Resource Center
 
The statements in this presentation that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see our Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information. This presentation includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non- GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). Certain profitability, earnings per share and cash flow information in this presentation exclude special items which have been identified in our earnings releases as we believe that by reporting such information, both management and investors are provided with meaningful supplemental information to understand and analyze our underlying trends and other aspects of our financial performance. Non-GAAP financial measures provide insight into selected financial information and should be evaluated in the context in which they are presented. These non-GAAP financial measures have limitations as analytical tools, and should not be considered in isolation from, or as a substitute for, financial information presented in compliance with GAAP, and non-GAAP financial measures as reported by us may not be comparable to similarly titled amounts reported by other companies. The non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements, including the related notes, and Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included in our Annual Reports on Form 10-K and Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q as filed with the SEC. We do not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reasons stated above. Safe Harbor and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
"This is Anixter" Video
 
Presented by: Bob Eck, President & Chief Executive Officer
 
Agenda Company overview Customer value proposition History People Customers Differentiators End markets Strategy Recent highlights Concluding remarks
 
Company Overview World-class global distributor with three distinct end markets: Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable OEM Supply: Fasteners History of success built on specialization and scalability Strong financial position History of efficient shareholder-focused capital structure management Anixter pulls together its robust capabilities in a coordinated manner that allows for specialization and scalability
 
Customer Value Proposition: Managing Cost and Complexity Global Operational Consistency Consistent systems, processes and services Local people, language and currency Global Infrastructure 24-48 hour delivery capability to all global major markets Supply Chain Services Reduce Customers' Cost Pre-production / installation product preparation Feed the factory / job just-in-time Industry leading customized electronic tools sets Technical Expertise Infrastructure / product design support Quality and interoperability testing and inspection in Anixter Labs SUPPLIERS CUSTOMERS
 
Industrial Wire & Cable Our Evolving Business 1957 1970's 1980's 1990's 2000's 2010+ CATV Networking Products Divest Networking Products & Integration Data Cabling Telecom Restructure Divest CATV Global Expansion Networking Integrated Supply Security Products Fasteners (OEM Supply) Wire & Cable OEM Telecom Divest Aerospace Hardware Continued Global Expansion Access Control Products
 
Blue-Chip Suppliers and Customers Key Suppliers Key Customers
 
Experienced Management Team Our people make the difference Anixter culture and values enable entrepreneurship and teamwork Experience = Excellence in Execution
 
Global distribution infrastructure creates high barrier to entry Unmatched Global Distribution Network Best-in-class distribution network 2,500+ technical sales people Located in 50+ countries Deal in 35 currencies Speak 30+ languages 100,000+ customers 450,000+ products Over $1B in inventory 225 warehouses  7M ft2
 
End Market Common Characteristics Small percentage of total customer spend Large volume of discrete "application critical" part numbers Large number of manufacturers across customer bill of material Products have a "technology" component that may not be fully understood by the customer Customer cost of acquisition commonly exceeds value of materials 70% End-markets' common characteristics drive synergies across the three businesses ^ Only 5-10% of customer spending Customer Spend ($) Number of Part Numbers ^ Large number of discrete part numbers
 
Focused Leadership in Diverse Markets 2007$5.8B Revenue ECS 95% ECS 57% ECS 38% OEM 45% W&C 5% North America 70% Europe 22% Emerging Markets 8% 2011$6.1B Revenue W&C 36% ECS 33% W&C 37% W&C 10% Europe 19% Emerging Markets 11% OEM 9% ECS 81% ECS 53% OEM 41% North America 70% W&C 17% OEM 7% OEM 10% W&C 26%
 
4 Strategic Imperatives 17 Deliver compelling value proposition based on technical knowledge and sophisticated supply chain services Strengthen customer loyalty through diverse product offerings, complete solutions and first-class service Leverage global footprint Execute with excellence
 
Growth Strategy 18 Long-term organic sales growth target: 8-10%
 
Acquisition Growth Strategy 1 Trailing 12-month sales at the time of acquisition. Targets  tuck-in/bolt-on opportunities Strategic fit, appropriate valuation, reasonable risk Industrial automation, security, Emerging Markets  Wire & Cable
 
Global Customer Support Global platform provides competitive advantage to meet multinational customers' needs Complex project management capability Value-added supply chain service Supports significant long-term growth opportunities European presence is essential to expanding multinational customer relationships 50% of top 100 customers (20% of our total revenue) do business with us in Europe 60% of top 50 suppliers (40% of our product purchases) do business with us in Europe Emerging markets are our fastest-growing geographic segments
 
2011 Record revenue  fully recovered from recession 85% increase in diluted earnings per share Divested Aerospace Fasteners business Repurchased 2 million shares (6% of total outstanding) 2012 Renewed credit revolver with increased capacity and better terms Issued $350 million bond in anticipation of 2013 convertible redemption Returned $150 million to shareholders through special dividend Strategic acquisition of electrical wire and cable distributor in Peru 17% increase in diluted earnings per share June YTD Announced 1 million share repurchase program Recent Highlights 21
 
Concluding Remarks 22 Unmatched global platform Diversified growth opportunities Strong financial position Shareholder-friendly capital structure management
 
Presented by: Bill Galvin, EVP Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions
 
Agenda Who we are Trends driving our business Our strategy What we sell Our customers How we are different
 
Dedicated focus on both end-user and channel partner customers Superior technical expertise Supply chain service experts Largest breadth of network infrastructure and security products Unmatched global capabilities and go-to-market strategy What is the Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions (ECS) Business Close partnerships with market-leading suppliers
 
Strong/Mature Developing Supply Capabilities ECS Worldwide Presence Global team: local expertise Technically trained sales force: 1,600 Supply Chain Solutions specialists: 60 Technology Solutions Group (TSG): 90 Global expertise Presence in more than 50 countries Locations in more than 260 cities Deal in 30 currencies Communicate in 35 languages
 
Trends Driving Our Business Data centers Worldwide data center hardware spending is predicted to grow 27% from 2011-20151 Energy demands and cost are top of mind for our customers Consumer demand for mobility is driving data center explosion Security solutions Video surveillance market 12-15% CAGR growth through 20162 Personal safety and loss-prevention are important customer concerns Access control: the next wave of IP adoption In-building wireless (IBW) Global IBW is expected to be a $10 billion market by 20153 Sources: 1. Gartner 2011 2. Anixter Market Research 3. ABIresearch 2011/In-Stat
 
Aligning with the Market
 
Customer Verticals & Geographic Coverage Education Retail Healthcare Finance Transportation Government Service Providers Manufacturing Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions: $3.2 billion dollars in sales for 2011 Channels Data Com Contractors System Integrators Security Integrators Network Integrators Industrial Communications Integrators EPCs & Consultants Commercial A/V Integrators
 
What We Sell: Data Center Solution Products
 
What We Sell: Server Cabinet
 
Access control Video surveillance Perimeter detection Door-locking hardware What We Sell: Security Solutions
 
Investing in Technology Expertise Governance with Standards Bodies Training and Technology Resources SM SM SM
 
A State Department of Transportation and Its Security Integrator End-user challenge Customer required a proof of concept (POC) of a multi-manufacturer security solution with integrated legacy and new technologies Security integrator challenge Could not support the expense to perform POC No single manufacturer support or interoperability standards to leverage Anixter's solution In one week, Anixter designed POC in our Lab and trained the integrator on the solution Security integrator was awarded a million-dollar contract Technology Case Study
 
Supply Chain Solutions We Start with Our Fundamental Processes We Customize Solutions Per Application We Help Our Customers with Complex Deployments Security  citywide surveillance Canadian cell tower installation Leading mobile device company Large railroad company
 
Relentless focus on growing markets Data center Security IBW Unique value for our customers Superior technology expertise Creative Supply Chain Solutions Global execution Global ECS Business Strategy All to support customers everywhere in the world
 
Question and Answer Session
 
Presented by: Giulio Berardesca, EVP Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable
 
Agenda Who we are What we sell Our customers How we are different Sustainable growth
 
We are a. Global, value-added distributor of specialty wire and cable with a specialized sales focus on the OEM and industrial power markets. Our Vision Expanding the role of traditional distribution through the constant expansion of product offerings, technical expertise and logistics and inventory services. Who We Are
 
Reduce our customers' costs of doing business and increase their efficiencies to give them a competitive advantage in the marketplace. Our Mission Efficiency Cost Process improvement and asset management Business objectives Drive
 
Strong/Mature Developing Supply Capabilities Global expertise Presence in more than 30 countries Locations in more than 110 cities Deal in more than 20 currencies Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable Worldwide Presence Global team: local expertise Technically trained sales force  890 Engineers  7 Supply Chain Solutions specialists  60 Industrial communication specialists  8
 
Our Products Electrical wire and cable Low voltage, instrumentation, control and power cable Medium voltage, power, mining, portable cord, specialty cable Electronic wire and cable Sound, security and fire alarm Automotive, military and OEM hook-up and lead wire Commercial and pro A/V cabling and connectors Support and supplies Cable tray, connectors, enclosures, grounding, cable management, raceways, tools Industrial communication and control Managed Ethernet switches, protocol and media converters, passive components, wireless and connectors
 
OEM  Vertical Markets Industrial Equipment Automotive Audio Video Equipment Medical Equipment Military Equipment Communications Equipment Panel Shop Cable Assembly/ Harness Shop Customer needs are supply chain based Ability to follow and support customers globally Key driver of our industrial automation strategy Diversification Transit Consumer Goods
 
Anixter's Competitive Advantage One Anixter One IT platform One management team Global reach World-class supply chain Subject matter experts Superior technical knowledge
 
OEM Case Study Global Measurement and Control Equipment Manufacturer Customer challenge Globally scalable logistics capability Distributor with financial strength Engineering support (spec reviews) Annual cost reductions Crisis management Anixter's solution Global footprint Financial strength Part number rationalization In-plant support Contractual cost reductions Benefits Single, global supplier partner Global account management Continuous manufacturing uptime Cost savings: product, process and labor
 
Industrial Power  Vertical Markets Industrial Power Oil, Gas and Petrochemical Engineering, Procurement and Construction (EPC) Natural Resources Contractors Water and Wastewater Treatment Global infrastructure project coordination Technical sale and electrical engineering support Opportunity to increase market share outside of North America
 
Global Engineering, Procurement and Construction Company Customer challenges Large-scale, green field new aluminum smelter plant construction project Extensive bill of materials Aggressive timeline and completion deadline International coordination Engineering changes Anixter solution Full service cable management program Long-standing, well-established relationship History of joint projects completed around the globe Global sourcing and vendor relationships Benefits Quick response to the project's changing timelines and inventory requirements Product depth and breadth Ability to leverage global footprint Industrial Power Case Study
 
Progressive Sales Strategy OEM Solutions Industrial Power Tactical Strategic Fulfillment distribution Expand product sets Customer service Spot buy sourcing Fulfillment distribution Limited breadth of product Customer service Specialty distributor MRO Technical expertise Best-in-class suppliers Application support Value add services Customer type marketing strategy Just-in-time Vertical market strategy Project deployment Product expansion  Security  Automation READY! Deployment Services Vertical market strategy Multiyear contracts READY! Material Management Services  READY! Store  READY! Depot Geographic expansion Global accounts Cross sell with Fasteners Geographic expansion of sales model Pre- and post- engineering support Global accounts Cross sell with ECS  Data centers  EPCs Low-cost provider of products and service to each of our customer's vertical segments.
 
Worldwide wire and cable market is estimated $185 billion1 Accessible market available through distribution: $75 billion2 2011 Anixter global Wire & Cable revenue: $1.9 billion Worldwide Market Geographical Breakdown Sources: 1. CRU Group 2011; 2. Anixter Market Research
 
Global expansion into an existing global company footprint Technical solutions and engineering support Tailored supply chain solutions OEM Industrial Specialists in a market with a high cost of entry Leverage with the global wire and cable manufacturers High-growth markets Sustainable Growth
 
Long-Term Sustainable Spend: OEM OEM OEM OEM Economic Environment Lean manufacturing Taking costs out of business Supplier consolidation Supplier rationalization Potential Spend Technology and automation will continue to mandate upgradesGrowth of developing countries will continue to drive demandRecessions and economic recoveries greatly affect this sector Technology and automation will continue to mandate upgradesGrowth of developing countries will continue to drive demandRecessions and economic recoveries greatly affect this sector Worldwide Need Low-cost labor countriesOutsourcing (e.g., harness house)Anixter's global footprint as finished goods production moves around the world is a huge differentiator Low-cost labor countriesOutsourcing (e.g., harness house)Anixter's global footprint as finished goods production moves around the world is a huge differentiator The world will continue to invest in manufacturing consumable goods.
 
Long-Term Sustainable Spend: OGP OEM The world will continue to invest in infrastructure spend. Oil, Gas and Petrochemical Oil, Gas and Petrochemical Oil, Gas and Petrochemical Economic Environment Price per barrel dictates spendingNeed for new facilities and facility upgrades Government legislation30% increase in demand over next 20 years1 Government legislation30% increase in demand over next 20 years1 Potential Speed Strong growth and investment for next 25 yearsIncreasing technology adoption and ongoing process improvementsExpecting strong investment in security and industrial automationGlobal market: $1.52.0B1 for wire and cable Strong growth and investment for next 25 yearsIncreasing technology adoption and ongoing process improvementsExpecting strong investment in security and industrial automationGlobal market: $1.52.0B1 for wire and cable Strong growth and investment for next 25 yearsIncreasing technology adoption and ongoing process improvementsExpecting strong investment in security and industrial automationGlobal market: $1.52.0B1 for wire and cable Worldwide Need Exploration to find new fieldsIncreasing consumer demandShale gas boom in North AmericaPopulation growth Exploration to find new fieldsIncreasing consumer demandShale gas boom in North AmericaPopulation growth Vehicle proliferation is primary market driver Fueled by growing middle class in Asia/South America Terrorism concerns expected to further increase security spendRisksEnvironmental objections Political environment Source: Anixter Market Research
 
Long-Term Sustainable Spend: Water/Wastewater OEM The world will continue to invest in infrastructure spend. Water and Wastewater Treatment Economic Environment Increased funding of clean water projects Access to clean water is projected to be critical issue over next decadeGrowing concerns over the safe treatment of wastewaterDemand increase due to the shale gas production boom Potential Speed North American market: $430M1 annually in wire and cableHeavy infrastructure improvement spendAddition of new facilities to handle increased wastewater productionUpgrade and expansion of existing facilities to improve capacity Worldwide Need Increased consumption due to population growthIncreasing demand in developing countriesChina has approximately 20% of world's population, but only 7% of its clean water2 Sources: 1. Anixter Market Research; 2. Summit Global Management Inc. 2010
 
Long-Term Sustainable Spend: Power Generation and Substation OEM The world will continue to invest in infrastructure spend. Power Generation Power Generation Economic Environment Investment needed to meet ever-increasing demand for power More stringent EPA rules in U.S. are driving:Transition from coal to gas-fired plantsIncrease in environment controls, such as scrubbers Aging transmission grid being updated and expanded After a recent increase, alternate energy investment is expected to slow due to tax credit expiration Potential Speed North American market: $1.5B1 in wire and cableProjected CAGR of 10%1 over next four years in transmission, distribution and substationGrowth in security spend due to terrorism concernsIncreased industrial automation spend due to smart grid investment North American market: $1.5B1 in wire and cableProjected CAGR of 10%1 over next four years in transmission, distribution and substationGrowth in security spend due to terrorism concernsIncreased industrial automation spend due to smart grid investment Worldwide Need Increased electrification in developing countries driving investmentGrowing middle-class population in South America and Asia Increased electrification in developing countries driving investmentGrowing middle-class population in South America and Asia Source: Anixter Market Research
 
Long-Term Sustainable Spend: EPC OEM Engineering, Procurement and Construction Firms Engineering, Procurement and Construction Firms Economic Environment Owns the top three vertical spends in wire and cableOil, gas, petrochemicalPower generationWater and wastewater treatment Backlogs continue to increase in addressable marketRequire global support for construction projects Potential Speed Cumulative total of previous three marketsStrong growth for security and industrial automation spendPipeline and backlog full for the next 5 to 7 years Cumulative total of previous three marketsStrong growth for security and industrial automation spendPipeline and backlog full for the next 5 to 7 years Worldwide Need Qualified electrical engineers in short supplyManpower shortage forces projects to be handed off to other local offices Wire and cable-specialized engineer at a premiumAging workforceNeed for global footprint partnerships The world will continue to invest in infrastructure spend.
 
Question and Answer Session
 
Presented by: Ian Clarke, SVP Fasteners
 
Who we are Our products and services Our customers Market opportunity Our key differentiators Our growth plan Agenda
 
Fasteners continuously develops, manages and sustains the supply chain between fastener manufacturers and OEMs. We do this by focusing on the fundamentals of quality, cost and material delivery, enabling our customers to concentrate on their core product offering. Total Cost of Acquisition: Value Proposition Fastener cost Vendor management Inventory management Cost of finance Logistics Engineering
 
Schedules and Manages spot buys Direct line feed Kitting and subassembly Aftermarket Vendor-managed inventory Services Engineering services Only Anixter can comprehensively deliver all of these services to a world-class standard globally.
 
Specialists in global sourcing and distribution of high-volume engineered components used in OEM production Products: 225K Part Nos. From 6K Vendors
 
Key Global Customers Proprietary and Confidential.  2012 Anixter Inc.
 
Customer Verticals Agriculture Power Train Truck and Bus Luxury / Niche Car Medical Lawn and Garden Rail White Room Technology Established Verticals Continue to develop established verticals Grow established verticals in developing regions Developing business in new verticals Targeting new verticals with fragmented supply chains New Verticals
 
Where We Are Americas: Canada*, Mexico (5), U.S. (42), Brazil * Europe: Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany (3), Italy (4), Spain, Turkey, U.K. (6) Asia Pacific: China (2), Singapore*, India (3)*, Australia*, Hong Kong* * = One Anixter Facility
 
Source: Freedonia 2011 USA Brazil Mexico EU Turkey UK India China Singapore Americas Current share approx 4.5% Europe Current share approx 7% New entry Market Opportunity
 
Competitive Differentiators Global footprint: Unrivalled geographic coverage Engineering focus: First class people and systems Quality driven: Zero defect culture Complexity: Hundreds of SKUs, suppliers and transactions handled every hour, every day, globally Purchase leverage: Volume consolidation with key global suppliers Manufacturing: Low -cost, high-quality, flexible production facility
 
Technical Expertise Manufacturing process Part rationalization Part substitution Design support Process re-engineering Problem Resolution
 
Technical Expertise Central Customer Database Single Global Part Number System 37HD9 DP003 3GHK1 AN001 AN001 AN001
 
Quality Investment Internationally accredited laboratories world wide from TS16949 to VDA 6.2 Significant investment in state-of-the-art equipment and processes in the last two years 100% audit approval by all major customers Used by customers and vendors Cornerstone of Anixter's differentiation
 
Case Study: Global Engine Manufacturer 20-year relationship now spanning 11 countries over five continents Started in the engine business unit but now an integral partner to all manufacturing divisions Delivering 800 million pieces / 12,000+ part numbers from 1,173 vendors annually to 29 facilities Complex applications with high engineering expectations delivered with a sub-75 parts per million defect rate Positioned to grow alongside the engine manufacturer as they double in sales volume over the next four years
 
Accelerated urbanization shapes our strategy for growth 2012: 50% of world's population live in cities, projected by 2050: 70%1 The must haves for any company to be successful: Strategic Outlook for Growth Global reach Technical expertise Financial strength Committed supply chain Environmental and social sustainability Source: World Trade Council
 
The Nuts and Bolts of Life Mass transport demand set to increase Mobile power generation demand Significant growth in requirements for mega-farming Efficient road movement to be clean and sustainable Improved water and waste distribution needed
 
Question and Answer Session
 
Presented by: Ted Dosch, EVP Finance & Chief Financial Officer
 
Agenda How we create value Business segments' financial highlights Company performance overview Sound financial management practices Long-term financial opportunities Shareholder value proposition
 
Strong Position to Create Value Consistent sales and profitability growth Strong operating leverage Effective working capital management Significant free cash flow Disciplined and prudent approach to capital allocation Focused on value creation for shareholders
 
A Global, Diversified Value-added Distributor Sales Adjusted Operating Margin and EPS(1) Operating Margin (1) Adjusted Operating Margin and EPS exclude special items outlined in the Company's Earnings Releases for the applicable periods. See Appendix for further details regarding these Non-GAAP measures. $4.8 $5.3 $6.1 4.1% 5.1% 5.7% 6.0%
 
Enterprise Cabling & Security Solutions (ECS) Sales Security Sales Growth $2.8 2% 12% 32% 16% 16% 9%(1) (1) Growth over 1st half of 2011 $2.9 $3.2 Clark Security Organic Billions Percent
 
Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable (W&C) $1.9 31% 18% 83% 25%(1) (1) Growth over 1st half of 2011 $1.4 $1.6 Sales Emerging Markets Sales Growth Billions Percent
 
OEM SupplyFasteners Sales Emerging Markets Sales Growth $0.6 $0.8 $1.0 47% 46% 20%(1) (1) Growth over 1st half of 2011
 
Trailing Twelve Months Results
 
Strong Operating Leverage in Recovering Economy Top line growth of 10% in 2010 and 17% in 2011 Effectively utilizing existing capacity to meet increased volume demand Increase in adjusted operating margin of 190 basis points from 2009  2011 Operating Profit Leverage Gross Profit Pull Through
 
Effective Margin Management Despite Input Cost Volatility This information has been obtained from third party sources. While we believe these sources are reliable, we have not independently verified this information and we make no representation as to its accuracy. Copper price source: www.metalprices.com
 
Earnings and Cash Flow Relationship to Sales Changes Fiscal Year (1) Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities less capital expenditures. (2) Adjusted operating profit from continuing operations excludes special items outlined in the Company's Earnings Releases for the applicable periods. See Appendix for details. Flexible / Scalable Business Model
 
Efficient Working Capital Management Effectively manage working capital while maintaining ability to quickly respond to customer orders Operational improvements allowed cash flow to be directed toward other strategic initiatives
 
Disciplined and Prudent Approach to Capital Allocation 4-Year Capital Allocation Snapshot Generates significant Cash Flow from Operations Opportunistically returned capital to shareholders with use of special dividends / share repurchases Conservative net leverage profile allows management to focus on operations 4 Year Summary (2008-2011)
 
Go-Forward Use of Cash Priorities Organic growth Support existing markets Expand into new markets Deleveraging Further strengthen balance sheet and improve liquidity Continue to enhance flexibility Strategic acquisitions Enhance geographic segment position EPS accretive Opportunistic return of value to shareholders Share repurchases Special dividends
 
2H'12 Business Environment Expectations Tailwinds Security business Emerging markets Additional parts with OEM Supply customers Electrical Wire and Cable Projects Low interest rates Potential Headwinds Copper pricing Foreign exchange European economic volatility Global uncertainty 2H'12 Performance Outlook Organic sales growth 4-5% Operating profit leverage Mid to high single digits
 
Long-Term Financial Goals Organic sales growth Operating leverage Working capital as a % of sales Debt-to-capital ratio 8 -10% Mid to high single digits 2122% 4550%
 
Long-Term Annual Sales Growth Goal
 
Value-Add Strategy Yields an Outperforming Investment Opportunity Comparative Operating Margin Performance Revenue Growth Faster growth than local market economic growth rates Earnings quality Higher margins Consistent growth Strong Balance Sheet Value-creating capital allocation (1) Operating margin performance is based on publicly available information of Wesco International Inc.
 
Key Investment Themes Broad end market / geographic / customer diversity Growth opportunities in each end market Common operations and management platform for leverage Experienced senior management team Strong financial position / liquidity Long history of shareholder favorable capital structure management Compelling Customer Value Proposition Delivers a Compelling Shareholder Value Proposition
 
Question and Answer Session
 
Appendix
 
Appendix Appendix I Adjusted Gross Profit and Operating Profit Appendix II Acronyms and Definitions Appendix III Non  GAAP Earnings Per Share Appendix IV Non  GAAP Trailing Twelve Months Results
 
Appendix I  Adjusted Gross Profit and Operating Profit (1) All periods restated for 2011 divestiture of Aerospace. Adjustments to operating profit are further described in the Company's earnings releases and SEC filings for the applicable periods.
 
Acronyms Appendix II  Acronyms and Definitions ECS  Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions W&C  Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable OEM  Original Equipment Manufacturer EPC  Engineering Procurement Construction IBW  In-building Wireless EPS  Diluted earnings per share, continuing operations EBITDA  Earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation, and amortization TTM  Trailing twelve months Cap ex  Capital expenditures 1H  First half 2H  Second half GDP  Gross domestic product AXE  Anixter International Inc. FY  Fiscal year GAAP  Generally Accepted Accounting Principles Total operating margin is defined as operating income as a percentage of total sales Operating profit leverage is defined as the change in adjusted operating profit over the change in sales Gross profit pull through is defined as the change in adjusted operating profit over the change in adjusted gross profit Gross profit margin is defined as gross profit as a percentage of total sales Cash flow is defined as net cash provided by (used in) operating activities less capital expenditures Cash flow from operations is defined as total cash provided from operating activities Working capital is defined as total current assets less total current liabilities Working capital as a % of sales is the average of the last 5 quarter end working capital balances divided by annual sales Free cash flow is defined as adjusted EBITDA less capital expenditures, cash paid for taxes, cash paid for interest plus the change in working capital Definitions
 
2009 In the six months ended July 3, 2009, the Company reported a net loss from continuing operations of $72.9 million (a loss of $2.06 per diluted share). During this period, the Company recorded an impairment charge of $100.0 million ($2.85 per diluted share), severance charge of $5.7 million ($3.9 million net of tax, or $0.11 per diluted share) and losses due to the cancellation of interest rate swaps of $2.1 million ($1.5 million net of tax, or $0.04 per diluted share). These items decreased net income from continuing operations for the six months ended July 3, 2009 by a combined $105.4 million ($2.90 per diluted share). For the full year 2009, the Company reported a net loss from continuing operations of $44.1 million (a loss of $1.17 per diluted share). In addition to the items above, during the remainder of 2009, the Company recorded foreign exchange related losses in Venezuela of $18.0 million ($9.0 million net of tax, or $0.24 per diluted share) and a loss on the early retirement of debt of $1.1 million ($0.07 net of tax, or $0.02 per diluted share), which were partially offset by the tax benefits of $4.8 million ($0.13 per diluted share). Combined, all of these items decreased 2009 net income from continuing operations by $110.2 million ($3.06 per diluted share). After adjusting for these items, net income from continuing operations would have been $32.5 million and $66.1 million in the 6 and 12 months of fiscal 2009, respectively ($0.84 and $1.89 per diluted share, respectively). 2010 In the six months ended July 2, 2010, the Company reported net income from continuing operations of $34.8 million ($0.98 per diluted share). During this period, the Company recorded a pre-tax loss on the early retirement of debt of $29.7 million ($18.4 million net of tax, or $0.51 per diluted share) and a foreign exchange gain in Venezuela of $2.1 million ($0.8 million net of tax, or $0.02 per diluted share). These items decreased 2010 net income from continuing operations by a combined $17.6 million ($0.49 per diluted share). For the full year 2010, the Company reported net income from continuing operations of $109.5 million ($3.08 per diluted share). In addition to the items above, during the remainder of 2010, the Company recorded additional pre-tax losses on the early retirement of debt of $2.2 million ($1.4 million net of tax, or $0.04 per diluted share) and recorded a reversal of prior years foreign taxes of $1.3 million ($0.03 per diluted share). Combined, all of these items decreased 2010 net income from continuing operations by $17.7 million ($0.50 per diluted share). After adjusting for these items, net income from continuing operations would have been $52.4 million and $127.2 million in the 6 and 12 months of fiscal 2010, respectively ($1.47 and $3.58 per diluted share, respectively). Appendix III  Non-GAAP Earnings Per Share
 
2011 In the 6 and 12 months ended 2011, the Company reported net income from continuing operations of $89.3 million and $200.7 million, respectively ($2.47 and $5.71 per diluted share, respectively). In the first half of 2011, the Company recorded a European restructuring charge of $5.3 million ($3.3 million net of tax, or $0.09 per diluted share). In addition to the restructuring charge, the Company recorded a tax valuation allowance adjustment of $10.8 million ($0.31 per diluted share) during the second half of the year. Combined, all of these items increased 2011 net income from continuing operations by a combined $7.5 million ($0.22 per diluted share). After adjusting for these items, net income from continuing operations would have been $92.6 million and $193.2 million in the 6 and 12 months of fiscal 2011, respectively ($2.56 and $5.49 per diluted share, respectively). 2012 In the first half of 2012, the Company reported net income from continuing operations of $99.6 million ($2.90 per diluted share). During this period, the Company recorded a charge for the interest and penalties associated with prior year income tax liabilities of $1.7 million ($1.1 million net of tax, or $0.03 per diluted share), an income tax benefit of $9.7 million ($0.28 per diluted share) primarily related to the reversal of deferred income tax valuation allowances in certain foreign jurisdictions and incremental interest of $3.2 million ($2.1 million net of tax, or $0.06 per diluted share) associated with a bond offering completed in 2012. These items increased net income from continuing operations by a net amount of $6.5 million ($0.19 per diluted share). After adjusting for these items, net income from continuing operations would have been $93.1 million ($2.71 per diluted share). Appendix III  Non-GAAP Earnings Per Share (cont.)
 
In the trailing twelve months ending June 29 2012, the Company recorded a charge for the interest and penalties associated with 2011 income tax liabilities of $1.7 million ($1.1 million net of tax, or $0.03 per diluted share), income tax benefits of $20.5 million ($0.59 per diluted share) primarily related to the reversal of deferred income tax valuation allowances in certain foreign jurisdictions and incremental interest of $3.2 million ($2.1 million net of tax, or $0.06 per diluted share) associated with a bond offering completed in 2012. These items increased net income from continuing operations by a net amount of $17.3 million ($0.50 per diluted share). In the trailing twelve months ending July 1, 2011, the $5.3 million restructuring charge decreased operating income by $5.3 and net income from continuing operations by $3.3 million, or $0.09 per diluted share. The Company also repurchased a portion of its debt which resulted in the recognition of a pre-tax loss of $2.2 million ($1.4 million, net of tax, or $0.04 per diluted share) and recorded a tax benefit of $1.3 million for the reversal of prior year foreign taxes ($0.03 per diluted share). After adjusting for these items, net income from continuing operations over the trailing twelve months ending June 29, 2012 would have been $193.7 million, or $5.64 per diluted share, which compares to adjusted net income from continuing operations of $167.4 million, or $4.67 per diluted share, in the corresponding prior year period (an increase of 21% per diluted share). Appendix IV  Non-GAAP Trailing Twelve Months Results


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20120913085833.txt.gz
TIME:20120913085833
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") is furnishing this Report on Form 8-K in connection with various disclosures of information at future meetings with analysts and investors beginning September 13, 2012. A copy of the slide presentation to be used during these meetings is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Report on Form 8-K and will be available on the Company's website, beginning on September 13, 2012. From time to time, the Company may update this presentation on the Company's website. The information in this Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, is being furnished and shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any registration statement or other document filed under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as otherwise stated in such filing. For additional detail, please refer to our Investor Day presentation as filed on Form 8-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 8, 2012.
www.anixter.com
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20121023115654.txt.gz
TIME:20121023115654
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 23, 2012, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended September 28, 2012. The Company's press release, dated October 23, 2012, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
Third Quarter Highlights
GLENVIEW, IL, October 23, 2012  Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE) today reported results for the quarter ended September 28, 2012. Sales of $1.61 billion were flat compared to the year ago quarter. Organic sales increased by 0.4% excluding the impact of the following items:
 
 
 
Operating income of $67.3 million included a $27.2 million impairment charge and an inventory lower of cost or market adjustment of $1.2 million. This combined non-cash charge of $28.4 million was a result of weaker macro economic conditions in Europe, driving lower operating income and a reduction in projected future cash flows.
After adjusting for the impairment and inventory charges, operating income of $95.7 million resulted in an operating margin in the current quarter of 5.9 percent, the highest quarterly margin of the year. Exclusive of $3.8 million of unfavorable copper pricing and $0.2 million of favorable foreign exchange effects, adjusted operating income was $99.3 million.
Net income from continuing operations for the third quarter was $19.8 million compared to $61.6 million in the year ago quarter. Excluding the impairment and inventory charges of $27.4 million net of tax, adjusted net income from continuing operations would have been $47.2 million as compared to $52.8 million in the prior year quarter excluding a net tax benefit of $8.8 million.
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $0.59 declined from $1.78 per diluted share reported in the year ago quarter primarily due to the impairment and inventory charges. Excluding the current quarter charge of $0.82 per diluted share as well as the prior year tax benefit of $0.25 per diluted share, net income from continuing operations would have been $1.41 per diluted share, a decrease of 8 percent from the prior year quarter diluted adjusted earnings per share of $1.53.
Cash flow generated from operations was $66.7 million compared to $18.7 million in the year ago quarter. The higher cash generation in the quarter was primarily due to a reduction in working capital requirements compared to the prior year quarter.
 
Third Quarter Sales Trends
Commenting on third quarter sales trends, Robert Eck, President and CEO, stated, "While the quarter was challenging from a macro economic perspective, which is reflected in lower sales in our Europe segment and our OEM Supply end market, we remain confident in the underlying health of our business and our ability to capitalize on a variety of opportunities throughout our business. The strength of our global natural resource development and power generation markets helped to fuel 8 percent organic growth in our global Electrical and Electronic Wire & Cable end market. This strong performance included a record quarter for our Canadian wire and cable business and 29 percent organic growth for our Emerging Markets wire and cable business."
Third Quarter Operating Results
"Our ongoing focus on cost management continues to enable us to deliver solid operating performance and cash flow," commented Eck. "We were pleased that third quarter operating expenses of $264.2 million, exclusive of the impairment, were 16.4 percent of sales, a 60 basis point improvement from the second quarter."
operating margin of 5.9 percent, exclusive of the impairment and inventory charges, increased 20 basis points sequentially and declined 40 basis points from the year ago quarter.
Company-wide adjusted
operating margin of 7.3 percent in the current quarter increased 30 basis points sequentially due to strong cost structure management. The 20 basis points year over year decline was driven by increased investment in strategic projects and higher costs related to pensions, partially offset by strong cost management actions.
North America
adjusted operating margin was 0.2 percent in the current quarter, exclusive of the impairment and inventory charges, and lower by 10 basis points sequentially and 180 basis points versus the prior year quarter. This margin decline reflects the impact of the weak economy in this region, which put significant pressure on revenue while also contributing to the unfavorable operating expense leverage.
Europe
operating margin of 5.5 percent declined 10 basis points sequentially and 20 basis points from the year ago quarter. Both declines were driven primarily by product mix.
Emerging Markets
Other
Interest expense in the current quarter of $16.6 million increased by $4.1 million compared to the prior year quarter, driven by the $4.9 million of incremental expense associated with the bond offering completed in the second quarter of this year. The bonds were issued in anticipation of the February 2013 convertible notes redemption, resulting in a temporary increase in interest expense, average cost of borrowed capital and debt-to-total capital ratio.
Other, net expense in the current quarter of $3.2 million decreased by $2.7 million from $5.9 million in the year ago quarter, driven primarily by lower foreign exchange losses and a favorable return on the cash surrender value of company-owned life insurance policies.
Excluding the impact of the impairment and inventory charges, the tax rate in the current quarter of 37.8 percent included an additional expense of $0.03 per diluted share due to the geographic mix changes in forecasted earnings bringing the full year rate to 36.8 percent. The prior year third quarter results included a net tax benefit of $8.8 million primarily related to the reversal of deferred income tax valuation reserves. Excluding this benefit, the adjusted tax rate in the prior year third quarter was 36.6 percent.
 
Cash Flow and Leverage
"Our strong cash generation in a period of slower year-on-year revenue growth reflects our disciplined working capital and cash management processes," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice-President and CFO. "With a quarter-end cash balance of $136.6 million and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow for the remainder of 2012, we will continue to evaluate the optimal use of our funds as we have done with our recent share repurchase and May special dividend." Continued Dosch, "Going forward, we will utilize future cash flows to invest in the growth of the business, capitalize on strategic acquisition opportunities as they arise, deleverage our balance sheet, and return capital to shareholders through share repurchases or special dividends."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the third quarter:
 
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
Eck concluded, "Our outlook for 2012 includes positive organic sales growth for the remainder of the year despite a softer environment than originally anticipated. While global markets, particularly in Europe, are difficult to predict, our strategic growth initiatives position us well to continue to expand our leadership position within the industry and further leverage our global supply chain platform. In this more uncertain environment we will remain focused on managing expenses and working capital carefully, while pursuing strategic investments to build our business. Finally, it is during times like this current economic environment when our business model, which is based on helping our customers lower their supply chain costs and reduce execution risk, is of even greater value."
Financial Results from Continuing Operations
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
 
Third Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will broadcast a conference call discussing these results at 9:30 am central time on Tuesday, October 23, 2012. The call will be Webcast by CCBN and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's Website at . The Webcast also will be available over CCBN's Investor Distribution Network to both institutional and individual investors. Individual investors can listen to the call through CCBN's individual investor center at , or by visiting any of the investor sites in CCBN's Individual Investor Network (such as America Online's Personal Finance Channel and Fidelity.com). Institutional investors can access the call via CCBN's password-protected event management site, StreetEvents (). The Webcast will be archived on all of these sites for 30 days.
www.anixter.com
www.companyboardroom.com
www.streetevents.com
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire & cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 220 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic revenue growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of acquisitions, foreign exchange and copper pricing for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of acquisitions, foreign exchange and copper pricing, which are subject to volatility or can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company business and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20121219083357.txt.gz
TIME:20121219083357
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 19, 2012, Anixter International Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release to furnish certain information reflecting its realigned segment reporting structure, which the Company is changing effective for the fourth quarter ending December 28, 2012.
While this financial data reflects the change in the Company's reportable segments described above, the Company has not in any way revised or restated its historical financial statements for any period.
Under the recent realignment of the Company's operating structure, the Company's new reportable segments will be as follows: Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions, Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable, OEM Supply and Corporate. The change in disclosure of reportable segment information is required by the provisions of Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") Topic 280, Segment Reporting, and reflects the manner in which the Company is currently managing its business. This Current Report on Form 8-K contains the recasted disclosure of historical results into the new business segments for previously reported fiscal periods ending 2010 and 2011 and the first, second and third quarters of fiscal 2012 and 2011.
A copy of the Company's press release issued on December 19, 2012 is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference. The press release is also available through the Company's website at www.anixter.com. From time to time, the Company may update this information on the Company's website. The Company did not operate under the realigned segment structure for any of these prior periods and will begin to report results under the new structure effective with the filing of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ending December 28, 2012.
In connection with the change in segments and in accordance with the provisions of ASC Topic 350, Intangibles  Goodwill and Other, the Company will be required to reassign the carrying amount of goodwill to its reporting units (which are the same as the realigned reportable segments) based on the respective fair value. This will be completed in the fourth quarter of 2012 and the Company will report the balance of goodwill in its segment footnote disclosure which will be included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ending December 28, 2012.
The information in this Form 8-K, including Exhibit 99.1, is being furnished and shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any registration statement or other document filed under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as otherwise stated in such filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE) today announced that it is furnishing certain historical business segment information to reflect its realigned segment reporting structure, which the Company changed effective for the fourth quarter ending December 28, 2012. Under the realigned structure, the Company's reportable segments are as follows: Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions, Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable, OEM Supply and Corporate. The change in disclosure of reportable segment information is required by Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") Topic 280, Segment Reporting, and reflects the manner in which the Company is currently managing its businesses.
GLENVIEW, IL, December 19, 2012 
While this financial data reflects the change in the Company's reportable segments described above, the Company has not in any way revised or restated its historical financial statements for any period.
Commenting on the change in segments, Bob Eck, President and CEO of Anixter, said, "We believe our new reporting segments reflect the realigned operating structure of our business and will provide senior management visibility to the respective end market segments, especially as we continue to leverage our global supply chain platform to support global customers and suppliers in each of our end market segments."
Historical results reflecting the new business segments for previously reported fiscal periods ending 2010 and 2011 and the first, second and third quarters of fiscal 2012 and 2011 are attached and available on the Company's website, www.anixter.com. From time to time, the Company may update this information on the Company's website. The Company did not operate under the realigned segment structure for any of these prior periods and will begin to report results under the new structure effective with the filing of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ending December 28, 2012.
In connection with the change in reportable segments and in accordance with the provisions of ASC Topic 350, Intangibles  Goodwill and Other, the Company will be required to reassign the carrying amount of goodwill to its reporting units (which are the same as the realigned reportable segments) based on the respective fair value. This will be completed in the fourth quarter of 2012 and the Company will reflect the balance of goodwill in its segment footnote which will be included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ending December 28, 2012.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire and cable, fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 225 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 260 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
INVESTOR CONTACTS
 
The Company is engaged in the distribution of communication and security products, electrical and electronic wire and cable products, and fasteners and other small parts ("C" Class inventory components) from top suppliers to contractors and installers, and also to end users including manufacturers, natural resources companies, utilities and original equipment manufacturers who use the Company's products as a component in their end product. In the fourth quarter of 2012, the Company has reorganized its reportable segments from geography to end market to reflect the new operating structure and management of these global businesses. Historical results reflecting the new business segments for previously reported periods for fiscal years ended 2010 and 2011 and the first, second and third quarters of 2011 and 2012 are shown below.
The Company has identified Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions, Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable, OEM Supply and Corporate as reportable segments. The following is a brief description of each of the Company's reportable segments and respective business activities:
Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions
The Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions ("ECS") segment, with operations in over 50 countries, supplies products and customized Supply Chain Solutions to customers in a diverse range of industries including finance, transportation, education, government, healthcare, and retail. ECS specifies solutions with end-users and sells the products through various channels including data communications contractors, and security, network and systems integrators. It has a broad product portfolio that includes copper and fiber optic cable and connectivity, access control, video surveillance, cabinets, power, cable management and other ancillary products. The Company's ECS segment includes more than 1,600 technically trained salespeople, approximately 60 Supply Chain Solutions specialists and 90 sales engineers.
Through a variety of supply chain value-added solutions, including inventory management, product packaging and enhancement, and other customized supply chain services, the ECS segment helps customers reduce the risk, complexity and cost associated with their IT infrastructure and physical security deployments. The ECS commitment to quality products and services and technical leadership is demonstrated by its participation in many global standards organizations. Its technical expertise extends to performance and interoperability testing at the Company's Infrastructure Solutions Lab
SM
, which provides ECS the opportunity to demonstrate solutions and proof of concepts to customers. The ECS Data Center HealthCheck
SM
and ipAssured
SM
programs help customers make intelligent buying decisions around network and security infrastructure, and improve efficiency to meet their sustainability goals.
Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable
The Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable segment, with operations in over 30 countries, offers a broad range of wire and cable products and solutions to the Industrial and Original Equipment Manufacturer ("OEM") markets. The Industrial group in this segment supplies products to customers in key markets such as oil, gas and petrochemical, power generation and distribution, industrial, natural resource, water and wastewater treatment. It also sells through channels including electrical contractors, security and automation integrators, and engineering, procurement and construction firms. The OEM focused sales force in this segment supplies products to manufacturers of products such as audio/video, automotive, industrial, medical, military and communications equipment; panel, cable and harness shops, and makers of consumer durable goods. The product portfolio in this global business includes electrical and electronic wire and cable, shipboard cable, support and supply products, low-voltage cable, instrumentation cable, industrial communication and control products, security cable, connectors, industrial Ethernet switches, and voice and data cable. Value-added services, including cable management, and engineering support are tailored to position the Company as a specialist in high-growth emerging markets, OEMs and industrial verticals. The segment helps customers achieve their sustainability goals by using its value-added services to minimize scrap, reduce lead times and improve power efficiency.
The Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable team of over 900 technical experts includes its sales, supply chain specialists, industrial communication specialists and engineers. The Company provides world-class technical assistance, products and support through code and standards interpretation, product selection assistance, on-site customer training, and customer specification reviews. The Company brings value to its customers through its global reach, ability to provide global infrastructure project coordination, technical and engineering support, financial strength, and sourcing and supplier relationships. These capabilities help customers reduce costs and risks and gain competitive advantage in their marketplace.
OEM Supply
The OEM Supply segment supplies high-volume, low-cost components and customized Supply Chain Solutions to leading original equipment manufacturers worldwide including the heavy truck, automotive, construction, medical, white goods, agricultural, power train, wind turbine, HVAC and transportation industries. Its inventory of 225,000 SKUs consist of primarily Class-C parts that are application critical and typically are engineered to distinct performance and quality specifications. The OEM Supply segment product portfolio includes nuts, bolts, screws, washers, clips, gaskets, brackets and rivets as well as other fasteners and small components required by manufacturers.
OEM Supply's worldwide scale and internationally accredited labs help its customers source quality components and test them for quality adherence to required specifications. Its Supply Chain Solutions, including scheduled and managed buys, direct line feed, vendor-managed inventory, kitting and subassembly, allow customers to streamline their manufacturing processes, reduce overall costs and focus on their core competencies. The Company's engineers and supply chain experts specialize in problem resolution, design support, part rationalization, part substitution, and process re-engineering. In-house quality experts and advanced quality procedures allow the OEM Supply segment to successfully implement customized supply solutions for each customer. The OEM Supply segment also has small batch manufacturing capabilities that allow it to address unique fastener quick turnaround requirements. With unrivaled geographic coverage, OEM Supply leverages its strong engineering, supply chain services and quality focus to support customers around the globe.
Corporate
The Company obtains and coordinates financing, tax, information technology, legal and other related services, certain of which are rebilled to subsidiaries. Corporate expenses are allocated to the segments based primarily on projected sales and estimated use of time. Also, the Company has various corporate assets which are not allocated to the segments. Interest expense and other non-operating items are not allocated to the segments or reviewed on a segment basis. Intercompany transactions are not significant.
Quarterly and year-to-date segment information for net sales, operating income, depreciation, amortization of intangible assets and capital expenditures and total assets are as follows (in millions):
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20130129135525.txt.gz
TIME:20130129135525
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 29, 2013, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended December 28, 2012. The Company's press release, dated January 29, 2013, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
GLENVIEW, IL, (Business Wire) January 29, 2013  Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE) today reported record sales of $1.54 billion for the quarter ended December 28, 2012, a 3.0 percent increase compared to the year ago quarter. Organic sales growth, which excludes the impact of the following items, was flat year-over-year:
 
 
 
Operating income of $38.6 million included pre-tax charges of $46.7 million attributable to:
 
 
 
After adjusting for the charges, operating income was $85.3 million compared to $91.6 million in the prior year period. Adjusted operating margin was 5.5 percent compared to 6.1 percent in the prior year period, driven primarily by a decrease in gross margin.
Adjusted net income from continuing operations was $43.5 million excluding the impairment, pension-related and restructuring charges of $38.3 million, net of tax. Adjusted net income was $47.8 million in the prior year quarter excluding a net tax benefit of $2.0 million.
 
 
Adjusted earnings from continuing operations was $1.32 per diluted share compared to an adjusted $1.43 per diluted share in the year ago quarter. The current quarter excluded the previously mentioned charges totaling $1.16 per diluted share while the prior year quarter excluded the previously mentioned tax benefit equating to $0.06 per diluted share. The $0.11 year-over-year decline in adjusted earnings per diluted share was primarily a result of the challenging global economy.
"In light of uneven global growth, we were pleased to achieve record fourth quarter and full year sales. This strong performance was driven by record sales in several areas of the business including Security Solutions, which continued to grow at a double digit rate to exceed $1 billion of sales for the year. Our ongoing focus on cost and balance sheet management enabled us to deliver solid operating performance and cash flow," commented President and CEO, Bob Eck. "We continue to have a strong financial position, with a business model that generates substantial cash in periods of slower revenue growth, as highlighted by the current quarter and fiscal year."
Income Statement Detail
Gross margin was 22.2 percent compared to 23.3 percent in the year ago quarter, primarily caused by a product mix shift within our Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable and Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions segments. Strong cost management resulted in flat operating expense year-over-year and a 50 basis point improvement in operating expense as a percent of sales, excluding the above mentioned charges.
Interest expense in the current quarter of $16.2 million increased by $4.2 million compared to the prior year quarter as a result of the $4.8 million of incremental expense associated with the second quarter of 2012 bond offering.
Excluding the impact of the impairment, pension-related and restructuring charges, the tax rate in the current quarter was 35.5 percent. In the first quarter of 2012 the Company recorded a benefit of $9.7 million related to the reversal of valuation allowances, and interest and penalties of $1.7 million related to the prior year. In the third quarter of 2012, the company recorded an impairment charge and an inventory adjustment which reduced operating income by $28.4 million, or $27.4 million net of tax. Excluding all of these charges the full year tax rate was 36.5 percent. The full year results for the prior year included net tax benefits of $10.8 million primarily related to the reversal of deferred income tax valuation allowances, $2.0 million of which was recorded in the fourth quarter. Excluding this benefit, the adjusted tax rate in the prior year fourth quarter and full year was 38.0 percent and 37.4 percent, respectively.
Segment Update
In December of 2012, the Company announced a change in reportable segments without revising or restating historical financial statements for any period. The new segments are Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions, Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable and OEM Supply.
 
 
("ECS") sales of $800.0 million declined 1 percent from the prior year period, impacted by the continuation of the trends we experienced throughout 2012 with companies delaying commitments to data center investments. Partially offsetting the decline was a 12 percent increase in security sales, which accounted for approximately 28 percent of segment sales. Adjusted operating income was $44.3 million, excluding $12.3 million of pension-related and restructuring charges, compared to $48.7 million in the year ago quarter. Adjusted operating margin was 5.5 percent compared to 5.6 percent in the previous quarter and 6.0 percent in the year ago quarter. Persistent weakness in the European economy and a product mix shift as security becomes an increasing part of the overall sales mix were the primary drivers of the margin decline versus the previous periods.
Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions
("W&C") achieved record fourth quarter sales of $544.1 million, up 18 percent from the prior year period, reflecting the acquisition of Jorvex and the continued strength in our natural resource extraction and power generation businesses. The strength was geographically broad-based, including record fourth quarter sales in resource rich regions such as Canada, Latin America and the Middle East. Adjusted operating income was $43.7 million, excluding $8.5 million of pension-related and restructuring charges, compared to $39.4 million in the year ago quarter. Adjusted operating margin was 8.0 percent compared to 8.5 percent in the previous quarter and 8.6 percent in the year ago quarter. The change in margin was largely a result of a mix shift from OEM to Industrial products in North America, and an increase in lower margin project activity outside of the US.
Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable
("OEM") sales of $200.3 million declined by 12.4 percent from the prior year quarter driven by a year-over-year decline in heavy truck production levels in North America along with weaker manufacturing production levels in the European region. Adjusted operating loss was $2.7 million, excluding $25.9 million of impairment, pension-related and restructuring charges, compared to an operating profit of $3.5 million in the year ago quarter. Adjusted operating margin was negative 1.4 percent compared to 0.2 percent in the previous quarter and 1.5 percent in the year ago quarter.
OEM Supply
Discussion of Impairment, Pension-related and Restructuring Charges
In connection with the previously announced change in reportable segments and in accordance with accounting guidance, the Company was required to reassign the carrying amount of goodwill to its new reporting units in the fourth quarter of 2012. This interim assessment of the recoverability of goodwill and the recoverability of the Company's long lived assets assigned to the reporting units concluded that the estimated fair value of the OEM Supply business was lower than the carrying value of the net assets. This result is primarily due to the poor global economic conditions that have disproportionately impacted this segment of our business, resulting in impairment charges of $21.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2012.
In the fourth quarter of 2012, the Company took two actions related to its U.S. defined benefit pension plan that will reduce future expenses and contributions. First, the Company offered a one-time lump sum payment option to terminated vested participants that resulted in an additional $34 million pension fund contribution by the Company to fund these payouts as well as a settlement charge of $15.3 million. These contributions were made using excess cash from operations, positively influencing the funded status of the plan. Second, the Company made changes to its existing U.S. defined benefit plan which are effective beginning December 31, 2013, that freeze benefits provided to employees hired on or before June 1, 2004. This change is similar to the change made in 2004 for any new employees.
 
 
Finally, recognizing the ongoing weak global economic conditions, the Company took further aggressive actions to reduce our cost structure across all segments and geographies, resulting in a $10.1 million charge in the fourth quarter of 2012. Most of the costs were severance related expenses associated with a reduction in over 200 positions.
The combination of the amendment to the pension plan and the restructuring actions will drive approximately $20 million in annual cost savings beginning immediately.
Cash Flow and Leverage
Cash flow generated from operations was $16 million compared to $113 million in the year ago quarter. The lower cash generation in the quarter was primarily due to a lower rate of working capital improvement achieved in the current quarter compared to the prior year quarter as well as the $34 million of additional pension plan contribution. Full year cash flow was $142 million; however, excluding the additional pension plan contribution, full year cash flow would have been $176 million, compared to $144 million in the prior year.
"Our disciplined working capital and cash management processes give us the flexibility needed to manage through an uncertain economic environment. With a year-end cash balance of $89 million and an expectation of continuing positive cash flow, we constantly evaluate the optimal use of our funds," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice-President and CFO. "Going forward, we will utilize future cash flows to invest in the growth of the business, capitalize on strategic acquisition opportunities, deleverage our balance sheet, and selectively return capital to shareholders through share repurchases and special dividends, as we did in 2012 with our 1 million share repurchase and $4.50 per share special dividend."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the fourth quarter:
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
"Our outlook for 2013 includes low to mid-single digit organic sales growth, which we believe will be weighted to the back half of the year. While global markets are difficult to predict, we took aggressive measures in 2012 that position us to continue to expand our leadership position within each of our segments, further leveraging our global supply chain platform to better serve our customers," stated Eck. "With ongoing pressure on companies to reduce costs, our business model, which is based on helping our customers lower their supply chain costs and reduce execution risk, is of even greater value. We believe we are well positioned financially, operationally and strategically to capitalize on our opportunities."
 
 
Financial Results from Continuing Operations
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter Earnings Call
Anixter will host a conference call to discuss these results beginning at 9:30 am central time today, Tuesday, January 29, 2013. The call will be simulcast through Anixter's investor relations website at . Additionally, the call may be accessed with the toll-free dial-in number 1 (888) 417-8465 or international toll free number 1 (719) 325-2452. Please use the pass code 4949555. A supplemental presentation titled "Fourth Quarter 2012 Highlights and Operating Review" will be posted to the Company's investor relations website.
www.anixter.com/investor
A replay of the conference call will be archived on the website and will also be available for 14 days, beginning at 12:30 pm central time on January 29, by dialing 888-203-1112 within the U.S. and Canada, or 719-457-0820 outside the U.S. and Canada. Please use the replay code 4949555.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of enterprise cabling and security solutions, electrical and electronic wire & cable, OEM supply fasteners and other small parts. The Company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 220 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 250 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
 
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
 
This report includes certain financial measures computed using non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("non-GAAP") components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The Company believes this information is useful to investors in order to provide a better understanding of the organic revenue growth trends of the Company on a comparable basis. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reason stated above.
Organic revenue growth measures revenue excluding the effects of acquisitions, foreign exchange and copper pricing for comparison of current period results with the corresponding period of the prior year. The Company believes that this measure provides management and investors with a more complete understanding of underlying operating results and trends of established, ongoing operations by excluding the effect of acquisitions, foreign exchange and copper pricing, which are subject to volatility or can obscure underlying trends. Management recognizes that the term "organic revenue growth" may be interpreted differently by other companies and under different circumstances. Although this may have an effect on comparability of absolute percentage growth from company to company, the Company believes that these measures are useful in assessing trends of the Company business and may therefore be a useful tool in assessing period-to-period performance.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20130423095739.txt.gz
TIME:20130423095739
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 23, 2013, the Company reported its results for the fiscal quarter ended March 29, 2013. The Company's press release, dated April 23, 2013, is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
GLENVIEW, IL, (Business Wire) April 23, 2013  Anixter International Inc. (NYSE: AXE) today reported sales of $1.49 billion for the quarter ended March 29, 2013, a 2.1 percent decrease compared to the year ago quarter. Sales growth year-over-year would have been slightly positive excluding the unfavorable impact of the timing of holidays and the conclusion of a large security solutions contract. Organic sales, which excludes the impact of the following items, declined by 3.8 percent year-over-year:
 
 
 
Operating income of $81.0 million decreased by 6.5 percent from $86.7 million in the prior year period. Operating margin of 5.4 percent compares to 5.7 percent in the prior year period and 5.5 percent in the previous quarter, excluding the fourth quarter of 2012 impairment, pension-related and restructuring charges of $46.7 million.
Net income from continuing operations of $42.6 million compares to non-GAAP net income from continuing operations of $47.0 million in the prior year quarter, which excludes a $9.7 million tax benefit from the reversal of deferred income tax valuation allowances and $1.7 million ($1.1 million, net of tax) in interest expense and penalties related to prior years' tax liabilities. Earnings from continuing operations of $1.27 per diluted share in the current quarter compares to an adjusted $1.37 per diluted share in the year ago quarter, which excludes the above referenced net benefit of $0.25 per diluted share. The year-over-year decline in earnings per diluted share was primarily a result of industry-wide delays in enterprise data infrastructure investment that began in the fourth quarter of 2011, and the continuation of weaker OEM Supply trends from the third and fourth quarters of 2012.
"We entered 2013 with the expectation that the first half of the year would continue to be challenged by global macroeconomic activity and that we would see strengthening results in the second half of the year. Based on the increased levels of project quoting activity, we are seeing signs that general business conditions and overall levels of capital spending by our customers are beginning to improve," commented Bob Eck, President and CEO. "We remain focused on margin improvement and working capital management, which will enable us to deliver solid financial results in a business environment that we expect will continue to be characterized by slow growth."
 
 
Income Statement Detail
Gross margin of 22.7 percent improved from 22.2 percent in the fourth quarter of 2012 and compares to 22.9 percent in the year ago quarter. The decrease in gross margin compared to the prior year was a result of customer and project mix in the company's OEM Supply and Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable segments, partially offset by improved gross margin in the company's Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions segment.
Strong cost management resulted in operating expenses of $257.2 million, a decline of $5.3 million, or 2.1 percent, year-over-year. Interest expense of $13.6 million increased by $1.5 million compared to the prior year quarter. This increase is a result of the $2.5 million of incremental expense associated with the company's bond offering in the second quarter of 2012, partially offset by the February 2013 redemption of the Company's 1.0% senior convertible notes. Foreign exchange and other expense of $1.9 million improved from $3.1 million in the prior year quarter primarily due to lower foreign currency expense.
The tax rate in the current quarter of 35.0 percent compares to an adjusted tax rate of 35.8 percent in the year ago quarter. In the first quarter of 2012, the adjusted tax rate excludes the items discussed above.
Segment Update
("ECS") sales of $745.1 million compares to $778.8 million in the prior year period. The 4.3 percent decline was primarily caused by persistent macro-economic weakness in the European and Emerging Markets regions, partially offset by growth in sales in North America. Sales growth year-over-year would have been nearly flat excluding the unfavorable impact of the timing of holidays and the conclusion of a large security solutions contract. Security sales increased slightly year-over-year but would have been up 10 percent excluding the same holiday and contract conclusion impact.
Enterprise Cabling and Security Solutions
ECS operating income of $34.8 million compares to $38.2 million in the year ago quarter. The year-on-year decline was caused primarily by declines in Emerging Markets. Operating margin for ECS of 4.7 percent compares to 4.9 percent in the year-ago quarter.
("W&C") achieved record first quarter sales of $517.8 million, up 6.8 percent from the prior year period, reflecting the acquisition of Jorvex and the continued strength in our natural resource extraction and power generation businesses customer sectors. Excluding the $34.1 million favorable impact from the acquisition of Jorvex, the $5.5 million unfavorable impact from copper and the $1.7 million unfavorable impact from foreign exchange, organic sales increased by 1.3 percent. Europe and Emerging Markets achieved record first quarter sales with North America growth relatively flat, primarily due to a lower mix of OEM sales and the timing of large project billings.
Electrical and Electronic Wire and Cable
Operating income of $41.3 million compares to $39.8 million in the year ago quarter, with gains in the Emerging Markets and EMEA regions offsetting a decline in North America. Operating margin of 8.0 percent compares to 8.2 percent in the year ago quarter.
("OEM") sales of $228.0 million declined by 12.0 percent from the prior year quarter caused by a year-over-year decline in heavy truck production levels in North America and continuing weaker manufacturing production levels in Europe. Excluding the $0.6 million unfavorable impact of foreign exchange, organic sales declined by 11.8 percent.
OEM Supply
 
 
Operating income of $4.9 million compares to $8.7 million in the year ago quarter. Operating margin of 2.1 percent compares to 3.4 percent in the year ago quarter, with declines in North America and Emerging Markets operating margin largely due to lower volumes and unfavorable customer mix.
On a sequential basis, sales improved by 13.8 percent, with double-digit sequential sales growth in each region. This performance resulted in a 350 basis point improvement in segment operating margin versus the prior quarter, excluding the 2012 fourth quarter impairment, pension-related and restructuring charges of $25.9 million.
Cash Flow and Leverage
In the quarter, the company generated $53.1 million of cash from operations due to a sequential decline in quarterly sales combined with working capital improvement initiatives. In the year ago quarter, the company reported $64.7 million of cash used in operations.
"Our disciplined working capital and cash management processes give us the flexibility needed to manage through an uncertain economic environment. With an expectation of continued positive cash flow for the fiscal year, we constantly evaluate the optimal use of our funds," commented Ted Dosch, Executive Vice-President and CFO. "We continue to have a strong financial position and remain committed to both investing in our business for growth and returning excess capital to our shareholders, as we have done consistently over the past five years."
Key capital structure and credit-related statistics for the quarter:
 
 
 
 
Business Outlook
"Our outlook for 2013 includes low single digit organic sales growth, which we believe will be weighted to the back half of the year. While global markets are difficult to predict, we took aggressive measures in 2012 that position us to expand our leadership position within each of our segments, further leveraging our global supply chain platform to better serve our customers," stated Eck. "With ongoing pressure on companies to reduce costs, our business model, which is based on helping our customers lower their supply chain costs and reduce execution risk, is of even greater value. We believe we are well positioned financially, operationally and strategically to capitalize on our opportunities."
 
 
Financial Results From Continuing Operations
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 
First Quarter Earnings Call Details
The company will host a conference call to discuss these results beginning at 9:30 a.m. central time today. The call will be available as a live audio webcast and can be accessed at the investor relations portion of Anixter's website at .
anixter.com/investor
Dial-in numbers for the call are as follows:
 
A replay of the call will be available at anixter.com/investor for 15 days following the call. Prior to the beginning of the call a supplemental presentation titled "First Quarter 2013 Highlights and Operating Review" will be available on the company's investor relations website.
About Anixter
Anixter International is a leading global distributor of enterprise cabling and security solutions, electrical and electronic wire and cable, OEM supply fasteners and other small parts. The company adds value to the distribution process by providing its customers access to 1) innovative inventory management programs, 2) more than 450,000 products and over $1 billion in inventory, 3) approximately 220 warehouses with 7 million square feet of space, and 4) locations in over 250 cities in more than 50 countries. Founded in 1957 and headquartered near Chicago, Anixter trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AXE.
 
 
Safe Harbor Statement
The statements in this news release that use such words as "believe," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "contemplate," "estimate," "plan," "project," "should," "may," "will," or similar expressions are forward-looking statements. They are subject to a number of factors that could cause the company's actual results to differ materially from what is indicated here. These factors include general economic conditions, the level of customer demand particularly for capital projects in the markets we serve, changes in supplier sales strategies or financial viability, risks associated with the sale of nonconforming products and services, political, economic or currency risks related to foreign operations, inventory obsolescence, copper price fluctuations, customer viability, risks associated with accounts receivable, the impact of regulation and regulatory, investigative and legal proceedings and legal compliance risks, and risks associated with integration of acquired companies. These uncertainties may cause our actual results to be materially different than those expressed in any forward looking statements. We do not undertake to update any forward looking statements. Please see the company's Securities and Exchange Commission filings for more information.
 
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
 
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
 
 
ANIXTER INTERNATIONAL INC.
Condensed Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows (Unaudited)
 
 
 
In addition to the results provided in accordance with U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles ("GAAP") above, this report includes certain financial measures computed using non-GAAP components as defined by the Securities and Exchange Commission. Specifically, net sales comparisons to the prior corresponding period, both worldwide and in relevant segments, are discussed in this report both on a GAAP basis and excluding acquisitions, foreign exchange effects and the impact of copper prices ("non-GAAP"). We believe that by reporting organic growth which excludes the impact of acquisitions, foreign exchange effects and the impact of copper prices, both management and investors are provided with meaningful supplemental sales information to understand and analyze our underlying trends and other aspects of our financial performance. From time to time, we may also exclude other items from reported financial results (e.g., impairment charges, inventory adjustments, restructuring charges, etc.) so that both management and financial statement users can use these non-GAAP financial measures to better understand and evaluate our performance period over period and to analyze the underlying trends of our business.
Non-GAAP financial measures provide insight into selected financial information and should be evaluated in the context in which they are presented. These non-GAAP financial measures have limitations as analytical tools, and should not be considered in isolation from, or as a substitute for, financial information presented in compliance with GAAP. Non-GAAP financial measures, as reported by us, may not be comparable to similarly titled amounts reported by other companies. The non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in conjunction with the Condensed Consolidated Financial Statements and Management's analysis of financial condition and results of operations included in this report. Management does not use these non-GAAP financial measures for any purpose other than the reasons stated above.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AXE/AXE-8K-20130510155956.txt.gz
TIME:20130510155956
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
The annual meeting of stockholders was held May 9, 2013. In connection with the meeting, proxies were solicited pursuant to the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934. The following are the voting results on proposals considered and voted upon at the meeting, all of which were described in the Company's 2013 Proxy Statement filed on April 4, 2013.
(1) The Directors of the Company were elected as follows:
(2) An advisory proposal on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers was approved by a vote of 28,946,857 shares "for" and 290,907 shares "against" with 247,523 shares abstaining. There were 1,177,829 broker non-votes.
(3) The stockholders ratified the appointment of Ernst & Young LLP as the Company's independent auditors for the fiscal year 2013 by a vote of 30,227,317 shares "for" and 212,960 shares "against" with 222,839 shares abstaining.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
